[ [ 'HEADNOTE
Arbitration
Arbitration Act, 1940
Sections 14 ,20 and 31 -Code of Civil Procedure, 1908 - Section 20 Arbitration award -Application for making the award a rule of the court - Territorial jurisdiction of the court - Determination - Agreement between appellant and respondent with regard to development of certain land and construction there on- Land located in New Delhi - Owner of the land residing in Faridabad, Haryana - Developer company having its registered office in New Delhi - Disputes between the parties - Arbitrator making an award notwithstanding the pendency of the application under Section 20 made by the appellant land owner in the High Court - Respondent developer making an application under Section 14 in the Faridabad court for making the award the rule of the court -Whether the said court has the juris-diction to entertain the application and make the award a rule of the court. Held Section 20 of CPC is attracted and since the appellant resided at Faridabad and the dispute involved rendition of accounts, the court at Faridabad had the jurisdiction to entertain the application under Section 14 to make the award the rule of the court.
HELD
We are of the view that at the relevant time the appellant resided at Faridabad. He resided at Faridabad when the contract was made. Under the contract, the parties agreed to refer all disputes to the Faridabad court. Apart from the residence, we are also concerned with the place of accrual of the cause of action. In the present case, a bare reading of the agreement indicates that it is an agreement to develop. The appellant remains the owner, the Developer remains the contractor. The Developer is the financer. The appellant is the owner of an asset. The contractor/ Developer agrees to exploit that asset on behalf of the owner. The Developer funds the scheme. The building plans remained in the name of the owner. The D.D.A. informs the owner regarding revocation of the building plan. The owner files the writ petition challenging the revocation. The contractor is paid consideration in terms of a part of the property. In the circumstances, it cannot be said that this case is similar to a suit for land. One cannot look at para 16 alone in isolation. On the other hand, with open eyes, theparties had entered into the contract, they had agreed to refer all disputes to an arbitrator at Faridabad and they had agreed that the Faridabad court alone shall have jurisdiction. In a matter of this kind, it can- not be said that the claim is similar to a suit for land. A housing complex has to be constructed at the site. When dispute arises, it will not be confined only to immovable property. Such disputes also require accounts to be maintained. The disputes also involve rendition of accounts. In the circumstances, in our view, section 20 CPC alone is attracted. Therefore, in our view, the High Court was right in holding that the Faridabad court had jurisdiction to make the Award the rule of the court. (Para 16)

Arbitration Act, 1940
Sections 8 , 14 to 17 and 20 - Arbitration - Ex parte award - Validity - Distinction and applicability of Sections 8 and 20 - Reference made to Arbitrator on 24-8-1992 - On the date fixed for hearing arbitrator not entering presence - However award made after fourteen months that too after one party moved an application under Section 20 in the High Court - Trial court making the award rule of the court by an ex parte order - Validity. Without going into the merits held that the order of the trial court was not sustainable. Matter accordingly directed to be restored to file of the trial court for re-examination as to whether the award given by the arbitrator should or should not be made rule of the court.
HELD
We have also gone through the Award. We do not wish to express any opinion on the merits, however, the fact remains that the arbitrator entered upon the reference on 24.8.1992. He fixed 06 passed by the trial court at Faridabad making Award dated 29.3.1994 the rule of the court. Consequently, we direct restoration of the matter to the file of the Court of Additional Civil Judge (Senior Division), Faridabad in Case No. 7 instituted on 12.4.1994 titled M/s Chopra Land Developers Pvt. Ltd. v. Jatinder Nath and Anr.. We may clarify that the trial court will proceed on the basis that it has territorial jurisdiction to decide the application made by the Developer under sections 14 to 17 of the Act. The said application will be decided on merits alone in accordance with law. In other words, the trial court will re-examine the question on merits as to whether the Award given by the arbitrator on 29.3.1994 should or should not be made the rule of the court. The trial court will have to decide whether to extend the period for making the Award or not, whether to supercede the reference or not. The trial court will proceed in accordance with law. Any observation on the merits of the case mentioned hereinabove shall not be treated as opinion of this Court. Further, the trial court will proceed on the basis that it has territorial jurisdiction to decide the above matter. (Para 17)

CASES REFERRED
1. Deena v. Bharat Singh JT 2002 (5) SC 359 (Para 10)

Dr. ARIJIT PASAYAT, J.



1. Leave granted.



2. Challenge in this appeal is to the order passed by a learned Single Judge of the Rajasthan High Court at Jaipur. By the impugned order the High Court dismissed the revision petition, filed by the appellant, and imposed cost of Rs.5,000/- to be paid personally by the Commercial Tax Officer, Anti

Evasion, Bharatpur who passed the assessment order dated 14.9.2001.



3. Background facts in a nutshell are as follows:



3.1. Penalty under Section 78(5) of the Rajasthan Sales Tax Act, 1994 (hereinafter referred to as the Act) was imposed on the respondent (hereinafter referred to as the assessee) on the ground that at the time of checking of vehicle on 7.9.2001, the documents produced showed that bill No.155 dated 29.9.2000 of M/s. George Fischer Disa Limited, Satyamangala Industrial Area, Tumkur, Karnataka raised on the respondent-assessee M/s. Amtek India Ltd., Biwadi along with delivery challan No.

5259 dated 3.9.2001 form No. ST-18A in which invoice No.155 was also mentioned and form No.ST -39 prescribed under Karnataka Sales Tax Act and bilty of North Eastern Carrying Corporation accompanying the said goods were produced for verification. However, date of  the said invoice No.155 dated 16.2.2000, was held to be of an earlier point of time than the date mentioned in the delivery challan of 3.9.2001. Therefore, the Assessing Authority held that said document was doubtful and there was non-compliance with Section 78(2)(a) of the Act, and imposed the penalty of Rs.1,36,200/- @ 30% of value of goods on the respondent-assessee, the consignee or purchaser.



3.2. According to the assessee, plant and machinery and equipments purchased by respondent-assessee from the consignor though purchased under invoice No.155 dated 16.2.2000 in which due excise duty and Central Sales Tax @ 4% against C-Form was charged by the seller, but the goods were consigned and received after the lapse of about one year.



3.3. But that cannot mean that invoice raised by seller-company was not genuine and, therefore, the penalty was not justified.



3.4. Both the Appellate Authorities i.e. D.C. (Appeals) as well as Tax Board found the said explanation of the assessee satisfactory and correct and, therefore, set aside the penalty under Section 78(5) of the Act. The revenue filed a revision petition before the High Court under Section 86 of the Act on the supposed question of law arising in the matter. The High Court found that as a matter of fact none arises.



3.5. In the Revision Petition filed, the correctness of views expressed by the Appellate Authority i.e. the DC (Appeals) and the Tax Board were questioned. The High Court found that all relevant documents were produced, the declarations issued by the Sales Tax Authorities of both the States clearly established that transit and transactions were perfectly genuine and there was no reason for the Assessing Authority to hold the document to be non-genuine so as to attract levy of penalty at the rate of 30% of the value of goods under Section 38(5) of the Act. The High Court felt that the action of the authorities cannot be countenanced and they cannot take the plea of good faith. The alleged good faith was not established and on the contrary the action clearly indicated that the assessing officer was bent upon levying the demand overlooking the genuine documents. Accordingly, the revision petition was dismissed and costs were imposed.

4. Learned counsel for the appellant submitted that an error of judgment should not be treated as a mala fide action so as to warrant the severe criticism as done by the High Court and also to warrant imposition of cost.



5. There is no appearance on behalf of the respondent in spite of notice.



6. Whether an act has been done in good faith would depend upon the factual scenario. In order to establish good faith, it has to be established that what has been imputed concerning the person claiming it to be so, is true.



7. Good Faith according to the definition in Section 3(22) of the General Clauses Act, 1897 means a thing, which is in fact done honestly whether it is done negligently or not.



8. Anything done with due care and attention, which is not mala fide is presumed to have been done in good faith.



9. Good Faith is defined under Section 2(h) of the Limitation Act, as good faith- nothing shall be deemed to be done in good faith which is not done with due care and attention



10. Dealing with a case under the Indian Limitation Act, 1963, this Court held that the expression good faith as used in Section 14 means exercise of due care and attention. In the context of Section 14, the expression good faith qualifies prosecuting the proceeding in the court, which ultimately is found to have no jurisdiction. The finding as to good faith or the absence of it is a finding of fact. See Deena v. Bharat Singh1



11. Section 52 of the Indian Penal Code, 1860 (in short IPC) emphasizes due care and attention in relation to good faith.



12. In this case though the action of the concerned assessing officer, in overlooking the documents produced coming to the conclusion about manipulation appears to be totally uncalled for and without any reasonable basis. This is a case where the officer should have been more careful and should not have acted in a manner as if he was a bloodhound and not a watchdog of revenue. It is unfortunate that in large number of cases, orders totally bereft of rationality are being passed. They do not in any manner serve public interest, much less the interest of revenue.



13. Therefore, while holding that the action of the Assessing Authority was clearly unjustified, we direct deletion of the direction for imposition of cost. We, however, make it clear that in future if any such action comes to the notice of the Courts/Authorities, appropriate action shall be taken in accordance with law and the observations made in this case about lack of bona fide shall also be a factor to be taken note of.


**********', 0] , 
[ 'CROSS CITATION
1968 SCR (2) 661

CIVIL APPELLATE JURISDICTION : Civil Appeal No. 454 of 1965. Appealfrom the Judgment and order October 7, 1963 of the Rajasthan High Court in D. B. Civil Writ Petition No. 482 of 1962. M. C. Chagla, K. B. Mehta and Indu Soni, for the appellants.

R. K. Garg, D. P. Singh, S. C. Agarwala, Shivpujan Singh and Anil Kumar Gupta, for the respondents.

The Judgment of the Court was delivered by

Ramaswami, J. This appeal is brought, by certificate,from the judgment of the Rajasthan High Court dated October 7, 1963 in D. B. Civil Writ Petition no. 482 of 1962. By its judgment the High Court allowed the Writ Petition filed by the respondents and quashed the orders of the Board of Revenue datedJuly 24, 1959, April 8, 1960 and July 16, 1962. The jagir of respondent no. 1, Rao Bal Deo Singh was resumed with effect from August 15, 1954 under the provisions of the 663 Rajasthan Land Reforms and Resumption of Jagirs Act,1952 (Act no. VI of 1952), hereinafter referred to as the Act. A notice was issued by the Collector, Bikaner to respondent no. 1, on August 23, 1954 asking him to hand over the charge of the jagir but respondent no. 1 did not comply with the notice as he had filed a writ application in the High Court challenging the validity of the Act. A subsequent notice was issued to respondent no. 1, by the Collector on May 14, 1955 directing him to hand over charge of the jagir. Respondent no. 1 actually handed over charge of the jagir on September 27, 1955 and at the same time submitted alist of his private properties under s. 23 of the Act. In the said list was included 5490 bighas and odd ofagricultural land in villages Mirgarh, Anandgarh and Rawla in Ganganagar district and Anupgarh in Bikaner district which respondent no. 1claimed as his khudkasht land.On March 18,1957 respondent no.1 madean application to the Tahsildar, Anupgarh to correct entries in the revenue records and to show the area claimed by him as his khudkasht land. After an enquiry the Tahsildar, Anupgarh forwarded the application to the Assistant Collector, Ganganagar recommending the correction of the entries as prayed for by respondent no. 1. The Assistant Collector forwarded the papers to the Collector, Ganganagarwho recommended to the, Divisional Commissioner, Bikaner that the correction of entries may be made.By his order dated November 30, 1958 the Divisional Commissioner, Bikaneraccorded sanction and directed the Collector to enter the disputed lands in the revenue records as khudkasht lands of respondent no. 1. On appeal to the Board of Revenue the case was remanded to the Divisional Commissioner on July24, 1959 with a direction that he shouldrefer the matter to the Jagir Commissioner andtill his decision was received the entries in the revenue record shouldnot be altered. It appears that the record of the case was transmitted for compliance to the Sub-Divisional Officer, Raisinghnagar by the office of the Commissioner of Bikaner, who,after making an enquiry, submitted his recommendation to the Jagir Commissioner instead of sending it to the Divisional Commissioner to correct the relevant entries. Meanwhile, the Director of Colonisation came to know of the proceedings which were going on and therefore he addressed a letter on December 22, 1958 to the Divisional Commissioner, Bikaner to review his order dated November 30, 1958 and requested him to refer the matter to the Jagir Commissioner who wasthe only competent authority to determine the nature of the disputed property under s. 23(2) of the Act. On receipt of the said letter the Divisional Commissioner reviewedhis previous order of November 30, 1958 and ultimately dismissed the objections of Director of Colonisation on March 5, 1959. It appears that the Additional Jagir Commissioner after receiving the papers from the Sub-Divisional Officer, Raisinghnagar also decided the matter on 664 October 5, 1959 holding that the disputed land should be treated as the personal property ofthe ex-Jagirdar of Sattasar. The State of Rajasthan preferred appeals to the Board of Revenue against the orders of the Commissioner, Bikaner datedMarch 5, 1959 and against the order of the Additional Jagir Commissioner dated October 5, 1959. By its judgment dated July 24, 1959 the Board of Revenue set aside the order of the Commissioner of Bikaner and directed him to decidethe case after referring the matter to the Jagir Commissioner for determining the nature of the property under s. 23(2) of the Act. By its order dated April 8, 1960 the Board of Revenue quashed the order of the Additional Jagir Commissioner and remanded the case to him with the direction that he should dispose of the matter after proper enquiry in accordance with the provisions of the Rules framed under the Act. Respondent no. 1 preferred a review against the order of the Board of Revenue dated April 8, 1960 but the review petition was dismissed by the Board of Revenue on July 16, 1962. Respondent no. 1 thereafter moved the High Court of Rajasthan for the grant of a writ under Art. 226 of the Constitution. By its judgment dated October 7, 1963 the Rajasthan High Court allowed the Writ Petition and quashed the orders of the Board of Revenue datedJuly 24, 1959, April 8, 1960 and July 16, 1962, holding that no enquiry under s. 23(2) of the Act was necessary in thecase and the matter required to be disposed in accordancewith the procedure laid down in the Rajasthan Land RevenueAct, 1956 (Act. no. 15 of 1956) regarding the correction of entries. The High Court accordingly directed that the Board of Revenue may either itself dispose the appeal if no further material was required for the purpose or maypass such orders which the circumstancesrequired for final disposal of the case.

It is necessary at this stage to set out the provisions of the relevant statutes. On February 13, 1952 the Rajasthan Legislature enacted the Act to provide for the resumption of jagir lands.Under s. 21 of the Act the Government of Rajasthan was empowered to issue a notification appointing a date for the resumption of any class of jagir lands and under s. 22 of the Act the right, title and interest of the Jagirdar in his jagir lands stood resumed to the Government free from all encumbrances as from the date of resumption notified under s. 21. Section 23 of the Act, however, provided that the khudkasht lands of the jagirdar shall be continued to be held by the jagirdar. Section 23 states

23. Private lands, buildings, wells, house

sites and enclosures.-(1) Notwithstanding

anythingcontained in the last preceding

section-

(a) Khudkasht lands of a Jagirdar;

6 6 5

(b) (i) all open enclosures used for

agricultural. or domestic purposes and in his

continuous possession (which including

possession of any predecessor-in-interest) for

six years immediately before the date of

resumption;

(ii)

(iii) all private buildings, places of

worship,and wells situated in, and trees

standing on lands, included in such enclosures

or house-sites, as are specified in clause (i)

above, or land appertaining to such buildings

or places of -worship;

(iv) all groves and fruit trees wherever

situate, belonging to or held by the Jagirdar

or any other person;

(c) all private wells and buildings

belonging to or held bythe Jagirdar or any

other person;

(d) all tanks in the personal occupation of

the Jagirdar and not used for irrigating the

lands of any tenant in the jagir land;

shall continue to belong to or be held by such

Jagirdar or other person:

(2) Ifany question arises whether any

property is of the nature referred to insub-

section (1), it shall be referred to the Jagir

Commissioner, who may,after holding the

prescribed enquiry, make such order thereon as

he deems fit.

Section 2(i)defines Khudkasht to mean anyland cultivated personally by a jagirdar and includes : (i) any land recordedas khudkasht, Sir, or Hawala in settlement records; and (ii) any land allotted to aJagirdar as khudkasht under Chapter IV. Section 37 reads as follows :

37. Question of title.-(1) If in the course

of a proceeding under this Act any question

relatingto title, right or interest in any

jagir land, other than a question as to any

khudkasht land or the correctness or otherwise

of any entry relating thereto in settlement

records or as to any boundary,map, field-

book, record of rights or annual register or

as to any Wazib-ul-arz or Dasturganwai or any

other settlement paper lawfully prepared or as

to the correctness or otherwise of any entry

made

666

therein or a question referred to in section 3

of the Rajasthan Jagir Decisions and

Proceedings (Validation) Act, 1955, arises and

the question so arising has not alreadybeen

determined by a competent authority, the Jagir

Commissioner shall proceed to make an inquiry

into the merits of the question so arising and

pass such orders thereon as he deems fit.

(2) Every question referred to in section 3

of the Rajasthan Jagir Decision and

Proceedings (Validation) Act, 1955 shall be

inquired into and decided by a revenue officer

or court declared by the provisions of the

said Act competent to do so.

(3) Every other question excluded bysub-

section

(1) from the jurisdiction of the Jagir

Commissioner shall beinquired into and

decidedby a revenueofficer or court

competent to do so under the provisions of the

Rajasthan Land Revenue Act, 1956 or the Rules

made thereunder.

(4) Ifany such question as is referred to

in subsections (2) and (3) arises in the

course of a proceeding under this Act, the

Jagir Commissioner shall refer it for inquiry

and decision of the court competent to do so

and shall be bound by, and act according to

such decision.

Section 46 provides

Bar of Jurisdiction.-( 1) Save as otherwise

providedin this Act, no Civil or Revenue

Court shall have jurisdiction in respect of

any matter which is required tobe settled,

decided or dealt withby any officer or

authority under this Act.

(2) Noorder made by any such officer or

authority under this Act shall be called in

question in any Court.

Section 47 states :

Act to override other laws.-Save as otherwise

expressly provided in this Act, the provisions

of this Act and of the rules and ordersmade

thereunder shall have effect notwithstanding

any thing therein contained being inconsistent

with any existing Jagir law or any other law

for the time being in force.

Rules 22, 23, 24, 26 and 28 of the Rajasthan Land Reforms and Resumption of Jagir Rules, 1954 are to the following effect :

:22. Submission oflist of personal

properties by Jagirdars.-(1) The Jagirdar

shall submit to the officers taking oversuch

charge a list of the properties which he

667

claims as his private and personal properties

under subsection (1) of section 23 of the Act.

(2) Copies ofsuch list shall be annexed

with the

reports submitted under rule 21 of sub-rule

(3).

(3) Ifthe officer taking over such charge

is of the

opinion that any item of property included in

the list submitted under sub-rule (1) is not

the property which the jagirdar is entitled to

hold under sub-section (1) of section 23 of

the Act, he shall record reasons forsuch

opinion and refer the matter to the Jagir

Commissioner under sub-section (2) of section

23 of the Act. While making the report under

rule 21, sub-rule (3), a copy ofsuch

reference shall be forwarded to the Government

as well as to the Collector of the District in

which the property in dispute is situated :

Providedthat where the officer deputed to

take over charge of a jagir is below therank

of Tehsildar he shall submit his opinion to

the Tehsildar concerned who shall refer the

same with his opinion to the Jagir

Commissioner.

(4) A copy of such list shall also be

affixed on the notice board of the Tehsil

concerned, and the Municipal Board or Village

Panchayat concerned shall be informedthat

they may see the list in the Tehsil and submit

their objections, if any, to the inclusion of

any property or part of it in the list to the

Tehsildar within a specified time.

(5) The Tehsildar may extend thetime

specified by him under sub-rule (4), if he is

satisfied that there are sufficient grounds

for doing so and shall submit the objections

received from the Municipal Board or thePan-

chayat with his opinion to the Jagir

Commissioner through the Collector.

23. Inquiry by Jagir Commissioner in the

matter of personal properties.-(1)Upon

receiptof a reference under thelast

preceding rule, or where he decides to review

the list on his own motion, the Jagir Commis-

sioner shall appoint a date for holding an

inquiry into the matter.Such date shall not

be less than two months from the date of the

order and a public notice thereof shall be

issued within a week of such order.

(2) Instead of holding the enquiry himself

under sub-rule (1) the Jagir Commissioner may

entrust the enquiry to any officer not below

the rank of an Assistant Jagir Commissioner or

Sub-Divisional Officer.

668

24. Notice how to be served. (1) The notice

given under rule 23 shall be served on the

Jagirdarconcerned, the Revenue Secretary to

the Government and the Collector of the

districtin which the property in dispute is

situatedin the manner provided for the

service of summons on a defendant in asuit

under the Code of Civil Procedure, 1908.

(2) Copies of the notice shall be sent to

the Tehsildar

within whose jurisdiction the property in

dispute is

situated :-

(a) for being proclaimed by beat of drum to

the

inhabitants ofthe localitywheresuch

property is situated;

(b) for being exhibited at some conspicuous

place in such locality; and

(c) for beingposted, thereafter on the

notice board of the Tehsil.

26. Who may contest.-(1) The State shall be

represented at such inquiry by the Collector

or any other Officer not below the rank of a

Naib Tehsildar as the Collector may by order

in writing appoint in that behalf.

(2) Ifany inhabitants of thelocality in

which the property in dispute is situated are

in any manner interested therein, they may

contest the claim of the Jagirdar in respect

thereof and may jointly appoint one ormore

persons not exceeding three in number to

represent them at such inquiry.

28. Mode of inquiryregarding personal

properties.-The Jagir Commissioner or the

officer holding the inquiry shall allow the

Jagirdar, the State and the inhabitants of the

locality desiring to contest the claim of the

Jagirdarreasonable opportunity to prove or

disprovetheir respective contentions. The

enquiry shall be held in the manner provided

for the trial of a suit by a Revenue Court,

and where the enquiry has been held by any

officer other than the Jagir Commissioner such

officer shall submit the record with a report

of his findings to the Jagir Commissioner for

his orders.

Section 122 of the Rajasthan Land Revenue Act, 1956 provides -as follows :

122. Attestation of entries and decision of

disputes -All undisputed entries in the record

of rights shall be attested bythe parties

interested, and all disputes

669

regarding such entries, whether taken up by

the Land Records Officer of his own motion or

upon application by any party interested,

shall be disposed of by him in accordance with

the provisions of sections 123, 124 and 125.

Section 125 is to the following effect

125. Settlement of disputes as to entries in

record of rights.-(1) All other disputes

regarding entries on the record of rights

shall be decided on the basis of possession.

(2) Ifin the course of inquiry into a

dispute under this section the Land Records

Officer is unable to satisfy himself as to

which party is in possession, he shall as-

certain by summary enquiry who is the person

best entitled to possession and shall decide

the dispute accordingly.

(3) Noorder as to possession passed under

this section shall debar anypersonfrom

establishing his right to the property in any

civil or revenue court having jurisdiction.

Section 136 reads

136. Decisionof disputes.-All disputes

respecting the class or tenure of any tenant

or regarding the rent or revenue payable or

regarding entries in the annual registers

shall be decided in accordance with the provi-

sions of section 123 or section 124 or section

125, as the case may be.

On behalf of the appellants Mr. M. C. Chagla put forward the argument that the High Court erred in law in holdingthat the dispute in the present case merely related to the correction ofentries envisaged in ss. 122 to 125 of the Rajasthan Land Revenue Act, 1956 and as suchthe Revenue Authorities were competent to ordercorrection ofsuch entries. It was submitted that the question as to whether the land claimed by respondent No.1was khudkashtland withinthe meaning of s. 23(1)(a) read with s. 2(i) of the Act was a matter which the Jagir Commissionalone could determine under s. 23(2) of the Act and the jurisdiction of other authorities was completely barred. The argument was stressed that the disputebetween the parties was essentially adispute relating to the character of the properties claimed to be khudkasht by respondent No. 1 and therefore the Jagir Commissioner had the exclusive jurisdiction to determine that question under s. 23(2) of the Act. It is true that respondent No. 1 had applied for correction ofentries in the revenue records but the correction ofrevenue records really depended upon the deter-670 mination of the character of the disputed property and unless it was held by competent authority under the Act that the property was khudkasht land of the Jagirdar the application of respondent no. 1 for the correction of the revenue entries could not be decided by the Revenue Authorities under the provisions ofthe RajasthanLand Revenue Act.To put it differently, the argument of the appellants was that the real question that arose for determination was whether the disputed land was khudkasbt under s. 23(1) of the Act and by taking recourse to the provisions of the Rajasthan Land Revenue Act respondent no. I could not oust the jurisdiction of the JagirCommissioner for determination ofthe dispute. In ouropinion the argument put forward by Mr. M. C. Chagla on behalf of the appellants is well-founded and must be accepted is correct. The dispute in this case is essentially as to the character of the property claimed by respondent no. 1 as khudkasht and falls directly within the purview of S. 23 of the Act and therefore the Jagir Commissioner is the exclusive authority to hold enquiry into the dispute and give a decision thereon. The language of s. 23 of the Act is peremptory in character andthe section requires that if any question arises whether any property is of the nature referred to in sub-s. (1), it shall be referred to the Jagir Commissioner, who may, after holding the prescribed enquiry, makesuch order thereonas he deems fit. Section 46of the Act relates to bar of jurisdiction and states that no Civil or Revenue Courtshall have jurisdiction in respect of any matterwhich is required to be settled, decided or dealt with by any officer or authority under the Act. The section makes furtherprovision that no order made by anysuch officer or authorityunder the Act shall be called in question in any Court.Section 47 expressly states that the provisions ofthe Act and of the rules andordersmade thereunder shall have effect notwithstanding anything therein contained being inconsistent with any existing Jagir law or any other law for the time being in force. Reading S. 23 of the Act in the context of ss. 46 and 47 of the Act it is manifest that an exclusive jurisdiction is conferred upon the Jagir Commissioner to decide the question as to whether any property of the Jagirdar is of the nature of khudkasht and the decision of the Jagir Commissioner on this question is final and cannot be challenged collaterally in a Civil or Revenue Court. It is true that ss. 125 and 136 of the Rajasthan Land Revenue Act confer power on theLand Records Officer to decide disputes with regard to the entries in the record of rights or in the annual registers, as the case may be. But neither the Land Records Officer nor any other Revenue Courts contemplated by the Rajasthan Land Revenue Act have jurisdiction to enquire into the question whether the property claimed by theJagirdar is khudkasht within themeaning of S. 23 of the Act. The reason is that the Rajasthan Land Reforms and Resumption of JagirsAct, 1952 is a special Act and the general maxim is that a subsequent Gene-671 ral Act does not affect a prior special Act by implication.-Generaliaspecialibus non derogant.-When the legislature has given its attention to a separate subject and made provision for it, the presumption is that a subsequent general enactment is not intended to interfere with the special provision unless it manifests that intention very clearly. Each enactment must be construed in that respect according to its own subject-matter and its own terms. (Barker v. Edger) (1). We are accordingly of the opinion that an enquiry under S. 23(2) of the Act was necessary in this case and that the Board ofRevenue was right in taking the view that the matter should be referred to the Jagir Commissioner for determining the nature of the property under S. 23(2) of the Act and only after his decision is received should the Commissioner, Bikanertake up the question with regard to the correction of entries under the Rajasthan Land Revenue Act. We consider that the order of the Board of Revenue dated July 24, 1959 is based on a correct interpretation of the law and the High Court of Rajasthan was in error in setting aside that order. On behalf of the respondents it was contended that s. 23 of the Act must be read along with s. 37 and since the Jagir Commissioner is not given any authority under s. 37 tomake any enquiry with regard to the khudkasht land of the Jagirdar it must be held that under s. 23 of the Actalso the Jagir Commissioner had no jurisdiction to make such an enquiry. In our opinion, there is no justification for this argument. In our view, s. 23 of the Act is independent of s. 37 of the Act as it deals with an enquiry of the nature of the property mentioned in s. 23(1), and it has nothing to do with the question of determining the right, title or interest of the Jagirdar in the land. Having regard to the schemeand purpose of the Act it is manifestthat s. 23 empowers the Jagir Commissioner to determine the character of the properties claimed by the Jagirdar as kliudkasht for determination of the compensation to be paid and determining other questions which are incidental to the resumption of the jagir land. On the other hand, s. 37 of the Act deals with questions of disputed titles and with regard to such a question the section makes a provision for enquiry either by the Jagir Commissioner or by a revenue authority under the Rajasthan Land Revenue Act, 1956. It is manifest that the scope of s. 37 is quite different from that of s. 23 and the nature of the enquiry contemplated by the two sectionsalso is different. As we have already pointed out, the question arising in the present case falls directly within the ambit of S. 23 of the Act and the Jagir Commissioner alone has the exclusive jurisdiction to determine that question. It was objected on behalf of the respondents that, in any case, the question cannot be determined by the Jagir Commissioner after

(1) 1898 A.C. 748. 672 the resumption proceedings had come to an end.It wassaid that after the proceedings for resumption were completed under the Act and award of compensation has been made, there is no jurisdiction left in the Jagir Commissioner to proceed with an enquiry under S. 23(2) of the Act. For the purpose of this caseit is not necessary for us toexpress any opinion as to whether the Jagir Commissioner has jurisdiction to make an enquiry under S. 23(2) of the Act after the proceedings for resumption have come to a close. It appears that in the present case theDirector of Colonisation addressed a letter to the Divisional Commissioner, Bikaner on December 22, 1958 for review of his order dated November 30, 1958 and that he also requested that the matter should be referred to the Jagir Commissioner as hewas the only competent authority to determine the natureof the disputed property under S. 23(2) of theAct. On receipt of this letter the Divisional Commissioner, Bikaner reviewed his previous order of November 30, 1958 and dismissed theobjections of Directorof Colonisation on March 5, 1959.It is admitted that the final award was made by the Additional Jagir Commissioner with regard to compensation on January 20, 1959. We shall assume in favour of the respondents that the proceedings for resumptioncame to a close on January 20, 1959. Even on that assumption the dispute was raised by the Directorof Colonisation on December 22, 1958, long before the date of the final award on January 20, 1959 and the Jagir Commissioner had jurisdiction to proceed with the enquiry under S. 23(2) of the Act since the proceedings for resumption were still pending. We are accordingly of the opinion that Counsel for the respondents is unable to make good his argument onthis aspect of the case.

We proceed to consider the next question arising inthis case, viz. whether the High Court was in error in setting aside the orders of the Board of Revenue dated April 8, 1960 and July 16, 1962. The Board of Revenue haspointed out that the decision of the Additional Jagir Commissioner dated October 5, 1959 was illegal since he did not follow the procedure contemplated by Rules 23 and 26 of the Rajasthan Land Reforms and Resumption of Jagir Rules,1954 (hereinafter referred to as the Rules). It appearsthat by its previous order dated July 24, 1959 the Board of Revenue had set aside theordersof the Divisional Commissioner dated November 30, 1958 and March 5, 1959 and the matter was remanded to him with the direction to refer the matter to the Jagir Commissioner and till the decision of the JagirCommissioner was received entries in the records should stand as they stood prior to the impugned orders. In compliance with this decision the record was transmitted to the Sub-Divisional Officer, Ganganagar by the office of the Commissioner, Bikaner who in turn sent them on August24, 1959 to the Sub-Divisional Officer, Raisinghnagar. The letter reached the Sub-Divisional Officer, Raisingh-673 nagar on August 29, 1959 and on it the Sub-Divisional Officer wrotedown the following order: Received today, informthe parties to appear before me on 5-9-59 : It appears that on September 5, 1959 Shri Murlidhar andShri Sada Nand appeared before the Sub-Divisional Officer, statements of5 persons were recorded and argumentswere heard and the case was directed to be put up for writing out the report on September 9, 1959. On this date theSubDivisional Officer wrote out the report and forwarded the papers to the Additional Jagir Commissioner. On October 1, 1959, the Additional Jagir Commissioner heard the arguments of the parties and pronounced his decision on October 5, 1959. The Board of Revenue has pointed out that underRule 23 a date not less than 2 months from the date of the order should have been fixed for hearing of the case and published notice should have been served not only on the Jagirdar but also upon the Revenue Secretary to the Government and the Collector of the district. Rule 28 states that the mode of inquiry was that provided for the trial of a suit by a Revenue court.The Sub-Divisional Officerinstead of following the rules fixed the date of hearing within a week of the receipt of the order and within further 5days submitted his report without giving the notices under Rules 23 and 24 and without holding the enquiry in the manner prescribed by Rule 28. The Board of Revenue accordingly set aside the order of the Additional Jagir Commissioner dated October 5, 1959 and remanded the case back to him with the direction that he should hold the enquiry himself or may entrust the enquiry under the provisions of s. 23(2) of the Act to a Subordinate Officer and that the enquiry must be held in either case in accordance with law and thecase shouldbe decided thereafter afresh. In our opinion, the Board of Revenue was right in taking the view that the Additional Jagir Commissioner should have followed theprocedure prescribed by the statutory rules and the High Court had no justification for setting aside the order of the Board of Revenue dated April 8, 1960 and of July 16, 1962. For the reasons expressed we hold that the order of the Rajasthan High Court dated October 7, 1963 quashing the orders of the Board of Revenue dated July 24, 1959, April 8, 1960 and July 16, 1962 should be set aside and CivilWrit Petition No. 482 of 1962 filed by the respondents should be dismissed. We accordingly allow this appeal and set aside the judgment of the Rajasthan High Court dated October 7, 1963, but in the circumstances of the case there will be no order as to costs.

Y.P. Appeal

allowed. 674
**********', 0] , 
[ 'HEADNOTE
LAND ACQUISITION

Land Acquisition Act, 1894

Sections 4, 6, 18 and 30 - Bihar Public Land Encroachment Act, 1956 - Sections 2(3) and 3 - Land Acquisition - Compensation for acquisition - Disputes relating to apportionment of compensation - Reference of such disputes by the collector to the decision of court - When permissible - Meaning of person interested within the meaning of section 3(b) - State proceeding to acquire a certain land on the assumption that it belonged to a particular person - Subsequently however state calling in question the award made by the collector and seeking reference under section 30 on the premise that the land did not belong to the person from whom it was purportedly acquired but was a land owned by the state having vested in it consequent upon the abolition of proprietary rights much before the acquisition - Whether state is an interested person within the meaning of section 3(b) - Whether the reference under section 30 maintainable - Allowing the appeal and setting aside the judgment of the division bench and restoring that of the single judge held, state cannot be considered to be an interested person. A dispute as to pre existing right or interest of the state government in the property sought to be acquired is not a dispute capable of being adjudicated upon or referred to the civil court for determination either under section 18 or 30. Therefore the reference was wholly without jurisdiction and therefore all proceedings under section 30 are null. State however not debarred from pursuing such other legal remedy as may be available to it.

HELD


State is not a person interested as defined in section 3(b) of the Act.  It is not a party to the proceedings before the collector in the sense, which the expression parties to the litigation carries.  The collector holds the proceedings and makes an award as a representative of the state government.  Land or an interest in land pre-owned by state cannot be subject matter of acquisition by state. The question of deciding the ownership of State or holding of any interest by the state government in proceedings before the collector cannot arise in proceedings before the collector (as defined in section 3(c) of the Act).  If it was a government land there was no question of initiating the proceedings for acquisition at all.  The government would not acquire the land, which already vests in it.  A dispute as to pre-existing right or interest of the State government in the property sought to be acquired is not a dispute capable of being adjudicated upon or referred to the civil court for determination either under Section 18 or section 30 of the Act.  The reference made by the collector to the court was wholly without jurisdiction and the civil court ought to have refused to entertain the reference and ought to have rejected the same.  All the proceedings under section 30 of the Act beginning from the reference and adjudication thereon by the court suffer from lack of inherent jurisdiction and are therefore a nullity liable to be declared so. (Para 24)



Quashing of the proceedings under section 30 of the Land Acquisition Act would not debar the state from pursuing such other legal remedy before such other forum as may be available to the state government and on the merits and the maintainability thereof we express no opinion herein.  Secondly, the situation in law would have been entirely different if the title of the appellant would have come to an end by any event happening or change taking place after the making of the award by the collector as was the case in Dr. G.H. Grant v. State of Bihar - (1965) 3 SCR 576 (Para 25)

CASES REFERRED
1.Scindia Employees Union v. State of Maharashtra and Ors. (1996) 10 SCC 150 (Para 15)


2.State of Maharashtra v. Sant Joginder Singh Kishan Singh and Ors. 1995 Supp (2) SCC 475 (Para 15)


3.Dr. G.H. Grant  v. State of Bihar  (1965) 3 SCR 576 (Para 11, 25)


4.Kothamasu Kanakarathamma and Ors. v. State of Andhra Pradesh and Ors. AIR 1965 SC 304 (Para 23)


5.Collector of Bombay v. Nusurwanji Rattanji Mistri & Others, AIR 1955 SC 298) (Para 11)


6.Secretary of State v. Sri Narain Khanna AIR 1942 PC 35 (Para 17)


7.Mohammad Wajeeh Mirza v. Secretary of State for India in Council AIR 1921 Oudh 31 (Para 20)


8.In the matter of the Land Acquisition Act : Govt. of Bombay v. Esufali Salebhai 34 Bom 618 (at page 636) (Para 18)


9.Deputy Collector, Calicut Division v. Aiyavu Pillay, 9 Ind Cas 341 (Mad) (Para 19)


10.Nusserwanjee Pestonjee v. Meer Mynoodeen Khan Wullud Meer Sudroodeen Khan Bahadoor 6 Moo Ind App 134 (Para 23)


R.C. LAHOTI, J.

1. The land, which is the subject matter of controversy in these proceedings, is 36.86 acres area out of the total area of 45.92 acres of land of plot nos. 4, 5 and 10 appertaining to khata no. 151 of village Phulsari, district Lohardaga. Notification under section 4(1) of the Land Acquisition Act, 1894 (hereinafter the Act for short) was issued on 16.02.1982 for acquiring the said land for the project called Phulsari Sapathi Nala. Declaration under section 6 of the Act was issued on 25.05.1982. Objections under section 9 of the Act were filed by the appellant herein. The state through circle officer, Kuru filed reply to the objections. On 19.02.1986 the collector made an award under section 11 of the Act directing the compensation, as appointed by him, to be paid to Smt. Sharda Devi, the appellant.

2. The relevant facts, which are beyond the pale of controversy at this stage and as would set out briefly the history of litigation, may be noticed. According to the appellant, the said land was Gairmajrua Malik land. It was a part of zamindari estate. Before vesting of zamindari, the land was settled by the ex-landlord in the name of one Deo Narain Prasad by means of a registered deed of settlement dated 24.04.1954. It was a raiyati settlement. The appellant purchased the land from the said Deo Narain Prasad through a registered deed of sale dated 07.09.1962. The appellant has developed the land and kept it under cultivation raising the crops. Her name was mutated in the revenue records by the circle officer. A correction slip was issued to her in her name. The state realized revenue from her from the very date of vesting, i.e. from 1955 till 1975. The rent receipts were exhibited on record.

3. On 18.05.1979, the circle officer issued a notice under section 3 of the Bihar Public Land Encroachment Act, 1956 (Bihar Act XV of 1956) calling upon the appellant to explain why she should not be treated as an encroacher on the land and why her encroachment should not be removed. The notice was issued on the premise that consequent upon vesting of zamindaris, the said land had stood vested in the state of Bihar and was, therefore, public land within the meaning of clause (3) of section 2 of the Bihar Public Land Encroachment Act, 1956. The appellant filed a writ petition in the High Court registered as civil writ jurisdiction case no. 366 of 1979 (R), laying challenge to the initiation of such proceedings. The counsel for the state made appearance though a written counter affidavit was not filed. The High Court after hearing both the parties, upheld the plea of the appellant that the said land was gairmajrua malik and not gairmajrua aam land and by virtue of the registered deed of transfer in favour of Deo Narain Prasad, the predecessor-in-title of the appellant, the appellant was justified in claiming that she was raiyat of the land in question and, therefore, could be ejected therefrom only in accordance with the provisions of the Chota Nagpur Tenancy Act. Inasmuch as such ejectment is permissible only on specified grounds, none of which existed in the present case, the notice issued to the appellant was without jurisdiction and liable to be quashed. The High Court by order dated 23.07.1984 allowed the writ petition and directed the proceedings initiated against the appellant under the provisions of the Bihar Public Land Encroachment Act, 1956 to be quashed.

4. In the year 1981, proceedings under section 4(h) of the Bihar Land Reforms Act, 1950 proposing to annul the settlement of land in question in favour of Deo Narain Prasad were initiated. The proceedings were founded on the premise that the said settlement was done with the object of defeating the provisions of the Act. An inquiry was held. Once again the appellant filed a writ petition seeking quashing of these proceedings. The petition was registered as CWJC No. 1663 of 1981 (R) and disposed of by the High Court by order dated 25.03.1987.

5. During the pendency of these proceedings, notification under section 4(1) of the Act was published on 16.02.1982 as already stated. It appears that the collector was reluctant to make an award in favour of the appellant determining the quantum of compensation and directing its release to the appellant. On 07.01.1985 the collector (addl. collector, exercising powers of collector) passed an order holding that the land had vested in state and hence no award directing payment of compensation to the appellant was called for. The appellant filed a writ petition in the High Court registered as CWJC No. 147 of 1985 (R). By order dated 13.02.1985, the High Court after hearing the learned counsel for the state, directed the writ petition to be allowed. A mandamus was issued to the collector to prepare the award in the name of the appellant. The High Court went on to observe if there be any dispute thereafter, the matter be referred to the civil court under sections 18 and 30 of the Land Acquisition Act for adjudication of any claim in accordance with law. The order dated 07.01.1985 passed by additional collector, Lohardaga was directed to be quashed. On 19.02.1986, the collector (Land Acquisition) prepared an award in the name of Smt. Sharda Devi directing the amount of compensation as determined by him to be paid to Smt. Sharda Devi, the appellant.

6. On 06.06.1986, much after the expiry of six weeks - the time appointed for seeking a reference to the civil court under section 18 of the Act, the circle officer, Kuru filed an application before the collector seeking a reference to the civil court. It was stated in the application that a dispute existed in between the circle officer, Kuru Anchal (on behalf of the state of Bihar) and Smt. Sharda Devi as to title over the acquired land, which dispute may be referred for adjudication to the civil court under section 30 of the Act. The dispute as to whether the title to the land vests in the appellant, so as to entitle her to payment of compensation or whether the appellants title had stood already extinguished in view of the land having vested in state was referred under section 30 of the Act to the decisions of the court. The reference was numbered as L.A. Misc. Case No. 42/86 before the civil court. By order dated 06.09.1986 the civil court directed the reference to be rejected. During the course of its order, the learned special subordinate judge, Ranchi, which is the reference court, opined that Smt. Sharda Devi was an occupancy raiyat of the land in question and, therefore, the award prepared in her name was just and legal.

7. By order dated 25.03.1987, the High Court allowed the writ petition filed by the appellant {CWJC 1663 of 1981 (R)} laying challenge to the proceedings initiated under section 4(h) of the Bihar Land Reforms Act. The result of this decision of the High Court is that the effort of the State seeking annulment of settlement and cancellation of the zamabandhi entries standing in the name of the appellant failed. The appellant was held to have acquired the status of raiyat in respect of the land in question.

8. Against the judgment dated 06.09.1986 passed by the learned special subordinate judge, the state Government preferred an appeal to the High Court. A learned single judge of the High Court, by his judgment dated 25.04.1988 affirmed the judgment of Special subordinate judge and directed the appeal to be dismissed. The state filed a letters patent appeal, which came up for hearing before a division bench of the High Court. The division bench framed five questions of law and directed the matter to be placed before the Chief Justice for constituting a full bench to answer the questions. One of the questions framed by the division bench was : Whether the reference under section 30 of the Land Acquisition Act, 1894 was maintainable at the instance of the state of Bihar ?

9. The questions of law framed, including the question referred to herein above, were answered against the appellant. As a consequence, the letters patent appeal filed by the state was allowed and the case was remanded to the learned single judge for decision of the case in the light of the observations made by the full bench. Feeling aggrieved by the order of remand, the appellant has preferred this appeal by special leave under Article 136 of the Constitution of India.

10. The sole question which arises for decision in this appeal centres around the question referred to herein above, i.e., whether in the facts and circumstances of the case a reference under section 30 of the Act was competent ? In other words, the core question is - when the state proceeds to acquire land on an assumption that it belongs to a particular person, can the award be called into question by the state seeking a reference under section 30 of the Act on the premise that the land did not belong to the person from whom it was purportedly acquired and was a land owned by the state having vested in it, consequent upon abolition of proprietary rights, much before acquisition ?

11. In order to appreciate the controversy, we will briefly examine the scheme of the Land Acquisition Act, 1894, also extracting and reproducing some of the statutory provisions as may be required.

Person interested is defined by clause (b) of section 3 as under :-

the expression person interested includes all persons claiming an interest in compensation to be made on account of the acquisition of land under this Act; and a person shall be deemed to be interested in land if he is interested in an easement affecting the land.

ï¬ Government is not a person interested within the meaning of the above definition (See - Collector of Bombay v. Nusurwanji Rattanji Mistri & Others1). In Dr. G.H. Grant v. State of Bihar2 this Court observed (vide page 584 G): ...............A dispute then arose between the state government and Dr. Grant as to the persons whom compensation was payable. The state had no right to the compensation payable for the land under a title existing before the date of the award of the collector, and no application for reference could be made by the state, as a person interested within the meaning of section 18(1).

ï¬ Whenever it appears to the appropriate government that land in any locality is needed or is likely to be needed for any public purpose etc. a notification to that effect shall be published under section 4 of the Act. Any person interested in any land which has been notified under section 4(1) may prefer objections under section 5A. After the objections have been determined, a declaration under section 6 shall be made which shall be published in the official gazette and in such other manner as prescribed by sub-section (2) of section 6. The appropriate government shall thereafter direct the collector to make order for the acquisition of the land. The land shall be demarcated. Persons interested shall be noticed under section 9 of the governments intention to take possession of the land and inviting claims to compensation for all interests in such land. Enquiry into the objections preferred by persons interested shall be made under section 11 by the collector followed by an award. The award is a determination by collector of disputes based on objections relating to:-

(1)the true area of the land acquired,

(2) the compensation which, in his opinion, should be allowed for the land by reference to the value of the land on the date of publication of the notification under section 4(1), and

(3) the respective interests of the persons claiming the compensation and directing the apportionment of the compensation among all the persons known or believed to be interested in the land, of whom, or of whose claims, he has information, whether or not they have respectively appeared before him.

ï¬ Section 12 attaches finality to the award making it a conclusive evidence as between the collector and the persons interested whether they have respectively appeared before the collector or not on three points: (i) the true area of the land, (ii) the value of the land, and (iii) the apportionment of the compensation amount among the persons interested.

ï¬ The collector may, after making the award under section 11, take possession of the land. On such taking possession, the acquired land shall vest absolutely in the government, free from all encumbrances.

ï¬ Part III of the Act deals with reference to court and procedure thereupon. Disputes as to apportionment of compensation are dealt with in Part IV. Part III consists of sections 18 to 28. Section 18 provides as under :

18. Reference to court. - (1) Any person interested who has not accepted the award may, by written application to the collector, require that the matter be referred by the collector for the determination of the court, whether his objection be to the measurement of the land, the amount of the compensation, the persons to whom it is payable, or the apportionment of the compensation among the persons interested.

(2) The application shall state the grounds on which objection to the award is taken:

Provided that every such application shall be made -

(a) if the person making it was present or represented before the collector at the time when he made his award, within six weeks from the date of the collectors award;

(b) in other cases, within six weeks of the receipt of the notice from the collector under section 12, sub-section (2); or within six months from the date of the collectors award, whichever period shall first expire.

ï¬ Section 19 prescribes the contents of the statement to be made by the collector to the court while making reference, which has to be in writing. Under section 20, the following persons shall be noticed by the court :-

(a)the applicant;

(b) all persons interested in the objection, except such (if any) of them as have consented without protest to receive payment of the compensation awarded; and

(c) if the objection is in regard to the area of the land or to the amount of compensation, the collector.

ï¬ The scheme of section 20 also suggests that collector (or state) does not fall within the meaning of persons interested; collector becomes a necessary party to reference and is required to be noticed by the court when the reference relates to objection in regard to area of land or to the quantum of compensation.

ï¬ Section 21 restricts the scope of the inquiry in proceedings initiated on reference by collector to a consideration of the interests of the persons affected by the objections. Section 26 prescribes the form of award to be made by the reference court.

ï¬ Under part IV, section 29 contemplates the compensation being apportioned between several persons interested in accordance with the agreement arrived at between them. The particulars of apportionment as specified in the award shall be conclusive as between the persons who have expressed their agreement in the apportionment of the compensation. In case of dispute, section 30 provides as under :-

Section 30 -When the amount of compensation has been settled under section 11, if any dispute arises as to the apportionment of the same or any part thereof, or as to the persons to whom the same or any part thereof, is payable, the collector may refer such dispute to the decision of the court.

ï¬ Under section 31, the collector is obliged to tender payment of the compensation to the persons interested in accordance with the award. The collector is obliged to withhold distribution of the awarded amount to the awardee or amongst the awardees and deposit the amount of compensation in the reference court in three situations:-

(i) if awardees do not consent to receive the amount of compensation,

(ii) if there be no person competent to alienate the lands, or

(iii) if there be any dispute as to the title to receive the compensation or as to the apportionment of it.

ï¬ The two provisions contemplating power of the collector to make reference as contained in section 18 and section 30 of the Act need a comparative study. Under section 18 the subject-matter of reference can be a dispute as to any one or more of the following: (i) as to the measurement of the land, (ii) as to the amount or the quantum of the compensation, (iii) as to the persons to whom the compensation is payable, (iv) as to the apportionment of the compensation among the persons interested. Under section 30 the subject matter of dispute can be: (i) the apportionment of the amount of compensation or any part thereof, (ii) the persons to whom the amount of compensation or any part thereof is payable. Though the expression employed in section 18 is the amount of compensation while the expression employed in section 30 is the amount of compensation or any part thereof, this distinction in legislative drafting is immaterial and insignificant and a dispute as to entitlement or apportionment of part of the compensation would also be covered by section 18 of the Act on the principle that the whole includes a part too. Thus, at the first blush, it seems that section 30 overlaps section 18 in part; but as will be seen shortly hereinafter, it is not so.

12. Dr. G.H. Grant v. State of Bihar (supra) is a three-judge bench decision of this Court wherein the scheme of the Act by reference to the power vesting in the collector to make a reference came up for the consideration of the court. The three-judge bench by a majority of 2:1 laid down the following principles :

(i)There are two provisions in the Act under which the collector can make a reference to the court, namely, section 18 and section 30. The powers under the two sections are distinct and may be invoked in contingencies which do not overlap. A person shown in that part of the award which relates to apportionment of compensation who is present either personally or through a representative or on whom notice is issued under section 12(2), must, if he does not accept the award, apply to the collector to refer the matter to the court under section 18 within the time prescribed thereunder. But a person who has not appeared in the acquisition proceedings before the collector may, if he is not served with notice of filing, raise a dispute as to apportionment or as to the persons to whom it is payable and apply to the court for a reference under section 30, for determination of his right to compensation which may have existed before the award, or which may have devolved upon him since the award. For a reference under section 30, no period of limitation is prescribed.

(ii) It is not predicated of the exercise of the power to make a reference under section 30 that the collector has not apportioned the compensation money by his award.

(iii)The award made by the collector under section 11 is not the source of the right to compensation. An award is strictly speaking only an offer made by the government to the person interested in the land notified for acquisition; the person interested is not bound to accept it and the government can also withdraw the acquisition under section 48. It is only when possession of the land has been taken by the government under section 16 that the right of the owner of the land is extinguished. Therefore the appellants contention that title to compensation is derived solely from and on the date of the award could not be accepted.

(iv)The liability of the government under section 31 to pay compensation to the person entitled thereto under the award does not imply that only the persons to whom compensation is directed to be paid under the award may raise a dispute under section 30. The scheme of apportionment by the collector under section 11 is conclusive only between the collector and the persons interested and not among the persons interested. Payment of compensation under section 31 to the persons declared in the award to be entitled thereto discharges the state of its liability to pay compensation leaving it open to the claimant to compensation to agitate his right in a reference under section 30 or by a separate suit.

(v)Under the Bihar Land Reforms Act the title of the appellant to the land noticed for acquisition became vested in the state and therefore the right to compensation for the land acquired devolved upon the State. A dispute then arose between the state government and the appellant as to the persons to whom compensation was payable. The state had no right to the compensation payable for the land under a title existing before the date of the award of the collector and no application could be made by it as a person interested within the meaning of section 18. But a dispute between the appellant and the state as to their conflicting claims to the compensation money was clearly a dispute which could be referred under section 30 of the Act to the court. There is nothing in section 30 which excludes a reference to the court of a dispute raised by a person on whom the title of the owner of the land has since the award, devolved (emphasis supplied).

13. Keeping in view the principles laid down by this Court in Dr. G.H. Grants case (supra) and analysing in-depth the provisions of the Act the difference between reference under section 18 and the one under section 30 can be summarized and set out as under:-
By reference to locus

Under section 18(1) a reference can be made by collector only upon an application in writing having been made by (i) any person interested (ii) who has not accepted the award (iii) making application in writing, to the collector, requiring a reference by the collector to the court (iv) for determination of any one of the four disputes (specified in the provision), and (v) stating the grounds on which objection to the award is taken. For reference under section 30 no application in writing is required. The prayer may be made orally or in writing or the reference may be made suo motu by the collector without any one having invited the attention of the collector for making the reference.

By reference to the disputes referable

Under section 18(1) there are four types of disputes which can be referred to civil court for determination. They are the disputes: (i) as to the measurement of the land, (ii) as to the amount of the compensation, (iii) as to the persons to whom the compensation is payable, or (d) as to the apportionment of the compensation among the persons interested. Under section 30 the only disputes which are referable are : (i) any dispute as to the apportionment of the amount of compensation or any part thereof, or (ii) a dispute as to the persons to whom the amount of compensation or any part thereof is payable. A dispute as to the measurement of the land or as to the quantum of compensation or a dispute of a nature not falling within section 30, can neither be referred by the collector under section 30 of the Act nor would the civil court acquire jurisdiction to enter and determine the same.

By reference to nature of power

Under section 18 of the Act the collector does not have power to withhold the reference. Once a written application has been made satisfying the requirements of section 18, the collector shall make a reference. The collector has no discretion in the matter; whether the dispute has any merit or not is to be left for the determination of the court. Under section 30 the collector may refer such dispute to the decision of the court. The collector has discretion in the matter. Looking to the nature of the dispute raised, the person who is raising the dispute, the delay in inviting the attention of the court, and so on - are such illustrative factors which may enter into the consideration by the collector while exercising the discretion. If the collector makes the reference it may be decided by the court subject to its forming an opinion that the dispute was capable of reference and determination under section 30 of the Act. In case the collector refuses to make a reference under section 30 of the Act, the person adversely affected by withholding of the reference or refusal to make the reference shall be at liberty to pursue such other remedy as may be available to him under the law such as filing a writ petition or a civil suit.
By reference to limitation

Under section 18 the written application requiring the matter to be referred by the collector for the determination of the court shall be filed within six weeks from the date of the collectors award if the person making it was present or represented before the collector at the time when he made his award or within six weeks of the notice from the collector under section 12(2) or within six months from the date of the collectors award, whichever period shall first expire. There is no such limitation prescribed under section 30 of the Act. The collector may at any time, not bound by the period of limitation, exercise his power to make the reference. The expression the person present or represented before the collector at the time when he made his award would include within its meaning a person who shall be deemed to be present or represented before the collector at the time when the award is made. No one can extend the period of limitation by taking advantage of his own wrong. Though no limitation is provided for making a reference under section 30 of the Act, needless to say, where no period of limitation for exercise of any statutory power is prescribed the power can nevertheless be exercised only within a reasonable period; what is a reasonable period in a given case shall depend on the facts and circumstances of each case.

14. The scheme of the Act reveals that the remedy of reference under section 18 is intended to be available only to a person interested. A person present either personally or through representative or on whom a notice is served under section 12(2) is obliged, subject to his specifying the test as to locus, to apply to the collector within the time prescribed under section 18(2) to make a reference to the court. The basis of title on which the reference would be sought for under section 18 would obviously be a pre-existing title by reference to the date of the award. So is section 29, which speaks of persons interested. Finality to the award spoken of by section 12(1) of the Act is between the collector on one hand and the persons interested on the other hand and attaches to the issues relating to (i) the true area, i.e. measurement of the land, (ii) the value of the land, i.e. the quantum of compensation, and (iii) apportionment of the compensation among the persons interested. The persons interested would be bound by the award without regard to the fact whether they have respectively appeared before the collector or not. The finality to the award spoken of by section 29 is as between the persons interested inter se and is confined to the issue as to the correctness of the apportionment. Section 30 is not confined in its operation only to persons interested. It would, therefore, be available for being invoked by the persons interested if they were neither present nor represented in proceedings before the collector, nor were served with notice under section 12(2) of the Act or when they claim on the basis of a title coming into existence post award. The definition of person interested speaks of an interest in compensation to be made. An interest coming into existence post award gives rise to a claim in compensation which has already been determined. Such a person can also have recourse to section 30. In any case, the dispute for which section 30 can be invoked shall remain confined only (i) as to the apportionment of the amount of compensation or any part thereof, or (ii) as to the persons to whom the amount of compensation (already determined) or any part thereof is payable. The state claiming on the basis of a pre-existing right would not be a person interested, as already pointed out hereinabove and on account of its right being pre-existing, the state, in such a case, would not be entitled to invoke either section 18 or section 30 seeking determination of its alleged pre-existing right. A right accrued or devolved post award may be determined in a reference under section 30 depending on collectors discretion to show indulgence, without any bar as to limitation. Alternatively, such a right may be left open by the collector to be adjudicated upon in any independent legal proceedings. This view is just, sound and logical as a title post award could not have been canvassed upto the date of the award and should also not be left without remedy by denying access to section 30. Viewed from this angle, section 18 and 30 would not overlap and would have fields to operate independent of each other.

15. We have entered into examining the scheme of the Act and exploring the difference between reference under section 18 and the one under section 30 of the Act as it was necessary for finding out answer to the core question staring before us. The power to acquire by state the land owned by its subjects hails from the right of eminent domain vesting in the state which is essentially an attribute of sovereign power of the state. So long as the public purpose subsists the exercise of the power by the state to acquire the land of its subjects without regard to the wishes or willingness of the owner or person interested in the land cannot be questioned. (See - Scindia Employees Union v. State of Maharashtra and Ors.1, and State of Maharashtra v. Sant Joginder Singh Kishan Singh and Ors.2). The state does not acquire its own land for it is futile to exercise the power of eminent domain for acquiring rights in the land, which already vests in the state. It would be absurdity to comprehend the provisions of Land Acquisition Act being applicable to such land wherein the ownership or the entirety of rights already vests in the state. In other words, the land owned by the state on which there are no private rights or encumbrances is beyond the purview of the provisions of the Land Acquisition Act. The position of law is so clear as does not stand in need of any authority to support. Still a few decided cases in point may be referred since available.

16. In Collector of Bombay v. Nusurwanji Rattanji Mistri & Others (supra) this Court held that when the government acquires lands under the provisions of the Land Acquisition Act, it must be for a public purpose, and with a view to put them to that purpose, the government acquires the sum total of all private interests subsisting in them. If the government has itself an interest in the land, it has only to acquire the other interests outstanding thereof so that it might be in a position to pass it on absolutely for public user. An interesting argument was advanced before the Supreme Court. It was submitted that the right of the government to levy assessment on the lands is an encumbrance and that encumbrance is capable of acquisition. The court held that the word encumbrance as occurring in section 16 can only mean interests in respect of which a compensation was made under section 11 or could have been claimed. It cannot include the right of the government to levy assessment on the lands. The Act does not contemplate the interest of the government in any land being valued or compensation being awarded therefor.

17. In Secretary of State v. Sri Narain Khanna1 it was held that where the government acquires any property consisting of land and buildings and where the land was subject- matter of the government grant, subject to the power of resumption by government at any time on giving one months notice, then the compensation was payable only in respect of such buildings as may have been authorized to be erected and not in respect of the land.

18. In In the matter of the Land Acquisition Act : Govt. of Bombay v. Esufali Salebhai2, Batchelor, J held that the government are not debarred from acquiring and paying for the only outstanding interests merely because the Act, which primarily contemplates all interests as held outside government, directs that the entire compensation based upon the market value of the whole land must be distributed among the claimants. The government was held liable to acquire and pay only for the super-structure as it was already the owner of the land.

19. In Deputy Collector, Calicut Division v. Aiyavu Pillay3, Wallis, J. observed that the Act does not contemplate or provide for the acquisition of any interest which already belongs to government in land which is being acquired under the Act but only for the acquisition of such interests in the land as do not already belong to the government.

20. In Collector of Bombay v. Nusurwanji Rattanji Mistri & Others (supra), the decision in Esufali Salebhais case and Aiyavu Pillays case were cited with approval. Expressing its entire agreement with the said views the court held that when government possesses an interest in land which is the subject of acquisition under the Act, that interest is itself outside such acquisition because there can be no question of government acquiring what is its own. An investigation into the nature and value of that interest is necessary for determining the compensation payable for the interest outstanding in the claimants but that would not make it the subject of acquisition. In land acquisition proceedings there is no value of the right of the government to levy assessment on the lands and there is no award of compensation therefor. It was, therefore, held by a division bench of judicial commissioners in Mohammad Wajeeh Mirza v. Secretary of State for India in Council1 that the question of title arising between the government and another claimant cannot be settled by the judge in a reference under section 18 of the Act. When the government itself claims to be owner of the land there can be no question of its acquisition and the provisions of the Land Acquisition Act cannot be applicable. In our opinion the statement of law so made by the learned judicial commissioners is correct.

21. The collector acts as a representative of the state whilst holding proceedings under the Land Acquisition Act. In fact, he conducts the proceedings on behalf of the state. The award of the collector is not the source of the right to compensation; it is the pre-existing right which is recognized by the collector and guided by the findings arrived at in determining the objections, if any, the collector quantifies the amount of compensation to be placed as an offer of the appropriate government to the owner recognized by the state. The offeree may accept or decline the offer. If he accepts the offer and the government takes possession over the land, the title of the offeree is extinguished and vests absolutely in the government free from all encumbrances. The power to make an award under section 11 and to make a reference under sections 18 or 30 of the Act is a statutory power. The sweep of jurisdiction of court to determine the disputes is also statutory and is controlled by the bounds created by section 17 or 30 whereunder the reference has been made to the court. The power has to be exercised to the extent to which it has been conferred by the statute and on availability of pre-existing conditions on the availability of which and which alone the power can be exercised.

22. Award made by the collector is final and conclusive as between the collector and the persons interested, whether they have appeared before the collector or not, on two issues : (i) as to true area, i.e. measurement of land acquired, (ii) as to value of the land, i.e. the amount of compensation, and (iii) as to the apportionment of the compensation among the persons interested - again, between the collector and the persons interested and not as amongst the persons interested inter se. In the event of a reference having been sought for under section 18, the collectors award on these issues; if varied by civil court, shall stand superseded to that extent. The scheme of the Act does not attach a similar finality to the award of the collector on the issue as to the person to whom compensation is payable; in spite of the award by collector and even on failure to seek reference, such issue has been left available to be adjudicated upon by any competent forum.

23. In Nusserwanjee Pestonjee v. Meer Mynoodeen Khan Wullud Meer Sudroodeen Khan Bahadoor1, their Lordships of the Privy Council have held that wherever jurisdiction is given by a statute and such jurisdiction is only given upon certain specified terms contained therein it is a universal principle that those terms should be complied with, in order to create and raise the jurisdiction, and if they are not complied with the jurisdiction does not arise. The privy council decision above-said was followed and the statement of law made therein approved by this Court in Kothamasu Kanakarathamma and Ors. v. State of Andhra Pradesh and Ors.2. This Court held that under the Land Acquisition Act the matter goes to the court only upon a reference made by the collector and there is no doubt that the jurisdiction of the court arises solely on the basis of a reference made to it. The court can adjudicate upon the matter referred to it but the court is certainly not invested with the jurisdiction to consider a matter not directly connected with it and this is not a matter of mere technicality. A case of lack of inherent jurisdiction will not be cured by mere failure to object to the proceedings before the court on the ground of an absence of reference on matters not referred. There can be no waiver or acquiescence. Indeed, when there is an absence of inherent jurisdiction, the defect cannot be waived nor can be cured by acquiescence,

24. To sum up the state is not a person interested as defined in section 3(b) of the Act. It is not a party to the proceedings before the collector in the sense, which the expression parties to the litigation carries. The collector holds the proceedings and makes an award as a representative of the state government. Land or an interest in land pre-owned by state cannot be subject matter of acquisition by state. The question of deciding the ownership of state or holding of any interest by the state government in proceedings before the collector cannot arise in proceedings before the collector (as defined in section 3(c) of the Act). If it was a government land there was no question of initiating the proceedings for acquisition at all. The government would not acquire the land, which already vests in it. A dispute as to pre-existing right or interest of the state government in the property sought to be acquired is not a dispute capable of being adjudicated upon or referred to the civil court for determination either under section 18 or section 30 of the Act. The reference made by the collector to the court was wholly without jurisdiction and the civil court ought to have refused to entertain the reference and ought to have rejected the same. All the proceedings under section 30 of the Act beginning from the reference and adjudication thereon by the court suffer from lack of inherent jurisdiction and are therefore a nullity liable to be declared so.

25. However, we would like to clarify our decision by sounding two notes of caution. Firstly, the quashing of the proceedings under section 30 of the Land Acquisition Act would not debar the state from pursuing such other legal remedy before such other forum as may be available to the state government and on the merits and the maintainability thereof we express no opinion herein. Secondly, the situation in law would have been entirely different if the title of the appellant would have come to an end by any event happening or change taking place after the making of the award by the collector as was the case in Dr. G.H. Grant v. State of Bihar1. The title of Dr. Ghosh had come to an end by change of law referable to a date subsequent to the making of the award. In this context it was held - ...............there is no reason why the right to claim a reference of a dispute about the person entitled to compensation may not be exercised by the person on whom the title has devolved since the date of the award and there is nothing in section 30 which excludes a reference to the court of a dispute raised by a person on whom the title of the owner of land has, since the award, devolved.

26. For the foregoing reasons, the appeal is allowed, the judgment of the division bench is set aside and that of the learned single judge restored with costs throughout.

**********', 0] , 
[ 'HEADNOTE
SPECIFIC RELIEF LAW 
Specific Relief Act, 1963 
Section 34 - Declaration and possession - Suit for - Bund - Plaintiffs land on eastern side - Defendants land on western side - Alleged trespass by defendant on a portion of bund - Bund and land on eastern side claimed to be allotted in partition decree of 1943 - Predecessor of defendant, having trespassed a portion of bund, plaintiff brought suit in 1962 - Compromise arrived - Said predecessor vacating trespassed portion - Suit allowed to be dismissed - Said predecessor selling said land in favour of defendant - In pleadings defendant claiming bund to be common and to be maintained by both parties - Suit decreed by trial court - Though first appellate court reversing the judg-ment, High Court agreeing with trial court, but resorting to pro-active move to put an end to the controversy. Held that such a move was unsustainable. Judgment set-aside and case remitted to trial court for considering if suit land was encroached by de-fendant and was part of common bund.
HELD
The trial court recorded the finding that plaint B sched-ule land is not a part of plaint A schedule property and that the plaint B schedule is a part of a common bund (varamba) situated in survey no.183/4. The trial court further found that the entire survey no.183/4 having an extent of 13 cents was thengu varamba (coconut varamba) and the same belonged to Mundas-seri Tarwad. The judgment of the first appellate court does not improve the position so far as this aspect of the matter is concerned. The High Court too not pay attention pointedly to this question, instead strayed into the proactive role as stated in the judgment. Such a course neither based on the case of the parties, nor with the sanction of law, is clearly unsustainable. In the facts and circumstances of the case, in our considered view, the case should be remitted to the trial court for consid-ering the question whether the suit land which as alleged by the plaintiffs has been encroached upon by the first defendant and of which recovery of possession is sought, was a part of the common bund (thedaya varamba) situated in survey no. 183/4. (Para 11)


D.P. MOHAPATRA, J. 
1. Leave granted. 
2. This appeal filed by the plaintiffs is directed against the judgment of the High Court of Kerala in second appeal No. 601/89 in which the High Court set aside the decisions of the first appellate Court and disposed of the suit granting portions of the suit property to both the parties with certain other directions. The operating portion of the judgment reads as follows :
In the result, I allow this Second Appeal and set aside the judgments and decrees of the courts below and grant the plain-tiffs a decree declaring the title of the plaintiffs over the green shaded plot market XYZ in the commissioners plan Ext.C2. I also give a declaration to the first defendant of his title over the yellow shaded plot in Ext.C2 plan marked WXZ by me in the plan. I grant a decree to the plaintiffs to get the obstruc-tions, if any, removed for the free flow of water from the east-ern paddy fields to the west of the green shaded bund their title over which I have hereby declared. I direct that the plan Ext.C2 will be appended to the decree. The defendants would be re-strained from interfering with the possession of the plaintiffs over the green shaded portion and the plaintiffs are restrained from in any manner interfering with the possession of the defend-ants over the yellow shaded portion in Ext. C2 plan. Considering the fact this court is trying to bring about a quietus to the disputes between the parties and with a view to generate future goodwill, I direct the parties to suffer their respective costs in all the courts. 
3. The controversy raised in the case relates to a bund referred to as thedaya varamba or coconut varamba or thengu varamba situated in survey No. 183/4 which is described in Schedule B of the plaint. On the eastern side of the bund lies the land of the plaintiffs and on the western side lies the land of contesting defendant. The plaintiffs went to Court with the cause, inter alia, that the bund(varamba) on survey no. 183/4 is a part of their property and they have exclusive title and possession over the same. They alleged that the first defendant illegally tres-passed upon a portion of the bund (varamba). The plaintiffs prayed for declaration of their title to the property and recov-ery of possession of the portion allegedly trespassed upon by the first defendant. The further claim of the plaintiffs was that the bund (varamba) along with other land lying on its eastern side was allotted to their predecessor in interest in the final decree in partition suit no.44/1943. Since then their predecessor in interest and the plaintiffs themselves had been in exclusive enjoyment of the properties allotted in their favour in the decree including the properties in Schedule B of the plaint. The vendor of the first defendant, Sankaranarayanan Nair, having trespassed on a portion of the bund the plaintiffs had filed O.S.No. 682 of 1962. During the pendency of the said suit a compromise was entered into between the parties and Sankaranar-ayanan Nair accepted the position that the bund (varamba) on survey no. 183/4 belonged to the plaintiffs and he vacated the portion encroached by him. In view of settlement of the dispute between 
the parties the suit was allowed to be dismissed. Subse-quently, Sankar-anarayanan Nair, executed a sale deed on 25.3.82 in favour of the first defendant alienating certain properties including survey no 183/4, though he had no interest therein. Thereafter the first defendant trespassed upon a portion of the bund. 
4. The first defendant in his written statement denied the claim of exclusive title and possession of the plaintiffs over the bund (varamba) lying in survey no. 183/4. He also denied to have trespassed upon any portion of the bund (varamba). He however, accepted the position that the bund (varamba) in survey no. 183/4 is the common bund dividing his land and the land of the plain-tiffs. From the discussions in the judgment of the courts below it appears that the first defendant also accepted the position that the bund (varamba) was to be maintained by both the parties since it was useful for flow of water from and land of the plain-tiffs which is at a higher level than the land of the first defendant. 
5. On the pleadings of the parties the trial court framed in all nine issues of which issues Nos. 1,3 and 4 are relevant for the purpose of the present case. They are :
1. Whether the description, boundaries, survey no, shown in the plaint schedule are correct ?
3. Whether the B schedule property is a part of A schedule property and whether it is the part of varamba mentioned in the plaint schedule ?
4. Whether the trespass alleged is 
true ?
Under the issue No.1 the trial court found that the description and survey no. as shown in the plaint schedule are correct. Taking up issue Nos.3 and 4 together the trial court found that plaint B schedule is not a part of plaint A schedule property and that plaint B schedule is a part of common bund (varamba) situated in survey no. 183/4 as described in Ext. A-6 and further that there is trespass over the plaint B schedule but that the alleged trespass as stated in the plaint is not proved in course of the discussion. On these issues the trial court held, inter alia, that the case of the plaintiffs that the entire survey no.183/4 property was a varamba has to be accepted; that the disputed property in survey no. 183/4 is a bund (varamba) having an extent of 13 cents; that the parties never obtained any right or title over the disputed bund (varamba) in survey no.183/4 under the final decree Ext.A/1.
6. On these findings the suit was decreed on the terms as follows : 
In the result the suit is decreed with modification and the defendant is hereby directed to reinstate the plaint B schedule trespassed portion of survey 183/4 common varamba into its origi-nal position within one month from the date of this judgment. If the defendant fails to comply with this direction to reinstate the plaint B schedule trespassed portion of survey 183/4, within one month, then the plaintiff can apply to the court to get the plaint B schedule trespassed portion of survey 183/4 common varamba reinstated into its original position at the plaintiffs own expenses and the actual expenses of such rein-statment can be decided at the time of such execution by the court. The plaintiffs are entitled for their costs in this suit from the defendant.
7. Not satisfied with the decision of the trial court the first defendant filed appeal suit No. 161/85 in which the plaintiffs also filed a cross objection. The first appellate court on appreciation of the evidence on record held that by measurement the plaint B schedule property is not included in plaint A schedule property. The first appellate court further held that on the plaintiffs own showing the first defendant and his predeces-sor Sankaranarayanan Nair had been in possession of plaint B schedule property since 1968 and since the plaintiffs case is that Sankaranarayanan Nair happened to be in possession of the plaint B schedule property by way of trespass the possession by Sankaranarayanan Nair and the first defendant is adverse to the plaintiffs and since the present suit is filed more than 12 years from the alleged trespass committed in 1968, plaintiffs title, if any, is lost by adverse possession and limitation. On the above findings the first appellate Court allowed the appeal and set aside the judgment and decree passed by the trial court. 
8. The second appeal filed by the plaintiffs was decided by the High Court by the impugned judgment in the manner noted earlier. From the discussions in the judgment it appears that the High Court accepted the case of the plaintiffs that Sankaranarayanan Nair gave up his claim to the control of the bund (varamba) and that the plaint B schedule property i.e. the bund (varamba) is in the possession of the plaintiffs. The High Court made the observation that the material on record shows the absence of bona fide on part of the first defendant in taking the sale deed by including survey no. 183/4 the dispute bund (varamba) though the same was not included amongst the properties allotted to the share of Sankaranarayanan Nair and even though it was the the-daya varamba of the plaintiffs. Discussing the question of relief to be granted in the suit the High Court felt inclined to agree 
with the position adopted by the trial 
court, but Court made these further observation :
The only other alternative open to this Court, if it is inclined to be judicially active so as to prevent further disputes between the parties, is to recognise the appropriation of a portion of the bund by the defendants after purchase from Sankaranarayanan Nair and on the basis of that appropriation bring about a divi-sion of the bund between the parties so as to avert future dis-putes over the same. It is seen from the report of the commissioner Ext. C2 that the green shaded portion still remains as a bund and the yellow shaded portion lying to the west of it has been an-nexed by the defendants with their paddy fields. Roughly two extents seem to be more or less equal though the green shaded portion might have more extent than the yellow shaded portion now annexed by the defendants. This court, to ensure that future disputes between the parties are averted, can, in my view, not-withstanding the protest of counsel for the plaintiffs and coun-sel for the defendants, recognise the de facto division brought about the action of the defendants and declare exclusive title of the respective parties to the respective portions with a view to avert future litigation.
9. From the discussions in the judgment it appears that the High Court embarked upon this pro-active move with a view to put an end to the controversy between the parties over the common bund (thedaya varamba). As the discussions show the arrangement to divide the common bund was objected to by the counsel for both the parties. The plaintiffs have filed this appeal assailing the judgment of the High Court. 
10. During the hearing of the case learned senior counsel appear-ing for both the parties contended before us that the course adopted by the High Court is neither to the satisfaction of the parties nor is it sustainable in law. Elucidating the point the learned senior counsel for the appellants submitted that in view of the accepted position of fact as found by the courts below that the common bund (thedaya varamba) in survey no. 183/4 was not the exclusive property of any of the parties and it was to be maintained as a bund for the benefit of both the parties the High Court should not have directed division of the bund and allotment of portions of the same to the parties. The thrust of the arguments of the learned senior counsel for the appellant was that there is a local custom in that part of the State of Kerala that the common bund (thedaya varamba) is to remain in possession of the owner of the land lying to the east of the bund (varamba) and has to be maintained by him. That position, according to the learned senior counsel was accepted by the first defendant also. The learned senior counsel appearing for respondent no.1 while not joining issue on the point urged that it was the spe-cific case of the first defendant that he had not trespassed upon any portion of the common bund (thedaya varamba) 
and the alleged trespassed land in 
his possession is not a part of the common bund (thedaya varamba) of the parties. 
11. From the case of the parties in the pleadings and the dis-putes raised by them before the courts below it appears to us that it is absolutely necessary to determine the question whether the suit land which is alleged to have been trespassed upon by the first defendants was a part of the common bund (thedaya varamba) situated in survey No. 183/4. On the answer to this question would depend whether a decree should be passed directing the defendant to deliver possession of the suit land to the plaintiffs for its amalgamation with the existing portion of the bund (varamba) and its maintenance as a part of the bund (varam-ba). No. doubt, the question is covered under issue no.3 framed by the trial court but as the judgment shows the trial court discussed the said issue along with issue no.4 and the question was not pointedly discussed. In a general manner the trial court recorded the finding that plaint B schedule land is not a part of plaint A schedule property and that the plaint B schedule is a part of a common bund (varamba) situated in survey no.183/4. The trial court further found that the entire survey no.183/4 having an extent of 13 cents was thengu varamba (coconut varamba) and the same belonged to Mundasseri Tarwad. The judgment of the first appellate court does not improve the position so far as this aspect of the matter is concerned. The High Court too not pay attention pointedly to this question, instead strayed into the proactive role as stated in the judgment. Such a course neither based on the case of the parties, nor with the sanction of law, is clearly unsustainable. In the facts and circumstances of the case, in our considered view, the case should be remitted to the trial court for considering the question whether the suit land which as alleged by the plaintiffs has been encroached upon by the first defendant and of which recovery of possession is sought, was a part of the common bund (thedaya varamba) situated in survey no. 183/4. The trial court will give opportunity to the parties to lead further evidence on this question only, if neces-sary, and thereafter dispose of the suit in accordance with the law. We make it clear that we have not disturbed the other find-ings recorded by the trial court which were accepted by the High Court. 
12. Accordingly, we allow the appeal, set aside the impugned judgment and decree passed by the High Court and remand the case to the trial court for disposal afresh in the manner aforesaid. The trial court is directed to disposal of the suit expeditious-ly, preferably within a period of six months from the date of receipt of intimation of this order. The parties to bear respec-tive costs.
**********', 0] , 
[ 'CROSS CITATION
1971 SCR 181

CIVIL APPELLATE JURISDICTION : Civil Appeal No. 1655 of 1966. 183 Appeal from the judgment and decree dated August 25, 1964 of the Patna High Court in Letters Patent Appeal No. 119 of 1958. D. Goburdhun and R. Goburdhun, for the appellant. S. V. Gupte, D. P. Singh and N. Nettar, for respondent No. 1. U. P. Singh for respondents Nos. 2 to 4.

The Judgment of the Court was delivered by

Shelat, J.-Two questions arise in this appeal.The first is whether the transaction evidenced by Ex. 1, dated March 20, 1915 was a family arrangement so as to confer on the appellant an,, his father, Nanhku Prasad, since deceased, title to a half share in the house in dispute. The second is that evenif it was so,whether such title became extinguished as a result of adversepossession for the statutory period by Baijnath, the deceased husband of respondent 1.

The parties are near relations. Thefollowing genealogy explains the relationship amongst them

Rajkumar Singh

Lalji Singh Amar Singh Ramji SinghRaghunandan

Reshmi Kuer Patreja KuerSingh

Nanhku Pd.

Suba Faujdar Balkeshwar Singh

(Plff. No.1)

Shambu Pd.

Decnath Singh

(Plff. No. 2)

Sonadhari Girwardhari Kamaldhari

Tarke shwar Pd. Baijnath Pd. alias

alias Daljit Nanu Babu Kamta Prasad

(Deft. No. 2) died in 1948

Phul Kumari Devi

(sons of Deft. (widow)

2-Nos. 3 to 7) Deft. No. 1.

There is no dispute that Amar Singh purchased from his own funds under a registered deed, dated January 20, 1898, the ,,landon which the house in dispute stands. Hisson, Nankhu, the deceased father of the present appellant, was taken in adoption sometime prior to March 20, 1915 by Ramji Singh and his wife Patreja Kuer as they had no issue, whereupon Nankhu ceased 184 to have any interest in the properties owned by Amar Singh and his branch. In 1933, Nankhu and the present appellant, then a minor, filed Suit No. 33 of 1933 against Sonadhari Tarkeshwar, Baijnath and Reshmi Kuer (the widow ofAmar Singh, wrongly described by the High Court as the wife of Rajkumar in the genealogy set out inits judgment) in respect of certain properties which bad nothing to dowith the house in dispute.The written statement filed inthat suit was that Nankhu had been paid the price of his share in the house in dispute andthat the entire house, consequently, belonged to and was since thenin the exclusive possession of the defendants.That suit wentupto the High Court when in 1941 a compromise application was filed by the parties settling that suit. But, as thesuit had nothing, as aforesaid, to do with the house in dispute, nothing was said about the allegation that Nankhu hadbeen paid off in respect of his interest in that house. In 1949, Nankhu and the appellant filed the instant suit for a declaration of their half share in the house in dispute. In answer to the suit, the respondents raised three defenses : (1)that Nankhu and the appellant derivedno interest under Ex. 1.(2) that assuming that they derivedsuch interest, it was relinquished by them on being paid the price thereof, and (3) that in any event they lost their interest by reason of adverse possession by the respondents The Trial Court rejected all the three defenses raised by the respondents and decreed the suit, holdingthat Nankhu had acquired one half share in the said house under Ex. I. Against that decree, two appeals were filed in theHigh Court,one by respondent I and the other by some of the other respondentdents.These appeals were heard first by a learned Single Judge of the High Court. Before the learned Single Judge, the finding of the Trial Court that Nankhu and the present appellant had not relinquished their interest in the house on their being paid the price thereof was not disputed. The only questions agitated beforethe learned SingleJudge,therefore, were whether Nankhuhad ahalf share, that is to say, whether he derived his title to,the half share under and by virtue of Ex. 1, and if so, whether he lost it as a result ofadverse possession by the respondents.

In respect of the first question. the parties urged two conflicting pleas. Nankhu and the appellant contendedthat Ex. I was a family arrangement under which he gothalf share in the house and that that family arrangement was valid and binding on the parties. The respondents, on the other hand, contended that Ex. I was only a Ladavi deed, that is, a deed of relinquishment. The argument on behalf of Nankhu and the appellant was that there were outstanding disputes between the different branches of the family of Rajkumar, and those disputes 185 were ultimately settled at the instance of and with the aid of certain family friends resulting in Ex. I by way of a familyarrangement. Therefore, even if Nankhu and the appellant were not able to show their anterior title to the house,they were entitled under Ex.I to a half share therein. The learned Single Judge accepted the contention raisedby Nankhu and the appellant. His reasoning inthis connection was that although the land on which thesuit house stood was purchased by Amar Singh outof his own funds,it was purchased in the furzi name of Lalji, but there was no evidence that Lalji ever admitted to be the furzidar of Amar Singh. Consequently, though Nankhu, by his ,adoption, lost all interest in theproperties ofAmar Singh,yet the fact that in Ex. I Amar Singhacknowledged Nankhu having a half share in the house indicated that there was some apprehension in the mind of Amar Singh of a future dispute and that it was such an apprehended dispute which Ex. 1, while dealing with the house, settled.The learned SingleJudge added that ,even assuming that there was no existing or apprehended dispute and the settlement wasmade out of considerationfor the peace of thefamilyor preservation of its properties, the settlement would have to be regarded as a family arrangement. Regarding theplea of adverse possession, he upheld the finding of the Trial Court that Nankhu and the appellant had established their acts of possession during the statutory Period, andthat consequently, the continuityand exclusiveness of the respondents adverse possession had been disrupted. On these findings, he dismissed the appeals and confirmedthe decree passed by the Trial Court.

Respondent I thereupon filed a letters patent appeal which was heard by a Division Bench of the High Court. Thesame two questions were reagitated, namely, as to the nature of Ex. 1, and as to the adverse possession. On the first question, the reasoning adopted by the Division Bench was on the following lines :

(1) that the executants of Ex. I formed

three conflicting groups, namely,

(a) Suba, Faujdar and Balkeshwar,

constituting one group of members of Laljis

branch, being executants 1 to 3;

(b) Raghunandan and his son, Kamaldhari,

being executants 4 and5 andconstituting

Raghunandans branch; and

(c) Amar Singh for himself and as the

guardian of Baijnath, then a minor, Sonadbari

for himself and as guardian of his minorson,

Tarkeshwar, and Nankhu, who had,

186

as earlier stated, gone to the line of Ramji

on his adoption, being executants 6,7 and 8;

(2) that the disputes, in settlement of

which Ex. I was executed bythese three

groups, were, as its recitals show :

(a) conflicting claims made by thesaid

three sets of executants as to whetherthey

were joint or separate in status, the claim of

executants 1 to 3 being that all the members

of Rajkumars family were still members of an

undivided Hindu family, and that therefore,

although the properties stood in the names of

and were in possession of individual members,

they continued to be joint family properties

including properties standing in the names of

female members, namely, Reshmi and Patreja;

(b) the allegation by executants 4 and 5

(Raghunandans branch) that all thefour

branches of Rajkumars four sons were separate

and yetclaiming share in the properties

standingin the names of members of Laljis

branch, and

(c) the claimby executants 6, 7 and 8

(Amar Singh, Sonadhari and Nankhu-by now in

the line of Ramji) that the partieswere

separate in status, and therefore, the

properties in the names of the twosaid

females belonged exclusively to them and the

members of the other branches had no interest

whatsoever in them-,

(3) that the Trial Court andthe learned

Single Judge were in error in holdingthat

what Ex.I did was to evidence relinquishment

by the rest of the members of the family of

their claims in properties standing in the

names of or in possession of particular

members, and thereby acknowledging their

anteriortitle in such properties. Infact

Nankhu had no such anterior title, nor could

be in law have any such title in the house in

dispute in view of his having got out ofAmar

Singhs branch as a result of his adoption by

Ramji;

(4) that there wasno subsisting or

apprehended dispute between Amar Singh and his

family, on the one hand, and Nankhu on the

other, the latter not having made any claim

for a share in the house in dispute, andthat

therefore, there was no question of

preservation ofpeace or family property,

there being nothing on record to showthat

Nankhu had held out any threat to the family

peace or property; therefore, there was a

total want of mutuality as in consideration of

Nankhu getting a half share,

187

Amar Singh got nothing in return and cases of

the type of Williams v. Williams(1) had no

application;

(5) that the recitals in Ex. I showedthat

the only dispute which prevailed at thetime

was branchwise and in that dispute Nankhu

did not set up any contest against Amar Singh

and his branch and indeed, both of them acted

in concert, both claiming that the members of

Rajkumars family were separate and the

properties standing in the names of Reshmi and

Patreja were their exclusive properties;

(6) that acknowledgement of exclusive title

of Amar Singh and Sonadhari (executants 6 and

7) to certainproperties, and likewise

acknowledgement of exclusive title of Nanhku

(executant No. 8) to certain other properties

set out in paras 3 and 4 of Ex. I were not by

way of settlement of any existing or

apprehended dispute betweenthem, and

therefore, that part of Ex. I could not be

regardedas providing any consideration for

conferring the half share in the disputed

house on Nanhku.

On this reasoning the Division Bench declined to treat Ex. I as a family arrangement. The conclusion of the Bench clearly signified that it had reliedon two fundamental premises: (1) that there were only three sets of executants, the third set consisting ;of executants 6, 7 and 8, and (2) that Amar Singh and Nanhku had acted in concert as there were no conflicting claims by and between them. In view of this conclusion there was no need for the Division Bench to go into the question ofadverse possession. However, it decided to do so for the reason that although the finding on the questionof adverse possession was concurrent, it had bee,-, seriously challenged before it. On this question, the Division Bench firstly relied on the Municipal Assessment Register for 1900-1901, (Ex. D), and the extract from the Demand Register of a Patna Municipality for 1915-16, (Ex. E).Ex. D showed the name of Amar Singh as the sole owner of the property. Ex.E mentioned Sonadhari and Baijnath only as the owners of the house as Amar Singh had died soon after Ex. I was broughtinto existence. The Division Bench was impressed by thefact that though only recently, in March 1915, Nanbkushalf share in the house had been acknowledged in Ex. 1, hisname was deliberately omitted inEx. E, which meantthat Sonadhari and Baijnath had openly asserted their title to the whole of the house and yet anhku took no steps to assert his title. Nor did he at any time

(1) 1867 2 Cb. A. 294. 188 pay his share of the municipal taxes and the costs of repairs carried out later on by Baijnath. The Division Bench was also impressed with the fact that evenwhen Baijnath, in his written statement in suit No. 33 of 1933, claimed that Nanhkus share had been paid off and be had since then been in exclusive possession of the entire house, Nankhu took no steps to vindicate his title until he and his son filed the present suit in 1949. The Division Bench came to the conclusion that there was not only an assertion of a hostile claimby Baijnath but thatthat assertion was accompanied by an ouster which remained open and continuous throughout the statutory period. As regards the evidence khat Nanhku and sometimes his wife came and stayed in the house,the Division Bench took the view that thesewere casualvisitsin the nature of visits of guests of the defendants, and therefore, did not have the effect of interrupting the continuityand the exclusiveness of possession by the respondents.The Bench even observed that the respondents had completed their titleby adverse possession long before Baijnath claimed exclusive possession in his said written statement in 1933. In this view, the Division Bench held that Nanhkus title in the house was extinguished by adverse possession.The Division Bench accordingly allowed the respondents appeal with costs all throughout. Both the conclusions of the Division Bench have been challenged before us as incorrect.

On the question as to the nature of Ex. I a large number of decisions were cited at the bar to show when a transaction can be said to be a family arrangement. It is not necessary to advert to them as most of them have been considered by this Court in its previous decisions, wherein principles as to when an agreement can properly be regarded as a family arrangement have been set out, Thus, in Pullaiah v. Narasimham(1) after setting out how courts in Englandview family arrangements, Subba Rao, J. (as he then was) observed that the concept of such a family arrangement has alsobeen accepted by courts in India, adapting the concept tosuit the family set up in this country which is different in many respects from that obtaining in England. After examining some earlier decisions which be characterized as illustrations of how family arrangements were viewed, he summarized the law as to a family arrangement as follows: -

,,Briefly stated, though conflict of legal

claims in praesenti or in future is generally

a condition for the validity of a family

arrangement, it is not necessarily so.Even

bona fide disputes, present or possible, which

may

(1) A. I. R. 1966 S. C. 1837.

189

not involve legal claims will suffice.

Members of a joint Hindu family may, to

maintainpeace or to bring about harmony in

the family, enter into such a family arrange-

ment. If such an arrangement is enteredinto

bona fide and the terms thereof are fair in

the circumstances of a particular case, Courts

will more readily give assent tosuch

arrangement than to avoid it.

Even in England, family arrangements are viewed as arrangements governed by principles which are not applicable to dealings between strangers. The courts, when deciding the rightsof parties under family arrangements, considerwhat is most for the interest of families and have regard to considerations which in dealings between persons not members of the same family would not be taken into account. Matters which would be fatal to the validity of similar transactions between strangers are not objections to the binding effect of family arrangements. (see Halsburys Lawsof England, (3rd Ed.), Vol. 17, 215). Thus, in Williams v. Williams(1) the Court held that a family arrangement might be such as the court would uphold although there were no rights in dispute, and if sufficient motive for the arrangement was proved, the Court would not consider the adequacy of consideration. But the question of consideration or mutuality wouldarise,as Williams case(1)shows,when other considerations, such as existing or an apprehended dispute or the question of preservation of property or honour of the family, are absent, so that it is not necessary for a valid family arrangement that there must exist actual competitive claimsor disputes or that the arrangements must be backed by proper consideration. Even disputes likely to arise in futureor preservation of family property and honour would be sufficientto uphold an arrangement bona fidemade between the members of a family.

What actually happens when such a family arrangement is made is explained by Bose, J., in Sahu Madho Das v. Mukund Ram(1) in the following words :

It is well settled that a compromise or

family arrangement is based on the assumption

that there is an antecedent title of some sort

in the parties and the agreementacknowledges

and defines what that title is, each party

relinquishing all claims to property other

than they had previously asserted, to the

portions allotted to them respectively.That

explainswhy no conveyance isrequired in

these cases to pass the title from the one in

whom itresides to the person receiving it

under the

(1) 1867 2 Ch.A. 294.

(2) 1955 2 S. C. R. 22.

190

family arrangement. It is assumed that the

title claimed by the person receiving the

propertyunder the arrangement had always

resided in him or her so far as the property

falling to his or her share is concerned and

therefore no conveyance is necessary.

He went on to say that this was not the only kind of arrangement which the courts would uphold, and thatthey would take the next step of upholding an arrangement under which one set of persons abandons all claims to all title and interestin all the properties in dispute and acknowledges that the sole and absolute title to all the properties resides in only one of their number (provided he or she had claimed the whole and made such an assertion of title)and are content to take such properties as are assigned to them as gifts pure and simple from him or her or as a conveyance for consideration when consideration is present. In such a kind of arrangement where title in the ,(entire property is acknowledged to reside in only one of them and thereupon that person assigns parts of it to others there would be a transfer by that agreement itself which obviously in such a case would need a registered document. This decision lays down the assumption underlying a family arrangement, namely, of an anterior title and its acknowledgement in one to whom a property orpart of it falls under the arrangement. (see also Rani Mewa Kuwar v. Rani Hulas Kuwar(1). Therefore, it is not necessarythat there must exist an anterior title sustainable in law in such a person which the others acknowledge.

The arrangement under challenge has to be considered as a whole for ascertaining whether it was made to allay disputes, existing or apprehended, in theinterest of harmony in the family or the preservation of property. It is not necessary that there must exist a dispute, actual or possible in the future, in respect of each and every item of property and amongst all members arrayed oneagainst the other. It would be sufficient if it is shown that there were actual or possible claims and counter,claims by parties in settlement whereof the arrangement as a whole hadbeen arrived at, thereby acknowledging title in one to whom a particular property falls on the assumption(not actual existence in law) that he had an anterior title therein. In the light of these decisions we must now examine Ex. I to see if the contention of the appellant that it was a family arrangement is correct or not.

The document Ex. 1, after reciting the death of the common ancestor, Rajkumar, his leaving him surviving four sons and the

(1) (1873-1874) L. R. 1 I. A. 157. at 166. 191 deaths of certain other family members thereafter, reads as follows :

Signs of ill feeling developed among us, the

executants Nos.1 to 8, and at the time of

survey and settlement operations, dispute in

connection withthe properties arose. On

account of dispute, wrong statements and claim

were made. On account of which the names of

some of us, the executants were recorded in a

wrong manner on the record of rights and in

the office of thelandRegistration

Department, inrespect of some of the

properties having regard to the real state of

affairs and title. At the time of the survey

and settlement operations ,etc. the claims and

allegations of us, the executants Nos. 1 to 3,

were that we, the executants, are all members

of thejoint family and the properties

standing in the names ,of a certain member of

the family as well as those in the name of

certain female member of the family, belong to

the joint family. Contrary to this, the

claims and allegations of us executants Nos. 4

to 5 were that all the four sons of Raj Kumar

Singh became separate and that executants Nos.

1 to 3 always continued to remain separate

from the (other) executants and executants

Nos. 4 and 5 separate from the (other)

executants and executants Nos. 6 to 8 separate

from the other executants, but in spite of

this allegation of separation, executants Nos.

4 and 5, on account of dispute, made contrary

to the real state of affairs with respect to

certain properties owned and possessed by

executants Nos. 1 to 3, and executants Nos. 6

to 8 also made allegations and claims of

separation and it was alleged that executants

Nos. 1 to 5 (?) neither had nor have any

connection and concern with the properties,

which were and are in the names of Mosst.

Patriga Kuer and Mosst. Reshmi Kuer, although

no party was member of a joint family, nor was

any property joint. As the dispute among us,

the executants is contrary to the real state

of affairs, and in case the said dispute

continues there is apprehension ,of

consideration loss anddamageto us, the

executants, therefore, on the advice of the

well wishers of the parties ,and of the

respectable persons and on the advice of the

legal advisers of the parties, as also with a

view to set at rest all kinds of dispute, it

was settled that all the disputes should be

put to an endby executing a deed of

agreement by way of a deed of relinquishment

of claims (ladavi) and the property, which is

actually,ownedand possessed by a certain

party should be declared to belong tothat

party exclusively, and as a

192

matter of fact, the family of us, the

executants, is separate and the property,

which stands in the name of a certain person,

has been purchased from his or her funds, and

in respect of his or her name should continue

to remain entered in the landRegistration

Department etc. and the name should be entered

if the same is not entered and the other

parties totallygave up their claimwith

respect thereto.

Then follow parts 1 to 4 in each of which certain properties are set out, and in respect of which, title of each of the four sets of the executants is acknowledged by the rest. Para 4, which relates to properties falling to the share of Nanhku, executant 8, commences with the declaration by the rest of the executants, including Amar Singh and Sonadhari, that Nanhku was the adopted son of Ramji and Patreja Kuer, that certain properties set out therein were exclusively acquired by Patreja Kuerand that Nanhku, as the adopted son of Ramji and Patreja Kuer, was exclusively entitled tothem on the death of Patreja, and that we, the executants Nos. 1 to 5, 6 and 7, and the heirs of executant No. 6 neither have nor shall have any claim, title or possession and connection inrespect thereof in any mannerand on any allegation. Following up the arrangement made in Paras I to 4, four schedules giving particulars of properties which were acknowledged tobe belonging to the four sets of executants were appended to Ex. 1. As regards two houses,. ;one at Rajipur and the other in dispute, Schs. 3 and 4 both set out a half share in them as belonging to executants 6 and 7 and the other half as belonging to executant 8, i.e. Nanhku, in each of them.

As already stated, the fundamental premise on which the Division Bench proceeded to consider Ex. I was that there were three sets of executants, namely, those belonging to Laljis branch, i.e., executants 1 to 3, those belonging to Raghunandans branch i.e., executants 4 and 5, and the third set consisting of Amar Singh and Sonadhari executants 6 and 7, and Nanhku, executant 8. The second premise on which the Division Bench rested its entire reasoning was that whereas there were disputes between the three sets of executants, there were no disputes between Amar Singh, Sonadhari and Nankhu, that in fact the three of them acted in concert, and that therefore, one half share given to Nanhku in the house in dispute was altogether voluntarily givenwithout any anterior title and without any claim or dispute raised by Nanhku in, respect thereof. In our view, both the premises were incorrect rendering theconclusion drawn therefrom untenable.

it is true that Amar Singh had in 1898 purchased out of his own moneys the land on which the, suit house stands. It is 193 also true that Nanhku was adopted sometime. before the execution of Ex. 1, and therefore, on the date of its execution he could not have any valid claim enforceable in law any property belonging to Amar Singh andhis branch. But, as stated earlier, a dispute or a contention, the settlement ofwhich can constitute afamilyarrangement, need not be one which is actually sustainable in law. The harmony in a family can be unsettled even by competitive and rival claims which cannot be upheld in law. Therefore, if Amar Singh and the other executants or some of them were to challenge, for instance, the factum or thevalidity of Nanhkus adoption, or if notwithstanding his adoption, Nanhku were to make a claim in properties held by Amar Singh and his branch or if some of the executants were to claim that the family of Rajkumar was still a joint and undivided familyor that though the members of thefamilywere separate, theproperties held in the individual names of some of them including Reshmi Kuer and Patreja Kuerwere joint,there would be sufficient disputes to constitute a settlement of them a family arrangement. A claim, made by executants 1 to 5 that the properties held byReshmiKuer and Patreja Kuer were not their separate properties but-were joint family properties, liable to bepartitioned amongst all, was bound to affect both Amar Singh and Nanhku, If such a claim were to be persisted and dragged to a court of law there is no gainsaying that it would put into jeopardy not only the interests of Amar Singh and Nanhku but also the harmony of the family.

The recitals in Ex. I clearly show that whereas members of Laljis branch were claiming that the family was still joint and undivided, and therefore, they had interest in all the properties irrespective of their standing in the names of particular individuals, Raghunandan and his son claimed that the members of the family were not joint andyet claimed share in all the properties including those standing in the names of Reshmi Kuer and Patreja Kuer. Thus the claims by executants 1 to 5 were definitely hostile to the interests of Amar Singh to :the extent of the properties standing in the name of Reshmi Kuer and of Nanhku to the extent of the properties standing in the name of Patreja Kuer. The claims made by the branches of Lalji and Raghunandan sought to bring all the properties into hotch potch including those held by Resbmi Kuer and Patreja Kuer, thus, affecting the rights of Amar Singh and Nanhku in the different properties and not the same properties. Their interests, therefore, were not identical and there was thus no reason for them to act jointly. Indeed, there was no evidence whatsoever and nothing in Ex. I itself to show that they were acting in concert as assumed by the Division Bench.

13-1 S. C. India/71 194 It is true that the recitals in Ex. I do not expressly set out any conflict of claims between Amar Singhand Nanhku. Nevertheless, it is significant that in para 4 of Ex. I the executants found it necessary toinsert therein a declaration not onlyby executants1 to 5, butalso executants 6 and 7 that Nanhku was the adopted son of Ramji and Patreja Kuer, that on the death of Patreja Kuer he, as such adopted son, was absolutely entitled to the properties set out therein in addition to those which stood in the name of Patreja Kuer. If the adoption of Nankhu was accepted by all and was not made the subject matter of any doubt or dispute, there was no necessity of including such a declaration and in particular joining executants 6 and 7 in such a declaration. If Amar Singh and Nanhku were acting in concert why had Amar Singh and his son, Sonadhari as executants 6 and 7, to be joined as declarants to the adoption of Nanhku. Para 4 of Ex. I also shows that there were certain bonds and mortgage deeds standing in thename of Patreja Kuer which were acquired from out of the personal funds of Ramji. Such a statement had to be acknowledged in paragraph 4 presumably ,because rights in those bonds and deeds were not admitted to be the exclusive rights of Patreja. If those rights were to be treated as joint family property, as claimed by executants 1 to 5, Amar Singh would get a share in them and to that extent his interest must be said to be in conflict with that ofNanhku. A similar resultwould follow if properties standing in the name of RashmiKuer were to be treated as joint family properties. It would not, therefore, be correct to assume that in the disputes amongst thedifferent branches ofthe family. Nanhku and Amar Singh were acting in concert or that there was no conflict of interest between them. In our judgment, the parties to Ex. I arrived at a settlement in view of claimsand cross claims by some against the others. Taken as a whole and in the light of the recitals and the statements in the operative part of the document indicating conflicts amongst the members of the family, the document represented an arrangement bona fide entered into, for settling existing or at any rate apprehended disputes, and therefore, satisfied the tests of a family arrangementlaid down in the decisions earlier referred to. In thisview Nanhkumust be said to have acquired a half share in the house in dispute under Ex. 1.

On the question of adverse possession by a co-sharer against another co-sharer, the law is fairly well settled. Adverse possession has to have the characteristics of adequacy, continuity and exclusiveness.The onus to establish these characteristics is on the adverse possessor.Accordingly, if a holder of title proves 195 that he too had been exercising during the currency of his title various acts of possession, then, the quality of those acts, even though they might not be sufficient to constitute adverse possession as against another, may be abundantly sufficient todestroy that adequacyand interruptthat exclusiveness and continuity which is demanded from a person challenging by possession the title which heholds.(see Kuthali Moothavar v. Paringati Kunharankutty(1). As between co-sharers, the possession of one cosharer is in law the possession ofall co-sharers. Therefore, to constitute adverse possession, ouster of the non-possessing cosharer has to be made out. As between them, therefore, theremust be evidence of open assertion of a hostile title coupled with exclusive possession and enjoyment by one of them to the knowledge of the other. (see Lakshmi Reddy v. Lakshmi Reddy(1) and also Mohammad Baqar v. Naim-un-Nisa Bibi.(3)) But, once the possession of a co-sharer has become adverse as a result of ouster, a mere assertion of a joint title by the dispossessed co-sharer would not interrupt the running of adverse possession. He must actually and effectively break up the exclusive possession of his co-sharer by reentry upon the property or by resuming possession in such a manneras itwas possible to do. (see Wuntakal Yalpi Chanabasavana Gowd v. Y. Mahabaleshwarappa(4)). Themere fact that a dispossessed co-sharer comes and stays for a few days as a guest isnot sufficient to interrupt the exclusiveness or the continuity of adverse possession ,so as not to extinguish the rights of the dispossessed co-sharer. (see Ammakannu Ammal v. Naravanaswami Mudaliar(5)). On this issue, the parties led considerable evidence,oral and documentary. On examination of that evidence, both the Trial Court and the learned Single Judge gave a concurrent finding that even if the possession by the respondents was adverse the appellant and his father had done acts of possession atvarious intervals which were sufficient to interrupt both the continuity and the exclusiveness of possession by the respondents.The Division Bench, however, did not agree with the concurrent finding on a reappraisal of the evidence. by it. It is not necessary for us to go into the details of that evidence once again as certain facts clearlyemerge out of the evidence toprevent the extinguishment of Nanhkus and the appellants title in the property as a result of adverse possession by the respondents.

The principal facts which impressed the Division Benchwere (i) that though in the Demand Register of Patna Municipality for 1915-16 (Ex. E) Sonadhari and Baijnath were the only

(1) 1921 48 I. A. 395, 404.

(3) A. I. R. 1956 S. C. 548.

(5) A. I. R. 1923 Mad. 633.

(2) 1957 S.C.R. 195, 202.

(4) 1955 1 S. C. R. 131, 138. 196

persons named as occupiers, Nanhku had not taken steps to include his name, (2) that all throughout it was Sonadhari and Baijnath who paid the municipal taxes and Nanhku at no time paid his share of the taxes or his share in the cost of repairs and laying of a water pipe in the house, and (3) that though in his written statement in suit No. 33 of1933 Baijnath claimed that he was in exclusive possession of the house as he had paid Nanhku the proportionate price of his share, Nanhku did not take any steps to vindicate his title until he and his son filed the present suit in 1949 by which time the statutory period for adverse possession had already been completed.

There was, however, evidence (if Nanhku and his wife having stayedon different occasions in the house. But the Division Bench was of the view that such acts of possession were only casual and did not have the effect of interrupting the adverse possession of the respondents.

It needs to mention in this connection that Nanhku was all along residing in a village and not in Patna, Therefore, his acts of possession could only be when he came down from his village for some work to Patna. In 1915-1916,when Sonadhari got his name and that of Baijnath entered in the DemandRegister (Ex.E) it might be that Nanhku did not know that they had omitted his name. His half share in the house had been acknowledged in Ex. I only recently byAmar Singh and Sonadhari as well. Relations between the parties had not yet become unfriendly so as to make Nanbku suspect that his name would be deliberately omitted in the municipal records or that possession by Sonadhari and later on by Baijnath would be treated by them as adverse. Baijnath, no doubt,was using the whole house, but so long as his possession did not amount to ouster his possession would be that of both the co-sharers. If Baijnath used the entire house, except when Nanhku stayed in it during his occasional visits, Nanhku would naturally think that Baijnath should pay the taxes.It was not the case of the respondentsthat Baijnath ever demanded a share in the taxes or a share in the cost of repair and that such a demand was refused by Nanhku. The High Court on these facts was not right in observing that the title of Baijnath was already completed by adverse possession long before Baijnath filed his written statement in 1933, as mere use and enjoyment by him of the house, in the absence of such use amounting to ouster, would not make it adverse possession.

It was for the first time that in the written statement filed in 1933 Baijnath openly asserted his title to the whole of the house. Since that assertion was accompanied by the fact that he was in enjoyment of the whole housethat act would amount

197 to ouster and adverse possession would commence as from that date. Obviously, the earlier possession could not be tacked on tothe subsequent possession because the plea inthat very written statement was that Baijnath had paid off the price of Nanhkus share thereby implied admitting Nankhus title to a half share in the house. Suit No. 33 of 1933, in which Baijnath filed the said written statement, was settled in 1941. In the compromise application filed by Nankhu and Baijnath, both of them stated that they wereresiding in that house. That assertion by Nanhku was never disputed by Baijnath.

But apart from that assertion there was the fact that Nanhku had no other place to reside in Patna. His case was that whenever he visited Patna he used to stay in the house in dispute. Apart from that assertion being natural, his evidence in that connection was corroborated by Prabhu Narain, P.W. 4, an Advocate residing in the neighbourhood. The Division Bench brushed aside his evidence without giving any adequate reason although it bad been accepted byboth the Trial Court and the learned Single Judge. In the light of this evidence itis notpossible to say that all throughout the period from 1933 till the statutory period for adverse possession was completed Nanhku had not stayed in the house at any time. Respondent herself admittedthat on suit No. 33 of 1933 beingsettled, relations between Nanhku and Baijnath became friendly. If that be so, it was natural that Nankhu would stay in the housewhenever be visited Patna in 1941 and thereafter.

The Municipal Survey Khasra (Ex. 2), dated December 19, 1933 mentions Nanhku along with Sonadhari and Baijnath as owners of the house. Since this entry was made after Baijnath had made a hostile claim to the entire house inthe written statement filed in suit No. 33 of 1933 on September 16, 1933, the entry must presumably have been made at the instance of Nanhku. Such an act on his Partwould be a clear assertion of his title in the house. Under the Bihar and Orissa Municipal Survey Act, 1 of 1920,beforesuch khasrawas finalised it had to be published and objections to it, if any, had to be invited and disposed of. No objection was ever raised by Baijnath to the said khasra. It is surprising that Baijnath did not resist the entry in the khasra although he had made a claim to the whole of the property only three months before the date ofthe khasra. That indicates that his claim *as merely acounterblast against Nanhkus suit.

The view of the Division Bench that the occasional putting up by Nanhku and his wife in the disputed house was merely casualand was. in the nature of visits as guests of the respondents 198

cannot be accepted. Such stay,however occasional, would.not be casual as it was accompaniedby anopen assertion of his title as evidenced by the khasra (Ex. 2). It could not also be that he stayed in the house as the guest of the respondents because after he filed the suit in 1933 and until it was settled, his relations with Baijnath could not have been friendly. These acts on the part of Nanhku Were ample enough to interrupt the continuity and the exclusiveness of possession by Baijnath.

The Division Bench also relied on a sale deed (Ex. C) dated October 12, 1933, executed by Baijnath and Tarkeshwar in favourof one Kamalnain Pandey. The High Court appears to have taken the view that, the land sold under Ex. C appertained to for was part of the land on which Amar Singh had put up the disputed house, and that although Baijnath and Tarkeshwar sold part of that land, no objection was taken at any time to such a sale by Nanhku. The recitals in Ex. C show that the land, sold under Ex. C.was jointly purchased on January20, 1898 by. Amar Singh and one Gajadhar Singh for construction of a house thereon.Amar Singh had a share in the said land to the extent of I katha 15 dhurs while his c0-purchaser had a share of 2 kathas 15 dhurs.The recitals further show that Amar Singhs original intention in purchasing the land was to build a house thereon. He appears to have given up that idea as till this sale took place the land was lying waste and unutilised. It is important to note that this sale was forI katha 10 dhurs,out of 1 katha 15 dhurs which was the share ofAmar Singh. This land obviously could not be the land on which the house indispute was built, for, if that was so, Baijnath could not have ,sold away I katha 10 dhurs out of the total extent of katha 15 dhurs to which Amar Singh was entitled. The house could not have stood on 5 dhurs only. Therefore, the land sold under Ex. C was a land different from the one on which the disputed house was situate.This conclusion is also borne out by the description of thesold land in the schedule to Ex. C where its northern boundary is described as follows:

North : Parti (waste) land thereafter the house of us, the executants.

This description shows that between the disputed house and the land sold under Ex. C there was to the north of it some waste .land.The land sold under Ex. C being different land, the High Court was not right in relying on thatsale deed to prove adverse possession on the ground at Nanhku never took objection to the said sale. He could not, as this land had nothing to do with the housein dispute. Besides the evidencediscussed above, there was other evidence. But the incidents therein describedwere irrelevant onthe question of adverse possession asthey took 199 place in 1948 and thereafter, that is to say, a longtime after title by adverse possession would have been completed if such adverse possessionwere to be accepted as established. In view of the evidence discussed above the Division Beach was not justified in interfering with the finding of fact concurrently given by the Trial Court and the learned Single Judge that the adverse, possession by Baijnath which commenced from 1933 wassufficiently interrupted by acts of possession by Nanhku, and therefore, his title was not extinguished by adverse possession. In the view we take on both the questions, the appealmust be allowed and the judgment and decree of the Division Bench must be set aside and the judgment and decree passed by the Trial Court and upheld by the learned Single Judge must be restored. The respondents will pay to the appellant his costs all throughout.

G.C. Appeal allowed. 200
**********', 0] , 
[ 'CROSS CITATION
1969 SCC (3) 447
1970 SCR (2) 903

CIVIL APPELLATE JURISDICTION : Civil Appeal No. 1369 of 1966. Appealby special leave from the judgment andorder dated September 11,1962 of the Allahabad High Court in Civil Revision No. 653 of 1959. 904 G. N. Dikshit, O. P. Saini and Lakshmi Chand Tyagi, for the appellant.

J. P. Goyal and S. N. Singh, for the respondents. The Judgment of the Court was delivered by

Hegde, J. This appeal by special leave arises from an arbitration proceeding. The appellant, the 1st respondent and one Sukh Lalwho died during thependency of these proceedings referred their disputes to five arbitrators as per the written agreement executed by them on September 9, 1955.Arbitrators made their award on October 11, 1955. They duly served on the parties to the arbitration agreement, notice of making and significantaward. The award was thereafter registered. On November 1, 1955 the appellant filed a suit in the court of Munsiff Hawali Meerut praying that the award in question be made a rule of the court and decree passed in accordance with the same. It is said that the notice taken in thatsuit could not be personally served onthe defendants as they refused to accept the same. That fact was reported to the court by the process server as per hisreport dated 19-11-1955. Thereafter the defendants filed their written statement on February 3, 1956 wherein they challenged validity of the award on various grounds. They contended that the award was vitiated because ofmisconduct onthe part of the arbitrators inasmuch as the arbitrators decided the disputes referred to them primarily on the basis of their personal knowedge. They also contended that the arbitration agreement wasobtained from them by exercise of undue influence. Their further contention was thatthe subject matterof the dispute could not under law be referred to, arbitration in view of the provisions of U.P. Act 1 of 1951. It was also contended by them that the suit was barred by time.

The trial court accepted the contention of the defendants that the arbitrators were guilty of misconduct. Dealing with the issue of undue influence, it came to the conclusion that the arbitrationagreement was not executed by the defendants according to their free will. But it heldthat the plea of undue influence was not made out. It upheld the contention of the defendants that the subject matter of the dispute could not have been referred to arbitration inview of the provisions of U.P. Act I of 1951.

In appeal the learned Civil Judge reversed the decree of the trial court. While agreeing with the trial court that the arbitrators had used their personal knowledgein deciding the disputes referred to them, that court held that under the terms of the agreement, it was open to the arbitrators to decide the disputes in question on the basis of their personal knowledge. Dealing with

905 the question of the arbitrators competence to decide the dispute, thatcourt held that the questionwhether the dispute came within the scope of U.P. Act 1 of 1951 or not is a question of law and the same could have been referred to arbitration. It went further and held that as the defendants had not taken their objection. to the award withinthe time prescribed, the same could not havebeen entertained by the trial court.

The High Court in revision differed from the appellate court on all the points mentioned above. It came to the conclusion that the arbitration agreement did not specifically empower the arbitrators to decide the disputes referred to them on the basis of their personal knowledge; they having utilized their personal knowledgein deciding the disputes,they were guilty of legal misconduct and consequently the award made by them is vitiated. Italso came to the conclusion that the disputes in question could not have been referred to arbitration in view of the provisions of U.P. Act 1 of 1951. It overruled the decision of the appellate court that the defendants had not taken their objections to the award within the prescribed time. We may at this stage mention that the contention that the suit was barred by time was not pressed before the trial court or in any other court.

Thereis no basis for the finding of the appellate court that the objection taken by the defendants to the award was barred by time. As seen earlier, the suit to make the award a rule of the court was brought by one of the parties to the arbitration agreement and not by any arbitrator. The plaint filed does not disclose that the award given hadbeen produced along with it. There was some controversy as _to whether that award was produced along withthe plaint. There is no need to go into that question as we shall presently see. It is not said that along with the plaint copy, a copy of the award had been sent to the defendants. Nor is it said that notice of the suit sent to the defendants mentioned the fact that the award had been filed into court along with the plaint. Art. 158 of the Limitation Act, 1908gives to party 30 days time for applying to set aside an award or get an award remitted for reconsideration from the date of the service of the notice of filing of the award. There is absolutely no proof in this case that a notice of the filing of the awardinto court had ever been given to the defendants. Hence the objections taken by the defendants to the award could not have been rejected on the round of limitation. Now coming to the question of misconduct on the part of the arbitrators, that allegation is founded on the fact that the arbitrators decided the disputes referred to them on the basis of their 906 personal knowledge. That allegation has beenaccepted as true both by the trial court as well as the appellate court. In fact the award says :

We gave our consideration to the entire dispute which is in full knowledge of us, the panchas.

Therefore there is hardly any room to contest the allegation that the arbitrators had decided the disputesreferred to them primarily ,on the basis of theirpersonal knowledge. Under these circumstances all that we have to see is whether the appellate court was right in concluding that under the arbitration agreement, the arbitrators had been empowered to decidethe disputes referred to them on the basis of their personal knowledge.

The material portion of the arbitration agreement which is in Hindi translated into English reads thus :

All the panchas and Sarpanchas are residents

of village Keli Pargana Sarawa. The power is

given to them that the saidPanchas and

Sarpanch, whatever decision, in whatever

manner will give in relation to ourland

described below, whatever land may be given to

any party or whatever party may be decided to

be the tenant of the entire land, whatever

compensation they may decide to be given to

any party, whatever decision they willgive

that will be final and acceptable andthey

will have the right to inform us of their

decision, unanimous or of majority and get the

same registered and we will fully complywith

their decision.

This agreement does not empower the arbitrators either specifically or by necessary implication to decide the disputes referred to them on the basis of their personal knowledge. The recital inthat agreement that the arbitrators may decide the disputes referredto them in whatever manner they think does not mean that they can decidethose disputes on the basis of their personal knowledge. The proceedings before the arbitrators are quasi-judicialproceedings. They must be conducted in accordance with the principles of natural justice. The parties to the submission may be in the dark as regards the personal knowledge of the arbitrators. There may be misconceptionsor wrong assumptions in the mind of the arbitrators. If the parties are not given opportunity to correct those misconceptions or wrongassumptions, ,-rave injustice may result. It is no bodys case that the parties to the submission were informed about the nature of the personal knowledge, the arbitrators had and that theywere given opportunity to correct any misconception or wrong assumption. Further in the present case there were asmany as five arbitrators. It is 907 not known whether the, award was made on the basis of the personal knowledge of all of them or only some of them. Arbitration is a reference of a dispute for hearing in a judicial manner. It is true that parties to an agreement of reference may include in it such clauses as they think fit unless prohibited by law. It is normally an implied term of an arbitration agreement that the arbitratorsmust decide the dispute in accordance with the ordinary law-see Chandris v. Isbrandtsen Moller Co. Inc(1). That rule can be departed from only if specifically provided for in the submission. The appellate, court, in our opinion, hasmisread the arbitration agreement and hence it erroneously came to the conclusion that the arbitrators had been empowered to decide the dispute on the basis of their personal knowledge. It was contended on behalf of the appellant that in exercise of its powers under s. 115 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the High Court could not have corrected the erroneous interpretation placed by the appellate court as to the scope of the arbitration agreement. We have not thought it necessary to go into that question as, in our opinion, the decision reached by the High Court is an eminently just one. Hence we do not feel called upon in exercise of our discretionary power under Art. 136 of the Constitution to interfere with the decision of the High Court. In view of our above conclusion, there is no need to go into the question whether the subject matter of the disputes could have been referred to arbitration.

In the result this appeal fails and the same is dismissed with cost.

Appeal dismissed.

V.P.S.

(1) 11951 K.B. 249. 908
**********', 0] , 
[ 'CROSS CITATION
2016 AIR (SC) 714
HEADNOTE
FLAT ALLOTMENT / SERVICE & LABOUR LAWS
Maharashtra Housing and Area Development Authority (MHADA) constructed flats for lower and middle income groups - Central Bank of India took possession of land and ten such buildings with intention of housing the families of 200 employees - Bank issuing circular regarding policy of allotment of flats to class III & IV employees - Allotment of flat not as of right or condition of service - Discretion of management absolute - Bank stopped allotting flats with the view to redevelop, by demolishing flats - Eviction notice issued to occupants of the flats under provision of Public Premises (Eviction of unauthorised occupants) Act 1971 - Proceeding contested before Estate Officer failed - Appeal failed before Appellant Authority - Writ petition before High Court dismissed. Held employees have no vested right as allotment was not the part of their condition of service.
HELD
There is no doubt that none of the employees have any right to retain the allotted premises, more particularly since the allotment was not a part of their condition of service. This is quite clear from the Circulars dated 15th September, 1982 and 25th May, 1983. That apart, no right based submission was made before us. That being the position, it is really difficult to appreciate the basis on which the employees are claiming an entitlement to continue in the allotted premises. (Para 18)

Bank taking land from MHADA for Housing middle/lower income group employees - As a redevelopment plan, Bank intending to demolish the same for constructing luxury apartment for managerial staff - Said purpose, allegedly, contrary to lease agreement with MHADA. Held many clauses referred in lease agreement, do not confer any right on employee to raise the issue of violation of provision of lease deed. This is not a public interest litigation. Time granted to employees to vacate the flat.
HELD
The second argument advanced by the employees is really a different facet of the first argument and since we do not find any basis at all for the grievance of the employees against either the MHADA or against the Bank, we reject this submission as well. (Para 21)

Since the employees have been residing in the flats for a considerable period of time, we grant them time to vacate the premises allotted to them on or before 31st March, 2016. We expect the employees to peacefully vacate the allotted premises and if there is some difficulty in this regard, the Bank is at liberty to approach the High Court for the implementation of its order of eviction. (Para 23)

Damages for illegal occupation of flats - As a redevelopment plan, Bank intending to demolish flats constructed for Housing middle/lower income group employee so as to construct luxury apartment for managerial staff - Employees, having no vested right, refusing to vacate. Held, Court would not direct them to pay damages as they were pursuing their remedies before High Court and Apex Court. (Para 24)

Ed.: Court emphasised the need for Institutionalized alternative dispute resolution mechanism in order to avoid protracted litigation. In this case, though efforts were made to settle dispute but no institutional mechanism was invited to assist in the settlement process.

CASES REFERRED
1. K. Srinivas Rao v. D.A. Deepa JT 2013 (3) SC 97 (Para 3)

2. Afcons Infrastructure Ltd. v. Cherian Varkey Construction Co. (P) Ltd. JT 2010 (7) SC 616 (Para 3)

3. Salem Advocate Bar Assn. (II) v. Union of India JT 2005 (6) SC 486 (Para 3)

MADAN B. LOKUR, J.

1. The proceedings in these petitions as indeed the proceedings in the Bombay High Court (out of which the present petitions have arisen) indicate a clear need for encouraging an amicable settlement process, preferably through mediation, in which the services of a mediator well-versed in the art, science and technique of mediation may be taken advantage of. The alternative, of course, is protracted litigation which may not be the best alternative for the contesting parties or for a society that requires expeditious justice delivery.

2. In his Foreword written on 12th April, 2011 to the first edition of Mediation Practice & Law - The path to successful dispute resolution written by Mr. Sriram Panchu, Senior Advocate and Mediator, Mr. Fali S. Nariman, a Senior Advocate of this Court and a respected jurist, writes:

The same subject matter of disputation between two parties can be dealt with in two different ways, not necessarily exclusive: first, by attempting to resolve a dispute in such a way that the parties involved win as much as possible and lose as little as possible through the intervention of a third party steeped in the techniques of mediation; and second, (failing this) the dispute would be left to be resolved by each party presenting its case before a disinterested third party with an expectation of a binding decision on the merits of the case: a win-all lose-all, final determination.

2.1. The second alternative may not be the best alternative, as already mentioned by us.

3. The decision rendered by the High Court which is under challenge before us states that efforts were made to have the disputes between the contesting parties settled but it is clear that no institutional mechanism was invited to assist in the settlement process. The proceedings before us also indicate that several efforts were made to encourage the contesting parties to arrive at a settlement, and at one point of time the parties did reach an interim arrangement but that could not fructify into a final settlement only because of the absence of an intervention through an institutional mechanism. Appreciating this, this Court has consistently encouraged the settlement of disputes through an institutionalized alternative dispute resolution mechanism and there are at least three significant decisions rendered by this Court on the subject. They are: (i) Salem Advocate Bar Assn. (II) v. Union of India JT 2005 (6) SC 486 (ii) Afcons Infrastructure Ltd. v. Cherian Varkey Construction Co. (P) Ltd. JT 2010 (7) SC 616 : 2010 (8) SCC 24 (iii) K. Srinivas Rao v. D.A. Deepa JT 2013 (3) SC 97 : 2013 (5) SCC 226

4. That apart this Court has, on several occasions, referred disputes for amicable settlement through the Mediation Centre functioning in the Supreme Court premises itself and Mediation Centres across the country in a large variety of disputes including (primarily) matrimonial disputes. In spite of the encouragement given by this Court, for one reason or another, institutionalized mediation has yet to be recognized as an acceptable method of dispute resolution provoking Mr. Fali S. Nariman to comment in the same Foreword in the context of the Afcons decision that Mediation must stand on its own; its success judged on its own record, un-assisted by Judges.

5. With this prologue, it is necessary to state the facts of the dispute before us. The Maharashtra Housing and Area Development Authority (MHADA) had constructed some buildings for the lower and middle income groups in a complex known as Samata Nagar, Kandivli, Mumbai. Each building had twenty flats. The Central Bank of India (for short the Bank) took possession of the land and ten such buildings on 16th August, 1982 with the intention of housing the families of a total of 200 employees. Pursuant thereto, the Bank issued Circulars on 15th September, 1982 and 25th May, 1983 relating to the policy of allotment of the flats to its Class III and Class IV employees.

6. The Circular dated 15th September, 1982 provided that the flats would be allotted to employees under the jurisdiction of the Central Office, Bombay Main Office and the Bombay Metropolitan Regional Office. It also provided that the allotment would be as per the absolute discretion of the management and that the facility of allotment was not given as a condition of service nor did any right vest in any staff member.

7. The Circular dated 25th May, 1983 made some minor modifications in the eligibility for allotment but the sum and substance, as far as the present proceedings are concerned, remained more or less the same.

8. Based on the above broad principles, the allotment of flats was made to its employees by the Bank. We are told that presently, about 50 families are living in these flats, the rest being vacant.

9. As earlier agreed upon by MHADA and the Bank, on 29th July, 1994 MHADA leased out the land underneath the buildings to the Bank for a period of 90 years. Some of the salient conditions mentioned in the Lease Deed read as follows:-

(h) Not to assign, sublet, underlet or otherwise transfer in any other manner whatsoever including parting with the possession of the whole or any part of the said land or its interest thereunder or benefit of this lease to any person or persons or change the user of the said land or any part thereof without the previous written permission of the Authority.

(i) To use the said land and the tenements in the said buildings constructed thereon for the purpose of residence of its employees as service quarter only and for no other purpose.

(l) Not to make any excavation upon any part of the said land without the previous consent of the Authority in writing first obtained, except for the purpose of repairing renovation or rebuilding the existing structure standing on the said land or utilization of permissible F.S.I. if any as per Development control rules/regulations on the plot leased to the lessee which is a part of a layout of village Poisar at Borivali Bombay.

10. Apparently with a view to redevelop the plot by demolishing the buildings purchased by the Bank, it appears that the Bank stopped allotting the flats from sometime in 1997 onwards and on or about 15th June, 2007 it floated a proposal for redevelopment of the plot by demolishing the buildings. The proposal for redevelopment necessitated the eviction of the employees from the flats occupied by them. Therefore, sometime in July 2007 eviction notices were issued to the employees-allottees under the provisions of the Public Premises (Eviction of Unauthorised Occupants) Act, 1971 (for short the Act).

11. Some of the employees contested the proceedings and eventually an order was passed by the Estate Officer appointed under the Act in 2008 rejecting all their submissions and they were directed to vacate the public premises within 15 days of the date of publication of the order failing which they were liable to be evicted, if need be, by the use of such force as may be necessary. The employees were also ordered to pay damages with effect from 15th June, 2007 till the date of handing over of peaceful possession of the public premises to the Bank failing which the amount would be recovered as arrears of land revenue.

12. Feeling aggrieved, the employees preferred appeals under Section 9 of the Act which came to be dismissed by the City Civil Court in Bombay in June 2008. The Appellate Authority dismissed all the appeals with costs but stayed the order of eviction for a period of seven days to enable the employees to approach the Bombay High Court.

13. The employees then approached the High Court by filing Writ Petition Nos.4417 of 2008 and 5589 of 2008 which were heard by a learned Single Judge and dismissed by a judgment and order dated 19th December, 2008 (impugned before us).

14. The employees made the following four submissions before the High Court:

(i) MHADA had leased the land to the Bank for building residential quarters for Class IV employees;

(ii) the premises were part of the conditions of services of the Class IV employees which could not be taken away by issuing a quit notice;

(iii) The purpose for which the Bank required vacant buildings was for demolishing them in order to build new buildings for housing their managerial staff; and

(iv) The notice for eviction did not spell out the reasons for evicting the petitioners.

15. Each of these contentions was rejected by the High Court but before us, learned counsel for the petitioners effectively pressed only the 1st and 3rd contentions, being inter-linked.

16. At this stage, we must point out that the High Court has observed that several adjournments were granted to the parties to negotiate a settlement. However, the parties failed to arrive at any settlement and it is for this reason that the High Court was compelled to deliver judgment. Before this Court also several efforts were made to arrive at some kind of an amicable settlement including providing alternative accommodation to the employees or making monthly payment to them in lieu of the allotted premises. However, for one reason or another despite best efforts made by learned counsel for the parties, no settlement could be arrived at.

17. At one stage, the following interim arrangement was broadly accepted by both the sides as noted in the order dated 29th November, 2010 but even that interim arrangement did not fructify into a settlement between the parties and it is for this reason that we too have been compelled to decide on the correctness or otherwise of the judgment and order passed by the High Court.

(i) 49 employees (sub staff) are occupying units spread over several buildings. Though most of the units are vacant, as some of the units are occupied, the Bank is not in a position to demolish the buildings and take up development work which it proposes. In the circumstances, out of the 49 employees, those who are allottees of quarters, will be shifted by the Bank to one or two buildings so that the Bank will be able to demolish the other buildings and take up the development.

(ii) It is made clear that if any family members of deceased allottees (who have been given compassionate appointment) are continuing in such units, they will not be entitled to alternative accommodation. Such occupants will have to vacate.

(iii) The Bank will, in the meanwhile, continue its efforts to identify alternative premises for those who are being shifted to the two buildings.

18. There is no doubt that none of the employees have any right to retain the allotted premises, more particularly since the allotment was not a part of their condition of service. This is quite clear from the Circulars dated 15th September, 1982 and 25th May, 1983. That apart, no right based submission was made before us. That being the position, it is really difficult to appreciate the basis on which the employees are claiming an entitlement to continue in the allotted premises.

19. It was submitted before us that the land was leased out by the MHADA to the Bank for the purposes of housing middle income group employees or lower income group employees. As a result of the redevelopment plan, the Bank was intending to demolish the buildings and to construct luxury apartments for their managerial level officers, contrary to the lease agreement with MHADA. Assuming this to be so, if there is a violation of the provisions of the lease deed between the MHADA and the Bank, it is really for them to settle their differences, if any. The employees do not come into the picture at all.

20. The various clauses in the lease agreement that have been referred to do not in any manner involve the employees and for them to raise an issue about any alleged violation of the provisions of the lease deed is totally inconsequential. This is not a public interest litigation where the rule relating to standing can be relaxed. We are therefore not inclined to accept this submission of the employees that since the MHADA had leased out the land to the Bank for housing middle income group or lower income group employees, the Bank is disentitled from demolishing the buildings and constructing luxury apartments for their managerial level officers.

21. The second argument advanced by the employees is really a different facet of the first argument and since we do not find any basis at all for the grievance of the employees against either the MHADA or against the Bank, we reject this submission as well.

22. Under these circumstances, we find no merit in these petitions and therefore decline to grant special leave to appeal and dismiss these petitions but with no order as to costs.

23. Since the employees have been residing in the flats for a considerable period of time, we grant them time to vacate the premises allotted to them on or before 31st March, 2016. We expect the employees to peacefully vacate the allotted premises and if there is some difficulty in this regard, the Bank is at liberty to approach the High Court for the implementation of its order of eviction.

24. We may also note that the Bank has demanded damages from the employees both who are still working with the Bank and those who have retired. In our opinion, since the employees were pursuing their remedies before the High Court as well as before this Court, we do not think it appropriate to direct them to pay any damages to the Bank for the use and occupation of the premises allotted nor do we think it appropriate to permit the Bank to recover the damages awarded against the employees.

**********', 0] , 
[ 'CROSS CITATION
2007 AIR (SC) 1401
2007 (3) SCR 545
APPEARANCES
Mr. Sunil Gupta, Senior Advocate, Mr. Jatin Zaveri, Advocate with him for the Appellant.
Mr. R. Venkataramani, Senior advocate, Mr. Nikhilesh Ramchandran and Mr. Ashok Panigrahi, Advocates, with him for the Respondents.
HEADNOTE
Arbitration
Arbitration Act, 1940
Sections 14 ,20 and 31 -Code of Civil Procedure, 1908 - Section 20 Arbitration award -Application for making the award a rule of the court - Territorial jurisdiction of the court - Determination - Agreement between appellant and respondent with regard to development of certain land and construction there on- Land located in New Delhi - Owner of the land residing in Faridabad, Haryana - Developer company having its registered office in New Delhi - Disputes between the parties - Arbitrator making an award notwithstanding the pendency of the application under Section 20 made by the appellant land owner in the High Court - Respondent developer making an application under Section 14 in the Faridabad court for making the award the rule of the court -Whether the said court has the juris-diction to entertain the application and make the award a rule of the court. Held Section 20 of CPC is attracted and since the appellant resided at Faridabad and the dispute involved rendition of accounts, the court at Faridabad had the jurisdiction to entertain the application under Section 14 to make the award the rule of the court.
HELD
We are of the view that at the relevant time the appellant resided at Faridabad. He resided at Faridabad when the contract was made. Under the contract, the parties agreed to refer all disputes to the Faridabad court. Apart from the residence, we are also concerned with the place of accrual of the cause of action. In the present case, a bare reading of the agreement indicates that it is an agreement to develop. The appellant remains the owner, the Developer remains the contractor. The Developer is the financer. The appellant is the owner of an asset. The contractor/ Developer agrees to exploit that asset on behalf of the owner. The Developer funds the scheme. The building plans remained in the name of the owner. The D.D.A. informs the owner regarding revocation of the building plan. The owner files the writ petition challenging the revocation. The contractor is paid consideration in terms of a part of the property. In the circumstances, it cannot be said that this case is similar to a suit for land. One cannot look at para 16 alone in isolation. On the other hand, with open eyes, theparties had entered into the contract, they had agreed to refer all disputes to an arbitrator at Faridabad and they had agreed that the Faridabad court alone shall have jurisdiction. In a matter of this kind, it can- not be said that the claim is similar to a suit for land. A housing complex has to be constructed at the site. When dispute arises, it will not be confined only to immovable property. Such disputes also require accounts to be maintained. The disputes also involve rendition of accounts. In the circumstances, in our view, section 20 CPC alone is attracted. Therefore, in our view, the High Court was right in holding that the Faridabad court had jurisdiction to make the Award the rule of the court. (Para 16)

Arbitration Act, 1940

Sections 8 , 14 to 17 and 20 - Arbitration - Ex parte award - Validity - Distinction and applicability of Sections 8 and 20 - Reference made to Arbitrator on 24-8-1992 - On the date fixed for hearing arbitrator not entering presence - However award made after fourteen months that too after one party moved an application under Section 20 in the High Court - Trial court making the award rule of the court by an ex parte order - Validity. Without going into the merits held that the order of the trial court was not sustainable. Matter accordingly directed to be restored to file of the trial court for re-examination as to whether the award given by the arbitrator should or should not be made rule of the court.
HELD


We have also gone through the Award. We do not wish to express any opinion on the merits, however, the fact remains that the arbitrator entered upon the reference on 24.8.1992. He fixed 06 passed by the trial court at Faridabad making Award dated 29.3.1994 the rule of the court. Consequently, we direct restoration of the matter to the file of the Court of Additional Civil Judge (Senior Division), Faridabad in Case No. 7 instituted on 12.4.1994 titled M/s Chopra Land Developers Pvt. Ltd. v. Jatinder Nath and Anr.. We may clarify that the trial court will proceed on the basis that it has territorial jurisdiction to decide the application made by the Developer under sections 14 to 17 of the Act. The said application will be decided on merits alone in accordance with law. In other words, the trial court will re-examine the question on merits as to whether the Award given by the arbitrator on 29.3.1994 should or should not be made the rule of the court. The trial court will have to decide whether to extend the period for making the Award or not, whether to supercede the reference or not. The trial court will proceed in accordance with law. Any observation on the merits of the case mentioned hereinabove shall not be treated as opinion of this Court. Further, the trial court will proceed on the basis that it has territorial jurisdiction to decide the above matter. (Para 17)

CASES REFERRED
1. Union of India v. Surjeet Singh Atwal AIR 1970 SC 189 (Para 8)


KAPADIA, J.

1. Leave granted.

2. This civil appeal arises from the final order dated 19.4.2006 passed by the High Court of Punjab and Haryana at Chandigarh allowing Civil Revision No. 4877/96.

3. The short question which arises for determination in this civil appeal is whether the Additional Civil Judge (Senior Division), Faridabad was right in dismissing the application filed under section 14 of the Arbitration Act, 1940 (for short the Act) filed by M/s Chopra Land Developers Pvt. Ltd.
(the Developer) on the basis of Award dated 29.3.1994 given by the Arbitrator in the above court for want of jurisdiction.

4. The Developer is a private limited company having its registered office at Saket, New Delhi. On 16.3.1990 an Agreement was entered into by the Developer with one Jatinder Nath (appellant herein). At that time, the appellant was residing at Faridabad. Under the above agreement, the Developer agreed to construct a housing complex on a plot bearing No. G-13, Saket, New Delhi. Under the said Agreement, the Developer agreed to finance the construction from its own resources. Clauses 11, 20 and 21 of the said agreement read as follows:

11. In case of any dispute arising between the parties in this respect, the matter shall be referred to the Sole Arbitrator for his valuable decision and his decision shall be final and binding on both the parties.

20. That in case of any dispute arising between the parties in respect of these presents, the same shall be referred for arbitration to the sole Arbitrator. Shri Damodar Sharma, 5-N/35, NIT Faridabad shall be the sole Arbitrator and the decision shall be binding on both the parties.

21. The agreement has been entered into between the parties at Faridabad and the Faridabad Courts only shall have the jurisdiction in case of any dispute between the parties to the said agreement.

In terms of the said agreement, when the dispute arose between the parties, the appellant herein requested for a reference to the named Arbitrator. This was vide letter dated 20.8.1992. The Arbitrator entered upon the reference on 24.8.1992. He fixed the hearing on 5.9.1992 on which date the appellant remained present at the venue of arbitration. However, neither the arbitrator nor the Developer was present. Suddenly after fourteen months, the arbitrator purported to act. He fixed the matter for hearing on 20.2.1994. Since the entire matter was pending before the Delhi High Court which was moved by the appellant herein under section 20, the arbitrator was requested not to proceed. Despite the request, the arbitrator proceeded to give his Award (ex parte). This was on 29.3.1994.

6. To complete the chronology of events, it may be pointed out that the Developer (first respondent herein) filed an application under section 14 of the Act for filing the Award in the court of Additional Civil Judge (Sr. Div.), Faridabad (for short the trial court). Notice of the said application was also given to the appellant herein. The appellant herein appeared and filed his objections. He objected to the jurisdiction of the trial court. According to the appellant, the suit land stood located in Saket, New Delhi and, therefore, the trial court had no jurisdiction to pass the decree in terms of the said Award. This was the basic objection raised by the appellant before us. Apart from his objection on territorial jurisdiction, the appellant also submitted before the trial court that the Arbitrator had issued notice dated 24.8.1992 fixing the date of hearing on 5.9.1992. However, when his advocate reached the residence of the Arbitrator on the date fixed, neither the Arbitrator nor the Developer had turned up. The appellant also contended before the trial court that the Award was not made within the period of four months from entering upon the reference and, therefore, the Arbitrator had become functus officio. He further pointed out to the trial court that an application under section 20 of the Act has also been filed in the High Court by him for filing the arbitration agreement in court. The appellant submitted that despite raising the above objections before the Arbitrator, the Arbitrator proceeded to pass an ex parte Award dated 29.3.1994. The appellant further pointed out that the Developer had filed a suit for permanent injunction in the Court of Senior Sub-Judge, Delhi and that the Developer had sought intervention of the civil court for adjudication of the dispute and, in the circumstances, the Arbitrator could not have made an ex parte Award dated 29.3.1994. According to the appellant, the said ex parte Award passed by the Arbitrator was in violation of the provisions of the Act; that it was non est, and, therefore, the same could not be made rule of the Court.

7. The trial court on the basis of the above pleadings framed several issues. Two of the six issues were, whether Award dated 29.3.1994 was non est as the Arbitrator had become functus officio and whether the trial
court had no territorial jurisdiction to entertain the matter since the suit lands are located in Saket, New Delhi.

8. By impugned judgment dated 24.9.1996, the trial court held that in view of section 31(4) of the Act, since the land in question stood located in Saket, New Delhi and since the appellant herein is the resident of Delhi and since the Developer was carrying on business in Delhi the trial court had no territorial jurisdiction to pass the decree in terms of the Award. The trial court rejected the contention of the Developer that the subject matter of the reference was the contract between the parties; that under the contract, the dispute, if any, was to be referred for arbitration in Faridabad; that under the contract, the dispute was referable to the sole arbitrator whose decision was to bind both the parties. The trial court also rejected the contention of the Developer that the agreement was entered into between the parties at Faridabad and that the Faridabad court alone had the jurisdiction to decide the above dispute. The trial court also rejected the contention of the Developer that on the date of execution of the agreement, the appellant herein was residing in Faridabad. On the merits of the case, the trial court found that the appellant herein had moved a petition under section 20 of the Act on 14.10.1993 in the Delhi High Court which was registered as Suit No. 2482/93 wherein it was prayed that an independent arbitrator be appointed and the matter be referred for arbitration. On 14.10.1993 the Arbitrator had not made the award. On 14.10.1993 the period of four months had expired. The trial court found that after the institution of petition under section 20 of the Act on 14.10.1993, the arbitrator, suddenly, after a lapse of almost
fourteen months from the date of his entering upon the reference, made an ex parte Award against the appellant on 29.3.1994. According to the trial court, though the agreement (exhibit P-1) stood executed at Faridabad, the validity of that agreement and the dispute arising therefrom have to be decided in the civil court at Delhi since the property in question stood located in Saket, New Delhi. According to the trial court, the Developer had moved an application under section 14 of the Act on 12.4.1994, by that application, the Developer sought a decree from the trial court at Faridabad in terms of the ex parte Award. On 12.4.1994, according to the trial court, the appellant herein was residing in Delhi, he was served with the summons at his residential address in Delhi coupled with the fact that the suit property was in Delhi and, therefore, the trial court at Faridabad had no territorial jurisdiction to entertain and try the Developers application under section 14 of the Act. According to the trial court, there was one more reason for saying that it had no territorial jurisdiction. According to the trial court the agreement (exhibit P-1), pertained to immovable property at Saket and when a dispute arose between the parties, the appellant herein had moved the Delhi High Court under section 20 of the Act in which the address of the appellant was shown as G-13, Saket, New Delhi. The trial court also look into account one more circumstance, namely, that the Developer had instituted Civil Suit No. 945/92 against the appellant herein. In that suit, the Developer had asked for a decree for permanent injunction. In that suit the appellant herein was the defendant. In that suit, the address of the appellant as defendant was also shown as G-13, Saket, New Delhi. In the circumstances, the trial court held that the Developer had invoked the territorial jurisdiction of the Delhi High Court much prior to his application under section 14 of the Act to the trial court herein on 12.4.1994. In the circumstances, the trial court held that the proviso to section 16 CPC was not applicable and that the application filed by the Developer under section 14 of the Act dated 12.4.1994 should have been instituted in the Delhi Court within the local limits of whose jurisdiction the suit property stood located. In the circumstances, it was held by the trial court that clause 21 of the agreement conferring jurisdiction to the Faridabad court cannot be implemented. The trial court observed that since the appellant had moved the Delhi High Court under section 20 of the Act for appointment of a new arbitrator in the year 1993 and since that application was prior to 12.4.1994 and since that application was anterior to the reference, the appellants application under section 20 of the Act fell within the purview of section 31(4) of the Act. According to the trial court, since a petition under section 20 of the Act was pending prior to 12.4.1994 in the Delhi High Court, the Developer should have moved his application under section 14 also before the Delhi High Court. In this connection reliance was placed on the judgment of this court in the case of Union of India v. Surjeet Singh Atwal1. Aggrieved by decision of the trial court dated 24.9.1996, the Developer moved the Delhi High Court by way of the CRA. In the CRA the Developer contended that under the agreement (exhibit P-1) vide clause 21 it was agreed between the parties that the Faridabad courts alone shall have the jurisdiction in case of any dispute between the parties and, therefore, the trial court had territorial jurisdiction to entertain and try application dated 12.4.1994 under section 14 of the Act. It was contended, in the alternative, that where two courts have concurrent jurisdiction, the parties by agreement can choose the jurisdiction of one of them and such a choice was not against the public policy. It was contended that an agreement whereby jurisdiction of the court stood specified was not contrary to section 28 of the Contract Act and to the public policy. It was further contended that where two courts had territorial jurisdiction to try a case, it is open to the parties to enter into an agreement whereby jurisdiction of the court stood specified. On behalf of the Developer it was further contended that, at the time of execution of the agreement (exhibit P-1) the appellant herein resided at Faridabad and his subsequent change of address cannot change clause 21 of the agreement. It was further urged on behalf of the Developer that an application under section 20 of the Act was filed by the appellant herein in the Delhi High Court and it had no relevance with clause 21 of exhibit P-1. According to the Developer, filing of such suit under section 20 of the Act before the Delhi High Court cannot alter the terms of exhibit P-1. It was further urged on behalf of the Developer that it had instituted the above suit for permanent injunction in the Delhi High Court. That suit was Suit No. 945/92 for permanent injunction which was for a relief which had no correlation with the arbitration matter. Moreover, that suit was for permanent injunction. Such a suit could have been filed in Delhi courts alone as in that suit it was alleged that the appellant herein was attempting to interfere with the Developers possession. Such a suit did not constitute a waiver. On behalf of the Developer, it was further urged that the trial court had erred in coming to the conclusion that exhibit P-1 cannot be given effect as the suit property was located at Saket, New Delhi and that the parties were residing at Delhi.

9. On behalf of the appellant herein, it was sought to be argued before the High Court that although exhibit P-1 was executed at Faridabad and although at the relevant time the appellant resided in Faridabad, the dispute was in connection with recovery of possession and, therefore, the civil court at Faridabad had no jurisdiction to entertain, try and dispose of the Developers application under section 14 of the Act. It was also urged that subsequently the appellant had shifted his residence from Faridabad to Saket in New Delhi and, therefore, the trial court was right in refusing to entertain the Developers application dated 12.4.1994 under section 14 of the Act. Accordingly, on behalf of the appellant herein it was urged that no interference is called for in the CRA.

10. By the impugned judgment, the High Court held that Delhi High Court was not a competent court as the parties had chosen to confer exclusive jurisdiction upon the Faridabad court. In the circumstances, section 31(4) of the Act was not applicable. The High Court further held that there was no waiver on the part of the Developer by invocation of the jurisdiction of the Delhi court when the respondent instituted Suit No. 945/92 for permanent injunction. The High Court held that Suit No. 945/92 had no correlation with the arbitration matter. The High Court further held, that on the facts and circumstances of the present case, section 20 CPC was applicable; that section 20 CPC refers to institution of suits other than those covered by section 16 CPC on the basis of residence of defendant or cause of action. In the circumstances, the High Court allowed the Revision Petition holding, that the trial court at Faridabad had jurisdiction to entertain and try application dated 12.4.1994 under section 14 of the Act; that section 31(4) of the Act was not attracted; that the arbitrator had entered upon reference on the application of appellant herein and, therefore, there was no occasion for the appellant moving the Delhi High Court under section 20 CPC seeking reference. Hence this civil appeal.

11. As stated above, the short point which arises for determination in this civil appeal is whether application dated 12.4.1994 filed by the Developer in the trial court at Faridabad was maintainable.

12. At this stage, it may be mentioned that the trial court at Faridabad following the impugned judgment of the High Court had dismissed the objections of the appellant herein and it has made said Award dated
29.3.1994 the rule of the court. This was on 31.5.2006. On 23.1.2007 the Developers Suit No. 945/92 for permanent injunction stood dismissed in default.

13. The basic point which needs to be decided by us is whether clause 21 of Agreement dated 16.3.1990 (Ex. P-1) conferring jurisdiction on the Faridabad court was ineffective and whether the appellant is right in his contention that the application made by the Developer under section 14 of the Act was not maintainable in the Faridabad court on the ground of lack of territorial jurisdiction.

14. Mr. Sunil Gupta, learned senior counsel appearing on behalf of the appellant submitted that the Award made by the arbitrator dated 29.3.1994 being an ex parte Award was non est as it was passed after expiry of four months from the date when the arbitrator entered upon the reference. He contended that on 20.8.1992 the appellant had referred the dispute to the arbitrator. On 24.8.1992 the arbitrator entered upon the reference and fixed the date of hearing on 5.9.1992 on which date the appellant was present. On that date neither the arbitrator nor the Developer was present. On that date, the appellant herein sought the next date of hearing. Despite the telegram seeking the next date of hearing, the arbitrator did not respond. During the period October, 1992 and November, 1992 disputes arose when the MCD had issued notices directing the appellant herein to show cause why the building plan submitted by the Developer should not be revoked. Learned counsel pointed out that on 15.10.1992 the Developer had in fact instituted Suit No. 945/92 in the civil court at Delhi for permanent injunction. In that suit, vide para 16, the Developer had invoked jurisdiction of the Delhi court. In the circumstances, it was not open to the Developer to move the trial court at Faridabad on 12.4.1994 under section 14 of the Act. Learned counsel urged that both the parties were aware that the dispute was in respect of the suit property located at Saket in New Delhi. The dispute, according to the
learned counsel, was for possession of the suit property. The appellant herein had sought possession of the suit property even before the arbitrator. The Award of the arbitrator, according to the learned counsel, itself indicates that the arbitrator has given relief in favour of the Developer concerning immovable property and, therefore, the trial court was right in coming to the conclusion that the application made on 12.4.1994 under section 14 by the Developer was not maintainable on the ground of territorial jurisdiction in view of section 31(4) of the Act. The second contention advanced on behalf of the appellant before us was that the impugned Award dated 29.3.1994 was non est. According to the learned counsel, four months time available to the arbitrator under clause 3 of Schedule I read with section 3 of the Act expired on 24.12.1992. After that date the arbitrator became functus officio. In the circumstances, the appellant herein filed an application under section 20 of the Act on 14.10.1993 before the Delhi High Court for appointment of an arbitrator for adjudication of the dispute with the Developer. This application was converted into Suit No. 2482/93. It is only thereafter that the arbitrator suddenly purported to act as an arbitrator by fixing the date of hearing on 20.2.1994 when the appellant herein requested the arbitrator in the light of the above facts not to proceed with the arbitration proceedings since the entire matter was before Delhi High Court in Suit No. 2482/93. Despite the request made by the appellant, the arbitrator proceeded to make
an Award dated 29.3.1994 being an ex parte Award. Learned counsel further pointed out that in fact prior to his application under section 20, M.C.D. had revoked the sanction for construction of the complex and it was the appellant herein who had filed a writ petition in the Delhi High Court being Writ Petition No. 5038/93 against the revocation by M.C.D.

15. On the first question on the lack of territorial jurisdiction, we do not find any merit in the contentions advanced on behalf of the appellant. We have examined Ex. P-1 between the appellant and the builder (Developer) dated 16.3.1990. The agreement describes the appellant as the owner. It describes M/s Chopra Land Development Pvt. Ltd. as the builder. Under the agreement, the appellant remains the owner. Under the agreement, the appellant applies to D.D.A. for time to construct a housing complex on a plot of land at Saket owned by the appellant. Under the agreement, the
Developer agrees to construct a housing complex on the plot bearing No. G-13, Saket, New Delhi. Under the agreement, the entire construction cost is financed by the Developer. Under the agreement, the housing complex consisted of basement, ground floor, mezzanine first floor, second floor and third floor. Under the agreement, the Developer agreed to construct the housing complex without prejudice to the owners right. Under the agreement, the owner was required to give permission to the builder to construct the housing complex. Under the agreement, the entire cost of construction was to be borne by the Developer. Under the agreement, the building plan, the completion certificate etc. were to be signed by the appellant-owner. Under the agreement, vide clause 15, the Developer agreed to pay to the appellant-owner a sum of Rs. 5 lacs in consideration of his seeking permission to construct the housing complex. This was in addition to the construction cost to be incurred by the Developer. Clause 16 of the agreement stated that in consideration of the Developers services to construct the housing complex, the appellant agrees to allow the ownership of the basement, ground floor and mezzanine along with proportionate interest in the land to be transferred in the name of the Developer. At this stage, it may be noted that under the ex parte Award dated 29.3.1994 the arbitrator has passed his Award in terms of para 16 and, therefore, it was contended before us on behalf of the appellant that the dispute related to possession of the property; that the dispute was comparable to a suit for land and that the submission was made specifically in view of the Award being passed in terms of para 16 of the agreement (Ex. P-1). It was urged that since the arbitrator has passed the Award directing the appellant to transfer the ownership of basement, ground floor, mezzanine along with the proportionate interest in the land in favour of the Developer, the present dispute related to recovery of possession and since the lands were located in Saket the trial court had no jurisdiction to make the Award rule of the court under section 14 of the Act. As stated above, we do not find merit in the contention advanced on behalf of the appellant. We have examined Ex. P-1 in entirety. Apart from the above clauses of exhibit P-1, we have already quoted clauses 11, 20, and 21 by which the parties agreed that in case of dispute between the parties the same shall be referred for arbitration to the sole arbitrator at Faridabad and his decision shall be binding on both the parties. Under clause 21, the parties agreed that the Faridabad court alone shall have the jurisdiction in case of any dispute between the parties. On our examining the terms and conditions of exhibit P-1 along with the surrounding circumstances thereto, we are of the view that exhibit P-1 was a pure Development Agreement. The agreement is merely an agreement whereby a party agrees to develop certain property for a certain consideration. Under the agreement, the appellant herein continues to remain the owner. He has to apply for permission to construct the building to the D.D.A.. The Developer agrees to construct on the land. The Developer agrees to finance the entire construction cost and in lieu of the Developers services in the matter of construction of housing complex the owner (appellant herein) agrees to permit transfer of the ownership a part of the complex to the Developer. It is for this reason, as indicated by the events enumerated above, that M.C.D. had issued notice to the appellant on 21.9.1992 to show cause why the building plan submitted should not be revoked. It is for the above reasons, that M.C.D. ultimately revoked the sanction for the construction of the housing complex on 18.5.1993 and it is the appellant herein as owner who had sought to challenge the revocation vide Writ Petition No. 5038/93. On the facts of this case, therefore, it cannot be said that the trial court at Faridabad had no jurisdiction to make the Award the rule of the court under section 14 of the Act. Section 31(1) of the Act provides that an Award may be filed in any court having jurisdiction in the matter to which the reference relates. Under that section, the Award can be filed in the court within whose jurisdiction the property in dispute lies. Parties cannot give jurisdiction to a court under section 14 by consent if that court does not has jurisdiction. If an award refers to an immovable property, the court having jurisdiction in respect of the same will entertain an application under section 14. In order to decide as to which court has jurisdiction to entertain a petition under section 14, reference has to be made to section 2(c) read with section 31(1) of the Act. Merely because the arbitrator chooses to hold the proceedings in a place where no suit could be instituted, and chooses to make an award at that place, it would not give the court of that place territorial jurisdiction to decide the matter under the Act. Section 30 refers to ground for setting aside an award. Section 30 is to be read with section 33. The idea behind the entire scheme of the Arbitration Act appears to be that an application by a party challenging the validity of correctness of the award on whatever ground has to be made under section 33. Section 33 is the only section under which a party is given the right to apply to the court to challenge either the agreement or the award. Under the Act, therefore, after the Award has been filed a party is permitted to make an application under section 33 to bring all kinds of defects to the notice of the court and the court will give reliefs either under section 15 or section 16 or even under section 30 of the Act. In an arbitration without the intervention of the court, an award can be filed in any court having jurisdiction in the matter to which the reference relates. The award can be filed only in the court which would have jurisdiction in respect of the subject matter of the dispute. In order to decide the jurisdiction of the court, it is necessary to decide whether the court would have jurisdiction to try a regular suit between the parties in which the relief is claimed. Section 33 does not prescribe the court before which an application under this section may be filed, but section 31 makes such provision. Section 31(2) provides that all questions regarding the validity, effect or existence of an award or an arbitration agreement shall be decided by the court in which the award has been filed or may be filed. Section 2(c) lays down the forum. The application has to be moved in the court within whose jurisdiction the opposite party resides or carries on business or within whose jurisdiction any part of the cause of action arises. Residence or ness or within whose jurisdiction any part of the cause of action arises. Residence or carrying on business of a party, apart from the place of accrual of a cause of action is relevant for determining the territorial jurisdiction of the court in arbitration cases, if the question so arises in connection with the subject matter of the dispute.

16. Applying the above tests to the facts of the present case, we are of the view that at the relevant time the appellant resided at Faridabad. He resided at Faridabad when the contract was made. Under the contract, the parties agreed to refer all disputes to the Faridabad court. Apart from the residence, we are also concerned with the place of accrual of the cause of action. In the present case, a bare reading of the agreement indicates that it is an agreement to develop. The appellant remains the owner, the Developer remains the contractor. The Developer is the financer. The appellant is the owner of an asset. The contractor/ Developer agrees to exploit that asset on behalf of the owner. The Developer funds the scheme. The building plans remained in the name of the owner. The D.D.A. informs the owner regarding revocation of the building plan. The owner files the writ petition challenging the revocation. The contractor is paid consideration in terms of a part of the property. In the circumstances, it cannot be said that this case is similar to a suit for land. One cannot look at para 16 alone in isolation. On the other hand, with open eyes, the parties had entered into the contract, they had agreed to refer all disputes to an arbitrator at Faridabad and they had agreed that the Faridabad court alone shall have jurisdiction. In a matter of this kind, it cannot be said that the claim is similar to a suit for land. A housing complex has to be constructed at the site. When dispute arises, it will not be confined only to immovable property. Such disputes also require accounts to be maintained. The disputes also involve rendition of accounts. In the circumstances, in our view, Section 20 CPC alone is attracted. Therefore, in our view, the High Court was right in holding that the Faridabad court had jurisdiction to make the Award the rule of the court.

17. As stated above, one of the points raised on behalf of the appellant herein is that ex parte Award dated 29.3.1994 was non est since it was made beyond four months from the date when the arbitrator entered upon the reference. We do not find any merit in this contention. Chapter II of the Arbitration Act covers references, in which the parties may proceed, if nothing goes wrong, up to the stage of delivery of the award, without the intervention of the court. This does not mean that the court has no authority to intervene at an early stage, should it become necessary. In the present case, as stated above, the arbitrator entered upon a reference pursuant to the notice given by the appellant on 24.8.1992. The notice was given on 20.8.1992. Therefore, section 8 of the Act has no application. Section 8 applies only where the parties do not concur in the appointment. Section 8 and Section 20 operate in different provinces. Section 20 confers power on the court to order the agreement to be filed and to make an order of reference to the arbitrator appointed by the parties or where they do not agree, the court can appoint any other person of its choice as an arbitrator. This discussion is important. This difference between section 8 and section 20 shows that the reference flows from an agreement between the parties in the cases falling under section 8. The reference flows from the agreement in cases falling under Chapter II of the Arbitration Act and as long as the agreement stands, the reference remains valid unless it is superseded by an order of the court under section 19. Under that section, where award becomes void under Section 16(3) or where an award is set aside, the court may by an order supersede the reference and shall thereupon order that the arbitration agreement shall cease to have effect. Therefore, till such time as the order is passed by the court under section 19 superseding the reference, the same shall remain valid till the agreement is superseded. This is the scope of section 8 read with section 19 of the Act. On the other hand, in cases falling under section 20 of the Act, power is conferred on the court to
make an order of reference to the arbitrator. That power is conferred on the court which orders the agreement to be filed before it. In a proceeding under section 8, disputes are presented by the parties before the arbitrator. Whereas in proceedings under section 20, the disputes are referred by the court. It is for this reason that it has been repeatedly held that merely because an arbitrator does not make an award within the specified period of four months the court has the power to extend the period. The award given by an arbitrator after four months is not binding on the parties. Such an award is vitiated as the arbitrator has no power to make an award after four months. However, a bare failure of an arbitrator to make an award within the time allowed by law will not involve the consequences of it being set aside only on that ground. The court has ample powers in a given case to extend the time and give life to the vitiated award by exercising judicial discretion under section 28 of the Act. An application to have the award set aside on the ground that it was made beyond time prescribed has to be moved under the Act. No separate suit would lie for that purpose. Section 28 is not limited only to references to arbitration made in a suit pending before the court. Further, the power given to the court under section 28 is so wide that it can extend the time even if the award is made beyond four months from the date of the arbitrator entering upon the reference. The only restriction is that it must be exercised with judicial discretion. In the present case, as state above, the Developer moved an application for making the award the rule of the court on 12.4.1994. Unfortunately, the appellant chose not to appear before the trial court. In the circumstances, an ex parte decree came to be passed on 31.5.2006. We have used the word unfortunately because the appellant herein had filed his objections before the trial court. Those objections were dismissed as he chose to remain absent. The appellant chose to remain absent as he had moved or decided to move this Court in special leave petition against the impugned judgment of the High Court on the point of territorial jurisdiction. The judgment of the High Court is dated 19.4.2006. The Award is made the rule of the court by the trial court on 31.5.2006 in view of the impugned judgment of the High Court. We have also gone through the Award. We do not wish to express any opinion on the merits, however, the fact remains that the arbitrator entered upon the reference on 24.8.1992. He fixed 06 passed by the trial court at Faridabad making Award dated 29.3.1994 the rule of the court. Consequently, we direct restoration of the matter to the file of the Court of Additional Civil Judge (Senior Division), Faridabad in Case No. 7 instituted on 12.4.1994 titled M/s Chopra Land Developers Pvt. Ltd. v. Jatinder Nath and anr.. We may clarify that the trial court will proceed on the basis that it has territorial jurisdiction to decide the application made by the Developer under sections 14 to 17 of the Act. The said application will be decided on merits alone in accordance with law. In other words, the trial court will re-examine the question on merits as to whether the Award given by the arbitrator on 29.3.1994 should or should not be made the rule of the court. The trial court will have to decide whether to extend the period for making the Award or not, whether to supercede the reference or not. The trial court will proceed in accordance with law. Any observation on the merits of the case mentioned hereinabove shall not be treated as opinion of this Court. Further, the trial court will proceed on the basis that it has territorial jurisdiction to decide the above matter.

18. Subject to above, the civil appeal is dismissed with no order as to costs.

**********', 0] , 
[ 'HEADNOTE
CO-OPERATIVE SOCIETIES
Maharashtra Co-operative Societies Act, 1960
Sections 91, 163, 94, 18 - Bar of jurisdiction - Suits for declaration - Land owned by Society - In a General Board Meeting, Society resolved to sell the land owned by it - Application for division of society already pending - Sale deed/conveyance executed on 07.12.2009 - Suits filed in 2010 challenging the resolution 6.12.2009 - If suits are barred by Sections 91 and 163 of the Act - If the provisions exclude the jurisdiction of Civil Court. Held that a dispute arising out of decision to alienate property is not covered by Section 163. Suits are also not barred by Section 91 as disputes covered there-under are among specified persons and not third party. Marine Times Publications (P) Ltd.s JT 1990 (4) SC 332 case relied and followed.
HELD
A dispute arising out of a decision of the society to alienate the property of the society, in our opinion, is not expressly covered under Section 163 of the Act. (Para 19)

Section 91 also stipulates that the disputes which are mandatorily required to referred to the Co-operative Court for an adjudication must also be disputes arising between the parties to the dispute who should belong to one or the other categories specified under clauses (a) to (e) to sub-section (1), hereinafter referred to as enumerated persons, for the sake of convenience. It can be seen from the scheme of Section 91, to confer exclusive jurisdiction on the Co-operative Court, the dispute must satisfy two requirements. (Para 22)

Section 91(1)(c) stipulates that persons other than the members of the society with whom the society has any transaction as one of the classes of persons who could be parties to a dispute amenable exclusively to the jurisdiction of the Co-operative Court. The said sub-section further qualifies the said class by expressly mentioning that the transactions of such persons with a society should be a transactions in respect of which restrictions and Regulations have been made or prescribed under Sections 43, 44, or 45 of the Act. (Para 24)

Where Section 91 (1) (c) speaks of persons other than the members of the society, it is actually referring to persons other than the members of the society who have deposited money with the society or who have either lent or borrowed money from the society in accordance with the provisions of Sections 43 and 44 and subject to the conditions and limitations if any prescribed with reference to such lending to or borrowing from the society. (Para 29)

Section 94(3)(a) does not enable a person other than an enumerated person to refer a dispute to the Co-operative Court. The said legal position is made clear in Marine Times (supra). (Para 32)

The property in which the 3rd party acquired interest must bear some relationship with the dispute pending before the tribunal. (Para 34)

Having regard to the language of Section 94, sub-section (3)(a), more specifically has acquired any interest, the acquisition of the interest contemplated is only an acquisition made during the pendency of the dispute before the Co-operative Court. (Para 36)

Even if the Co-operative Court came to the conclusion that the resolution is illegal, it would always be open for the respondents 22 and 23 to ignore such a determination as they are not parties to the proceedings and assert their title on the basis of the conveyance dated 7th December, 2009. If any party such as the plaintiffs (the appellants herein) disputes the validity of the title conveyed thereunder, necessarily such a dispute would have to be adjudicated by a competent Court under Section 9 of the Code of Civil Procedure wherein, necessarily, the question whether a valid title was conveyed in favour of respondents 22 and 23 by the society would arise for determination. The legality of the resolution would still have to be gone into again. (Para 38.1.)

For all the above-mentioned reasons, the conclusion of the High Court that the suits in question are not maintainable on the ground that the dispute is amenable to the exclusive jurisdiction under Section 91 of the Act to the Co-operative Court cannot be sustained. (Para 39)

Sections 91, 163 - Civil Procedure Code, 1908, Section 9A As amended by Maharashtra - Bar of jurisdiction - Question of maintainability of civil suits - Hearing of interim application - If Court can go into question of maintainability of suits. Held that as per provision, issue has to be decided as a preliminary issue. (Para 40)


CHELAMESWAR, J.

1. Leave granted.

2. These appeals arise out of a common order dated 29th August, 2011 of the Division Bench of the Bombay High Court passed in three writ petitions and two suits, 144 and 145 of 2010.

3. By the said common order, it was held, among other things, that the two suits are not maintainable in view of the provisions of Sections 91 and 163 of the Maharashtra Co-operative Societies Act, 1960 (hereinafter the Act, for short). We are not concerned with the remaining part of the Division Benchs judgment as the instant special leave petitions are preferred only against that part of the Division Benchs judgment. The brief factual background of this litigation is as follows.

4. The first respondent is a Society which was originally incorporated in the year 1914. The full particulars of such incorporation are not available at this juncture on record and are also not necessary for the present purpose. It is sufficient to state that it is admitted on all hands that it is a housing cooperative society and the Act governs the affairs of the said Society.

5. It is also an admitted fact on all hands that the said Society has different classes of members known as owners, lessees, allottees, tenants, etc. It is also an admitted fact that the total membership is 762 out of which 69 members fall under the classification of tenant members. However, the exact rights and obligations of these various classes of members, vis-ï¿½-vis the first respondent Society or these various classes of members inter se are also not available on record.

6. It appears from the record that, as on today, the first respondent Society owns an extent of approximately 21,774.10 sq. mts. of land in the city of Mumbai alongwith structures popularly known as Wellingdon Catholic Colony. It appears that the said property was part of a larger parcel of land earlier owned by the first respondent Society but is not owned by the Society now. Some of the tenant members (including the appellants herein) of the Society initiated proceedings for the division of the Society sometime in the year 1970 invoking Section 18 of the Act by making an application to the Registrar. The said application has a very long and chequered history, the details of which are not necessary for the present purpose except to state that by virtue of the judgment under appeal, the application is still open and pending.

7. In the meanwhile, in a resolution came to be passed on the 6th December, 2009 by the General Body of the Society to sell the above mentioned land in favour of respondents No.22 and 23. In furtherance of the said resolution, a sale deed/conveyance came to be executed on 7th December, 2009. Aggrieved by the said resolution and the sale, two suits 144 and 145/2010 came to be filed invoking the original jurisdiction of the Bombay High Court. A copy of the plaint in the suit No.145/2010 is placed on record in these SLPs. The principal prayer in both the civil suits is

(a) for a declaration that the said Resolution dated 6th December, 2009 (Exhibit K hereto) and the said Conveyance dated 7th December, 2009 (Exhibit M hereto) are invalid, illegal and void ab initio and/or the same are voidable as against the Plaintiffs and the Tenant members of Defendant No.17 Association;

(a-i) That this Honble Court be pleased to pass Order declaring Section 164 of Maharashtra Co-operative Societies Act, 12 Violation of Article 14 of the Constitution of India and the same ought to be struck down.

7.1. It can be seen from prayer (a) extracted above that the plaintiffs seek in effect two declarations - (i) that a resolution dated 6th November, 2009 of the first respondent Society, and (ii) a Conveyance dated 7th December, 2009 executed on behalf of the first respondent Society in favour of respondents 22 and 23, are either illegal, void ab initio or in the alternative that they are voidable as against the plaintiffs (of whom at least some) are the appellants herein and claim to be the tenant members of the respondent society (we may state here that there is a dispute regarding the membership of some of the appellants herein but, for the present case, we do not go into the dispute but refer the appellants, only for the sake of convenience, as tenant members). The substance of the factual and legal basis (asserted in the plaint) on which the plaintiffs seek the two declarations (referred to earlier) in the civil suits, and argued at the Bar is that the tenant members alone have the right, title and interest over the property sought to be sold by the impugned conveyance dated 7th December, 2009 and that the other members of the Society have no right, title or interest in the property in dispute. The plaintiffs expect an order of bifurcation of the respondent No.1 Society and also to get a declaration in their favour of the right, title and interest in the property in dispute. The plaintiffs also therefore claimed appropriate interim orders regarding the property during the pendency of the suits.

8. The defendants raised a preliminary objection regarding the maintainability of the suits in view of Sections 91 and 163 of the Act which was rejected by a learned single judge but found favour with the Division Bench of the Bombay High Court resulting in that part of the judgment which is under appeal now.

9. By the judgment under appeal it is held that:

In our opinion, therefore, what is principally challenged in the Civil Suit is the resolution of the general body. And challenge to the conveyance is ancillary

9.1. And therefore opined:

That the Plaintiffs could have filed the dispute before the Co-operative Court challenging the resolution of the General Body and the consequent execution of conveyance in favour of M/s. Sumer associates and could have joined M/s. Sumer associates as a Defendant in that dispute. In our opinion thus the entire subject matter of the Civil Suit could have been the subject matter of the dispute filed under Section 91.

10. Shri Mukul Rohtagi and Dr. Abhishek M. Singhvi, learned senior counsel appearing for the appellants argued that irrespective of the fact whether a declaration regarding illegality of the impugned resolution dated 6th December, 2009 could be granted by the ordinary civil courts in view of Section 91 of the Act, a declaration regarding the voidness of the impugned conveyance dated 7th December, 2009 could only be given by a competent civil court contemplated under Section 9 of the Code of Civil Procedure (hereinafter the Code for short) because such conveyance is in favour of a person who is not a member of the Society. It is submitted that the ultimate dispute and grievance of the plaintiffs is against the alienation of the property in favour of the respondents 22 and 23 herein by the impugned conveyance which has the effect of depriving the plaintiffs of their right, title and interest in the property in dispute. Such a conveyance could only be declared illegal and void ab initio by a competent civil court contemplated under Section 9 of the Code. The impugned resolution, which purportedly authorises the sale of the property covered by the impugned conveyance, by itself does not transfer or create any interest in the property adverse to the interest of the plaintiffs. Therefore, even if it is assumed that the legality of the impugned resolution is amenable to the jurisdiction of the Co-operative Court functioning under Section 91, the suits in question could not have been held to be not maintainable as the jurisdiction to adjudicate upon the incidental question regarding the impugned resolution dated 6th December, 2009 would stand subsumed by the jurisdiction of the competent civil court which alone is competent to decide the legality of the impugned conveyance dated 7th December, 2009. The learned counsel further argued that the ouster of the jurisdiction conferred on the Civil Courts under Section 9 of the Code is to be conceded only where there is an express exclusion by the language of the Statute or if such an ouster arises by a necessary implication from the Scheme of a particular Statute. It is argued that there is nothing either in the language of Section 91 or the Scheme of the Act which would lead to a conclusion that the jurisdiction conferred under Section 9 of the Code is excluded to adjudicate the suits in question.

11. On the question of interim order during the pendency of the suits, the learned counsel argued that in view of the pendency of the claim of the plaintiff for the bifurcation of the respondent society (and according to the appellants, they have a very strong case), the disputed property must be preserved as it is and the balance of convenience is in favour of the appellants. The learned counsel argued that the High Court grossly erred in examining the maintainability of the suits in the interlocutory application filed by the plaintiff seeking interim order.

12. On the other hand, learned senior counsel Shri C.A. Sundaram appearing for the respondents argued that the language of Section 91, sub-section 1(c) of the Act clearly indicates that the jurisdiction of the Co-operative Court contemplated under Section 91 is not confined only to the adjudication of the disputes between the society and its members or servants etc. enumerated in Section 91(1)(a), (b), (d) and (e) but also extends to the disputes where one of the parties to the dispute is a person other than a member of the society.

13. According to the learned counsel, such conclusion is irresistible from the language of Section 91(1) (c) and Section 94 (3) (a). Hence, the judgment under appeal does not call for any interference.

14. Shri K.K. Venugopal, learned senior counsel submitted that the course adopted by the Bombay High Court in examining the maintainability of the suits in the Interlocutory Application filed by the plaintiffs is not only justified but also mandatory in view of the language of Section 9A of the Civil Procedure Code inserted by the State Legislation of Maharashtra.

15. On the question of interim arrangement to be made during the pendency of the suit, learned counsel for the respondent submitted that the suit itself is based on the expectancy that the tenant Members would succeed in their application for the bifurcation of the society, and upon bifurcation, the tenant members would be entitled for the exclusive title and possession of the disputed property. Even if the above mentioned understanding of the plaintiffs is right since the plaintiffs are only some of the tenant members of the society, they would not be entitled for the title and possession of the entire disputed property, but only a part of it. It is argued that since other tenant members have no objection to the alienation of the property in dispute in favour of the respondent no. 22 and 23, impeding of conveyance dated 7th December, 2009 would not be justified as the impugned resolution and the conveyance have made adequate provisions for safeguarding the interest (if any) of the appellants.

16. We shall now examine the issue of maintainability of the suits. As rightly contended by the learned counsel for the appellants the Civil Courts jurisdiction to adjudicate Civil disputes is unlimited, subject only to the limitations imposed by law either expressly or by necessary implications. The law in this regard is well settled and needs no elaboration. Therefore, it becomes necessary for us to examine whether there is anything in the language of Section 91 or Section 163 which expressly excludes the jurisdiction of the Civil Courts in the context of the suits in question. Section 163 of the Act bars the jurisdiction of Civil and Revenue Courts reads as follows:

163. Bar of jurisdiction of Courts.

(1) Save as expressly provided in this Act, no Civil or Revenue Court shall have any jurisdiction in respect of

(a) the registration of a society or its by-laws or the amendments of its by-laws or the dissolution of the committee of a society, or the management of the society on dissolution thereof: or

(b) any dispute required to be referred to the Co-operative Court for decision.

(c) any matter concerned with the winding up and dissolution of a society.

(2) while a society is being wound up, no suit or other legal proceeding relating to the business of such society shall be proceeded with or instituted against the society or any member thereof, or any matter touching the affairs of the society, except by the leave of the Registrar, and subject to such terms as he may impose.

(3) all orders, decisions or awards passed in accordance with the Act or the Rules shall, subject to the provisions for appeal or revision in this Act be final; and no such order, decision or award shall be liable to be challenged, set aside, modified, revised or declared void in any Court upon the merits or upon any other ground whatsoever.

17. Section 163 (1)(b) and Section 91 (3) are complimentary to each other. Section 91(3) reads as follows:

Save as otherwise provided under sub-section (2) to section 93, no Court shall have jurisdiction to entertain any suit or other proceedings in respect of any dispute referred to in sub-section (1)

18. It can be seen that the Section 163 only excludes the jurisdiction of the Civil Court with reference to the disputes arising out of the registration:

1) Registration of the society;

2) Disputes relating to the bye-laws of the society;

3) Dissolution of the Committee of the society;

4) Management of the society on dissolution of the society;

5) Any disputes which is required to be referred to the Co-operative Court under Section 91.;

6) Any matter concerned with the winding up and dissolution of the society etc.

19. A dispute arising out of a decision of the society to alienate the property of the society, in our opinion, is not expressly covered under Section 163 of the Act. It is to be examined whether it is a matter which is required to be resolved by the Co-operative Court by virtue of the provisions under Section 91 of the Act. In view of the conclusion of the High Court that the entire subject matter of the civil suit could have been the subject matter of dispute filed under Section 91.

20. It is necessary to examine the scope of Section 91(1), which reads as follows

(1) Notwithstanding anything contained in any other law for the time being in force any dispute touching the Constitution, (Election of Committee or its Officers) other than the elections of the committees of the specified societies including its officers), Conduct of general meetings, management or business or a society shall be referred by any of the parties to the disputes, or by federal society to which the society is affiliated or by a creditor of the society, ( in the Co-operative Court) If both the parties there to are one or other of the following;

(a) a society, its committee, any past committee, any past or present officer, any past or present agent, any past and present servant or nominee, heir or legal representative of any deceased officer, deceased agent or deceased servant of the society or the liquidator of the society (or the official Assignee of a De-Registered Society),

(b) a member, past member of a person claiming through a member, past member of a deceased member of society, or a society which is a member of the society ( or a persons who claims to be a member of the society;)

(c) a person other than a member of the society, with whom the society has any transactions in respect of which any restrictions or regulations have been imposed, made or prescribed under sections 43,44 or 45 and any person claiming through such person:

(d) a surety of a member, past member or deceased member, or surety of a person other than a member with whom the society has any transactions in respect of which restrictions have been prescribed under section 45, whether such surety or person is or is not a member of the society:

(e) any other society , or the Liquidator of such a society or de-registered society or the official Assignee of such a de-registered society.

21. It can be seen from the above extract that the Section makes it mandatory that certain disputes, the nature of which is specified in the said sub-section, be referred to the Co-operative Court1 - as defined under Section 2(10-a ii). Such reference is required to be made by any of the parties to the dispute. The Section also specifies the nature/subject matter of dispute which is required to be referred to the Co-operative Courts. They are disputes touching the

1) Constitution of the society

2) Elections of the Committee or its officers

3) Conduct General Meetings

4) Management of the society or

5) Business of the society.

22. Section 91 also stipulates that the disputes which are mandatorily required to referred to the Co-operative Court for an adjudication must also be disputes arising between the parties to the dispute who should belong to one or the other categories specified under clauses (a) to (e) to sub-section (1), hereinafter referred to as enumerated persons, for the sake of convenience. It can be seen from the scheme of Section 91, to confer exclusive jurisdiction on the Co-operative Court, the dispute must satisfy two requirements. It was held so in Marine Times Publications (P) Ltd. v. Shriram Transport & Finance Co. Ltd. JT 1990 (4) SC 332 : 1991 (1) SCC 469 at para 11:

11. Before a dispute can be referred to a Cooperative Court under the provisions of Section 91(1) of the said Act it is not only essential that the dispute should be of a kind 1 Co-operative Court means a court constituted under this Act to decide disputes referred to it under any of the provisions of the Act. described in sub-section (1) of Section 91 but it is also essential that the parties to the said dispute must belong to any of the categories specified in clauses (a) to (e) of sub-section (1) of the said section.

22.1. Both the subject matter as well as the parties to the dispute must be those specified under the section. In other words if either of the above mentioned two requirements is not satisfied then the dispute cannot be adjudicated by the Co-operative Court. If one of the parties to the dispute is not an enumerated person, the question whether the subject matter of the dispute is one which falls exclusively within the jurisdiction of the Co-operative Court need not be examined. Similarly, if it is found in a given case that the subject matter of dispute is not covered by Section 91, an enquiry into the question whether the parties to the dispute fall under any of the categories enumerated under Section 91 would become irrelevant.

23. However, learned counsel for the respondent argued that in view of the language of Section 91(1) (c) and Section 94(3) the various classes of persons contemplated under Section 91 to bring the dispute within the jurisdiction of the Co-operative Court (if the subject matter of the dispute is otherwise exclusively amenable to the jurisdiction of the Co-operative Court), includes persons other than the members of the society though not covered by clauses (a), (b), (d) and (e) of Section 91(1). The leaned counsel laid emphasis on the clause persons other than a member of the society occurring under Section 91(1) (c) and the clause whether he be a member of the society or not has acquired any interest in the property of a person who is a party to a dispute occurring under Section 94(3)(a) clearly demonstrate that the jurisdiction of the Co-operative Court is not confined only to those cases where both the parties are either members or officers etc. specified in clauses (a), (b), (d) and (e) of Section 91(1).

24. To examine the correctness of the submissions made by Shri C.A. Sundaram, it requires an analysis of Section 91(1)(c) and 94 (3). When Section 91(1)(c) stipulates that persons other than the members of the society with whom the society has any transaction as one of the classes of persons who could be parties to a dispute amenable exclusively to the jurisdiction of the Co-operative Court, such a class is not an unqualified class. The said sub-section further qualifies the said class by expressly mentioning that the transactions of such persons with a society should be a transactions in respect of which restrictions and Regulations have been made or prescribed under Sections 43, 44, or 45 of the Act. Therefore, to understand the exact nature of the above mentioned class, an examination of the scheme of Sections 43, 44 is necessary.

25. Section 43 (1) reads as follows:

43. (1) A society shall receive deposits and loans from members and other persons, only to such extent, and under such conditions, as may be prescribed, or specified by the by-laws of the society.

25.1. The said provision recognises the legal authority of a co-operative society to receive deposits and loans either from the members or other persons. It further stipulates that the receipt of deposits and loans is permissible only to the extent and subject to such conditions as may be prescribed.

26. Section 44 on the other hand deals with the legal authority of the co-operative society to make a loan/lend money. Section 44 in so far as it is relevant reads as follows.

44.(1) No society shall make a loan to any person other than a member or on the security of its own shares, or on the security of any person who is not a member.

Provided that with the special sanction of the Registrar, a society may make loans to another society.

(2) Notwithstanding anything contained in the foregoing sub-section, a society may make a loan to a depositor on the security of his deposit.

**********', 0] , 
[ 'CROSS CITATION
1987 AIR (SC) 2205
1987 (4) SCC 410
1988 (1) SCR 93
HEADNOTE
PUNJAB TENANCY ACT, 1887
Section 77(3) - Res judicata - Test to be applied - Question of jural relationship - Jurisdiction of Revenue Courts and suits cognizable by them - Whether Revenue Court could go into the question whether respondent was a tenant in possession or mortgagee - Held no - If so, the subsequent civil suit (for title) was not barred by res judicata.

CASES REFERRED
1. Raj Lakshmi Dasi and others v. Banamali Sen and others 1953 IV S.C.R. 154

2. Magiti Sasamal v. Pandab Bissoi 1962 3 S.C.R. 673

3.Shri Raja Durga Singh of Solan v. Tholu 1963 2 S.C.R. 693

4. Om Prakash Gupta v. Rattan Singh and another 1964 1 S.C.R. 259

5.Lal Chand (dead) by Lrs. and others, v. Radha Kishan 1977 2 S.C.R. 522

6. State of Tamil Nadu v. Ramalinga Samigal Madan A.I.R. 1986 S.C. 794


SABYASACHI MUKHARJI, J.

1. How far an order directing eviction of a person by the Revenue Court under section 77(3) of the Punjab Tenancy Act, 1887 (hereinafter called the Act) operates as res judicata for a title suit filed by a person claiming to be a mortgagee and not a tenant of the alleged landlord, is the question that arises in this appeal by special leave from the Full Bench decision of the High Court of Punjab and Haryana dated 12th March, 1981 in second appeal. By the impugned order and judgment the High Court has dismissed the appeal of the appellants and affirmed the judgment and order dated 7th September, 1978 of the Additional District Judge, Gurgaon reversing the judgment and order of Sub Judge 1S Class, i dated 4th of November, 1977 dismissing the suit of the respondent.

2. It appears that the appellants filed proceedings in the Court of Assistant Collector 1st Grade Ballabgarh seek ejectment of the respondent from his lands on 29th July, 1975 under Section 77(3) proviso 2(e) of the Act on the ground that the respondent-tenant had defaulted in the payment of rent. The suit was decreed on 29th October, 1976. In execution of the decree the respondent was ejected from the suit land. No appeal though provided under the said Act was filed by the respondent from the said decree. The respondent however, filed a suit in the civil court against the appellants alleging that he in fact was mortgagee in possession of the suit land and not a tenant and that the decree of ejectment dated 29th of October, 1976 by the Revenue Court was without jurisdiction and, therefore, a nullity. The respondent claimed to be restored the possession of the suit land from which he had been wrongly outsted by the Revenue Court. The suit was dismissed by the learned Subordinate Judge on 4th November, 1977 holding that the claim of the respondent to be a mortgagee in possession of the suit land was wrong and that the order of the Revenue court was perfectly in order and was within that courts jurisdictional competence. It was alleged that it was of binding nature on the respondent and was not capable to challenge the same in subsequent proceedings. The claim, it was asserted, by the respondent in the subsequent suit, was barred by the principles of res judicata. The respondent lost. He filed an appeal against the said order of the learned Subordinate Judge. The learned Additional District Judge, Gargaon vide his order dated 7th September, 1978 reversed the findings of the trial court and decreed the suit of the respondent. Against the said order of the learned Additional District Judge the appellants filed Regular second Appeals which were placed for disposal before one of the learned Judges of the High Court of Punjab and Haryana at Chandigarh. After hearing counsel for the parties the learned Judge was of the view that there were conflicting judgments on the points for determination in the case which were of importance and the matter was referred to the Honble the Chief Justice of the said High Court for the constitution of a larger bench for the determination of the points in controversy. The question referred to a large bench was whether, the decision of Rent Controller under the Rent Control Laws or a Revenue Court under section 77 of the Punjab Tenancy Act upon the relationship of landlord and tenant between the parties operates as res judicata and is not open to challenge in a subsequent suit or in other collateral proceedings between the parties. The learned Chief Justice constituted a Full Bench of three learned Judges for resolving the conflict pointed out in the referring order. The three learned Judges of the Full Bench have given three separate judgment and ultimately the case came to be decided in accordance with the majority view.

3. The order of the Full Bench was that in accordance with the majority view it was held that the decision of the Revenue Court under Section 77 of the Punjab Tenancy Act upon the relationship of landlord and tenant between the parties would not operate as res judicata and it would be open to challenge in a subsequent suit or any other collateral proceedings between the parties. The Full Bench thereafter directed the matter to go back to the learned single Judge for disposal in accordance with the decision of the Full Bench. Aggrieved by the aforesaid order and decision the appellants have come up in appeal before this Court.

4. It may be mentioned that of the three learned Judges, Sandhawalia, CJ. was of the view that it was to operate as res judicata, but the other two learned judges, namely, J.V. Gupta, J. and S.P. Goyal, J. held contrary views. It is the propriety and the validity of the majority view of the Full Bench which calls for an examination in this appeal.

5. In order to appreciate the controversy in appeal it is necessary to refer to the relevant provisions of the said Act. The preamble of the Act states that it was an Act to amend the law relating to the tenancy of land in Punjab. These provinces of Punjab had the distinction between the occupancy tenants and tenants-at-will with the rest of its early revenue Code from the United Provinces. the possession of the right to fixity of tenure by many cultivators in northern India was early recognised. Indeed the fact that in Lower Bengal the connection of persons whom was recognised as proprietors with the land was often far more recent than that of the cultivators inevitably suggested that the latter had rights in the soil that required protection. Fixity of tenure of resident cultivators at rents determined by authority was prominent feature of the Bengal Settlement as originally planned. Regulation XXVIII of 1803 professed to extend the Bengal system to the North Western Provinces, but it left the subject of tenant right in a vague and uncertain condition. The provisions of Regulation VII of 1922 were more definite. By its 9th section Settlement Officers were required not only to prepare a record of persons enjoyed the possession and property of the soil, or vested with any hereitable or transferable interest in it, that is to say, of proprietors, but also of the rates per bigha .... demandable from the resident cultivators not claiming any transfenrnable property in the soil whether possessing the right of hereditary occupancy or not. It is not necessary to trace the history of this settlement laws which can be found in Douies Settlement Manual, 4th Edition. Twelve years uninterrupted possession of a holding at the same rate of rent was considered as a sufficient proof of occupancy right in the United Provinces. The twelve years rule was very generally adopted in early Punjab settlements, though the best revenue officers held that it should not be regarded as the sole criterion, and that the quality, as well as the length of occupation should be considered. The Act in question was passed to amend the law of tenancy in Punjab which was later the object of the Act to protect the tenants from the exactions of the landlords. The tenants as usual in other parts of the world were in many cases peculiarly liable to oppression or duress from their landlords and in order to protect them quite effectively from the possibility of any such oppression or duress the Act was passed.

6. The overall scheme of the Acts is to provide speedy remedies with regard to disputes between the landlords and tenants and also under what circumstances that relatioinship comes to an end. It is appropriate to bear in mind the whole basic question involved in this appeal is whether the courts created by this Act have limited power and jurisdiction or plenary powers and jurisdiction. In this appeal we are concerned with the amplitude of the jurisdiction of the courts under section 77 of the Act which deals with Courts and suits cognizable by them. Relavant portion of section 77 of the Act provides as follows:

77. Revenue Courts and suits cognizable by them. - (i) When a Revenue-officer if exercising jurisdiction with respect to any such suit as is described in sub-section (3), or with respect to an appeal or other proceedings arising out of any such suit, he shall be called a Revenue Court.

(2) ...............................

(3) The following suits shall be instituted in, and heard and determined by, Revenue Courts, and no other Court shall take cognizaqnce of any dispute or matter with respect to which any such suit might be instituted:-

Provided that -

(1) ................

(2) ................

FIRST GROUP
..............................

SECOND GROUP
...............................

(e) suit by a landlord to eject a tenancy.

7. The controversy with which we are concerned in this appeal is a type of suits indicated in second group under clause (e), namely, suits by a landlord to eject a tenant.

8. The question of res judicata was analysed in the background of land acquisition proceedings by this Court in RAJ LAKSHMI DASI AND OTHERS V. BANAMALI SEN AND OTHERS (1953 IV S.C.R. 154). There this court observed that the right to receive compensation for property acquired in land acquisition proceedings as between rival claimants depended on the title to the property acquired and the dispute as to tiltle was raised by the parties and had to be decided by the land Acquisition judge after contest, so this decision as to tiltle operates as res judicata in a subsequent suit between the same parties on the question of title. The biniding force of a judgment delivered under the Land Acquisition Act depended on general principles of law and not on section 11 of the Civil procedure Code, and the decision of a Land Acquisition Judge would operate as res judicata even though he was not competent to try the subsequent suit. It has to be emphasised, however , that the right to compansation depended upon the title , but here in the instant case the right to ejectment existed only if the relationship of landlord and tenant existed. The Revenue Court did not have jurisdiction whether the claimant was the landlord to be entitled to eject the tenant.

9. Our attention was drawn by Sree Harbans Lal, learned counsel appearing for the appellants to section 98 of the Act, as to power of the Revenue Court to refer to the Civil Court a mdecision by the Revenue Court if it thought proper and also to section 99, where there is power to refer to High Court question as to jurisdiction. These provisions, in our opinion, do not in any way affect the question whether the decision of the Revenue Court under the Revenu Act can operate as res judicata in certain cases like the present. The limits of the jurisdiction would apparent by the fact that in all suits by landlord to eject a tenant, do not encompass suits to decide whether a a person is a tenant or not or whether the plaintiff is a landlord or not. The question was answered by this Court in OM PRAKASH GUPTA VS. RATTAN SINGH AND ANOTHER (1964 1 S.C.R.259) where Sinha, C.J. dealing with the Delhi Rent Control Act observed at pages 264 and 265 as follows:

The most important question that arises for determination in this case is whether or not the Rent cantrol authporities had jurisdiction in the matter in contraversy in this Case. Ordinarily it is for the Civil Courts to determine whether and , if so, what jural relationship exists between the litigating parties. But Act has been enacted to privide for the control of rents and evictions of tenants, avowedly for their benefit and protection . The Act postulates the relationship of landlord and tenant which must be a preexisting relationship . The Act is directed to control some of the terms and incidents of that relationship. Hence, there is no express provision in the Act empoering the controller, or the Tribunal , to determine whether or not there is a relationship, of landlord and tenant. In most cases such a questionwould not arise for determination by the authorities under the Act. A landlord must be very ill- advised to start proceedings under the Act, if there is no such relationship of land lord and tenant. If a person in possession of the premises is not a tenant, the premises is not a tenant , the owner of the premises would be entitled to institute a suit for ejectment in the Civil Court, untrammelled by the provision of the Act. It is only when he happens to be the tenant of premises in an urban area that the provisions of the Act are attracted. (Emphasis Supplied).

10. In SHRI RAJA DURGA SINGH OF SOLAN VS. THOLU (1963 2 S.C.R. 693), this Court had occasion to consider the question of res judicata in the back ground of the jurisdiction of the court. That was a case under section 77 of the Puynjab Tenancy Act. In that case the appellant had filed a suit before the Civil Court for the ejectment of the resapondent therein on the ground that they were licenses. The respondents claimedthat they were occupancy tenants and contended that under section 77 of the Pnajab Tenancy Act, 1887, the suit was triable by a revenue court only and not by the civil court. The trial court and the first appellate court decreed the suit holding that the respondents were not tenants.On second appeal the Judicial Commissioner held that the respondents were occupancy tenants and that the civil court had no jurisdiction to entertain the suit. It was held by this Court that the civil court had jurisdiction to entertain the suit and section 77 of the Panjab Tenancy Act was applicable only to suits between landlord and tenants where there was no dispute that where there was no dispute that the person clutivating the land was a tenant.But where the status of the defendent as a tenant was not admitted by the landlord, section 77 did not bar a suit in a civil court. This Court held that it would , therefore be reasonable to infer that the legislature barred only those suits which form the cognizance of a civil court where there was not dispute between the parties that a person cultivating land or who was in possession of land was a tenant. This is precisely what has been held in the two decisions of the Lahaore High Court where there was reference at pages 698-699 of the report. In the first of these two cases, Tek Chand, J. had observed:

It is obvious that the bar under clause (4) is applicable to those cases only in which the relationship of landlord and tenant is admitted and the object of the tenancy i.e. whether the status of the tenant falls under sections 5,6,7 or 8 or the Act.

In that cases the suit was instituted by someone claiming to succeed to the tenancy of certain land on the death of the occupancy tenant. The learned Judge observed:

In a suit like the one before us the point for decision is not the nature of the tenancy, but whether the defendent is related to the deceased tenant and if so whether their common ancestor had occupied the land. If these facts are established, the claimant, ipso factosucceeds to the occupancy tenancy. But if they are found against him, he is not a tenant at all.

As this facts were not established the High Court held that the landlord was entitled to sue the defendent who had entered on the land asserting a claim to be a collateral of the deceased tenant but who failed to substantiate his claim. This view was affirmed by a full bench consisting of five Judges in the other Lahore case. In DAYA RAM VS.JAGIR SINGH (A.I.R. 1956 H.P.61) the same judicial Commissioner who decided the appeal before us has expressed the view that where in a suit for ejectment the existence of the relationship of landlord and tenant is not admitted by the parties the Civil Court had jurisdiction to try the suit and that such a suit did not fall under section 77(3) of the Act . In MAGITI SASAMAL VS. PANDAB BISSOI (1962 3 S.C.R 673 this Court was considering the provisions of section 17(1) of the Orissa Tenant Protection Act, 1948 (3 of 1948). The provisions of that section run thus:

Any dispute between the tenant and the landlord as regards, (a) tenants possession of the land on the 1st day September, 1947 and his right to the benefits under this Act, or (b) misuse of the land by tenant, or (c) fasilure of the tenant to culttivate the land properly, or (d) failure of the tenant to deliver to the landlord the rent accrued due within two months from the date on which it becomes payable, or (e) the quantity of the produce payable to the landlord as rent, shall be decided by the Collector on the application of either of the parties.

It was contended in that case on behalf of the respondents who claimed to be tenants that suit for permanent injunction was barred by the provisions of section 7(1). Dealing with this contention this Court as follows:

In other words, S.7(1) postulates the relationship of tenant and landlord between the parties and proceeds to provide for the exclusive jurisdiction of the Collector to try the five categories of disputes that may arise between the landlord and the tenant . The disputes which are the subject-matter of section 7(1)must be inregard to the five categories. That is the plain and obvious construction of the words any dispute as regards. On this construction it would be unreasonable to hold that a dispute about the status of the tenant also falls within the purview of the said section. The scheme of section 7(1)to the tenant and landlord as such and it contemplates disputes of the specified character arising between them. Therefore, in our opinion, even on a liberal construction of section 7(1) it would be difficult to uphold the argument that a dispute as regards the excistance of relationship of landlord and tenant falls to be determined by the Collector under section 7(1).

11. As regads the said observations, in so far as the essential facts are concerned, precisely the same is the position in the instant appeal. here the respondent ins claiming to be a mortgagee in possession and not a tenant in possession . In MAGITI SASAMAL VS. PANDAB BISSOI (1962 3 S.C.R.673), the appellant haqd filed in the Civil Court a Suit fort permanent injunction restraining the respondents from enttering tjhe lands in suit on the allegation that the lands in suit on the allegation that the lands belonged to him and were in his cultivatory possession for many years and the respondents had no right or title and had never cultivated them. The respondents contended that they were tenants of propotions of the said lands and were in cultivating possession of the same as tenants. The question which arose for decision was whether having regard to the provisions of section 7(1) of the Orrissa Tenants Protection Act, 1948 , the Civil Court had jurisdiction to entertain the suit which involved a dispute as to the relationship of landlord and tenant between the parties . It was held that even on a liberal construction of section 7(1) of the Act, it cannot be held that disputes as regards the excistance of the relationship of landlord and tenant fall to be determine by the Collector under the Section . Dispute which are entrusted to the Collector under section 7(1)are the simple disputes specified therein in the five categories and do not include a serious dispute as to the relationship between the parties as landlord and tenant.

12. It is well- settled that ouster of jurisdiction of civil courts should not be inferred easily. It must be clearly provided for and established.

13. This question was again viewed in the background of the Slum Areas (Improvement and Clearance) Act, 1956 in LAL CHAND (DEAD) BY LRS.AND OTHERS VS. RADHA KISHAN (1977 2 S.C.R 522),Where this Court reiterated that section 11 was not exhaustive and the principle which motivates that section could be extended to caseswhich do not fall strictly within the letter of the law. This Court further reiterated that the principle of res judicata was conceived in the larger public interest which rewquired that all litigation must, sooner than later, come to an end. This Court in the STATE OF TAMILNADU VS. RAMALINGA SAMIGAL MADAN (A.I.R.1986 S.c.794) has analysed the position in paragraph 8 as follows:

The principles bearing on the question as to when exclusion of the Civil Courts jurisdiction can be inferred have been indicated in several judicial pronouncemants but we need referto only two only two decisions. In SECRETARY OF STATE VS. MASK AND COMPANY (A.I.R.1940 P.C. 105 at p.110) the privy Council at page 236 of the Report has observed thus:

It is settled law that the exclusion of the jurisdiction of the Civil Courts is not to be readily inferred but that such exclusion must either be explicity expressed or clearly implied. It is also well settled that even if jurisdiction is so excluded, the Civl Courts have jurisdiction to examine into cases where the provisions of the Act have not been complied with or the statutory tribunal has not acted in conformity with the fundamental principles of judicial procedure.

In DHULABHAI VS. STATE OF MADHYA PRADESH (1968 3 S.C.R. 662) hidayatullah, C.J., speaking for the Court, on an analisis of the various decisions cited before the Court expressing diverse views, culled out as many as 7 propositions; out of them the first two which are material for our purpose are these:

(1) Where the status gives a finality to the orders of the special tribunal the civil Courts jurisdiction must be held to be excluded, if there is adequate remedy to do what the civil Courts would normally do in a suit. Such provision, however, does not exclude those cases where the provisions of the particular Act have not been complied with or the statutory tribunal has not acted in conformity with the fundamental principles of judicial procedure.

(2) Where there is an express bar of the jurisdiction of the Court, an examination of the scheme of the particular Act to find the adequacy or the sufficiency of the remedies provided may be relevant but is not decisive to sustain the jhurisdiction of the civil Court.

Where there is no express exclusion the examination of the remedies and the scheme of the particular Act to find out the intendment bacomes necessary and the result of the inquiry may be decisive. In the latter case it is necessary to see if the status creates a special right or as liability and provides for the determination of the right or liability and further lays down that all questions about the said right and liability shall be determined by the tribunals so constituted, and whether remedies normally associated with actions in civil Courts are prescribed by the said status or not.

14. Applying the aforesaid principles, it appears to us that if the dispute was as to the nature of the relationship of landlord and tenant between the parties, the Revenue Court under the Punjab Tenancy Act had no jurisdiction when there was admitted position, the relationship of landlord and tenant was accepted, the remedies and rights of the parties should be worked out under the scheme of the Act.

15. salutary and simple test to apply in determining whether the previous decision operates as res judicata or on principles analogous thereto is to find out whether the first court, here the Revenue Court could go into the question whether the respondent was a tenant in possession or mortgagee in possession. It is clear in view of language mentioned before that it could not. If that be so there was no res judicata. The subsequent civil suit was not barred by res judicata.

16. In that view of the matter, we are of the opinion that the High Court of Punjab and Haryana was right in holding that there was no res judicata so far as the second suit based on the assertion of the title of the respondent was concerned. The appeals must, therefore, fail and are accordingly dismissed with costs.

Appeal dismissed.

**********', 0] , 
[ '', 0] , 
[ 'CROSS CITATION
1987 AIR (SC) 2137
1987 (4) SCC 71
HEADNOTE
CIVIL PROCEDURE CODE, 1908
Section 9 - Maintainability of suits - Dispute regarding identification of boundary between adjacent land - Plaintiff himself uncertain about precise boundary - Suit is one of a civil nature and the courts will have to try the same.
HELD
We do not think that we will be justified in importing into our jurisprudence the technicalities of English law and the distinction made by the english courts between legal estates and equitable estates. In India, the question whether a suit is congnizable by a civil Court is to be decided with reference to Sec. 9 of the Civil Procedure code. If the suit is of a civil nature, the court will have jurisdiction to try the suit unless it is either expressly or impliedly barred. A dispute regarding identification of boundary between two adjacent land owners is certainly a dispute of a civil nature and it is not barred either expressly or impliedly. Para 2

CASES REFERRED
1. Lord Keeper Henley in wake v. Conyers 1759 (I) W. & T.L.C. (7th Edn.) 170.

2.Rayappan v. Yagappan Nadar 1958 Kerala Law Times 955

3. Kavasji Jamestji v. Horhasji Nassarvanjishet. ILT 29 Bombay 73


CHINNAPPA REDDY, J.

1. The defendant is the appellant in this appeal by special leave under Art. 136 of the Constitution. The respondent-plaintiff filed the suit out of which the appeal arises for a decree (a) specifying and demarcating the property comprised in the plaint schedule as per the terms of the agreement dated June 25, 1960, referred to above, after taking a plan of the property; (b) for a perpetual injunction restraining the defendants and their people from trespassing upon the plaint schedule property and in any other manner interfering with the peaceful possession and enjoyment of the same and other reliefs. The case of the plaintiff was that he had purchased the plaint schedule property of the extent of 1000 acres from Sha Manikalal Shivraj and Dr. C.C. John under a registered sale deed dated December 30, 1959 after obtaining the permission of the Collector of Kozhikode on January 8,1958. After purchasing the property he obtained permission to fell timber and clear on area of 500 acres. The first defendant who was part owner of the land forming the south-western boundary of the plaint property also obtained a permission to fell trees in an extent of 100 acres lying in his land. Disputes arose between the plaintiff and the defendant as to the precise boundary between the land of the plaintiff and the land of the defendant. Parties however arrived at a settlement and entered into an agreement dated September 25, 1960 by which the manner in which the boundary was to be ascertained was indicated and three arbitrators were nominated to locate the precise boundary in accordance with the agreement. The arbitrators however declined to demarcate the boundary. The plaintiff, therefore, filed a suit for the reliefs mentioned by us earlier. The suit was dismissed by the Trial Court on the ground that suit for the demarcation of the boundary of a property was not maintainable where the plaintiff himself was uncertain about the boundary. During the pendency of the suit the trial court appointed a Commissioner to locate the boundary in the manner indicated by the agreement dated September 25, 1960. The Commissioner did in fact submit a report locating the boundary. The plaintiff preferred an appeal against the dismissal of the suit. The Division Bench consisting of Subramanian Poti and Viswanatha Iyer, JJ reversed the judgment of the Trial Court. They found that there was no bar to the suit or the grant of the relief claimed by the plaintiff. They accepted the report of the Commissioner appointed by the Trial Court and granted a decree in terms of the prayer made by the plaintiff.

2. The only question argued before us by the learned counsel for the appellant was that a suit for demarcating the boundary of property was not maintainable when the plaintiff himself was uncertain about the precise boundary. He placed reliance upon a judgment of the High Court of Bombay in KAVASJI JAMSETJI V. HORHASJI NASSARVANJISHET (ILR 29 Bombay 73) and a judgment of a learned single judge of the Kerala High Court in RAYAPPAN V. YAGAPPAN NADAR (1958 Kerala Law Times 955). In these two cases, the learned Judges purported to follow the statement of LORD KEEPER HENLEY IN WAKE VS. CONYERS (1959 (I) W.& T.L.C. (7th Edn.170) decided in 1759 where he had said, the court has, in my opinion (and if parties are not satisfied, they have resort elsewhere), no power to fix the boundaries of legal estates, unless some equity is super induced by the act of the parties, as some particular circumstance of fraud, or confusion, where one party has ploughed too near the other, or the like; nor has this Court a power to issue such commissions of course, as here prayed. We do not think that we will be justified in importing into our jurisprudence the technicalities of English law and the distinction made by the English courts between legal estates and equitable estates. In India, the question whether a suit is cognizable by a civil court is to be decided with reference to Sec. 9 of the Civil Procedure code. If the suit is of a civil nature, the court will have jurisdiction to try the suit unless it is either expressly or impliedly barred. A dispute regarding identification of boundary between two adjacent land owners is certainly a dispute of a civil nature and it is not barred either expressly or impliedly. In the judgment under appeal, Poti,J. pointed out:

We can also state from our experience at the bar that this type of suits are not unfamiliar to this part of our country. In fact in several areas of the state suits for determination of boundaries when the boundaries between the holdings are disputed are a matter of common occurrence and the maintainability of such suits, have not, till recently, been doubted................It is not necessary to further into this question since we see no warrant to follow the english Law based, as it is upon its peculiar historical background. The question in the Indian context is not whether any equitable consideration has to be shown before a plaintiff in a suit gets the relief and, therefore, what was said in the decisions of the english courts on this particular form of action may not have relevance here. As we pointed out earlier in this judgment, the only question that may be relevant to the issue in a suit of this nature in the courts in India is whether the suit is one of a civil nature. Since it is shown that it is, no other question would arise and the courts will have to entertain the suit and try it on the merits. The decision in KAVASJI VS. HORMISJI (supra) which has also been referred to by Veradaja Iyengar J. in RAYAPPAN VS. YAGAPPAN NADAR (supra) has simply purported to follow the english cases without considering how far the law should be applicable to this country. We therefore, are of the view that the decision in RAYAPPAN VS. YAGAPPAN NADAR (supra) has not laid down the correct law and has therefore, to be overruled.

Justice Viswanatha Iyer who agreed with Justice Poti but added a brief note of his own stated:

Disputes as regard the location of boundary separating adjacent lands of different owners may arise under ever so many circumstances. One common instance is where portion of survey field are transferred or allotted to different persons without mentioning either the side measurements or other necessary measurements to fix the geometrical shape of the plot of the spot. The area and location alone may have been shown in the transfer deed or the partition deed. Without changing the location the area conveyed or allotted may be sought to be located in one or more alternative geometrical shape by one owner. This may clash with the claim of the other person to have his area located in a particular geometrical shape. Again, any one party may wish to have the limits of the area belonging to him demarcated so that he may either enclose the area to prevent trespass or to exercise acts of possession without encroaching into the neighbouring plot. If the other party on demand does not co-operate, a cause of action arises to have the limits of his property determined through court. Again the property conveyed allotted may have been described only with reference to neighbouring properties. Those properties may or may not have been limited in extent and shape to a survey field. In that case, a fixation of the boundary of these properties maybe necessary to fix the boundaries of the properties conveyed or allotted. If there is not cooperation in doing that, that may result in a dispute. These instances are only illustrative and not exhaustive. All these disputes are disputes of a civil nature and they can form the subject matter of a suit under Sec. 9 C.P.C. There is no express or implied bar under any other law.....According to me, whenever there is a dispute between two parties as regards the location of a boundary separating their neighbouring properties and it on a demand to co-operate in fixing that boundary it is not given, a suit will lie at the instance of the demanding party. So I agree with my learned brother that the that the decision in RAYAPPAN V. YAGAPPAN (supra) is not correct and has to be overruled.

3. We agree with the reasoning of Justice Poti, J. and Viswanatha Iyer, J. The appeal is, therefore, dismissed, but in the circumstances, there will be no order as to costs.

**********', 0] , 
[ 'CROSS CITATION
1991 AIR (SC) 972
1991 (1) (Suppl) SCC 565
1990 (3) (Suppl) SCR 566
HEADNOTE
TENANCY AND LAND LAWS
U.P. Zamindari Abolition & Land Reforms Act, 1950
Sections 229-B, 293, 339 and 341 - Bhumidari rights - Declaration of - Second appeal arising out of suit under section 229-B - Reference of dispute to arbitration - Decision of the High Court that Board of Revenue had ample jurisdiction under section 203 of the Land Revenue Act to refer the dispute to arbitration - U.P. Land Revenue Act, 1901, sections 203 - Arbitration Act, 1940.
HELD
...provisions contained in Chapter IX of the Land Revenue Act are procedural provisions which are normally applicable to a court required in to adjudicate disputes brought before it. There is nothing in these provisions which may require restricting their application to applications and proceedings under Chapter X of the Zamindari Abolition Act. Some of the matters covered by Chapter IX of the Land Revenue Act have been dealt with in Chapter XII of the Zamindari Abolition Act but most of the matters referred to in Chapter IX of the Land Revenue Act are not dealt with in the Zamindari Abolition Act. It cannot be assumed that while enacting the Zamindari Abolition Act the legislature intended that the aforesaid procedural provisions contained in Chapter IX of the Land Revenue Act would be applicable only to applications and proceedings under Chapter X of the Zamindari Abolition Act, but would not be applicable to applications and proceedings under provisions other than Chapter X of the Zamindari Abolition Act. Schedule II to the Zamindari Abolition Act contains a list of applications and proceedings falling in 43 heads which can be initiated under the various provisions of the said Act. Only 5 out of these 43 matters (Sl Nos.39 to 43) relate to applications or proceedings under Chapter X and rest of the items mentioned in Schedule II relate to applications or proceedings under provisions other than Chapter X of the Zamindari Abolition Act. Could it be the intention of the legislature that in the matter of adjudication of applications and proceedings under provisions other than Chapter X of the Zamindari Abolition Act which would be substantially larger in number than those under Chapter X of the said Act, the provisions contained in Chapter IX of the Land Revenue Act should not be available to the revenue courts? Considering this question in the light of the provisions with regard to arbitration of disputes contained in Sections 203 to 207 of the Land Revenue Act we find it difficult to attribute such an intention to the legislature. Arbitration is a recognized mode of settlement of disputes. It enables the parties to resolve their dispute by a tribunal selected by them. The considerations which justify reference to arbitration of disputes arising in applications and proceedings under Chapter X of the Zamindari Abolition Act are equally applicable to applications and proceedings under other provisions of the said Act. ... we are of the view that in the judgment under appeal, the High Court has rightly taken the view that the Board of Revenue had ample jurisdiction under Section 203 of the Land Revenue Act to refer to arbitration the dispute involved in the second appeal pending before it which arose out of a suit filed under Section 229-B of the Zamindari Abolition Act. We are unable to endorse the contrary view taken by another learned Judge of the High Court in Sahdeo and Another vs. Deputy Director of Consolidation Varanasi at Allahabad and Others (supra). Paras 15 and 16

CASES REFERRED
1. Sahdeo and Another vs. Deputy Director of Consolidation, Varanasi at Allahabad and Others 1980 Allahabad Law Journal 1110 Overruled.

Books, Treatises and Articles Referred
:

Singh, G.P. : Principles of Statutory Interpretation, 4th Edition, p.51.

S.C. AGRAWAL, J. 

1. This appeal by special leave raises the question whether it was competent for the Board of Revenue to refer for arbitration the dispute relating to declaration of Bhumidari rights in agricultural land in a second appeal arising out of a suit instituted under Section 229-B of the U.P. Zamindari Abolition & Land Reforms Act, 1950 (hereinafter referred to as the Zamindari Abolition Act).

2. Badlu, father of Hakim Ali (appellant No.1), instituted a suit under Section 229-B of the Zamindari Abolition Act against respondent No.2, Lekhi Ram, wherein he sought a declaration that he is Bhumidar in respect of certain lands situate within the urban area of Municipal Board, Baraut. During the pendency of the said suit before the trial court Badlu died and the appellants were brought on record as the plaintiffs. The said suit was dismissed by the Sub Divisional Officer, Baghpat. But on appeal it was decreed by the Additional Commissioner, Meerut. Respondent No.2 filed a second appeal before the Board of Revenue. During the pendency of the said appeal, on the joint request of the parties, the Board of Revenue referred the dispute to arbitration and appointed Shri Anup Singh, respondent No.5 as the arbitrator. The arbitrator gave his award against which objections were filed by the appellants. One of the objections raised by the appellants was that the reference to arbitration was bad in law inasmuch as the Board of Revenue had no jurisdiction to refer the dispute for arbitration and the award given by the arbitrator is void and without jurisdiction. The Board of Revenue, by order dated March 9, 1973, rejected the said objection of the appellants and held that the dispute had been validly referred to arbitration. The appellants filed a writ petition wherein they challenged the said decision of the Board of Revenue. The said writ petition was dismissed by the Allahabad High Court (H.N. Seth, J.) by judgment dated November 17, 1976. The High Court held that the expression court in Section 2(c) of the Arbitration Act, 1940 does not include a Revenue Court. But in view of Section 203 of the U.P. Land Revenue Act, 1901 (hereinafter referred to as the Land Revenue Act) the High Court held that the provisions of the Arbitration Act are applicable to cases coming up for hearing before the Board of Revenue and the Board of Revenue had ample jurisdiction to refer a dispute involved in second appeal under the Zamindari Abolition Act to arbitration. Since the High Court was of the view that there was no infirmity in the order of the Board of Revenue referring the dispute pending before it to arbitration, it did not consider it necessary to deal with the objection raised by respondent No.2 that since the dispute had been referred to arbitration by the Board of Revenue with the consent of the appellants, they should not be permitted to invoke the discretionary jurisdiction of the High under Article 226 of the Constitution and to challenge the jurisdiction of the Board of Revenue to refer the dispute to arbitration. Feeling aggrieved by the aforesaid decision of the High Court the appellants have filed this appeal.

3. Before we deal with the submission of Shri Satish Chandra, the learned counsel for the appellants, in support of the appeal, we would set out the relevant provisions of the Land Revenue Act and the Zamindari Abolition Act.

4. Section 203 of the Land Revenue Act confers the power to refer disputes to arbitration and it provides as under :-

203 Power to refer disputes to arbitration. -

The Board, a Commissioner, an Additional Commissioner, a Collector, Additional Collector, an Assistant Collector of the first class, a Record Officer or an Assistant Record Officer, a Settlement Officer, or an Assistant Settlement Officer, may, with the consent of the parties, by order refer any dispute before it, or him, to arbitration.

In Section 204, provision is made with regard to procedure in cases referred to arbitration and it is prescribed that in all cases of reference to arbitration under Section 203, the provisions of the Arbitration Act, 1940 shall apply so far as they are not inconsistent with anything in the Land Revenue Act. Section 205 prescribes that any application to set aside an award shall be made within ten days after the day appointed for hearing the award. Section 206 lays down that if the officer making the reference does not see cause to remit the award or any of the matters referred to arbitration for reconsideration, and if no application has been made to set aside the award, or if he has refused such application, he shall decide in accordance with the award, or if the award has been submitted to him in the form of a special case, according to his own opinion in such case. Section 207 bars an appeal or a suit in a Civil Court against a decision given under Section 206. All these provisions are contained in Chapter IX of the Land Revenue Act.

5. By Section 293 of the Zamindari Abolition Act the provisions of Chapter IX and X of the Land Revenue Act have been made applicable to applications in proceedings under the Zamindari Abolition Act. The said provision which is contained in Chapter X of the Zamindari Abolition Act provides as under :-

293 Provisions of Act III of 1901 applied to applications and proceedings under this Chapter. The provisions of Chapter IX and X of the United Provinces Land Revenue Act, 1901, as amended by this Act shall, insofar as they are not inconsistent with the provisions of this Act, apply to applications and proceedings made or taken under this Chapter.

6. Section 339, which makes provision for repeals, is as follows:-

339. Repeals. - With effect from the date of vesting in respect of any area -

(a) the enactments mentioned in List I of Schedule III shall be and are hereby repealed in their application to such area;

(b) so much of any other enactments as is inconsistent with the provisions of Chapter VIII to X of this Act shall be deemed and is hereby repealed in its application to such area;

(c) the United Provinces Land Revenue Act, 1990 (U.P. Act III of 1901), shall in its application to such area be deemed to be and is hereby amended to the extent mentioned in column 3 of the List II of the Schedule aforesaid.

Provided that where under this Act any interpretation has to be made, action taken or thing done in accordance with the provisions of the United Provinces Tenancy Act, 1939 (U.P. Act XVII of 1939), the same may be made, taken or done as if it has not been repealed by this Act.

7. Section 341 makes provision for application of certain Acts to the proceedings under the Zamindari Abolition Act, and it reads as under :-

341. Application of certain Acts to the proceeding of this Act. - Unless otherwise expressly provided by or under this Act, the provisions of the Indian Court Fees Act, 1870 (VII of 1870), the Code of Civil Procedure, 1908 (V of 1908), and the Limitation Act, 1963 (XXXVI of 1963), including Section 5 thereof shall apply to the proceedings under this Act.

8. Shri Satish Chandra has urged that Section 293 of the Zamindari Abolition Act expressly limits the applicability of the provisions of Chapters IX and X of the Land Revenue Act, as amended by the Zamindari Abolition Act to applications and proceedings made or taken under Chapter X of the Zamindari Abolition Act and that since Section 203 of the Land Revenue Act is a provision contained in Chapter IX of the Land Revenue Act, it is applicable only to applications and proceedings made or taken under Chapter X (Sections 241 to 294) of the Zamindari Abolition Act and that said provisions of Section 203 of the Land Revenue Act would not be applicable to a second appeal arising out of a suit filed under Section 229-B of the Zamindari Abolition Act which was not a proceeding taken under Chapter X of the Zamindari Abolition Act. In this context, Shri Satish Chandra has also referred to Section 341 of the Zamindari Abolition Act and has pointed out under the said Section certain enactments namely, the Indian Court Fees Act, the Code of Civil Procedure and the Limitation Act have been applied to the proceedings under the Zamindari Abolition Act, under provisions other than Chapter X of the said Act, but the provisions of the Land Revenue Act have not been made so applicable. In support of his aforesaid submissions Shri Satish Chandra has also placed reliance on a later decision of the Allahabad High Court (B.D. Agarwal, J.) in Sahdeo and Another v. Deputy Director of Consolidation, Varanasi at Allahabad and Others , 1980, Allahabad Law Journal 1110.

9. It is no doubt true that under Section 293 of the Zamindari Abolition Act, the provisions of Chapters IX and X of the Land Revenue Act have been made applicable only to applications and proceedings made or taken under Chapter X of the Zamindari Abolition Act and since Section 203 falls in Chapter IX of the Land Revenue Act, it would not be applicable to proceedings made or taken under provisions other than those contained in Chapter X of the Zamindari Abolition Act. In our view, however, Section 293 cannot be read in isolation. It has to be read along with Section 339. In Clause (c) of Section 339 it is prescribed that with effect from the date of vesting in respect of any area, the Land Revenue Act shall, in its application to such area, be deemed to be and is hereby amended to the extent mentioned in column 3 of the List II of the Schedule III of the Said Act. As a result the provisions of the Land Revenue Act containing the amendments as mentioned in column 3 of List II of Schedule III, would be applicable to the area to which the Act has been made applicable with effect from the date of vesting. Under column 3 of List II of Schedule III certain modifications and amendments have been made in the various provisions of the Land Revenue Act, but no modification has been made in Section 203 of the said Act. This would mean that the provisions of the Land Revenue Act, including Section 203, are applicable to the area in which the Zamindari Abolition Act has been applied with effect from the date of vesting.

10. Shri Satish Chandra has, however, pointed out that in Section 293 the legislature has used the words apply to applications and proceedings made or taken under this Chapter and similarly in Section 341 the words shall apply to the proceedings under this Act have been used, whereas in Section 339 the words in its application to such area have been used. The submission of Shri Satish Chandra is that this difference in the language used by the legislature in Sections 293, 339, 341 indicates that in the matter of applicability of the provisions of the Land Revenue Act a distinction has to be drawn between applicability to proceedings and applications under the Zamindari Abolition Act and applicability to a particular area and that by virtue of Section 339(c) of the Zamindari Abolition Act the provisions of the Land Revenue Act cannot be said to have been made applicable to proceedings under the Zamindari Abolition Act and the provisions of the Land Revenue Act can be said to have been made applicable to the area to which the provisions of the Zamindari Abolition Act are applied with effect from date of vesting.

11. This distinction based on the difference in terminology used in Section 293 and 339(c) does not, in our view, advance the case of the appellants. It only indicates that Section 293 is limited in its scope in applying the provisions of Chapters IX and X of the Land Revenue Act to applications and proceedings under Chapter X of the Zamindari Abolition Act whereas Section 339(c) is much wider in amplitude in as much as it makes all the provisions of the Land Revenue Act applicable to the area to which the provisions of the Zamindari Abolition Act are applied. The Land Revenue Act contains provisions relating to appointments and jurisdiction of revenue officers, maintenance of maps and records and appointment of Kanungos and Lekhpals for that purpose, revision of maps and records, settlement of the revenue, revision of assessment, partition and union of Mahals, collection of revenue, Procedure of Revenue Courts and Revenue Officers, Appeals Reference and Revision, etc. As a result of the application of the provisions of the Land Revenue Act, as amended to the extent mentioned in column 3 of List II of the Schedule to the Zamindari Abolition Act, to the area to which the provisions of the Zamindari Abolition Act are applied, all the various provisions of the Land Revenue Act would be applicable to all the matters dealt with by the Zamindari Abolition Act including applications and proceedings under the said Act. The width and amplitude of the said provision contained in Section 339(c) of the Zamindari Abolition Act cannot, in our opinion, be curtailed by reference to Sections 293 and 341 of the said Act.

12. It is argued that on this construction Section 293 would be rendered otiose and that such an intention cannot be attributed to the legislature. It is no doubt true that as a general rule legislature may be presumed not to make a superfluous provision. But this presumption is not a strong presumption and it is not uncommon to find the legislature inserting superfluous provision under the influence of what may be abundant caution. (See: G.P. Singh on Principles of Statutory Interpretation, 4th Edn., P.51).

13. We may, at this stage, briefly refer to the provisions contained in Chapter IX of the Land Revenue Act and examine whether the said provisions are of such a nature that they can apply only to applications and proceedings under Chapter X of the Zamindari Abolition Act and not to applications and proceedings under the other provisions of the said Act.

14. Chapter IX of the Land Revenue Act which contains Sections 189 to 209 bears the heading Procedure of Revenue Courts and Revenue Officers. Section 189 prescribes the place where the court can be held by the various Revenue Officers. Section 190 empowers the Collector, Settlement Officer, Record Officer and their assistants etc. to enter upon and survey land. Section 191 confers power on the Board of Revenue or the Commissioner to transfer any case or proceedings from a subordinate Revenue Court or Revenue Officer to any other court or officer competent to deal therewith. Section 192 empowers the Collector or Assistant Collector incharge of the sub-division of a district, a Tehsildar, a Record Officer, or a Settlement Officer to transfer cases from his own file to any of his subordinates competent to deal with such cases or to withdraw any class of cases from any Revenue Officer subordinate to him and deal with the same himself. Section 192-A makes provision for consolidation of cases involving substantially the same question for determination and based on the same cause of action pending in one or more court. Section 193 empowers a Revenue Court to summon persons to give evidence and produce documents. Section 195 lays down that the summons should be in writing and sealed and also provides the mode of serving summons as well as for service in district other than that of issue. Section 196 prescribes the mode of serving the notice. Section 197 provides for mode of issuing proclamations. Section 198 provides that a notice and a proclamation shall not be void on account of any error in the name of any person or any designation of any person or in the description of any land referred to therein, unless such error has produced substantial injustice. Section 199 provides for the procedure for procuring attendance of witnesses. Section 200 provides for dismissal of a case in default or for hearing and determination of the same ex parte. Section 201 bars an appeal from an order passed under Section 200 but enables re-hearing of the case on proof of good cause for non-appearance. Section 202 makes provision for correction of error and omission. Sections 203 to 207 deal with the arbitration to which reference has already been made. Section 208 provides for recovery of fines and costs. Section 209 makes provision for delivery of immovable property.

15. All these provisions contained in Chapter IX of the Land Revenue Act are procedural provisions which are normally applicable to a court required in to adjudicate disputes brought before it. There is nothing in these provisions which may require restricting their application to applications and proceedings under Chapter X of the Zamindari Abolition Act. Some of the matters covered by Chapter IX of the Land Revenue Act have been dealt with in Chapter XII of the Zamindari Abolition Act but most of the matters referred to in Chapter IX of the Land Revenue Act are not dealt with in the Zamindari Abolition Act. It cannot be assumed that while enacting the Zamindari Abolition Act the legislature intended that the aforesaid procedural provisions contained in Chapter IX of the Land Revenue Act would be applicable only to applications and proceedings under Chapter X of the Zamindari Abolition Act, but would not be applicable to applications and proceedings under provisions other than Chapter X of the Zamindari Abolition Act. Schedule II to the Zamindari Abolition Act contains a list of applications and proceedings falling in 43 heads which can be initiated under the various provisions of the said Act. Only 5 out of these 43 matters (Sl Nos.39 to 43) relate to applications or proceedings under Chapter X and rest of the items mentioned in Schedule II relate to applications or proceedings under provisions other than Chapter X of the Zamindari Abolition Act. Could it be the intention of the legislature that in the matter of adjudication of applications and proceedings under provisions other than Chapter X of the Zamindari Abolition Act which would be substantially larger in number than those under Chapter X of the said Act, the provisions contained in Chapter IX of the Land Revenue Act should not be available to the revenue courts? Considering this question in the light of the provisions with regard to arbitration of disputes contained in Sections 203 to 207 of the Land Revenue Act we find it difficult to attribute such an intention to the legislature. Arbitration is a recognized mode of settlement of disputes. It enables the parties to resolve their dispute by a tribunal selected by them. The considerations which justify reference to arbitration of disputes arising in applications and proceedings under Chapter X of the Zamindari Abolition Act are equally applicable to applications and proceedings under other provisions of the said Act.

16. For the reasons aforesaid we are of the view that in the judgment under appeal, the High Court has rightly taken the view that the Board of Revenue had ample jurisdiction under Section 203 of the Land Revenue Act to refer to arbitration the dispute involved in the second appeal pending before it which arose out of a suit filed under Section 229-B of the Zamindari Abolition Act. We are unable to endorse the contrary view taken by another learned Judge of the High Court in Sahdeo and Another vs. Deputy Director of Consolidation Varanasi at Allahabad and Others (supra). In the result, the appeal fails and is hereby dismissed with costs.

**********', 0] , 
[ 'CROSS CITATION
1987 AIR (SC) 1518
1987 (2) SCC 692
1987 (2) SCR 1189
APPEARANCES
Mr. B.R.L. Iyengar, Mr. Soli J. Sorabjee, Mr. S.K.V. Iyenger and Mrs. Shyamala Pappu, Sr. Advocates, Mr. S. Lakshminarasu, Mr. K. Ram Kumar, Mrs. Indira Sawhey and Mr. P.R. Ramasesh, Advocates with them for the Appellants.
Mr. M. Veerappa and Mr. Ashok Sharma, Advocates for the Respondents.
HEADNOTE
KARNATAKA LAND REFORMS ACT, 1961
Sections 2(6), 4 to 43, 44 to 62, 63 to 79, 112, 113, 114 and 118 - Karnataka Land Reforms (Amendment) Act 1 of 1974 - Constitution of India, 1950; Articles 31A, 31B, 31C, 39(b) and 39(c) - The Advocates Act, 1961; section 30 - the Indian bar Councils Act, section 14 - Challenge to section 44 as Amended by the Amendment Act - 1974 amendment took away the right of a landlord to resume possession of the tenanted land where he bona fide required the same for personal cultivation - If the tenant is already cultivating the land and that is the source of his livelihood, there is no reason why he should be dispossessed - Qualifications of member of Land Tribunal not specified - the disputes contemplated by s.48A do not appear to be disputes of a nature where the application of a trained judicial mind is absolutely essential - Bar on appearance of advocates before the Tribunals - s.48(8) will not be enforced so as to prevent Advocates from appearing before the Tribunals.
HELD
(i) It is now well recognised by leading economists everywhere that in the absence of common ownership of land and in the existing system of economic relations, the greatest incentive for maximum production is the feeling of identity and security which is possible only if the ownership of the land is with the tiller. It is obviously in recognition of this principle that landlordism was sought to be totally done away with by the amendment of S.5 of the Act by the omission of Secs, 14 and 16 and by the amendment of S.44. If between a landlord who did not himself personally cultivate the land and a tenant who so cultivated the land, the legislature preferred the cultivating tenant, we are unable to hold that such preference is not part of a programme of agrarian reform pursuant to the Directive Principles contained in Arts. 39(b) and (c). We do not have the slightest doubt that the amendment was a law clearly aimed at agrarian reform, to secure the Directive Principles contained in Arts. 39(b) and (c). It is true that one of the conditions subject to which alone a landlord could resume land for personal cultivation under S.16 of the Act was that the income from the land proposed to be cultivated by the landlord on resumption should be the principal source of income for the maintenance of the landlord. But it is important to notice that the question of resumption of land from a tenant would not arise unless a tenant was already cultivating the land. If, therefore, a tenant is already cultivating the land and if, presumably, that is the source of his livelihood, there is no reason why he should be dispossessed to enable a landlord whose source of livelihood it was not until then to make it his principal source of maintenance hereafter. We do not think that any provision of the Amending Act offends the basic structure of the constitution.

(ii) In regard to the constitution of the Tribunal, it was argued that very important questions fell for consideration under S.48A and it was wholly wrong that the decision of such questions should be left, not to a judicial Tribunal, but to a Tribunal consisting of members nominated by the State government with no regard for any qualification....There can be no doubt that while the decision of some disputes require a trained judicial mind to be applied to it, there are many other questions which do not require the application of any trained judicial mind. The disputes contemplated by S.48A do not appear to be disputes of a nature where the application of a trained judicial mind is absolutely essential. We also notice that Land Tribunals have functioned very well in West Bengal and Kerala where under the retrospective State Acts more complicated questions than the ones under s.48A are entrusted to Land Tribunals. The failure of the Land Tribunals to function efficiently in the State of Karnataka has been apparently taken note of by the Legislature itself and the Act has since been amended making provision for an appeal and revision. So much to the credit of the Karnataka Legislature. But we do not see how the failure of some of the land Tribunals to function efficiently can be said to be sufficient to stigmatise wholesale, the functioning of all the Tribunals constituted under the Act and to invalidate the provisions of the Act relating to Tribunals.

(iii) The last submission was in regard to sub-sec.8 of Sec.48 which prohibited legal practitioners from appearing in proceedings before the Tribunals. The argument was that S.48(8) was repugnant to S.30 of the Advocates Act, 1961 and S.14 of the Indian Bar Councils Act. It was said that the State Legislature was not competent to make a law repugnant to laws made by Parliament pursuant to Entries 77 and 78 of List I of the 7th Schedule of the Constitution. The submission of the learned counsel is fully supported by the judgment of a Full Bench of High Court of Punjab and Haryana in JASWANT KAUR V. STATE OF HARYANA AIR 1977 Punjab & Haryana 221. We adopt the reasoning of the High Court of Punjab & Haryana and direct that S.48(8) will not be enforced so as to prevent Advocates from appearing before the Tribunals functioning under the Act. In regard to the decisions already rendered by the Tribunals we do not think that it is necessary to reopen them on the ground that legal practitioners were not allowed to appear before the Tribunals in those cases.

CASES REFERRED
1.Jaswant Kaur v. State of Haryana AIR 1977 Punjab & Haryana 221

2. Waman Rao & Ors. v. Union of India 1981 (2) SCR 1


CHINNAPPA REDDY, J.

1. The question raised in the several appeals is primarily that of the vires of Sec.44 of the Karnataka land Reforms Act, 1961 as amended by the Karnataka Land Reforms(Amendment) Act 1 of 1974. In order to appreciate the submissions made to us, it will be useful to set out the relevant provisions of the Act before it was amended by Act 1 of 1974. Section 2 (6) as it stood before the amendment defined basic holding as meaning land which was equal to two standard acres. Court was defined to mean the court of Munsif within the local limits of whose jurisdiction the land was situate. Family holding was defined as meaning land equal to six standard acres. Small holder was defined to mean a land owner owning land not exceeding two basic holdings whose total net annual income including the income from such land did not exceed one thousand two hundred rupees. Standard acre was defined to mean one acre of the first class of land or an extent equivalent thereto consisting of any one or more classes of land specified in Part A of Schedule I determined in accordance with the formula in Part B of the said Schedule. Chapter II (Sections 4 to 43) contained General provisions relating to Tenancies and Chapter III (Sections 44 to 62) dealt with Conferment of ownership on tenants. Section 5 prohibited the creation or continuation of any tenancy in respect of any land after the appointed day and barred the leasing of land for any period whatsoever. It was, however, provided that (a) any small holder might create or continue & tenancy or lease the land owned by him and (b) any land owner who was a minor, a widow, an unmarried woman, a person incapable of cultivating land by reason of any physical or mental disability or a soldier in service in the armed forces of the Union or a seaman, might create or continue the tenancy or lease the land owned by him or her. It was further provided that tenancies of resumable lands could be continued until the dispossession of the tenants under S. 14 and of non-resumable land until the date of vesting under S.44 Section 14 provided for resumption of lands from tenants. Sub-section 1, 4 and 6 of S. 14 may be usefully extracted here. Sub-section 2, 3, and 5 do not appear to be necessary for the purposes of the present case. Sub-Sections 1, 4, and 6 were as follows:-

14. Resumption of land from tenants - (1) Notwithstanding anything contained in sections 22 and 43, but subject to the provisions of this section and of sections 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20 and 41, a landlord may, if he bona fide required land, other than land referred to in the first proviso to clause (29) of sub-section (A) of section 2,

(i) for cultivating personally, or

(ii) for any non-agricultural purpose, file with the Court a statement indicating the lands owned by him and which he intends to resume and such other particulars as may be prescribed. On such statement being filed, the Court shall, as soon as may be after giving an opportunity to be heard to the landlord and such of his tenants and other persons as may be affected, and, having due regard to contiguity, fertility and fair distribution of lands, and after making such other inquiries as the Court deems necessary, determine the land or lands, which the landlord shall be entitled to resume, and shall issue a certificate to the landlord to the effect that the land or lands specified in such certificate has been reserved for resumption; and thereupon the right to resume possession shall be exercisable only in respect of the lands specified in such certificate and shall not extend to any other land.

Explanation:- Subject to such rules as may be prescribed, the Court within the jurisdiction of which the greater part of the land held by the landlord is situated shall be the Court competent to issue a certificate under this section.

(2) xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx

(3) xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx

(4) In respect of tenancies existing on the appointed day, as soon as may be after the expiry of fifteen months from the appointed day, as soon as may be after the statement under sub-section (1) is filed, the Court shall after such inquiry as it deems fit, determine the lands which will be non-resumable lands leased to tenants for purpose of this Act.

(5) xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx

(6) Notwithstanding anything contained in sub-section (5), where the landlord belongs to any of the following categories, namely:-

(i) minor;

(ii) a person incapable of cultivating land by reason of any physical or mental disability,

(iii) a widow;

(iv) An unmarried woman;

then, the application to the Court for possession of land shall be made, within fifteen months from the appointed day or one year from the date on which-

(a) in the case of category(i), he attains majority;

(b) in the case of category (ii), he ceases to be subject to such physical or mental disability;

(c) in the case of category (iii), she remarries;

(d) in the case of category (iv), she marries whichever is later:

Provided that where land is held by two or more joint landlords, the provisions of this sub-section shall not apply unless all such landlords, belong to the categories specified in clauses (i) and (ii) and the application shall be made within one year from the date on which any one of such category and an application by any one of the joint-holders shall be deemed to be a valid application on behalf of all the joint holders:

Provided further that where a person belonging to any of the categories specified in clause (i) or (ii) of this sub-section, is a member of a joint family belong to the categories specified in clauses (i) and (ii), but where the share in the joint family of a person belonging to any of such categories has been separated by metes and bounds before the filling of the statement under sub-section (i), if the Court on inquiry is satisfied that the share of such person in the land separated, having regard to the area, assessment, classification and value of the land is in the same proportion as the share of that person in the entire joint family property, and not in a larger proportion, the provisions of the sub-section shall be applicable to such persons.

(7) xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx

(8) xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx

Section 15 provided for resumption of land by soldiers and seamen. Section 16 prescribed the conditions restricting resumption of land under S. 14. It is necessary to extract the whole of S. 16. It was as follows:-

16. Conditions restricting resumption of land under Section 14 - The right of a landlord to resume for cultivating the land personally under Section 14, shall be subject to the following conditions, namely:-

(1) If the landlord owns land not exceeding two basic holding he shall be entitled to resume one half of the land leased to the tenant:

Provided that the right to resume by such landlord shall be subject to the conditions that in the case of a protected tenant, such tenant, shall be left with at least one standard acre of the land actually held by him, whichever is less.

(2) If the landlord owns land exceeding two basic holdings, he shall be entitled to resume one-half of the area leased to the tenant, provided that the total area resumed by the landlord does not exceed three family holdings.

(3) No landlord who has been cultivating personally land exceeding three family holdings shall be entitled to resume any land leased.

(4) The right to resume land under clauses (1) to (3) shall be subject to the further condition that the land resumed from all the tenants holding under the landlord together with the extent of land, if any, cultivated by the landlord personally and any non-resumable land held by him shall not exceed three family holdings.

(5) In respect of land cultivated with plantation crops, the landlord shall not be entitled to resume more than one-half of the land leased to a tenant.

(6) If more tenancies than one are held under the same landlord, than the landlord shall be entitled to resume land only from tenants whose tenancy or tenancies are the shortest in point of duration.

Provided that the landlord shall be entitled to resume lands held by protected tenants only if the required extent of land cannot be resumed from tenants other than protected tenants:

Provided further that where such tenancy or tenancies shortest in point of duration shall on resumption leave with the tenants land in extent which will be less than a basic holding, the resumption shall be made in respect of tenancy or tenancies next longer in point of duration.

(7) The right to resume land by the landlord, other than a landlord owning land not exceeding two basic holdings, shall be subject to the further condition that in the case of protected tenants, each protected tenant shall be left with a basic holding or the land actually held by him, whichever is less.

(8) The right to resume land from any tenant shall be exercisable under s.14 only once.

(9) The income by the cultivation of the land of which he is entitled to resume shall be the principal source of income for the maintenance of the landlord.

(10) If as a result of the resumption of land under Section 14, a fragment is created, the person entitled to the larger part of the land shall be entitled to the fragment also.

(10A) If any person has after the 18th November, 1961 and before the appointed day transferred any land, otherwise than by partition, then, in calculating the extent of land owned by such person for purposes of the proceeding clauses, the area so transferred shall be taken into consideration, and land exceeding the resumable area so calculated shall be deemed to be non-resumable land, and such person shall not be entitled to resume such non-resumable land.

Explanation - For purposes of this clause, a land shall be deemed to have been transferred, if it has been transferred by act of parties (whether by sale, gift, mortgage with possession, exchange, lease or any other disposition) made inter vivas.

(10B) Notwithstanding anything contained in clauses (1) to (10) (both inclusive), or S. 142, the extent of land, if any, resumable, by any landlord in Bombay Area shall be subject to the restrictions and conditions specified in Section 31A, 31B, and 31C of the Bombay Tenancy and Agricultural Lands Act, 1948, as inserted by the Bombay Tenancy and Agricultural Lands (Amendment) Act 1955 (Bombay Act 13 of 1956), notwithstanding the provisions of the Bombay Tenancy (Suspension of Provisions and Amendment) Act, 1957 (Mysore Act 13 of 1957).

(10C) Notwithstanding anything contained in clauses (1) to (10), both inclusive), or S. 142, the extent of land, if any, resumable, by any landlord in the Hyderabad Area, shall be subject to the restrictions and conditions specified in the Hyderabad Tenancy and Agricultural Lands Act, 1950, as in force in the Hyderabad Area on the 1st November 1956.

(ii) No landlord who at any time before the appointed day had resumed land from any tenant from personal cultivation under the Bombay Tenancy and Agricultural Lands Act, 1948, or the Hyderabad Tenancy and Agricultural Lands Act, 1950, shall be entitled to resume again under section 14 and land left with the same tenant.

Section 44 provided for the vesting of certain lands in the State Government. Sub-sec.1 was as follows:

(1) As soon as may be after the determination of the non- resumable lands under sub-section (4) of Section 14, by each Court, the State Government may by notification declare that with effect from such date as may be specified in such notification (hereinafter referred to as to date of vesting) all the non-resumable lands determined by such Court which are leased to tenants, whether protected or otherwise, and all lands leased to permanent and other tenants referred to in the first proviso to clause (29) of sub-section (a) of Section 2 in the area within jurisdiction of such Court shall stand transferred to and vest in the State Government.

Section 45 provided for the registration of tenants as occupants of land on certain conditions. Section 47 provided for the payment of compensation to the land owner in regard to the extinguishment of rights in land vesting in the State Government under S.44. Chapter IV(Sections 63 to 79) dealt with ceiling on land holdings. Section 63 prescribed the ceiling on the extent of land which any person may hold either as a land-owner, landlord or tenant or as a mortgagee with possession or otherwise or partly in one capacity and partly in another. Section 68 provided further vesting of land surrendered by the owner in the State Government. Section 72 provided for payment of compensation for land surrendered to and vested in the State Government. We are not concerned with Chapters V, VI, VII, and VIII. Chapter IX dealt with Procedure and Jurisdiction of Court and Appeals. Section 112 prescribed the duties of the Court and among the duties were (g) to issue a certificate relating to reservation of land for resumption under sub-section (1) of S. 14 and (h) to determine the non-resumable lands under sub-sec.(4) of Sec. 14. Sections 113, 114 and 115 provided for enquiry by the Court and the procedure to be adopted. Section 118 provided for an appeal from the Court to the District Court.

2. The broad scheme of the provisions mentioned or set out above was that there was not only to be a ceiling on the holding of land, the system of leasing of land was to be abolished and cultivating tenants were to be invested with rights of ownership. However, certain limited classes of cases were recognised where leases were permitted on the one hand and on the other tenants were deprived of the right to remain in possession of the land. It was provided that leases were permissible in cases when the landlord was under some disability as specified in S.5. It was also provided that a land owner could seek, subject to the prescribed limits, resumption of land from tenants, if he bona fide required the land for cultivating personally or for any non-agricultural purpose. The right to resume land for personal cultivation was no doubt subject to several severe conditions, one of the most important of which was that the income by the cultivation of the land which he was entitled to resume should be the principal source of income for the maintenance of the land owner. In other words, the Act while fixing a ceiling on the holding of land and generally conferring ownership rights on tenants, did not altogether ignore the interests of the smaller landlords and did in fact offer some measure of protection to those who desired to personally cultivate the tenanted land.

3. The Act was substantially amended in 1974. Basic holding and family holding ceased to be defined. Ceiling area was defined to mean the extent of land which the person or family was entitled to hold under S.63. Section 5 was amended and the provisos were omitted. It was however provided by sub-sec 2 that the prohibition against creation of tenancies or leases would not apply to tenancies created by a soldier or a seaman. The savings in respect of a minor widow or a minor woman under the original Sec.5 was taken away. Section 14 was omitted. Section 16 was also omitted. Section 44 was amended. The new sub-section 1 of Sec.44 is as follows:-

44(1) All lands held by or in the possession of tenants (including tenants against whom a decree or order for eviction or a certificate for resumption is made or issued) immediately prior to the date of commencement of the Amendment Act, other than lands held by them under leases permitted under Section 5, shall, with effect on and from the said date, stand transferred to and vest in the State Government.

A new Section 48 was introduced providing for the Constitution of Tribunals, a Tribunal for each taluq consisting of the Assistant Commissioner of the Revenue Division and four other members to be nominated by the State Government of whom one shall be a person belonging to the schedules casts or scheduled tribes. No qualifications were prescribed for the nomination of persons to membership of the Tribunal. Sub-section 8 of Section 48 provided that no legal practitioner shall be allowed to appear in any proceeding before the Tribunal. Section 48A dealt with the procedure to be adopted by the Tribunal in its enquiry into applications made under S.45 for registration of a person as an occupant. Sec. 112A provided for the duties of the Tahsildar and S.112B provided for the duties of the Tribunals. The provision for an appeal from the decision of the Court and the further right of revision under the amended Act were taken away and there was no right of appeal or revision against the decision of the Tribunal. Thus, we see that the 1974 Amending Act took away the right which, was saved by the original Act in favour of the widow, unmarried woman, minor and disabled person to create a tenancy or lease the land. The more important right which was taken away by the 1974 Amendment was the right of the landlord to resume the land if he bona fide required the land for personal cultivation or for a non-agricultural purpose. The right to resume the land if he bona fide required the land for personal cultivation was denied by the Amending Act even if the income by the cultivation of the land which he was entitled to resume was the principal source of income for the maintenance of the landlord.

4. The principal submission of the learned counsel for the appellants was that the 1974 amendment in so far as it took away the right of a landlord to resume possession of the tenanted land where he bona fide required the land for personal cultivation and had no other principal source of income for his own maintenance, was ultra vires, notwithstanding its inclusion in the Ninth Schedule, as it offended the basic structure of the Constitution. Another submission which was made by the learned counsel was that the provision for the constitution of a Tribunal consisting of person with unspecified qualifications in the place of a Court was similarly ultra vires the powers of the State Legislature. The third submission of the learned counsel was that S.47(8) which excluded legal practitioner from appearing before the Tribunals was in conflict with S.30 of the Advocates Act and had therefore, to yield.

5. It is necessary for us to mention here that the principal Act was included in the IXth Schedule of the Constitution on October 20, 1965 and the Amendment Act of 1974 was similarly included in the IXth Schedule on September 7, 1974.

6. We do not think that it is necessary to hark back to the decisions of this court rendered prior to the one in WAMAN RAO & ORS. V. UNION OF INDIA 1981 (2) SCR 1. One of the petitioner who presented his case in person did argue that WAMAN RAOS case to the extent that it upheld Arts. 31-A, 31-B and 31-C and to the extent that it uphold the validity of the legislations impugned therein required reconsideration. We do not agree that it is necessary either to reconsider or to go behind Waman Rao for the purposes of this case. Chandrachud, CJ, speaking for the majority of the judges of the Constitution Bench stated their conclusions in regard to Arts. 31-A, 31-B and 31-C as follows:-

(1) The Constitution (First Amendment) Act, 1951 which introduced Article 31A into the Constitution with retrospective effect and Section 3 of the Constitution (Fourth Amendment) Act, 1955 which substituted a new clause (1), sub-clause (a) to (b), for the original clause (1) with retrospective effect, do not damage any of the basic or essential features of the Constitution or its basic structure and are valid and constitutional being within the constituent power of the Parliament.

(2) Section 5 of the Constitution (First Amendment) Act 1951 introduced Article 31B into the Constitution which reads thus:

31B xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx

In Keshavananda Bharti (1973, Suppl., SCR 1) decided on April 24, 1973 it was held by the majority that Parliament has no power to amend the Constitution so as to damage or destroy its basic or essential features or its basic structure. We hold that all amendments to the Constitution which were made before April 24, 1973 and by which the 9th Schedule to Constitution was amended from time to time by the inclusion of various Acts and Regulations therein, are open to challenge on the ground that they, or any one or more of them, are beyond constituent power of the Parliament since they damage the basic or essential features of the Constitution of its basic structure. We do not pronounce upon the validity of such subsequent Constitutional amendments except to say that if any Act Regulation included in the 9th Schedule by Constitutional amendment made on or after April 24, 1973 is saved by Article 31A, or by Article 310 as it stood prior to its amendment by the 42nd Amendment, the challenge to the validity of the relevant Constitutional Amendment by which that Act or Regulation is put in the 9th Schedule, on the ground that the Amendment damages or destroys a basic or essential feature of the Constitutional or its basic structure as reflected in Articles 14, 19 or 31, will become otiose.

(3) Article 31C of the Constitution, as it stood prior to its amendment by Section 4 of the Constitution (42 Amendment), Act, 1976, is valid to the extent to which its constitutionality was upheld in Keshavananda Bharti. Article 31C, as it stood prior to the Constitution (42 Amendment) Act does not damage any of the basic or essential features of the Constitution or its basic structure.

(4) All the Writ Petitions and Review Petitions relating to the validity of the Maharashtra Agricultural Lands Ceiling Acts are dismissed with costs.

7. In the course of the submission, the learned counsel suggested that the 1974 Amendment Act was not a law pertaining to agrarian reform; nor it was said, was it a law directed towards securing that the ownership and control of the material resources of the community were so distributed as best to subserve the common goods or the operation of the economic system did not result in the concentration of wealth and means of production to the common detriment. It was suggested that the 1974 Amendment Act far from setting out to achieve these goals set out in quite opposite direction by seeking to reduce to destitution small landlords whose sole means of livelihood was the tenanted land which they were allowed to resume for personal cultivation. It was said that the original Act was very fair as it recognised poverty amongst landlords as well as poverty amongst tenants and afforded a measures of protection to the poorer sections of the landlords. We are unable to agree with the submissions that the Amendment is not aimed at agrarian reform or at securing the objectives mentioned in Arts. 39(b) and (c) of the Constitution. It is too late in the day to contend that, in the existing system of economic relations, ownership of land to the tiller of the land is not the best way of securing that utmost utilisation of land, a material resource of the community for the common good of the entire community. It is now well recognised by leading economists every where that in the absence of common ownership of land and in the existing system of economic relations, the greatest incentive for maximum production is the feeling of identity and security which is possible only if the ownership of the land is with the tiller. It is obviously in recognition of this principle that landlordism was sought to be totally done away with by the amendment of S.5 of the Act, by the omission of secs, 14 and 16 and by the amendment of S.44. If between a landlord who did not himself personally cultivate the land and a tenant who so cultivated the land, the legislature preferred the cultivating tenant, we are unable to hold that such preference is not part of a programme of agrarian reform pursuant to the Directive Principles contained in Arts. 39(b) and (c). We do not have the slightest doubt that the amendment was a law clearly aimed at agrarian reform, to secure the Directive Principles contained in Arts. 39(b) and (c). It is true that one of the conditions subject to which alone a landlord could resume land for personal cultivation under S.16 of the Act was that the income from the land proposed to be cultivated by the landlord on resumption should be the principal source of income for the maintenance of the landlord. But it is important to notice that the question of resumption of land from a tenant would not arise unless a tenant was already cultivating the land. If, therefore, a tenant is already cultivating the land and if, presumably, that is the source of his livelihood, there is no reason why he should be dispossessed to enable a landlord whose source of livelihood it was not until then to make it his principal source of maintenance hereafter. We do not think that any provision of the Amending Act offends the basic structure of the Constitution.

8. In regard to the Constitution of the tribunal, it was argued that very important questions fell for consideration under S.48A and it was wholly wrong that the decision of such questions should be left, not to a judicial Tribunal, but to a Tribunal consisting of members nominated by the State Government with no regard for any qualification. Our attention was invited to several decisions of the Karnataka High Court where the functioning of such ill-constituted Tribunals was exposed and castigated. It is true that it was commented in some of those cases that the Tribunals were functioning in a most unjudicial manner, quite often without applying their minds at all to the questions at issue and in some cases, in utter violation of the principles of natural justice. We are unable to see how the mal-functioning of some of the Tribunals can possibly vitiate the provision relating to the Constitution of the Tribunal and the entrustment of the decision of certain issues to the Tribunal. We do not want to enter into a discussion of the question whether a lay Tribunal cannot function more efficiently than a judicial Tribunal in resolving certain peculiar questions. There can be no doubt that while the decision of some disputes require a trained judicial mind to be applied to it, there are many other questions which do not require the application of any trained judicial mind. The disputes contemplated by S.48A do not appear to be disputes of a nature where the application of a trained judicial mind is absolutely essential. We also notice that Land Tribunals have functioned very well in West Bengal and Kerala where under the retrospective State Acts more complicated questions than the ones under S.48A are entrusted to Land Tribunals. The failure of the Land Tribunals to function efficiently in the State of Karnataka has been apparently taken note of by the Legislature itself and the Act has since been amended making provision for an appeal and revision. So much to the credit of the Karnataka Legislature. But we do not see how the failure of some of the land Tribunals to function efficiently can be said to be sufficient to stigmatise wholesale, the functioning of all the Tribunals constituted under the Act and to invalidate the provisions of the Act relating to Tribunals.

9. The last submission was in regard to sub-sec.8 of Sec.48 which prohibited legal practitioners from appearing in proceedings before the Tribunals. The argument was that s.48(8) was repugnant to S.30 of the Advocates Act, 1961 and S.14 of the Indian Bar Councils Act. It was said that the State Legislature was not competent to make a law repugnant to laws made by Parliament pursuant to Entries 77 and 78 of List I of the 7th Schedule of the Constitution. The submission of the learned counsel is fully supported by the judgment of a Full Bench of High Court of Punjab and Haryana in JASWANT KAUR V. STATE OF HARYANA AIR 1977 Punjab & Haryana 221. We adopt the reasoning of the High Court of Punjab & Haryana and direct that S.48(8) will not be enforced so as to prevent Advocates from appearing before the Tribunals functioning under the Act. In regard to the decisions already rendered by the Tribunals we do not think that it is necessary to reopen them on the ground that legal practitioners were not allowed to appear before the Tribunals in those cases. All the civil appeals are, therefore, dismissed, in the circumstances without cost.

Appeal dismissed.

**********', 0] , 
[ 'CROSS CITATION
2011 AIR (SC) 1899
2011 (11) SCC 375
APPEARANCES
Mr. R.K. Kapoor, Ms. Sanjana Bali, Mr. Harish Chandra Pant, Ms. Sweta Kapoor, Mr. Anis Ahmed Khan, Advocates, for the Appellant(s).
Mr. Keerthi Prabhakar, Mr. Aniruddha P. Mayee, Advocates, for the Respondent(s).


HEADNOTE
ARBITRATION
Arbitration and Conciliation Act, 1996
Sections 11, 2 - Appointment of Arbitrator - Arbitration agreement - Existence of - Developer entering into agreement with land owners - One T also a party, who wanted to purchase undivided share in land - Developer agreeing to construct residential apartment for T - On request of T, bank sanctioning loan under tripartite agreement with him as borrower and with developer as guarantor - Agreement to disburse loan amount directly to developer - Land owners executing registered sale deed on 21.02.2008 conveying undivided share in land - On same date, construction agreement between T and developer to construct apartment and deliver it to T by 16.10.2008, made - Said agreement contained arbitration clause - On default, T issued notice to developer - In absence of reply, petition filed in High Court - Bank brought as party for the first time - If arbitration against bank can be said to be in existence - Presence of arbitration clause in agreement between T and bank. Held that appointing arbitrator against a person who is not a party to arbitration agreement, would be against contract and law. Orders of High Court appointing Arbitrator against bank, set aside.
HELD
The question is whether the appellant, a non-party to the construction agreement containing the arbitration agreement as per clause (7), could be roped in, as a party to such arbitration. The first respondent made a demand for damages against the developer in his notice dated 31.7.2009. As the developer refused to comply, the first respondent invoked the arbitration agreement contained in clause (7) of the Construction Agreement dated 21.2.2008 between him and the developer. Therefore, in so far as the disputes between the first respondent and the developer (second respondent) are concerned, the designate of the Chief Justice was justified in appointing an arbitrator. (Para 11)
A dispute can be said to arise only when one party to the arbitration agreement makes or asserts a claim/demand against the other party to the arbitration agreement and the other party refuses/denies such claim or demand. If a party to an arbitration agreement, files a petition under section 11 of the Act impleading the other party to the arbitration agreement as also a non-party to the arbitration agreement as respondents, and the court merely appoints an Arbitrator without deleting or excluding the non-party, the effect would be that all parties to the petition under section 11 of the Act (including the non-party to arbitration agreement) will be parties to the arbitration. That will be contrary to the contract and the law. (Para 13)
The appellant was not a party to the said construction agreement dated 21.2.2008 containing the arbitration agreement. It is no doubt true that the loan agreement dated 21.12.2006 between the first respondent as borrower, and the appellant as the creditor, also contains an arbitration clause (vide Article 11) providing for resolution of disputes in regard to the said loan agreement by arbitration. But the developer was not a party to the loan agreement. There is no arbitration agreement between the developer and the appellant. The disputes between the first respondent and the developer cannot be arbitrated under Article 11 of the Loan Agreement. The first respondent invoked the arbitration agreement contained in clause 7 of the construction agreement (between first respondent and developer) and not the arbitration agreement contained in clause 11 of the loan agreement (between appellant and first respondent). The existence of an arbitration agreement in a contract between appellant and first respondent, will not enable the first respondent to implead the appellant as a party to an arbitration in regard to his disputes with the developer. (Para 14)
The first respondent has also alleged that the appellant by releasing the payments to the developer without verifying the ground realities about the progress and construction and without intimation to him, had committed breach of trust and therefore liable to pay compensation for the financial and mental suffering of the first respondent as also the legal and other expenses. No such claim was ever been made against the appellant before filing the petition under section 11 of the Act, nor did the first respondent at any time seek arbitration in regard to such claims against the appellant. The said claims against the appellant cannot be arbitrated in an arbitration in pursuance of clause (7) of the construction agreement between the first respondent and the developer. (Para 15)
It could not be said that any dispute existed between the first respondent and appellant, when the petition under section 11 of the Act was filed. Even in the application under section 11 of the Act, there is no reference to clause No.(11) of the loan agreement which contains the arbitration agreement in regard to disputes that may arise between the appellant as lender and the first respondent as the borrower. There is no claim or dispute in regard to the loan agreement. (Para 16)

CASES REFERRED
     1.    S.N. Prasad v. Monnet Finance Ltd. JT 2010 (11) SC 479 (Para 12.2.)
     2.    Yogi Agarwal v. Inspiration Clothes & U JT 2009 (1) SC 440 (Para 12.1.)
     3.    Jagdish Chander v. Ramesh Chander JT 2007 (6) SC 375 (Para 12)


R.V. RAVEENDRAN, J.
1. Leave granted.
2. The second respondent (referred to as the Developer) entered into a development agreement with the owners of certain lands at Bachupally village, Qutubullapur Mandal, Ranga Reddy District, for constructing independent houses and multistoried Apartment buildings with common facilities in a layout known as Hill County township. The landowners as the first party, the developer as the second party and the first respondent who wanted to acquire an apartment therein as the third party entered into an agreement for sale dated 16.10.2006 under which the land-owners agreed to sell an undivided share equivalent to 87 sq.yds. out of a total extent of 16.95 acres to the first respondent and the developer agreed to construct a residential apartment measuring 1889 sq.ft. for the first respondent. The total consideration for the undivided share in the land, apartment and car parking space was agreed as Rs.55,89,368. The agreement contemplating the entire price being paid in installments, that is 10% on booking, 85% in seven installments upto 15.3.2008 and 5% at the time of delivery. Clause (14) of the said agreement dated 16.10.2006 provided for settlement of disputes by arbitration.
3. On the request of the first respondent, the appellant (earlier known as BHW Home Finance Ltd.) sanctioned a housing loan of Rs.52 lakhs to the first respondent for purchase of the said apartment in terms of a loan agreement dated 21.12.2006 entered into between the first respondent as the borrower and the appellant as the lender. The said loan agreement contained the terms of the loan, rate of interest, provisions for amortization, consequences of delay in payment of EMIs, security for repayment, and general covenants of borrower. Clause (11) thereof provided for settlement of all disputes (that is, all matters, questions, disputes, differences and/or claims arising out of and/or concerning and/or in connection and/or in consequences of breaches, termination or invalidity thereof or relating to the Agreement) by arbitration by the Managing Director of the appellant or his nominee as sole Arbitrator. The first respondent subsequently had entered into a supplemental loan agreement with the appellant on 29.10.2007 for reducing the loan amount from Rs.52 lakhs to Rs.49,78,527/-; and the said loan has been disbursed in terms of the said loan agreements.
4. It is alleged that a tripartite agreement was also executed on 21.12.2006 among first respondent as borrower, the developer as guarantor and the appellant as the lender, under which it was agreed that the loan amount should be disbursed by the appellant directly to the developer and such amounts paid to the developer shall be deemed to be disbursement of loan by the appellant to the first respondent.
5. In pursuance of the agreement of sale dated 16.10.2006, the first respondent paid the entire sale price to the developer through the appellant. Thereafter, the land-owners and the developer executed a registered sale deed dated 21.2.2008 for a consideration Rs.21,27,409/-, conveying to the first respondent, an undivided share in the land equivalent to 87 sq.yds. with the semi finished apartment bearing No.3E in the third floor of Nainital Block of Hill County with one reserved parking space. On the same day the first respondent entrusted the construction of the unfinished flat to the developer under a construction agreement dated 21.2.2008, under which the developer acknowledged the receipt of the total cost of construction, that is Rs.33,22,226 from the first respondent and agreed to complete the construction of the apartment and deliver the same to the first respondent by 16.10.2008 with a grace period of three months. Clause 7 of the said construction agreement dated 21.2.2008 between the first respondent and the developer provided for arbitration and is extracted below:
             7. Arbitration
            a. In the event of any dispute between the parties in connection with the validity, interpretation, implementation or breach of any provision of this agreement or any other disputes including the question of whether there is proper termination of the agreement shall be resolved through arbitration by appointing a sole arbitrator by the Vice Chairman of the First Party. The decision of the Arbitrator shall be final and binding on both the parties.
            b. The arbitration proceedings shall be in accordance with the provisions laid down in the Arbitration and Conciliation Act, 1996 and shall be governed by the laws in A.P. subject to the authorized arbitration clauses. The venue of the Arbitration proceedings shall be Hyderabad and the language shall be in English. All the proceedings are subject to the exclusive jurisdiction of the courts at Hyderabad limits.
5.1. On the execution of the sale deed dated 21.2.2008 and construction agreement dated 21.2.2008, the earlier agreement for sale dated 16.10.2006 apparently lost its relevance, as the land-owners went out of the picture on execution of the sale deed regarding the undivided share and a fresh construction agreement dated 21.2.2008 was executive regarding completion of the apartment by the developer.
6. The first respondent issued a notice dated 31.7.2009 to the developer, alleging delay in construction and delivery of the apartment and called upon it to pay Rs.54,778 per month as compensation for the period of delay, that is from the due date of completion (16.10.2008) till date of actual completion and delivery of the apartment. By another letter dated 15.9.2009 addressed to the developer, first respondent invoked the arbitration clause contained in clause (7) of the construction agreement dated 21.2.2008 and sought reference of the disputes between them to arbitration. There was no response from the developer.
7. Thereafter, the first respondent filed a petition under section 11 of the Arbitration and Conciliation Act, 1996 (Act for short) in the Andhra Pradesh High Court, for appointment of an Arbitrator. In the said petition, the appellant was brought into the dispute, for the first time, by impleading it as a respondent along with the developer. In the said petition, the first respondent alleged that the developer had failed to complete and deliver the apartment in terms of the construction agreement dated 21.2.2008. He also alleged that the developer had arranged the housing loan from the appellant; and that the appellant-lender had released the total loan amount to the developer without ensuring that there was sufficient progress of construction and without verifying the ground realities and thereby failed to perform its minimum obligations and responsibilities as a lender. He contended that the circumstances disclosed collusion, fraud and misrepresentation on the part of the developer and the appellant. First respondent further alleged that the following disputes had arisen between him on the one hand, and the respondents therein (the developer and the appellant) on the other, which required to be decided by arbitration:
            a) The developer committed breach of contract in not fulfilling its part of contractual obligations and consequently was liable to refund all the amounts collected from him and the appellant, together with interest thereon at 24% per annum with monthly rests from the date of its respective dates of collections till payment, besides the interest and damages that may be charged by the appellant.
            b) The appellant clandestinely and deliberately released the entire payments to the developer without verifying the ground realities about the progress of construction and without intimation to him (first respondent) and thus committed breach of trust and was liable for all consequences.
            c) In view of the breach of trust and non-fulfillment of the obligations, the developer was also liable to pay a sum of Rs.15 lakhs towards miscellaneous expenditure incurred and mental agony suffered by the petitioner.
            d) The developer was also liable to pay/reimburse whatsoever that may be demanded by the appellant in respect of the entire transaction.
            e) The developer and the appellant were liable to pay the first respondent all the expenditure incurred/to be incurred towards legal and other miscellaneous charges.
            f) The developer and the appellant were liable to compensate him for his financial and mental suffering.
            g) The developer and the appellant were liable to pay commercial rate of interest to the first respondent on the amounts found due from the due date till payment.
7.1. The first respondent relying upon clause (7) of the construction agreement dated 21.2.2008, sought appointment of a sole arbitrator to adjudicate upon the disputes between him and the developer and the appellant in respect of purchase of the apartment.
8. The said petition was resisted by the appellant. The appellant contended that it had nothing to do with the dispute between first respondent and developer; that for the first time, the first respondent had chosen to make allegations against the appellant in the petition under section 11 of the Act, apparently in collusion with the developer, to avoid payment of EMIs due to the appellant; and that the petition under section 11 of the Act was not maintainable against it, as the dispute was between the first respondent and the developer (second respondent) and it was not a party to the arbitration agreement invoked by the first respondent (that is clause 7 of the construction agreement dated 21.2.2008).
9. The designate of the Chief Justice of Andhra Pradesh High Court by the impugned order dated 12.4.2010 allowed the said application under section 11 and appointed a retired Judge of High Court as the sole arbitrator. The learned designate referred to the construction agreement dated 21.2.2008 between the first respondent and second respondent and clause (7) therein providing for arbitration. The said order did not refer to the contention of the appellant that it was not a party to the dispute and therefore the petition under section 11 was not maintainable against it. In view of the impugned order, the appellant though not concerned with the disputes between the first respondent and the developer, is made a party to the arbitration.
10. The said order is challenged by the appellant urging the following contentions:
            (i) As the first respondent and the developer were the only parties to the construction agreement dated 21.2.2008 containing the arbitration agreement, the appellant could not be dragged into a dispute between them, by impleading it as a party to the petition under section 11 of the Act.
            (ii) The designate of the Chief Justice ought to have examined whether both respondents in the petition under section 11 of the Act were parties to the arbitration agreement (clause 7 of the construction agreement dated 21.2.2008) before making an order appointing an arbitrator under section 11 of the Act.
10.1. On the contentions urged, the question that arises for our consideration is whether the appellant could be made a party to the arbitration, even though the appellant was not a party to the arbitration agreement contained in clause (7) of the construction agreement dated 21.2.2008.
11. In this case, the first respondent made a demand for damages against the developer in his notice dated 31.7.2009. As the developer refused to comply, the first respondent invoked the arbitration agreement contained in clause (7) of the Construction Agreement dated 21.2.2008 between him and the developer. Therefore, in so far as the disputes between the first respondent and the developer (second respondent) are concerned, the designate of the Chief Justice was justified in appointing an arbitrator. But the question is whether the appellant, a non-party to the construction agreement containing the arbitration agreement as per clause (7), could be roped in, as a party to such arbitration.
12. In Jagdish Chander v. Ramesh Chander JT 2007 (6) SC 375 : 2007 (5) SCC 719 this court held :
            The existence of an arbitration agreement as defined under Section 7 of the Act is a condition precedent for exercise of power to appoint an arbitrator/Arbitral Tribunal, under Section 11 of the Act by the Chief Justice or his designate. It is not permissible to appoint an arbitrator to adjudicate the disputes between the parties in the absence of an arbitration agreement or mutual consent.
12.1. In Yogi Agarwal v. Inspiration Clothes & U JT 2009 (1) SC 440 : 2009 (1) SCC 372, this court observed:
            When Sections 7 and 8 of the Act refer to the existence of an arbitration agreement between the parties, they necessarily refer to an arbitration agreement in regard to the current dispute between the parties or the subject-matter of the suit. It is fundamental that a provision for arbitration, to constitute an arbitration agreement for the purposes of Sections 7 and 8 of the Act, should satisfy two conditions. Firstly, it should be between the parties to the dispute. Secondly, it should relate to or be applicable to the dispute.
12.2. In S.N. Prasad v. Monnet Finance Ltd. JT 2010 (11) SC 479, this Court held:
            There can be reference to arbitration only if there is an arbitration agreement between the parties. If there is a dispute between a party to an arbitration agreement, with other parties to the arbitration agreement as also non-parties to the arbitration agreement, reference to arbitration or appointment of arbitration can be only with respect to the parties to the arbitration agreement and not the non-parties........As there was no arbitration agreement between the parties, the impleading of the appellant as a respondent in the proceedings and the award against the appellant in such arbitration cannot be sustained.
12.3. Therefore, if X enters into two contracts, one with M and another with D, each containing an arbitration clause providing for settlement of disputes arising under the respective contract, in a claim for arbitration by X against M in regard to the contract with M, X cannot implead D as a party on the ground that there is an arbitration clause in the agreement between X and D.
13. The existence of an arbitration agreement between the parties to the petition under section 11 of the Act and existence of dispute/s to be referred to arbitration are conditions precedent for appointing an Arbitrator under section 11 of the Act. A dispute can be said to arise only when one party to the arbitration agreement makes or asserts a claim/demand against the other party to the arbitration agreement and the other party refuses/denies such claim or demand. If a party to an arbitration agreement, files a petition under section 11 of the Act impleading the other party to the arbitration agreement as also a non-party to the arbitration agreement as respondents, and the court merely appoints an Arbitrator without deleting or excluding the non-party, the effect would be that all parties to the petition under section 11 of the Act (including the non-party to arbitration agreement) will be parties to the arbitration. That will be contrary to the contract and the law. If a person who is not a party to the arbitration agreement is impleaded as a party to the petition under section 11 of the Act, the court should either delete such party from the array of parties, or when appointing an Arbitrator make it clear that the Arbitrator is appointed only to decide the disputes between the parties to the arbitration agreement.
14. The arbitration agreement relied upon by the first respondent to seek appointment of arbitrator, is clause (7) of the construction agreement dated 21.2.2008. The appellant was not a party to the said construction agreement dated 21.2.2008 containing the arbitration agreement. It is no doubt true that the loan agreement dated 21.12.2006 between the first respondent as borrower, and the appellant as the creditor, also contains an arbitration clause (vide Article 11) providing for resolution of disputes in regard to the said loan agreement by arbitration. But the developer was not a party to the loan agreement. There is no arbitration agreement between the developer and the appellant. The disputes between the first respondent and the developer cannot be arbitrated under Article 11 of the Loan Agreement. The first respondent invoked the arbitration agreement contained in clause 7 of the construction agreement (between first respondent and developer) and not the arbitration agreement contained in clause 11 of the loan agreement (between appellant and first respondent). The existence of an arbitration agreement in a contract between appellant and first respondent, will not enable the first respondent to implead the appellant as a party to an arbitration in regard to his disputes with the developer.
15. The first respondent obviously cannot involve the appellant as a party to an arbitration in regard to his disputes arising out of the claims made by him against the developer which are covered by clause (7) of the construction agreement. The disputes referred to in the petition under section 11 of the Act relate to the claims of the first respondent against the developer. It is however true that there is reference to the appellant in disputes (b), (e) and (f) and reference to collusion between the developer and the appellant in those disputes. The first respondent has also alleged that the appellant by releasing the payments to the developer without verifying the ground realities about the progress and construction and without intimation to him, had committed breach of trust and therefore liable to pay compensation for the financial and mental suffering of the first respondent as also the legal and other expenses. No such claim was ever been made against the appellant before filing the petition under section 11 of the Act, nor did the first respondent at any time seek arbitration in regard to such claims against the appellant. The said claims against the appellant cannot be arbitrated in an arbitration in pursuance of clause (7) of the construction agreement between the first respondent and the developer.
16. The first respondent did not issue any notice or demand making any claim against the appellant nor did he issue any notice claiming that the appellant is liable for the consequences of non-performance by the developer, of its obligations. Nor did the first respondent issue any notice to the appellant seeking reference of any disputes to arbitration. Therefore it could not be said that any dispute existed between the first respondent and appellant, when the petition under section 11 of the Act was filed. Even in the application under section 11 of the Act, there is no reference to clause No.(11) of the loan agreement which contains the arbitration agreement in regard to disputes that may arise between the appellant as lender and the first respondent as the borrower. There is no claim or dispute in regard to the loan agreement. The first respondent has not invoked clause (11) of the loan agreement for deciding any dispute with the appellant.
17. If there had been an arbitration clause in the tripartite agreement among the first respondent, developer and the appellant, and if the first respondent had made claims or raised disputes against both the developer and the appellant with reference to such tripartite agreement, the position would have been different. But that is not so. The petition under section 11 of the Act against the appellant was therefore misconceived as the appellant was not a party to the construction agreement dated 21.2.2008.
18. In view of the above, we allow this appeal and set aside the order dated 12.4.2010 of the designate of the Chief Justice, in part, in so far as the appellant is concerned. We make it clear that the appointment of arbitrator under the impugned order shall remain undisturbed in so far as the disputes between first respondent and the second respondent (developer) are concerned. We further make it clear that this order will not come in the way of first respondent making any claim or raising a dispute against the appellant or appellant making any claim or raising a dispute against the first respondent and either of them seeking recourse to arbitration in regard to such disputes.
**********', 0] , 
[ 'HEADNOTE
ARBITRATION
Arbitration & Conciliation Act, 1996
Section 11 - Appointment of Arbitrator - Facts and circumstances - A working in U.S.A. - Contacted N and represented about good prospects of business in water and amusement park in India - V alongwith another person remitted US $ 6,40,000 to A and his wife G - Separate MOU entered into between V and its partner and between A and G who formed a private company - Agreement to allot 1,67,000 Equity Shares of Rs.100/- each as fully paid up share to V and its partners whereas the remaining shares were to be held by partner of V and A representing 60% holding - Further agreement to transfer 10 acres of land out of 25 Acres owned by G in lieu of 40% contribution by V - Said agreement dated 29.01.2005 contained Arbitration Clause - Subsequently G undertook to transfer the entire piece of land of 25 Acres vide Supplementary Agreement dated 02.02.2005 - G later on refused to transfer - Thereafter A and G called a Board Meeting which V and its partners did not know - In the said meeting A and G resolved to wound up water park business of the company and transferred the same to some close relatives alongwith land - V sent legal notice and named an arbitrator asking A and G to appoint their arbitrator - No action taken by them - If disputes have arisen between the parties and the arbitrator is liable to be appointed. Held that disputes have arisen between the parties which need to be adjudicated and decided by an Arbitrator. Hence Arbitrator appointed. (Paras 8 to 15)


DALVEER BHANDARI, J.

1. This application has been filed by the applicant under section 11(5) read with section 11(9) and section 11(12) of the Arbitration and Conciliation Act, 1996 for appointment of an arbitrator for adjudicating and deciding the disputes which have arisen between the applicant and the respondents in respect of the implementation and working of agreements entered into between the applicant and the respondent no.3 on the one hand and respondent nos.1 and 2 on the other hand on 29.1.2005 and the supplementary agreement between the same parties on 2.2.2005.

2. The applicant is a citizen of the United States of America and is a person of Indian origin.

3. Respondent no.3, Dr. Vinod Kaura is the husband of the applicant, Vanna Claire Kaura.

4. Respondent no.2, Anil Indulkar was doing business in Pharmaceuticals in USA and respondent no.1, Gauri Anil Indulkar is his wife. Respondent no.2 came in contact with the applicant and he represented to the applicant and respondent no.3 that there was a good prospect of business for water and amusement park in India and that if the applicant and respondent no.3 invested in India, the applicant and respondent no.3 would get good returns on their investments. Consequently, the applicant and respondent no.3 remitted $6,40,000 (US Dollars) to respondent nos.1 and 2. A memorandum of understanding dated 7.6.2000 was entered into between the applicant and respondent no.3 on the one hand and respondent nos.1 and 2 on the other. On the basis of the capital so provided by the applicant and respondent no.3, respondent nos.1 and 2 formed a company called, M/s Splash Mountain Water Park Pvt. Ltd. with its registered office at Pune, Maharashtra. According to the applicant, it was agreed that 1,67,000 equity shares of Rs.100/- each in the said company shall be allotted as fully paid-up shares to the applicant and respondent no.3 by way of 40% equity shares to be allotted to the applicant as per the earlier understanding. It was also agreed that respondent nos.2 and 3 shall hold the remaining 2,50,400 equity shares of Rs.100/- each representing their 60% shares holdings in the company.

5. According to the applicant, it was agreed by an agreement dated 29.1.2005 that respondent no.1 who owned 25 acres of land in Pune should transfer 10 acres out of the said land along the eastern boarder thereof to the applicant in lieu of the 40% contribution made by the applicant towards the initial capital. There is a clause of arbitration in the said agreement. In the supplementary agreement entered on 2.2.2005 a small modification was made that inasmuch as respondent no.1 undertook to transfer and convey the entire 25 acres of land owned by her to the applicant instead of the earlier agreed extent of 10 acres of land. Accordingly, respondent no.1 did not transfer the land, as agreed. It is alleged that respondent nos.1 and 2 called a Board meeting of the company hurriedly to ensure that the applicant and respondent no.3 could not know about the meeting and there was no possibility of their participation in the said meeting. In the said meeting, respondent nos.1 and 2 maneuvered to get a resolution passed to wind up the Water Park business of the company and transferred the said business to another company owned by the close relatives of respondent nos.1 and 2. The land on which the business of the company was being run was also handed over to the said company owned by the close relatives of respondent nos.1 and 2.

6. In these circumstances, the applicant had sent a legal notice on 14.3.2006 to respondent nos.1 and 2 appointing one Vilol Khaladkar as an arbitrator and also called upon respondent nos.1 and 2 to appoint their arbitrator. Since respondent nos.1 and 2 did not take any steps to appoint their arbitrator, the applicant filed an arbitration petition in the High Court of Bombay under section 11 of the Act. The applicant submitted that the said arbitration petition filed by the applicant in the High Court of Bombay was not maintainable for the reason that the agreement dated 29.1.2005 and the supplementary agreement dated 2.2.2005 are in the nature of international commercial arbitration agreement as defined under the Act and, therefore, an application for appointment of an arbitrator under section 11(5) read with section 11(9) and section 11(12) of the Act would only lie before the Chief Justice of India.

7. Accordingly, the applicant withdrew the application filed at the Bombay High Court. The applicant submits that the following disputes have arisen between applicant and respondent nos.1 and 2 and the same are required to be referred to an Arbitrator and the Arbitrator is to be appointed for the purpose of adjudicating and deciding the following disputes:

a) Transfer & conveyance of 25 acres of land, as mentioned in agreement dated 29.1.2005 and dated 2.2.2005, standing in the name of Guari Indulkar to the claimant Ms. Vanna Claire Kaura and her husband Dr. Vinod Kaura.

b) Being shareholders of 1,67,000 number of equity shares of Rs.100/- each of Splash Water Mountain Park Pvt. Ltd. in the name of Vanna Clair Kaura and same number of equity shares of Rs.100/- each in the name of Dr. Vinod Kaura in terms of agreement dated 29.1.2005, action of Gauri Indulkar and Anil Indulkar to hand over the leased land to Lessor was illegal and consequently due to illegal closure of business of Splash Water Park Mountain Pvt. Ltd. they are liable to compensate Vanna Clair Kaura for loss of business and loss of profits approximately to the tune of Rs.20,00,000/- (Rupees twenty lacs) per month from September 2005, the date of Resolution passed in the absence of Vanna Clair Kaura and Dr. Vinod Kaura and without giving them sufficient time to respond and thereby illegally closing the business of Splash Water Park Mountain Pvt. Ltd.

c) A sum of Rs.7,00,000/- per month to be paid to Vanna Clair Kaura by Gauri Indulkar and Anil Indulkar in terms of compensation as stipulated in clause 5 of supplementary agreement dated 2.2.2005 from the date of repayment of loans and payment of lease rent;

d) A sum of Rs.10,00,000/- towards reimbursement of expenditure incurred on travel and board, lodging etc., by the Vanna Clair Kaura;

e) Vanna Clair Kaura to be compensated by way of payment of damages by Gauri Indulkar and Anil Indulkar due to non-performance of their respective parts as stipulated in the agreements dated 29.1.2005 and 2.2.2005;

f) Present, pendent lite and future interest @ 24% on the amounts found due and payable to Vanna Clair Kaura.

8. The applicant prays that an independent arbitrator be appointed for adjudicating and deciding the disputes having arisen between the parties out of the agreement dated 29.1.2005 and the supplementary agreement dated 2.2.2005 entered into for and between the parties.

9. In pursuance to the notice issued by this court, reply on affidavit has been filed on behalf of respondent nos.1 and 2. In the reply affidavit, a number of preliminary objections have been taken. Respondent no.1 submitted that the application filed by the applicant is not maintainable and is liable to be dismissed because there is no live dispute pending between the parties. It is also submitted by respondent no.1 that the applicant has suppressed facts from this court and has been indulging in forum shopping and the present application is liable to be dismissed on this ground alone.

10. It is further mentioned in the reply that the applicant has abandoned the arbitration clause. It is further mentioned that the MOU dated 7.6.2000 and subsequent agreement dated 29.1.2005 and the supplementary agreement dated 2.2.2005 were entered into by respondent nos.1 and 2 due to coercion, threat and harassment on the part of the applicant and respondent no.3.

11. The company by the name, Splash Mountain Water Park Pvt. Ltd. came into existence on or about 3.7.1997. By Board Resolution dated 24.6.2005, wherein the applicant herself was present, the applicant proposed the closure of the Water Park business of the company since the same was suffering losses. She further stated that she and respondent no.3 would not invest any further funds to keep the business going. As such, by way of board resolution dated 24.6.2005, the proposal of the applicant was discussed and thereafter it was unanimously resolved that the activity of the Water Park should be closed as of 30th June, 2005.

12. In the reply, respondent no.1 has mentioned that the applicant is indulging in forum shopping and has filed multi- pronged litigation before various forums including the Bombay High Court, Civil Judge, Pune, Principal Bench of Company Law Board and this court as well as the criminal proceedings before the Judicial Magistrate, First Class.

13. It is also mentioned that the applicant has invoked arbitration by notice dated 14.3.2006 and the present application is not based on the said invocation and the applicant subsequently entered into arbitration on second time on the same cause of action and as such the present application is barred. It is also submitted that the applicant having invoked arbitration by notice dated 14.3.2006 and thereafter abandoning the same cannot seek arbitration for the second time for the same cause of action. Respondent no.1 also submitted that the present application is a clear abuse of the process of law and is liable to be dismissed.

14. I have heard the learned counsel for the parties and carefully perused the MOU dated 7.6.2000 and agreement dated 29.1.2005 and the supplementary agreement dated 2.2.2005.

15. In my considered view, the dispute has arisen between the parties and it needs to be adjudicated and decided by an Arbitrator. Consequently, I request Honble Mr. Justice S.N. Variava, a former Judge of this court to accept this Arbitration and adjudicate and decide the dispute which has arisen between the parties. The learned Arbitrator would be free to decide about his fee.

16. This arbitration petition is accordingly disposed of with the direction to the parties to appear before Honble Mr. Justice S.N. Variava, a former Judge of this court at 11 a.m. on 27th July, 2009 at Mumbai.

17. The Registry is directed to immediately communicate this order to the learned arbitrator to enable him to decide the arbitration matter as expeditiously as practicable.

18. Consequently, this arbitration petition is allowed and disposed of. In the peculiar facts and circumstances of this case, I direct the parties to bear their own costs.

**********', 0] , 
[ 'HEADNOTE

CONTRACTS / CONSTITUTION
Contractual disputes - Settlement of - Writ -If maintainable - Disputes between Central Government entity and State entity - How to be resolved - Appellant, a Central Government entity, obtaining from the respondent, a State entity, certain land on lease - Upon the failure of the latter to execute the agreement, appellant filing a writ - High Court holding that since the disputes related to contractual matters, writ was not maintainable - Validity. Held all such disputes should be resolved by Committees to be constituted by the Central Government. Directions given for constituting a committee comprising of Union Cabinet Secretary, Chief Secretary of the State, Secretaries of the Concerned Departments of the Union and the State and CEOs of the concerned undertakings, forthwith and resolve the disputes between the appellant and respondent within four months.
HELD
In the instant case, CIDCO is a State entity and the appellant is a central entity. The desirability of having a committee to sort out differences between pubic sector undertakings, State Governments, different Govt. departments have been highlighted by this Court in several cases. (Para 7)

The matter is pending since 1990. Considering the nature of the controversy which is a recurring feature we direct that a committee be formed to sort out the differences between the Central Government and the State Government entities. The composition of such committee shall be as follows:

(1)The Cabinet Secretary of the Union;

(2)Chief Secretary of the State;

(3)Secretaries of the concerned departments of Union and the State; and

(4)Chief Executive Officers of the concerned undertakings. (Para 10)

As the matter is pending since long, we direct that the Committee shall be constituted forthwith to take a decision within 4 months from the date of receipt of copy of this judgment. (Para 11)

CASES REFERRED
1.M/s Popcorn Entertainment & Anr. v. City Industrial Development Corpn. & Anr. JT 2007 (4) SC 70 (Para 5)

2.Punjab and Sind Bank v. Allahabad Bank and Ors. 2006 (4) SCC 780 (Para 8)

3.U.P. SEB and Anr. v. Sant Kabir Sahakari Katai Mills Ltd. JT 2005 (8) SC 399 (Para 9)

4.Rajureshwar Associates v. State of Maharashtra JT 2004 (5) SC 249 (Para 5)

5.Chief Conservator of Forests, Govt. of A.P. v. Collector and Ors. JT 2003 (5) SC 210 (Para 7)

6.National Highways Authority of India v. Ganga Enterprises and Anr. JT 2003 (Supp-1) SC 300 (Para 5)

7.Whirlpool Corporation v. Registrar of Trade Marks, Mumbai and Ors. JT 1998 (7) SC 243 (Para 5)

8.Oil and Natural Gas Commission and Anr. v. Collector of Central Excise JT 1992 (4) SC 158 (Para 6)

Dr. ARIJIT PASAYAT, J.

1. Leave granted.

2. Challenge in this appeal is to the order passed by a Division Bench of the Bombay High Court dismissing the Civil Writ Petition No.4036 of 2001 with Civil Application No.1583 of 2004. It was held that with reference to several judgments of this Court the writ jurisdiction should not be exercised in contractual matters. It was also held that there was no reason whatsoever for which a Government of India undertaking shall bypass the alternative remedy of a civil suit.

3. Background facts in a nutshell are as follows:

3.1 A writ petition was filed by the appellant alleging inaction on the part of the City & Industrial Development Corporation of Maharashtra Limited (hereinafter referred to as CIDCO) in not executing the agreement of lease with the appellant- company. Prayer in the writ petition was for a direction by issuance of an appropriate writ requiring the CIDCO to execute the agreement in respect of the possession of plots covered by the agreements. Prayer essentially was (i) to hand over the possession of plot of land admeasuring 24 hectares demarcated in favour of the appellant situated at Bhandkhal (Navghar), Taluka Uran alongwith approach road and water supply till the boundary of the said plot of land; (ii) execute a lease agreement for the period set out more particularly in the letter of allotment dated 5th March, 1984 in respect of the said plot of land; (iii) issue appropriate writ in respect of demand for service charge contained in the letter dated 24th July, 1990 and (iv) other reliefs.

4. The High Court referred to several correspondence exchanged between the parties but ultimately held that the issues related to contractual matters and the writ petition was not the appropriate remedy. Findings were also recorded regarding maintainability of the writ petition.

5. In support of the appeal, learned counsel for the appellant submitted that the High Court has lost sight of the fact that the dispute involved two public bodies. It was highlighted by learned counsel for the appellant that this Court in M/s Popcorn Entertainment & Anr. v. City Industrial Development Corpn. & Anr.1 held in para 15 about the maintainability of the writ petition. In paragraph 42 of the judgment it was noted that there was no dispute and in fact there was concession regarding maintainability of the writ petition. Reference has also been made to National Highways Authority of India v. Ganga Enterprises and Anr.2 and Rajureshwar Associates v. State of Maharashtra3 to contend that in all contractual matters a writ application can be entertained. The three circumstances wherein relating to contractual matters writ applications can be entertained were set out in Whirlpool Corporation v. Registrar of Trade Marks, Mumbai and Ors.4 .

6. Mr. Altaf Ahmad, learned senior counsel on the other hand submitted that in a dispute of this nature, the course indicated by this Court in Oil and Natural Gas Commission and Anr. v. Collector of Central Excise5 can be applied.

7. In the instant case, CIDCO is a State entity and the appellant is a central entity. The desirability of having a committee to sort out differences between pubic sector undertakings, State Governments, different Govt. departments have been highlighted by this Court in several cases. In Chief Conservator of Forests, Govt. of A.P. v. Collector and Ors.6 it was inter alia as follows :

14. Under the scheme of the Constitution, Article 131 confers original jurisdiction on the Supreme Court in regard to a dispute between two States of the Union of India or between one or more States and the Union of India. It was not contemplated by the framers of the Constitution or CPC that two departments of a State or the Union of India will fight a litigation in a court of law. It is neither appropriate nor permissible for two departments of a State or the Union of India to fight litigation in a court of law. Indeed, such a course cannot but be detrimental to the public interest as it also entails avoidable wastage of public money and time. Various departments of the Government are its limbs and, therefore, they must act in coordination and not in confrontation. Filing of a writ petition by one department against the other by invoking the extraordinary jurisdiction of the High Court is not only against the propriety and polity as it smacks of indiscipline but is also contrary to the basic concept of law which requires that for suing or being sued, there must be either a natural or a juristic person. The States/Union of India must evolve a mechanism to set at rest all interdepartmental controversies at the level of the Government and such matters should not be carried to a court of law for resolution of the controversy. In the case of disputes between public sector undertakings and the Union of India, this Court in Oil and Natural Gas Commission v. CCE, 1992 Supp (2) SCC 432 called upon the Cabinet Secretary to handle such matters. In Oil and Natural Gas Commission v. CCE (JT 1995 Supp (4) SCC 541) this Court directed the Central Government to set up a committee consisting of representatives from the Ministry of Industry, the Bureau of Public Enterprises and the Ministry of Law, to monitor disputes between Ministry and Ministry of the Government of India, Ministry and public sector undertakings of the Government of India and public sector undertakings in between themselves, to ensure that no litigation comes to court or to a tribunal without the matter having been first examined by the Committee and its clearance for litigation. The Government may include a representative of the Ministry concerned in a specific case and one from the Ministry of Finance in the Committee. Senior officers only should be nominated so that the Committee would function with status, control and discipline.

15. The facts of this appeal, noticed above, make out a strong case that there is a felt need of setting up of similar committees by the State Government also to resolve the controversy arising between various departments of the State or the State and any of its undertakings. It would be appropriate for the State Governments to set up a committee consisting of the Chief Secretary of the State, the Secretaries of the departments concerned, the Secretary of Law and where financial commitments are involved, the Secretary of Finance. The decision taken by such a committee shall be binding on all the departments concerned and shall be the stand of the Government.

8. In Punjab and Sind Bank v. Allahabad Bank and Ors.1 it was observed as follows:

6. The matter was again examined in the case of Chief Conservator of Forest v. Collector JT 2003 (5) SC 210). In Para 14 and 15 it was noted as follows:

Under the scheme of the Constitution, Article 131 confers original jurisdiction on the Supreme Court in regard to a dispute between two States of the Union of India or between one or more States and the Union of India. It was not contemplated by the framers of the Constitution or the C.P.C. that two departments of a State or the Union of India will fight a litigation in a court of law. It is neither appropriate nor permissible for two departments of a State or the Union of India to fight litigation in a court of law. Indeed, such a course cannot but be detrimental to the public interest as it also entails avoidable wastage of public money and time. Various departments of the Government are its limbs and, therefore, they must act in co- ordination and not in confrontation. Filing of a writ petition by one department against the other by invoking the extraordinary jurisdiction of the High Court is not only against the propriety and polity as it smacks of indiscipline but is also contrary to the basic concept of law which requires that for suing or being sued, there must be either a natural or a juristic person. The States/Union of India must evolve a mechanism to set at rest all inter- departmental controversies at the level of the Government and such matters should not be carried to a court of law for resolution of the controversy. In the case of disputes between public sector undertakings and Union of India, this Court in Oil and Natural Gas Commission v. Collector of Central Excise (supra) called upon the Cabinet Secretary to handle such matters. In Oil and Natural Gas Commission & Anr. v. Collector of Central Excise (1995 Suppl. (4) SCC 541), this Court directed the Central Government to set up a Committee consisting of representatives from the Ministry of Industry, the Bureau of Public Enterprises and the Ministry of Law, to monitor dispute between Ministry and Ministry of the Government of India, Ministry and public sector undertakings of the Government of India and public sector undertakings in between themselves, to ensure that no litigation comes to court or to a Tribunal without the matter having been first examined by the Committee and its clearance for litigation. The Government may include a representative of the Ministry concerned in a specific case and one from the Ministry of Finance in the Committee. Senior officers only should be nominated so that the Committee would function with status, control and discipline.

The facts of this appeal, noticed above, make out a strong case that there is felt need of setting up of similar committees by the State Government also to resolve the controversy arising between various departments of the State or the State and any of its undertakings. It would be appropriate for the State Governments to set up a Committee consisting of the Chief Secretary of the State, the Secretaries of the concerned departments, the Secretary of Law and where financial commitments are involved, the Secretary of Finance. The decision taken by such a committee shall be binding on all the departments concerned and shall be the stand of the Government. 

7. The directions as noted above were quoted in Mahanagar Telephone Nigam Ltd. v. Chairman, Central Board, Direct Taxes and another1 and were adopted in paragraph 8. It was noted as follows:

Undoubtedly, the right to enforce a right in a court of law cannot be effaced. However, it must be remembered that courts are overburdened with a large number of cases. The majority of such cases pertain to Government Departments and/or public sector undertakings. As is stated in Chief Conservator of Forests case (supra) it was not contemplated by the framers of the Constitution or the Civil Procedure Code that two departments of a State or Union of India and/or a department of the Government and a public sector undertaking fight a litigation in a court of law. Such a course is detrimental to public interest as it entails avoidable wastage of public money and time. These are all limbs of the Government and must act in co-ordination and not confrontation. The mechanism set up by this court is not, as suggested by Mr. Andhyarujina, only to conciliate between Government Departments. It is also set up for purposes of ensuring that frivolous disputes do not come before courts without clearance from the High Powered Committee. If it can, the High Powered Committee will resolve the dispute. If the dispute is not resolved the Committee would undoubtedly give clearance. However, there could also be frivolous litigation proposed by a department of the Government or a public sector undertaking. This could be prevented by the High Powered Committee. In such cases there is no question of resolving the dispute. The Committee only has to refuse permission to litigate. No right of the Department/public sector undertaking is affected in such a case. The litigation being of a frivolous nature must not be brought to court. To be remembered that in almost all cases one or the other party will not be happy with the decision of the High Powered Committee. The dissatisfied party will always claim that its rights are affected, when in fact, no right is affected. The Committee is constituted of highly placed officers of the Government, who do not have an interest in the dispute, it is thus expected that their decision will be fair and honest. Even if the Department/public sector undertaking finds the decision unpalatable, discipline requires that they abide by it. Otherwise the whole purpose of this exercise will be lost and every party against whom the decision is given will claim that they have been wronged and that their rights are affected. This should not be allowed to be done.

8. The ONGC I to III cases (supra), Chief Conservators case (supra) and Mahanagar Telephones case (supra) deal with disputes relating to Central Government, State Government and Public Sector Undertakings. They have no application to the facts of these cases as the High Court has not indicated any reason for its abrupt conclusion that the writ petitioners are Public Sector Undertakings. In the absence of a factual determination in that regard, the decisions can have no application.

9. The position has also been examined in U.P. SEB and Anr. v. Sant Kabir Sahakari Katai Mills Ltd.1 and Mahanagar Telephone Nigams case (supra).

10. The matter is pending since 1990. Considering the nature of the controversy which is a recurring feature we direct that a committee be formed to sort out the differences between the Central Government and the State Government entities. The composition of such committee shall be as follows:

(1)The Cabinet Secretary of the Union;

(2)Chief Secretary of the State;

(3)Secretaries of the concerned departments of Union and the State; and

(4)Chief Executive Officers of the concerned undertakings.

11. As the matter is pending since long, we direct that the Committee shall be constituted forthwith to take a decision within 4 months from the date of receipt of copy of this judgment.

12. The appeal is disposed of with no order as to costs.

**********', 0] , 
[ 'HEADNOTE
ARBITRATION
Arbitration and Conciliation Act, 1996
Section 34(2)(iv) , 31(7)(a) and 16. Award - Reference during pendency of SLP - Relief sought relating to compensation for destruction of houses , crops , garden , and to reclamation of lands etc. - Reference mentioning ,  The disputes and differences arising between parties in SLP  - Arbitrators , however , awarding compensation for loss of potential of lands . Held that the same fell out side the scope of reference . Award set-aside and matter directed to be decided in SLP
HELD
The first question , therefore , is : What were the terms of the submission to arbitration . The order of reference to arbitration is material in the context ; it refers to the arbitration agreement that the parties had filed . Clause 1 thereof refers to arbitration  the disputes and differences arising between the parties hereto in S.L.P. ( Civil ) No. 17106 of 1996 . The S.L.P. arose out of the writ petition filed by the appellants ( and others ) in the High Court . It is , therefore , reasonable to conclude that what was referred to arbitration was the dispute in the writ petition . This is , in fact , not contested .  Para 12 

The reliefs the writ petition sought , were :a) a direction to the second respondent to close its plant ; b) damages from the second respondent in the sum of Rupees 1 crore for the destruction of (i) residential houses , (ii) crops and (iii) mango garden ; c) a direction to the second respondent to reclaim the writ petitioners  agricultural lands that had been rendered unfit for cultivation ; and d)a direction to the first and third respondent to take civil and criminal action against the second respondent . This , then , was what was referred to arbitration . There was no claim for damages for the alleged loss of the potential of the lands and no averments or particulars in that behalf .  Para 13 

The second respondent had contended in its reply to the appellants  statement of claim that the claim therein fell outside the scope of the reference . It is difficult to see how , in the circumstances , the second respondent can be said to have acquiesced in the determination of damages for the alleged loss of potential of the appellants  land . The point must be read in the light of restricted claim and not as encompassing the claim for compensation for the alleged lost potential of the land .  Para 14 

It was not the case of the appellants in the writ petition , even in the alternative , that the land could not be reclaimed and there was no claim for compensation for the alleged lost potential of the land or averments or particulars in support thereof . The relief that was sought was a direction to the second respondent to reclaim the appellants  land ; awarding compensation for the alleged lost potential of the land was not moulding the relief that was sought .  Para 16 

We hold that the award of Rs. 77,19,800 /- for  loss of potential of land  and interest thereon falls outside the scope of the reference to arbitration and is not in relation to a dispute contemplated thereby .  Para 17 

CASES REFERRED
1. State of Orissa v. B.N. Agarwalla JT 1997 (2) SC 51 Referred in JT 1998 (7) SC 128 (Para 9) 

ORDER


1. The appellants and others filed a writ petition in the High Court of Punjab and Haryana against the respondents . The case in the writ petition , briefly stated , was that the writ petitioners were owners of agricultural lands , residential buildings , tubewells etc. at Gaddiwara within the municipal limits of Panipat . The second respondent , the National Fertilizers Limited , had installed a plant for the manufacture of fertilisers in the vicinity . The second respondent had constructed a  kucha  bund around the original pond and was using it for depositing effluents . The bund was made of earth which breached due to the excessive pressure of the effluents and the accumulation of burnt ash . The result was that water and ash had escaped from the pond and had damaged the writ petitioners  standing crops , mango gardens and residential properties . There had been a loss of soil , from 6 inches to 2 feet , on their lands which had made them unfit for cultivation until such time as they were reclaimed . The second respondent had not done anything to redress the grievances of the writ petitioners . The writ petition , therefore , prayed for a direction to the second respondents to close its plant until effluent disposal arrangements were made and  to pay the damages of Rs. one crore for the destruction of residential houses , crops and Mango Garden . The respondent No. 2 may also be directed to reclaim the agricultural land of the petitioners which has been rendered unfit for cultivation . The respondents No. 1 and 3 may be directed to take steps for civil and criminal ( action ) against the respondent No. 2 

2. The writ petition was dismissed by a learned single Judge because it raised disputed questions of fact which could not be resolved in proceedings under Article 226. The order of the learned single Judge was upheld by a Division Bench , the appeal being summarily dismissed .

3. The appellants ( being five of the writ petitioners ) filed a petition for special leave to appeal against the order of the Division Bench . Notice thereon was issued to the respondents .

4. Learned counsel appearing for the parties informed this Court on 15th July , 1997 that they had agreed to go to arbitration to settle their disputes and an adjournment was granted for one week to file the arbitration agreement . On 21st July , 1997 the following order was passed :

 Pursuant to our order dated 15.7.1997 , the contestants have filed an Arbitration Agreement whereby they have referred their disputes to the two named Arbitrators therein . Therefore , we grant leave and keep the matter pending till the arrival of the arbitration award . Let the Arbitrators be informed so that they enter upon the reference. 

The arbitration agreement stated , in clause 1 , thus :

 That the disputes and differences arising between the parties hereto in S.L.P ( Civil ) No. 17106 of 1996 shall stand referred to the arbitration of Mr. Justice K.S. Tiwana and Mr. Justice G.R. Majithia , the retired Judges of the Hon ble Punjab & Haryana High Court at Chandigarh , who shall resolve and decide the aforesaid disputes between the parties . 

The agreement required the two learned arbitrators to appoint an umpire before entering upon the reference and provided for the modalities thereof . Pursuant thereto , Mr. S.S. Dewan , a retired Chief Justice , was appointed the umpire . On 20th September , 1997 the learned arbitrators , sitting with the learned umpire , entered upon the reference .

5. The appellants filed a statement of claim dated 27th September , 1997 before the learned arbitrators . They contended that effluents such as fly ash emitted by the second respondent s plant and slurry converged to the appellants  land because of successive breaches of the bund and pond had caused havoc to the agricultural land , agricultural crops , mango orchards and fishery ponds and had destroyed the appellant s land . Details were stated . The estimated value of profits lost by the appellants were set out , aggregating to Rs. 4.2 lakhs for the years 1984 , 1986 , 1987 , 1988 , 1990 and 1991 . The appellants submitted that by August , 1991 their land had become completely unfit for cultivation because of chemical pollutants which had seeped therein and fly ash had been deposited over the trees , etc .

 The value of the land thus totally diminished in so far as the land was completely destroyed . . . . . . The land being completely destroyed and having become worthless both for commercial and non-commercial use , the party no. 1 is claiming the entire value of the land estimated at (Rs.) 2 crores and 40 lakhs as damage of property being total loss in the year 1991 .  The appellants claimed interest  on the sum of entire loss or damages incurred ever since 1984 at the rate of 18% upto August 1991  and  interest at the rate of 18% per annum till the date of re-payment of the entire amount  . The appellants quantified their claim at Rs. 5 crores 28 lakhs , including Rs. 2 crores 40 lakhs for  total loss suffered on account of the destruction of land making it worthless both for agricultural use ever since the year 1991  .

6. The respondents filed a written statement in which they drew attention to the order of reference passed by this court on 21st July , 1997 and the arbitration agreement and submitted that the claim made in the statement of claim went beyond the scope of the writ petition and , therefore , beyond the scope of the arbitration .

7. On 2nd January , 1998 the learned umpire and arbitrators made an award . The relief given to the appellants read thus :

 In the result , we determine the compensation as under :-

(i)For loss of potential of land                          Rs. 77,19,800.00

(ii)For damage to the crops other                     Rs. 5,14,347.50
than orchard for the years , 1984 ,
1986 , 1987 , 1988 , 1990 and 1991 .
---------
Total :                                                            Rs. 82,34,147.00
--------

The demised land lost all productivity and fertility from the year 1991 . Accordingly , we allow interest on the principal amount @ 12% per annum from January I , 1991 till the date of award and interest @ 18% per annum from the date of award till realisation . Party No . 1 will be entitled to the costs of the arbitration proceedings . 

8. On 31st January, 1998 the appellants made an application to this court to take the award on record and dispose of the appeal in terms thereof. The second respondent, on 30th March, 1998, filed objections to making the award a rule of the court. This is the scope of the controversy before us.

9. The learned Attorney General , appearing for the second respondent , submitted that the award fell outside the ambit of the reference to arbitration made by this Court . It also went far beyond the terms of the arbitration agreement . This was because it awarded to the appellants compensation for loss of potential of the land , in the sum of Rs. 77,19,800/-. The learned Attorney General submitted that the case was covered by the terms of Section 34(2)(iv) of the Arbitration and Conciliation Act , 1996 (  the Act  ) . Next , the learned Attorney General pointed out that the award made copious references to an inspection report made by the learned arbitrators consequent upon a site visit . He submitted that in as much as a copy of the inspection report had not been made available by the learned arbitrators to the second respondent , the second respondent had been unable to present its case thereon and the principles of natural justice had been violated . In this behalf the learned Attorney General drew our attention to Section34(2)(iii) of the Act . The learned Attorney General submitted , lastly , that the award of interest was without jurisdiction because there was no claim for interest . In any event , he submitted , the grant of pre-reference interest at the rate of 12% per annum was without jurisdiction , and the amount of such interest aggregated to Rs. 66,45,557.96 . In support of his contention on the aspect of interest , the learned Attorney General relied upon the judgment of this Court in State of Orissa v. B.N. Agarwalla , JT 1997 (2) SC 51 , and the provisions of Section 3(1)(b) of the Interest Act , 1978.

10. Mr. D.D. Thakur , learned counsel for the appellants , drew our attention to the prayers in the writ petition and to an application made before the High Court pending the writ petition . It alleged that the writ petitioners had been deprived of their livelihood , which was dependent on the soil ; the writ petitioners  lands had been rendered unfit for cultivation and their houses had suffered great loss on account of floods ; the environment of the area had been rendered unfit due to pollution and the residents were living in great stress and strain , which had caused depression , on account of the constant fear of leakage of gas . Learned counsel drew attention to the arbitration agreement . He submitted that the learned arbitrators and umpire found that the appellants  land could not be reclaimed ; they , therefore ,gave the alternate relief of compensation for the land . He submitted that arbitrators had in this behalf the same powers as a court of law to mould the relief having regard to the circumstances . It was , learned counsel submitted , a reasonable conclusion from what was stated in paragraph 10 of the award that the learned arbitrators had found that the appellants  land could not be reclaimed . Paragraph 10 of the award reads thus :

 10 . Party No.2 contended that if the Party No.1 had drained out the water , the land could be reclaimed and made fit for cultivation . This assertion fails to absolve Party No. 2 of its responsibility to maintain its ash pond and the dykes in a proper manner to avoid the breach or leakage therein . The negligence of party No.2 is apparent . Their failure to keep the ash ponds and the dykes in a standardised form and to prevent any leakage or breach is blame-worthy of negligence . Their negligence has resulted in rendering the land of Party No . I beyond cultivation and the garden developed thereof deprecated in result . During our inspection , we noted that on a part of the disputed land residential houses belonging to people belonging to lower strata of society , seemingly below poverty line , have been constructed recently and that locality is quite filthy . Foul smell unabatedly emanated from the land , although the ash ponds were abandoned and as alleged by party No. 2 were to be used in the event of emergency only . 

Reference was also made by learned counsel to the findings in paragraph 13 of the award that the appellants  land had  had the potentiality for developing a housing colony thereon . In fact , a licence was granted by the Haryana Town and Country Planning Department . The second party No.2 contended that the land for which the licence was granted was not owned by Party No.1 Nevertheless it could not be disputed that the land for which permission was granted was part and parcel of the disputed land and similarly situated in all respects . The irresistible inference is that the demised land could be developed into a housing colony . During our inspection we noticed that the land is hardly 3 Kms. away from the G.T.Road passing through Panipat . G.T. Road is also called Sher Shah Suri Marg and it is agreed over from Calcutta to Rawalpindi ( now forming part of Pakistan ) . C.W.I Shri Vineet Khanna says that the Housing Colony could not be developed because of the fear of the deluge with ash slurry water on the demised land . Thus , the land other than the land under orchard was at one time the most fertile land yielding considerable annual income as depicted in the average produce statement , Exhibit TW1/1. The land under the orchard measuring 17 acres similarly fetched considerable income to Party No. 1 , as stated by Shri Vineet Khanna . Now this land is unfit for cultivation . However , as was noticed and observed by us in our inspection note , many residential houses belonging to people of lower strata of society . seemingly blow poverty line , have been constructed on a part of the disputed land in the recent years . After the agriculture and horticulture activity stopped , part of the land other than the land under the orchard before 1991 was sold at the rate of Rs. 200/- per sq. yard . . . . . . . .  . In paragraph 15 of the award , to which reference was made , the learned arbitrators were unable to agree with  the amount of compensation claimed by the claimants , as admittedly the market value of their land in recent years was not higher than Rs.200/- per square yard as the use of the land , for the reasons aforesaid , is confined to job of trivial nature or at best its use is limited for residential purpose of the lower strata of the society . The potential of the land considerably diminished . In the circumstances , the claimants would be entitled only to the quantum of compensation for loss of average potential of the land . Keeping in view the totality of circumstances and the material brought on record , we hold that the ends of justice entail fixation of the quantum of compensation for loss of potential of land at Rs. 55/- per square yard . In summation , as the average potential value of the land is taken out at Rs. 55/- per sq. yard and the total area of the damaged land being 140360 per sq. yards , therefore , total loss under this head comes to Rs. 77,19,800/-  . In learned counsel s submission , this , in the circumstances , was a reasonable conclusion for the learned arbitrators to come to . Learned counsel also submitted that the second respondent had acquiesced in the course that the arbitration proceedings had taken and he referred in this behalf to the points for decision which the learned arbitrators had framed , namely ,  (1) Whether Party No . 1 has suffered any damages , if so , is entitled to any compensation ? (2) Whether the claim is barred by acquiescence , laches , estoppel , limitation and res judicata ?  In this context , Mr. Thakur referred to Section 16 of the Act which empowers the arbitral tribunal to rule on its own jurisdiction . In regard to the inspection reports , learned counsel submitted that the learned arbitrators were under no obligation to furnish the same to the parties to the arbitration and , in fact , the appellants had also not received a copy there of . He submitted that the second respondent had not stated that any part of the inspection report was incorrect . In the matter of interest , learned counsel referred to the provisions of Section 31 (7)(a) of the Act. Section 31 deals with the form and contents of an arbitral award and sub-section 7 , (a) states :

 Unless otherwise agreed by the parties , where and in so far as an arbitral award is for the payment of money , the arbitral tribunal may include in the sum for which the award is made interest , at such rate as it deems reasonable , on the whole or any part of the money , for the whole or any part of the period between the date on which the cause of action arose and the date on which the award is made . 

11. Section 34(1) of the Act states that recourse to a court against an arbitral award may be made only by an application for setting aside such award in accordance with sub-sections (2) and (3) . Under sub-section (2) , Clause (iv) an award may be set aside if it  deals with a dispute not contemplated by or not falling within the terms of the submission to arbitration , or it contains decisions on matters beyond the scope of the submission to arbitration  . The proviso the clause (iv) says that if the decision on matters submitted to arbitration can be separated from those not so submitted , only that part of the award which contains decisions on matters not submitted to arbitration may be set aside .

12. The first question , therefore , is : What were the terms of the submission to arbitration . The order of reference to arbitration is material in the context ; it refers to the arbitration agreement that the parties had filed . Clause 1 thereof refers to arbitration  the disputes and differences arising between the parties hereto in S.L.P. ( Civil ) No. 17106 of 1996. The S.L.P. arose out of the writ petition filed by the appellants ( and others ) in the High Court . It is , therefore , reasonable to conclude that what was referred to arbitration was the dispute in the writ petition . This is , in fact , not contested .

13. The grievance in the writ petition was that the overflow of effluents and slurry from a pond in the second respondent s premises due to breaches of the earthen bund thereof had damaged the writ petitioners  lands , crops , mango crops , houses , etc. The reliefs the writ petition sought , and this is most important were :a) a direction to the second respondent to close its plant ; b) damages from the second respondent in the sum of Rupees 1 crore for the destruction of (i) residential houses , (ii) crops and (iii) mango garden ; c) a direction to the second respondent to reclaim the writ petitioners  agricultural lands that had been rendered unfit for cultivation ; and d)a direction to the first and third respondent to take civil and criminal action against the second respondent . This , then , was what was referred to arbitration . There was no claim for damages for the alleged loss of the potential of the lands and no averments or particulars in that behalf .

14. There is no discussion or ruling in the award relating to the scope of the reference ; this despite the fact that the second respondent had contended in its reply to the appellants  statement of claim that the claim therein fell outside the scope of the reference . It is difficult to see how , in the circumstances , the second respondent can be said to have acquiesced in the determination of damages for the alleged loss of potential of the appellants  land . All that was referred to by learned counsel for the appellants in this behalf was the statement in the award of the points for determination . That the first of the points relates to compensation for damage suffered by the appellants does not by itself support learned counsel s submission for compensation for damage to the appellants  residential houses , crops and mango garden was within the scope of the reference . The first point must be read in the light of this restricted claim and not as encompassing the claim for compensation for the alleged lost potential of the land .

15. The argument of learned counsel for the appellants was that the learned arbitrators had found that the appellants  land was beyond reclamation and , therefore , the learned arbitrators had moulded the relief and awarded compensation for the land s lost potential . We do not find in the paragraphs of the award quoted by learned counsel , or , for that matter , anywhere else in the award , a discussion or conclusion by the learned arbitrators that the appellants  land could not be reclaimed . in fact , the award quotes a witness as explaining  reclamation  thus :  By this I mean bringing the soil to its natural position . The natural position of the soil can be had after the total removal of the coal ash  . A perusal of the award suggests that the learned arbitrators did not think that they could award compensation for the alleged lost potential of the land only if they found that the land could not be reclaimed ; there is , therefore , no such evidence or discussion or finding in the award .

16. In any event , we do not find it possible to accept learned counsel s submission that granting compensation for the alleged lost potential of the land was permissible moulding of the relief . It was not the case of the appellants in the writ petition , even in the alternative , that the land could not be reclaimed and there was no claim for compensation for the alleged lost potential of the land or averments or particulars in support thereof . The relief that was sought was a direction to the second respondent to reclaim the appellants  land ; awarding compensation for the alleged lost potential of the land was not moulding the relief that was sought .

17. We hold that the award of Rs. 77,19,800 /- for  loss of potential of land  and interest thereon falls outside the scope of the reference to arbitration and is not in relation to a dispute contemplated thereby .

18. The learned Attorney General did not advance an argument specific to the award of Rs. 5,14,347.5 for  damage to crops other than orchard for the years 1984 , 1986 , 1987 , 1988 , 1990 and 1991  . Even his general argument related to the learned arbitrators  inspection report would not really apply to this item of the award . At the same time , learned counsel for the appellants did not urge that the award should not be set aside qua this item which is easily separable and the appeal should be allowed in terms thereof . We can understand why . The larger claim of the appellants is in relation to the reclamation of the land ; the appellants would want to agitate that claim in the appeal and we think that to do complete justice in the circumstances we should permit them to do so .

19. In the view that we take , it is not necessary to deal with the arguments on the aspects of the inspection report and interest .

20. The award dated 2nd January , 1998 is set aside . The appellants  application ( I.A.No.2 of 1998 ) to take the award on record and dispose of the appeal in terms thereof is dismissed . The second respondent s application ( I.A.No.3 of 1998 ) to set aside the award is allowed.

21. The appeal shall now be heard on its merits. It shall be listed in the ordinary course.

22. No orders as to costs.

**********', 0] , 
[ 'HEADNOTE
LAND REVENUE
Punjab Land Revenue Act, 1887:
Sections 66 and 69 - Recovery of arrears of salary as land revenue - Arrest and detention of defaulter - Whether a defaulter could be arrested without prior notice of arrest? - Whether the provisions of sections 67 and 69 are unfair? - Act does not contemplate issuance of prior notice before warrant of arrest is issued - Procedure lays down the mode in which the recovery could be made - Held that procedure of issuance of prior notice tends to frustrate the effectivity of clause (b) of s.67 and could aid as a lever to avoid process of recovery by arrest and detention - Industrial Disputes Act, 1947, section 33-C(2) - Constitution of India, Articles 14 and 21 - Appeal dismissed.
HELD


O R D E R
1. This appeal by special leave arises from an order dated October 24, 1980 passed by the Division Bench of Delhi High Court.
2. The undisputed facts are that the appellant is a partner of Dr. Sahib Singh and Sons. While doing business in Delhi, the workmen had an adjudication in the Labour Court under s.33-C(2) of the Industrial Disputes Act, 1947, for recovery of arrears of salary, bonus etc. The Labour Court had certified under s.33-C(1) that a sum of Rs.62,843.50 was due to them and issued a certificate to the District Collector to have it recovered from the partnership firm as arrears of land revenue. It is not disputed before us that on July 8, 1980, the bailiff of the Collector had gone to the appellant and sought to attach his movable properties. He then assured the bailiff that he would appear before the Collector but admittedly he never turned up. On July 20, 1980 the bailiff came with a warrant of arrest against the appellant. Calling the order of arrest in question, a writ petition came to be filed but was dismissed. Thus this appeal by special leave.
3. It is contended by learned counsel for the appellant that the procedure prescribed in ss. 67 and 69 of the Punjab Land Revenue Act, 1887 (Punjab Act No.17 of 1987) is unfair, improper and vitiated Articles 21 and 14 of the Constitution. He urged that without prior notice of arrest a defaulter cannot be arrested. Neither Section 67 nor Section 69 prescribes such a procedure. Therefore, it will be unjust, oppressive and arbitrary exercise of power. 
4. We do not find any substance in the contention. Section 67 enumerates various modes in which the arrears of land revenue could be recovered from any person or more in the manner prescribed thereunder. One of the clause, which is clause (b) envisages that recovery could be effected is by arrest and detention of his person. Section 69 provides the procedure in that behalf which reads as follows :
69. Arrest and detention of defaulter - (1) At any time after an arrear of land-revenue has accrued a Revenue-Officer may issue a warrant directing an officer named therein to arrest the defaulter and bring him before the Revenue Officer.
(2) When the defaulter is brought before the Revenue Officer, the Revenue Officer may cause him to be taken before the Collector, or may keep him under personal restraint for a period not exceeding ten days and then, if the arrear is still unpaid, cause him to be taken before the Collector.
(3) When the defaulter is brought before the Collector, the Collector may issue an order to the officer in charge of the civil jail of the district, directing him to confine the defaulter in the jail for such period and not exceeding one month from the date of the order, as the Collector thinks fit.
(4) The process of arrest and detention shall not be executed against a defaulter who is a female, a minor, a lunatic or an idiot.
5. A reading thereof clearly indicates that when arrears of land revenue has accrued the Revenue Officer may issue warrant directing the officer named therein to arrest the defaulter and bring him before the Revenue Officer, who is empowered to keep the defaulter under personal restraint for a period not exceeding 10 days. Even then, if arrears are not paid, cause him to be taken before the Collector. Sub-section (3) gives power to the Collector to take further action thereon. When the defaulter has been brought before him, the Act envisages that Collector may issue an order to the officer in charge of the civil jail of the district and direct the defaulter to be confined in the jail for a period not exceeding one month from the date of the order, as the Collector thinks fit.
6. It is seen that a procedure has laid down mentioning the mode in which recovery could be effected. The Act does not contemplate issuance of any prior notice before warrant of arrest is issued. When the movable properties were sought to be attached, the appellant himself had undertaken to appear before the Collector but he did not turn up. Rather he avoided the process. Therefore, the question whether prior notice should be given has become redundant. The procedure of issuance of prior notice tends to frustrate the effectivity of clause (b) of s.67 of the Act and could aid as a lever to avoid process of recovery by arrest and detention.
7. The appeal is accordingly dismissed. No costs.
**********', 0] , 
[ 'HEADNOTE
PRACTICE AND PROCEDURE
Land disputes - Suit for declaration of title and possession - Suit against appellant dismissed by first appellate court holding the appellant to be the Sirdar of the land in question - Said decision affirmed by the High Court - Thereafter appellant seeking restitution of the land in question - Said application rejected by the trial court - High Court too dismissing the appeal - Validity. Held suit against the appellant having been dismissed, appellant was entitled to possession of the suit land and therefore the High Courts decision dismissing the appeal against the order dismissing the restitution application was not correct. Paras 5, 6 and 7

Civil suits in general - Inordinate delays in the disposal by courts - Concerned authorities requested to do the needful to ensure speedy disposal of cases by the courts. Paras 9, 10 and 11


ORDER


1. This appeal by special leave has been filed by Rajindra Singh, (since deceased) whose legal representatives have been brought on record, against the judgment and order passed by the High Court of Judicature at Allahabad dated 16th September, 1999 in Execution Second Appeal No. 870/1976 whereby the Second Appeal filed by the defendant-appellant has been dismissed.

2. The brief facts giving rise to this appeal are that Smt. Prem Mai and Sudha Mai filed a suit for declaration and possession of the suit land in the Trial Court being Suit No. 487/57. The said suit was decreed against the appellant herein on 21.9.63. Aggrieved against that decree, the appellant- defendant preferred an appeal which was allowed on 16.4.64 and the judgment and decree passed by the Trial Court was reversed by the First Appellant Court. The First Appellant Court was of the view that the defendant-appellant was in cultivatory possession of the land in dispute since before the commencement of the U.P. Zamindari Abolition and Land Reforms Act, 1951, and the suit was barred by time in view of Section 180 U.P. Tenancy Act, and hence the defendant had become a Sirdar.

3. Aggrieved against that, the respondent herein preferred Second Appeal before the High Court which was also dismissed vide order dated 10.2.1971 and the judgment passed by the First Appellate Court was affirmed. It appears that during the pendency of the suit the Trial Court had appointed a receiver (one Pitamber Singh) who took possession of the suit land. Also, Prem Mai and Sudha Mai purported to gift the suit land to the D.A.V. College Trust. After the suit was dismissed by the First Appellate Court and the said dismissal was affirmed by the High Court, the question arose about restitution of the land in question to the defendant-appellant under Section 144 CPC. However, by order dated 13.8.75 the restitution application was rejected. Aggrieved against that order, the matter was taken up in first appeal which was dismissed on 2.4.76 and then to the High Court in second appeal which was dismissed on 6.9.99. All the courts having dismissed the restitution proceedings, the appellant is before us by way of the present appeal.

4. We have heard learned counsel for the appellants and perused the record.

5. From the bare facts it is apparent that the suit against the appellant was dismissed by the First Appellate Court which held that the appellant is the Sirdar of the land in question, and that judgment has been affirmed by the High Court on 10.2.71 in S.A. 215 of 1964, which order became final. Hence in the ordinary course the appellant would be entitled to possession of the suit land. Therefore, we are of the opinion that the view taken by the High Court by its order dated 6.9.99 and courts below cannot be sustained.

6. However, we have been informed by learned counsel for the respondent No. 2 that after these proceedings were over, the defendant-appellant had entered into an agreement to sell with respondent No. 2 for sale of the suit land. An application for bringing on record these subsequent facts has been filed by respondent No. 2. Since that agreement to sell was not acted upon, respondent No. 2 has filed a civil suit being Suit No. 242 of 2002 before the Civil Judge, Dehradun for enforcement of the said agreement, and the legal representatives of the appellant have also filed a suit against respondent No. 2. In the said proceedings an interim order of status quo has been passed in April, 2002 by the Trial Court. However, this is not the subject matter before us and we do not wish to express any opinion on this issue. So far as the present case is concerned, we are of the opinion that after the title of Rajindra Singh (since deceased) has been upheld by the High Court on 10.2.71 he or his legal representatives would ordinarily have been entitled to take possession of the suit land. Therefore, the view taken by the Allahabad High Court in the impugned order dated 6.9.99 cannot be sustained and consequently the same is set aside. However, in view of the subsequent order of status quo passed in Suit No. 242 of 2002 for enforcement of the agreement to sell pending between the parties, we do not wish to express any opinion thereon.

7. Insofar as the present proceedings are concerned, we set aside the impugned judgment and order of the High Court and allow this appeal. The appellant would ordinarily have been entitled to possession of the suit land but because of the interim order of status quo passed in Suit No. 242 of 2002, we direct that the possession of the suit land shall be subject to orders passed in those proceedings.

8. The appeal is allowed. No order as to costs.

9. Before parting with this case we would like to express our anguish at the delay in disposal of cases in our law courts. The present case is a typical illustration. A suit filed in 1957 has rolled on for half a century. It reminds one of the case Jarndyce v. Jarndyce in Charles Dickens novel Bleak House which had rolled on for decades, consuming litigants and lawyers alike.

10. We may quote a passage from Bleak House written in Dickens inimitable style :-

Jarndyce and Jarndyce drones on. This scarecrow of a suit has, in course of time, become so complicated, that no man alive knows what it means. The parties to it understand it least; but it has been observed that no two Chancery lawyers can talk about it for five minutes, without coming to a total disagreement as to all the premises. Innumerable children have been born into the cause; innumerable young people have married into it; innumerable old people have died out of it. Scores of persons have deliriously found themselves made parties in Jarndyce and Jarndyce, without knowing how or why; whole families have inherited legendry hatreds with the suit. The little plaintiff or defendant, who was promised a new rocking-horse when Jarndyce and Jarndyce should be settled, has grown up, possessed himself of a real horse, and trotted away into the other world. Fair wards of court have faded into mothers and grandmothers; a long procession of Chancellors has come in and gone out; the legion of bills in the suit have been transformed into mere bills of mortality; there are not three Jarndyces left upon the earth perhaps, since old Tom Jarndyce in despair blew his brains out at a coffee house in Chancery Lane; but Jarndyce and Jarndyce still drags its dreary length before the court, perennially hopeless.

Is this not descriptive of the situation prevailing in India today ?

11. People in India are simply disgusted with this state of affairs, and are fast losing faith in the judiciary because of the inordinate delay in disposal of cases. We request the concerned authorities to do the needful in the matter urgently to ensure speedy disposal of cases if the peoples faith in the judiciary is to remain.

**********', 0] , 
[ 'CROSS CITATION
2004 AIR (SC) 1720
2004 (9) SCC 713
APPEARANCES
Mrs. D. Bharathi Reddy, Advocate for the Appellant.

Mr.Guntur Prabhakar, Advocate for the Respondent.

HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAWS
Evidence Act, 1872
Sections 32(1), 3 - Indian Penal Code, 1860 - Sections 306, 498A - Dying declarations - Evidence - Appreciation - Cruelty leading to suicide - First statement made at 3.30 p.m. - Only mother-in-law accused of unbearable harassment - Statement recorded by magistrate, after removing all persons from room - Second statement, after 5 minutes, by head constable - Harassment by husband on her parents visit to her and husband and mother-in-law did not want her to speak amicably to her relatives - Fathers statement showing a misunderstanding due to children of husbands sister being brought up in said family - No accusation about ill-treatment or harassment by husband of deceased or her mother-in-law or other members - Except the two dying declarations no other evidence - All PWs not supporting prosecution - Yet, conviction on the basis of dying declarations - High Court confirming conviction under Section 498A only - Justification. Held that the two statements being inconsistent, it is not safe to rely upon and convict the accused under Section 498A also. Appeal allowed.
HELD
In the first dying declaration there is no mention about the appellant having treated the deceased with cruelty or of his having caused harassment to the deceased. In fact, his name does not find place in the relevant portion of the first dying declaration. The first dying declaration was recorded by a magistrate after taking all necessary precautions. The deceased was in a position to make a statement which was certified by the treating physician who was also present when the statement was recorded. Only 5 minutes thereafter another statement was recorded by the head constable and in that dying declaration allegations have been made against the appellant and fact stated relating to the immediate cause which led the deceased to commit suicide which are attributable to the appellant, though there is a statement that her mother-in-law also used to harass her. (Para 12)

The deceased did not in her first dying declaration accuse the appellant of having caused harassment to her, or having ill-treated her, and therefore there is no justification for convicting the appellant even for the offence under section 498A I.P.C. (Para 13)

The father of the deceased namely, PW-1, in his deposition stated that misunderstandings arose between his daughter and her husband on account of the fact that the three children of the deceased sister of the appellant were being brought up in the house of the appellant which was objected to by the deceased. If in those unfortunate circumstances the three children of the deceased sister of the appellant were being brought up in his family, one cannot blame the appellant or his parents for having shown compassion towards the children of his deceased sister. If that is what caused annoyance to the deceased, one cannot equate such conduct with cruelty or harassment. Having regard to the inconsistency in the two dying declarations we do not find it safe to act solely on them to convict the appellant, and for that reason even accused no.2, the mother of the appellant. (Para 14)

Ed: In this case, the court directed the acquittal of mother-in-law of deceased even though, her SLP had been dismissed.


B.P. SINGH, J.

1. This appeal by special leave is directed against the judgment and order of the High Court of judicature at Andhra Pradesh at Hyderabad dated November 26, 1996 in criminal revision case no.195 of 1995 whereby the High Court while partly allowing the appeal and acquitting the appellant of the charge under section 306 I.P.C, confirmed his conviction and sentence under section 498A I.P.C on which count the appellant has been sentenced to undergo rigorous imprisonment for three years and to pay a fine of Rs.1000/-.

2. The appellant Lella Srinivasa Rao and his mother Lella Gangamamba were tried by the assistant sessions judge, Chirala charged of the offences under sections 498A and 306 I.P.C. The case of the prosecution was that the appellant herein was married to the deceased Bhavani about three years before the date of occurrence which took place on 15.8.1990. The case of the prosecution was that the appellant as well as his mother (accused no.2) treated Bhavani (deceased) with such cruelty, and harassed her to such an extent, that she was forced to commit suicide at about 12.45 p.m. on 15.8.1990. She set fire to herself as well as her daughter who was about 1-1/2 years old as a result of which both of them succumbed to their injuries later on the same day. The trial court found them guilty of the offence under section 306 I.P.C. and sentenced both the accused to undergo rigorous imprisonment for a period of seven years under section 306 I.P.C. and three years rigorous imprisonment under section 498A I.P.C. Both the accused preferred criminal appeal no. 169 of 1992 which came to be disposed of by the court of session, Prakasam division, Ongole who dismissed the appeal and upheld the convictions and sentences. The accused thereafter challenged their convictions and sentences before the High Court which set aside the conviction under section 306 I.P.C. but upheld their conviction and sentence under section 498A I.P.C.

3. From the record it appears that both the accused preferred special leave petitions before this Court. The special leave petition of accused no.2, Lella Gangamamba was dismissed by order dated 28.4.1997 and notice was issued confined to the petition on behalf of the appellant herein, which was later admitted for hearing.

4. As noticed earlier, the deceased was married to the appellant on 24th January, 1988. It appears that some differences cropped up between them to which we shall refer later in this judgment. On the 15th August, 1990 the deceased Bhavani set fire to herself and her 1-1/2 years old daughter at about 12.45 p.m. She had closed the door of her room and after pouring kerosene oil on herself and her child set herself ablaze. When she cried in pain her neighbours came to her rescue, got the door opened, and put off the fire. She was taken to the government hospital, Chirala along with child. Intimation was sent by the hospital authorities to the magistrate for recording the dying declaration of the deceased. On such request PW-13 the II additional munsif magistrate, Chirala visited the hospital at 3.05 p.m. and recorded the dying declaration of Bhavani which was exhibited at the trial as exhibit P-18. The dying declaration was recorded by him between 3.30 p.m. and 3.40 p.m. The said dying declaration is in question answer form and was recorded in the presence of the treating physician who certified that Bhavani was conscious when the dying declaration was recorded. The munsif magistrate read over the contents to the deceased in the presence of the doctor and on Bhavani admitting the statement to be correct, she affixed her thumb impression on the dying declaration.

5. In this dying declaration Bhavani (deceased) stated that due to unbearable harassment caused by her mother-in-law she had poured kerosene oil on her body and had set herself on fire at about 1.00 p.m. on that day. To a specific question she replied saying that none-else had set her on fire. It also appears that while recording the dying declaration the magistrate had taken care to remove all other persons from the room, except the doctor on duty.

6. There is another dying declaration on record exhibit P-19 which was recorded by head constable, Rasool Saheb, PW-15 only 5 minutes after the dying declaration was recorded by the munsif magistrate. According to head constable, Rasool Saheb, PW-15 he received intimation at about 3.00 p.m. on the date of occurrence from the government hospital and he immediately went to the hospital and recorded the statement of the deceased. The second dying declaration recorded by head constable, PW-15 is a detailed dying declaration in which Bhavani (deceased) has stated that she was a house wife married to the appellant three years ago and had a female child who was about 18 months old on the date of occurrence. Her husband and mother-in-law used to harass her and did not want her to speak or behave amicably with her relatives and used to beat her often. On 14.8.1990 her parents visited her and thereafter went away. After they had left, and on coming to know this fact, her husband harassed her. Due to the unbearable harassment meted out to her she was disappointed with her life and she closed the doors of her room in the absence of family members and after pouring kerosene oil on her body and on her child she set herself on fire which engulfed her and her child and both were badly burnt. On account of severe burns suffered by her she cried, hearing which her neighbours broke open the door and entered the house and extinguished the flames. She and her child were taken to the government hospital by them.

7. It will thus be seen that whereas in the first dying declaration the allegation made is only against the mother-in- law saying that she used to be harassed by her, in the second dying declaration she has given details relating to her parents visiting her on 14th August, 1990 and the harassment meted out to her by the appellant herein after he came to know of the fact that her parents had visited her. This was because her husband and mother-in-law did not want her to speak or behave amicably with her relatives. She was, therefore, disappointed with life and chose to commit suicide.

8. It is apparent that while in the first dying declaration there is only a general allegation against the mother-in-law, accused no.2, in the second dying declaration the allegation of harassment is against the husband as well as the mother-in-law and the immediate cause for the suicide was her being harassed by her husband, the appellant herein, after her parents had left. It cannot be disputed that the two dying declarations are not consistent with each other. The complicity of the appellant herein is disclosed only in the second dying declaration.

9. However, the High Court has not accepted the case of the prosecution so far as it relates to the offence under section 306 I.P.C. and no appeal has been preferred against the impugned judgment and order of the High Court acquitting the accused of the charge under section 306 I.P.C. The sole question, therefore, which arises for consideration is whether there is evidence to support the charge under section 498A.

10. The prosecution at the trial examined some members of the family of the deceased including her father, PW-1 and her uncles PWs-2 and 3. PW-4, Shyama Sundara Rao is a brother-in-law of PW-1, the father of the deceased. None of these witnesses have supported the case of the prosecution regarding torture and harassment of the deceased by her husband or mother-in-law. No doubt they have been declared hostile but their evidence does disclose the reason for the misunderstanding between the appellant and the deceased.

11. PW-1, in his deposition stated that after her marriage with the appellant his daughter Bhavani resided with the appellant and the relationship between them was cordial. His daughter, Bhavani (deceased) gave birth to a daughter and when her daughter was about 5 months old she came to his house because of some dispute with her husband, the appellant. According to PW-1, the accused was the only son of his parents. His elder sister died on 15.5.1987 leaving behind three children all below the age of 14 years. The husband of his deceased sister remarried and set up his family, but his three children from the first wife were left with the appellant and they used to reside in the same house where the appellant resided with his parents. This was objected to by deceased Bhavani and she had stated that she would not live with the appellant till he separated from his father and lived separately from them. She did not like that the children of her deceased sister-in-law should be brought up by the family members of her husband including her mother-in-law, accused no.2. According to the father of the deceased this was the reason for misunderstanding between the deceased and the appellant. He further stated that on 14th August, 1990 he had been informed by PW-4, that there was some misunderstanding between the appellant and his daughter and he had requested him to come and get the matter patched up. He had gone to the house of his daughter on 14.8.1990 and patched up their differences. On the next day, he came to know that his daughter had set herself on fire and that she had been admitted in a hospital. He denied having stated before the police that the accused were responsible for the death of his daughter. According to him the accused looked after the welfare of his daughter and she delivered a daughter and lived in the house of the appellant till the child was 5 months old. She had thereafter come to reside with him on account of some misunderstanding with her husband. The reason for the misunderstanding was the objection of his daughter to the upbringing of deceased sister-in-laws children by her husbands family. No accusation has been made by the father of the deceased to the effect that Bhavani was ever ill-treated or harassed by either the appellant or his mother-in-law or any other member of the family. PW-2, a brother of PW-1 has also deposed on the same lines as PW-1. In the deposition of PW-4 also there is no allegation that the deceased was ill-treated by her husband or members of his family. In fact, the learned trial judge noticed that except the two dying declarations, there was no other evidence before the court to prove that the deceased was treated with cruelty and harassment which led her to commit suicide. However, the trial court finding the two dying declarations to be consistent and supplemental to each other relied upon them and recorded the conviction of the appellant as well as his mother, accused no.2 under sections 498A and 306 I.P.C. Appellate court also upheld the judgment and order of the trial court. The High Court in revision, however, came to the conclusion that though the facts of this case prove commission of offence under section 498A I.P.C., the prosecution had failed to prove its case under section 306 I.P.C.

12. Having noticed the evidence on record and having noticed the inconsistency between the two dying declarations, we do not find it safe to base the conviction of the appellant on the basis of the second dying declaration. As noticed earlier, in the first dying declaration there is no mention about the appellant having treated the deceased with cruelty or of his having caused harassment to the deceased. In fact, his name does not find place in the relevant portion of the first dying declaration. The first dying declaration was recorded by a magistrate after taking all necessary precautions. The deceased was in a position to make a statement which was certified by the treating physician who was also present when the statement was recorded. Only 5 minutes thereafter another statement was recorded by the head constable and in that dying declaration allegations have been made against the appellant and fact stated relating to the immediate cause which led the deceased to commit suicide which are attributable to the appellant, though there is a statement that her mother-in-law also used to harass her.

13. Learned counsel for the appellant submitted that there was no necessity for the head constable to record another dying declaration when the munsif magistrate had already recorded the dying declaration. In any event, the deceased did not in her first dying declaration accuse the appellant of having caused harassment to her, or having ill-treated her, and therefore there is no justification for convicting the appellant even for the offence under section 498A I.P.C.

14. We have earlier noticed the evidence examined by the prosecution in support of its case that the deceased was treated with cruelty by both the accused. However, the witnesses including the father of the deceased have not supported this case. In fact, the father of the deceased namely, PW-1, in his deposition stated that misunderstandings arose between his daughter and her husband on account of the fact that the three children of the deceased sister of the appellant were being brought up in the house of the appellant which was objected to by the deceased. If in those unfortunate circumstances the three children of the deceased sister of the appellant were being brought up in his family, one cannot blame the appellant or his parents for having shown compassion towards the children of his deceased sister. If that is what caused annoyance to the deceased, one cannot equate such conduct with cruelty or harassment. We also find no reason why on this aspect of the matter the father of the deceased should not speak the truth. In any event, he and his family members were the only persons who could have deposed about the treatment meted out to the deceased. All of them have denied the suggestion that the appellant or his mother-in-law treated the deceased with cruelty. The fact that these witnesses have been declared hostile by the prosecution, does not result in the automatic rejection of their evidence. Even the evidence of a hostile witness if it finds corroboration from the facts of the case may be taken into account while judging the guilt of an accused. In any event, if their evidence is kept out of consideration, there is no other evidence to prove the prosecution allegation of cruelty and harassment meted out to the deceased. Having regard to the inconsistency in the two dying declarations we do not find it safe to act solely on them to convict the appellant, and for that reason even accused no.2, the mother of the appellant who has since served out her sentence.

15. In the facts of this case we find that the prosecution has failed to prove the commission of the offence under section 498A I.P.C. Accordingly, we allow this appeal and acquit the appellant of the charge under section 498A I.P.C. Since the case of accused no.2 Smt. Gangamamba, mother of the appellant herein also stands of the same footing, we also record an order of acquittal in her favour, even though her special leave petition was dismissed and she has undergone the sentence imposed against her. This appeal is accordingly allowed. The bail bonds furnished by the appellant are discharged.

**********', 1] , 
[ 'CROSS CITATION
2010 (9) SCC 73
APPEARANCES
Mr. R.P. Gupta, Senior Advocate, Mr. M.P. Singh and Mr. Rajeev Kumar Bansal, Advocates, with him for the Appellants.
Ms. Vibha Datta Makhija, Advocate, for the Respondent.
HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAWS
Penal Code, 1860
Sections 498A, 304B - Evidence Act, 1872, Sections 113A, 113B - Dowry death - Presumption when death occurs within seven years of marriage - Evidence of only mother and brother of deceased - Allegations of beating as no dowry received from family of deceased - Marriage was a community marriage due to poverty of couple - Only bald statements that victim was subjected to cruelty and harassment - Nothing to show if she was subjected to such treatment prior to her committing suicide. Held that no case can be made out as there is insufficient evidence. Benefit of doubt given. Appeal allowed. Anand Kumars case JT 2009 (2) SC 662 distinguished.
HELD
In order to hold an accused guilty of an offence under Section 304B IPC, it has to be shown that apart from the fact that the woman died on account of burn or bodily injury, otherwise than under normal circumstances, within 7 years of her marriage, it has also to be shown that soon before her death, she was subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or any relative of her husband for, or in connection with, any demand for dowry. Only then would such death be called dowry death and such husband or relative shall be deemed to have caused the death of the woman concerned. (Para 15)

In order to bring home a conviction under Section 304B IPC, it will not be sufficient to only lead evidence showing that cruelty or harassment had been meted out to the victim, but that such treatment was in connection with the demand for dowry. In our view, the prosecution in this case has failed to fully satisfy the requirements of both Section 113B of the Evidence Act, 1872 and Section 304B of the Indian Penal Code. (Para 17)

No case can be made out on the ground of insufficient evidence against the Appellants for conviction under Sections 498A and 304B IPC. (Para 18)

We are inclined to allow the benefit of doubt to the Appellants having particular regard to the fact that except for certain bald statements made by PWs.1 and 3 alleging that the victim had been subjected to cruelty and harassment prior to her death, there is no other evidence to prove that the victim committed suicide on account of cruelty and harassment to which she was subjected just prior to her death. (Para 14)

CASES REFERRED
1.Anand Kumar v. State of M.P. JT 2009 (2) SC 662 (Para 12)

2.Biswajit Halder @ Babu Halder & Ors. v. State of W.B. JT 2007 (5) SC 360 (Para 7)

3.Shri Gopal & Anr. v. Subhash & Ors. JT 2004 (2) SC 158 (Para 8)

ALTAMAS KABIR, J.

1. Leave granted.

2. This appeal is directed against the judgment and order dated 28th April, 2009, passed by Jabalpur Bench of the Madhya Pradesh High Court, dismissing Criminal Appeal No.103 of 2000, which had been directed against the judgment of conviction and sentence under Section 498A and Section 304B Indian Penal Code. By the said judgment, the learned Sessions Judge had sentenced the Appellants to undergo rigorous imprisonment for 3 years and to pay a fine of Rs.1,000/- and in default of payment of fine to undergo rigorous imprisonment for 3 months under Section 498A IPC and to undergo rigorous imprisonment for 7 years and to pay a fine of Rs.5,000/- and in default of payment of such fine, to undergo rigorous imprisonment for a further period of 3 years. Upon consideration of the materials on record, the High Court was of the view that the prosecution had proved its case beyond all reasonable doubts and that the appeal, therefore, deserved to be dismissed.

3. Appearing in support of the appeal, Mr. R.P. Gupta, learned Senior Advocate, contended that both the Courts below had erred in convicting the Appellants on the basis of evidence on record. Mr. Gupta submitted that in the absence of any evidence to prove the charges under Sections 304B and 498A IPC, the trial Court, as also the High Court, had erred in merely relying on the presumption available under Section 304B regarding the death of a woman by any burn or bodily injury or otherwise than under normal circumstances, within 7 years of her marriage, in coming to a conclusion that there would be a natural inference in such circumstance under Section 113A and 113B of the Indian Evidence Act, 1872, that the accused persons had caused the death of Kripa Bai by torturing her physically and mentally so as to drive the deceased to commit suicide. Mr. Gupta submitted that both the Courts below appear to have overlooked the fact that in order to prove a case of dowry death it would have to be shown that in addition to the fact that the death took place otherwise than in normal circumstances within 7 years of marriage, that soon before her death, the wife was subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or any relative of her husband for, or in connection with, any demand for dowry. It was pointed out by Mr. Gupta that in the explanation to Sub-Section (1) of Section 304B it had been mentioned that for the purpose of the said Sub-Section, dowry shall have the same meaning as under Section 2 of the Dowry Prohibition Act, 1961.

4. Mr. Gupta also submitted that the provisions of Section 113A of the Indian Evidence Act were not applicable in this case since no case for abetment of suicide by the husband or any of the husbands relatives had been alleged. On the other hand, the case sought to be made out is one under Section 113B relating to presumption as to dowry death. Mr. Gupta submitted that the provisions in Section 113B relating to presumption as to dowry death are similar to that of Section 304B IPC. He urged that in order to arrive at the presumption of dowry death, it would have to be shown by the prosecution that soon before her death, such woman had been subjected to cruelty or harassment for, or in connection with, any demand for dowry, which would lead to a presumption that such person caused the dowry death.

5. Mr. Gupta submitted that in the instant case, the Appellants had not been convicted under the provisions of the Dowry Prohibition Act, but under Section 304B and 498A IPC. Mr. Gupta submitted that the prosecution had not established that prior to the death of the victim Kripa Bai, she had been either subjected to cruelty or harassment for, or in connection with, any demand for dowry, particularly, when the Appellants had not been convicted under the provisions of the Dowry Prohibition Act, 1961.

6. It was pointed out that the only evidence on which reliance had been placed both by the trial Court, as well as the High Court, for convicting the Appellants, was the evidence of Vimla Bai, PW.1, the mother of the deceased and Radheshyam, PW.3, the brother of the deceased. In fact, the prosecution story was that since no dowry had been received from the family of the victim, she had been beaten and treated with cruelty. There is no other evidence regarding the physical and mental torture which the deceased was alleged to have been subjected to. Mr. Gupta urged that the marriage of the Appellant No.1 with the deceased was performed as part of a community marriage being celebrated on account of the poverty of couples who could not otherwise meet the expenses of marriage and that even the few utensils which were given at the time of such community marriage were given by the persons who had organized such marriages.

7. Mr. Gupta submitted that the evidence in this case was wholly insufficient to even suggest that the victim had been subjected to cruelty or harassment which was sufficient to compel her to commit suicide. In support of his submissions, Mr. Gupta firstly referred to the decision of this Court in Biswajit Halder @ Babu Halder & Ors. v. State of W.B. JT 2007 (5) SC 360 : 2008 (1) SCC 202, wherein, in facts which were very similar, it was held that there was practically no evidence to show that there was any cruelty or harassment for, or in connection with, the demands of dowry. There was also no finding in that regard. It was further observed that this deficiency in evidence proved fatal for the prosecution case and even otherwise mere evidence of cruelty and harassment was not sufficient to attract Section 304B IPC. It had to be shown in addition to that such cruelty or harassment was for, or in connection with, demand of dowry. Mr. Gupta urged that since the Appellants had not been convicted under the provisions of the Dowry Prohibition Act, 1961, the charge under Section 304B would also fail since the same was linked with the question of cruelty or harassment for, or in connection with, the demand for dowry.

8. Mr. Gupta then urged that even the evidence of PW.3, Radheshyam, and also that of PW.2, Ashok Kumar, were full of omissions as to their statements before the police authorities and their evidence during the trial. Mr. Gupta submitted that such omissions were also fatal to the prosecution case since the same was mere embellishment and improvement of the evidence led by the prosecution. In this regard, Mr. Gupta referred to the decision of this Court in Shri Gopal & Anr. v. Subhash & Ors. JT 2004 (2) SC 158 : 2004 (13) SCC 174. In the said decision, while dealing with statements made by prosecution witnesses under Section 162 Cr.P.C. and omissions made during their evidence in Courts, this Court held that the same would amount to contradiction and their evidence on such point would not, therefore, be acceptable.

9. Mr. Gupta urged that both the trial Court, as well as the High Court, did not take into consideration any of the aforesaid matters while convicting the Appellants under Sections 304B and 498A IPC. Mr. Gupta urged that in such circumstances, the judgment and order of the trial Court, as well as that of the High Court, affirming the said judgment, are liable to be set aside.

10. Opposing the submissions made by Mr. R.P. Gupta, learned Senior Advocate, Ms. Vibha Datta Makhija, learned Advocate appearing for the State of Madhya Pradesh, submitted that the trial Court had considered the evidence of Vimla Bai, PW.1, the mother of the deceased and Radheshyam, PW.3, the brother of the deceased, in coming to a finding that their evidence was sufficient to bring home the guilt of the Appellants under Sections 498A and 304B IPC.

11. Ms. Makhija also reiterated the submissions which had been made before the trial Court regarding the presumption that was to be drawn both under Section 304B IPC, as also under Section 113B of the Indian Evidence Act, 1872, having regard to the fact that Kripa Bai had committed suicide within 7 years of her marriage. Ms. Makhija submitted that once it was found that by their actions the Appellants had driven Kripa Bai to commit suicide, the provisions of Section 304B IPC were immediately attracted and the Appellants, therefore, had been rightly convicted by the trial Court under Sections 498A and 304B IPC. Ms. Makhija urged that the evidence of PWs.1 and 3 were sufficient to meet the requirements of both Sections 113B of the Indian Evidence Act and Section 304B IPC.

12. Ms. Makhija then contended that as had been laid down by this Court in the case of Anand Kumar v. State of M.P. JT 2009 (2) SC 662 : 2009 (3) SCC 799, in order to counter the presumption available under Section 113B, which is relatable to Section 304-B, a heavy burden has been shifted on to the accused to prove his innocence. Having regard to the language of Section 113B of the Indian Evidence Act, which indicates that when a question arises as to whether a person has committed the dowry death of a woman and it is shown that soon before her death such woman was subjected to cruelty or harassment by such other person or in connection with any demand for dowry, the Court shall presume that such person had caused such dowry death. Ms. Makhija urged that the aforesaid wording of Section 113B of Evidence Act and the use of the expression shall would clearly indicate that the Court shall presume such death as dowry death provided the conditions in Section 113-B were satisfied and it would then be for the accused to prove otherwise.

13. Ms. Makhija, thereupon, urged that the order of conviction passed by the trial Court holding the Appellants guilty under Sections 498A and 304B IPC, confirmed by the High Court, did not warrant any interference by this Court.

14. Having carefully considered the submissions made on behalf of the respective parties, we are inclined to allow the benefit of doubt to the Appellants having particular regard to the fact that except for certain bald statements made by PWs.1 and 3 alleging that the victim had been subjected to cruelty and harassment prior to her death, there is no other evidence to prove that the victim committed suicide on account of cruelty and harassment to which she was subjected just prior to her death, which, in fact, are the ingredients of the evidence to be led in respect of Section 113-B of the Indian Evidence Act, 1872, in order to bring home the guilt against an accused under Section 304B IPC.

15. As has been mentioned hereinbefore, in order to hold an accused guilty of an offence under Section 304B IPC, it has to be shown that apart from the fact that the woman died on account of burn or bodily injury, otherwise than under normal circumstances, within 7 years of her marriage, it has also to be shown that soon before her death, she was subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or any relative of her husband for, or in connection with, any demand for dowry. Only then would such death be called dowry death and such husband or relative shall be deemed to have caused the death of the woman concerned.

16. In this case, one other aspect has to be kept in mind, namely, that no charges were framed against the Appellants under the provisions of the Dowry Prohibition Act, 1961 and the evidence led in order to prove the same for the purposes of Section 304B IPC was related to a demand for a fan only.

17. The decision cited by Mr. R.P. Gupta, learned Senior Advocate, in Biswajit Halders case (supra) was rendered in almost similar circumstances. In order to bring home a conviction under Section 304B IPC, it will not be sufficient to only lead evidence showing that cruelty or harassment had been meted out to the victim, but that such treatment was in connection with the demand for dowry. In our view, the prosecution in this case has failed to fully satisfy the requirements of both Section 113B of the Evidence Act, 1872 and Section 304B of the Indian Penal Code.

18. Accordingly, we are unable to agree with the views expressed both by the trial Court, as well as the High Court, and we are of the view that no case can be made out on the ground of insufficient evidence against the Appellants for conviction under Sections 498A and 304B IPC. The decision cited by Ms. Makhija in Anand Kumars case (supra) deals with the proposition of shifting of onus of the burden of proof relating to the presumption which the Court is to draw under Section 113B of the Evidence Act and does not help the case of the State in a situation where there is no material to presume that an offence under Section 304B IPC had been committed.

19. In that view of the matter, we allow the Appeal and set aside the judgment of the trial Court convicting and sentencing the Appellants of offences alleged to have been committed under Sections 498A and 304B IPC. The judgment of the High Court impugned in the instant Appeal is also set aside. In the event, the Appellants are on bail, they shall be discharged from their bail bonds, and, in the event they are in custody, they should be released forthwith.

**********', 1] , 
[ 'HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAWS 
Penal Code, 1860 
Sections 498A, 306, 304B Conviction under All five members of in-laws family convicted Husband of deceased has undergone his sentence - Mother-in-law has died Appellants who are sisters and brother of husband are in jail for 4 years and two months - Whether omnibus allegations against all the family members should not be taken at face value No independent corroboration against such allegations No individual role of harassment assigned to appellants. Held possibility of appellants having been named by way of exaggeration cannot be ruled out. Brothers and sisters do not stand on the same footing having regard to nature of their relationship. They deserve benefit of doubt. Conviction and sentence under Section 304B set aside. Kans Rajs JT 2000 (5) SC 223 case relied.
HELD
We do not find any ground to interfere with the view taken by the courts below that the deceased was subjected to harassment on account of non-fulfillment of dowry demand, we do find merit in the submission that possibility of naming all the family members by way of exaggeration is not ruled out. (Para 8)

The Court has, thus, to be careful in summoning distant relatives without there being specific material. Only the husband, his parents or at best close family members may be expected to demand dowry or to harass the wife but not distant relations, unless there is tangible material to support allegations made against such distant relations. Mere naming of distant relations is not enough to summon them in absence of any specific role and material to support such role. (Para 8.1)

The Court has to adopt pragmatic view and when a girl dies an unnatural death, allegation of demand of dowry or harassment which follows cannot be weighed in golden scales. At the same time, omnibus allegation against all family members particularly against brothers and sisters and other relatives do not stand on same footing as husband and parents. In such case, apart from general allegation of demand of dowry court has to be satisfied that harassment was also caused by all the named members. (Para 11)

CASES REFERRED
1.Amar Singh v. State of Rajasthan JT 2010 (8) SC 99 (Para 10) 

2.Raja Lal Singh v. State of Jharkhand JT 2007 (7) SC 77 (Para 9) 

3.Kans Raj v. State of Punjab & Ors. JT 2000 (5) SC 223 (Para 5)

ADARSH KUMAR GOEL, J. 

1. The appellants stand convicted under Sections 498A, 306 and 304B of the Indian Penal Code (IPC) and sentenced to undergo Rigorous Imprisonment (RI) for 10 years and to pay fine of Rs.5000/-. In default, to undergo further imprisonment for two years. They also stand sentenced to suffer RI for three years and to pay fine of Rs.1000/- and in default to suffer further imprisonment for three months under Sections 498A and 306 IPC. 

2. The deceased Shanti Roy was married to Sekhar Roy on 20th February, 1994. According to the prosecution, Sekhar Roy, his mother, two sisters and brother raised a demand of Rs.5000/- and since the said demand was not fulfilled, Shanti Roy was harassed and even kept without food. On 31st July, 1995, she committed suicide by pouring kerosene and setting herself on fire. She was pregnant carrying eight months old foetus. Chittaranjan Saha (PW1), brother of the deceased lodged First Information Report. After conducting investigation, appellants Monju Roy, Anju Roy, sisters of Sekhar Roy, Tulshi Roy, brother of Sekhar Roy, Sumitra Roy, mother of Sekhar Roy and Sekhar Roy, husband of the deceased were sent up for trial. Sumitra Roy died on 27th August, 2001 during pendency of the trial. 

3. The prosecution examined 17 witnesses and also produced documents in support of its case. The witnesses examined included brother of the deceased PW 5 and mother of the deceased PW 14 to prove that the deceased was harassed by demand of dowry. Accepting the evidence, the trial court convicted and sentenced the three appellants as mentioned above and also Sekhar Roy who has not preferred appeal and is said to have undergone the sentence awarded to him. The High Court upheld the conviction and sentence with the modification that instead of life imprisonment under Section 304B awarded by the trial court, sentence of RI for ten years was awarded. 

4. We have heard learned counsel for the appellants Shri Pijush K. Roy and Shri Kabir S. Bose for the State of West Bengal and with their assistance have gone through the record. 

5. Learned counsel for the appellants submitted that omnibus allegation against all the family members could not be taken at the face value, having regard to the well known tendency of naming all the family members by the family of an unfortunate victim. In such circumstances, the court may be cautious in accepting such omnibus allegations against all the family members unless there is an independent corroboration of such allegation. He submitted that in the present case, the allegation is that all the five family members raised a demand of Rs.5000/- and beyond stating that all the family members harassed her, no individual role in harassment has been specified. The benefit of dowry could go either to the husband or at best his mother and not to the siblings who are alleged to have joined in such demand. There is no independent corroboration of the allegation as such allegation has been made for the first time in the FIR. The allegation is based on the version given to the witnesses three months after the marriage or thereafter, though it is stated that the witness continued to receive information about such demand even thereafter upto 15-20 days prior to the occurrence. He submitted that mother-in-law of the deceased has already died and husband of the deceased has undergone the sentence. The appellants who are two sisters and one brother of the husband of the deceased have been in custody for more than four years and two months. The possibility of exaggeration about the number of family members who raised demand of dowry was not ruled out. Even if demand was jointly made, the appellants have not been assigned any role in harassment in absence of which, presumption under Section 113B of the Evidence Act could not be raised against them. Reliance has been placed on observations of this Court in Kans Raj v. State of Punjab & Ors. JT 2000 (5) SC 223 : 2000 (5) SCC 207. 

6. Learned counsel for the State opposed the above submission and pointed out that the deceased was pregnant for eight months and would not have committed suicide within two years of marriage unless the harassment for dowry had been caused. He submitted that there is no reason to disbelieve the version of close relatives of the deceased that dowry was demanded by all the family members and the demand continued till her death. All the members have been specifically named. The death having taken place within seven years of marriage in circumstances other than normal, statutory presumption under Section 304B clearly arises and the courts below were justified in convicting and sentencing the appellants. 

7. We have given serious thought to the question raised about the possibility of exaggeration in prosecution version in implicating all the family members. 

8. While we do not find any ground to interfere with the view taken by the courts below that the deceased was subjected to harassment on account of non-fulfillment of dowry demand, we do find merit in the submission that possibility of naming all the family members by way of exaggeration is not ruled out. In Kans Raj, this Court observed: 

5A tendency has, however, developed for roping in all relations of the in-laws of the deceased wives in the matters of dowry deaths which, if not discouraged, is likely to affect the case of the prosecution even against the real culprits. In their over enthusiasm and anxiety to seek conviction for maximum people, the parents of the deceased have been found to be making efforts for involving other relations which ultimately weaken the case of the prosecution even against the real accused as appears to have happened in the instant case. 

8.1. The Court has, thus, to be careful in summoning distant relatives without there being specific material. Only the husband, his parents or at best close family members may be expected to demand dowry or to harass the wife but not distant relations, unless there is tangible material to support allegations made against such distant relations. Mere naming of distant relations is not enough to summon them in absence of any specific role and material to support such role. 

9. In Raja Lal Singh v. State of Jharkhand JT 2007 (7) SC 77 : 2007 (15) SCC 415, it was observed: 

14. No doubt, some of the witnesses e.g. PW 5 Dashrath Singh, who is the father of the deceased Gayatri, and PW 3 Santosh Kr. Singh, brother of the deceased, have stated that the deceased Gayatri told them that dowry was demanded by not only Raja Lal Singh, but also the appellants Pradip Singh and his wife Sanjana Devi, but we are of the opinion that it is possible that the names of Pradip Singh and Sanjana Devi have been introduced only to spread the net wide as often happens in cases like under Sections 498-A and 394 IPC, as has been observed in several decisions of this Court e.g. in Kamesh Panjiyar v. State of Bihar 2005 (2) SCC 388, etc. Hence, we allow the appeal of Pradip Singh and Sanjana Devi and set aside the impugned judgments of the High Court and the trial court insofar as it relates to them and we direct that they be released forthwith unless required in connection with some other case. 

10. Moreover, ingredient of offence under Section 304B is not mere demand of dowry but cruelty or harassment for or in connection with demand of dowry. In Amar Singh v. State of Rajasthan JT 2010 (8) SC 99 : 2010 (9) SCC 64, it was observed: 

29. .. What is punishable under Section 498-A or Section 304-B IPC is the act of cruelty or harassment by the husband or the relative of the husband on the woman. It will be also clear from Section 113-B of the Evidence Act that only when it is shown that soon before her death a woman has been subjected by any person to cruelty or harassment for, or in connection with, any demand for dowry, the court shall presume that such person had caused the dowry death within the meaning of Section 304-B IPC. The act of subjecting a woman to cruelty or harassment for, or in connection with, any demand for dowry by the accused, therefore, must be established by the prosecution for the court to presume that the accused has caused the dowry death. 

11. The Court has to adopt pragmatic view and when a girl dies an unnatural death, allegation of demand of dowry or harassment which follows cannot be weighed in golden scales. At the same time, omnibus allegation against all family members particularly against brothers and sisters and other relatives do not stand on same footing as husband and parents. In such case, apart from general allegation of demand of dowry court has to be satisfied that harassment was also caused by all the named members. 

12. In the facts and circumstances of the present case, even if it is accepted that the appellants were involved in raising the demand for dowry there is material that the appellants harassed the victim resulting in her death. Normally, it is the husband or parents of the husband who may be benefitted by the dowry and may be in a position to harass and not all other relatives, though no hard and fast rule can be laid down in that regard. It is also true that till such an unfortunate event takes place, the family members may not disclose the demand of dowry being a private matter and under the hope that the relationship of the couple may improve. However, having regard to the nature of their relationships, there being possibility of the appellants having been named by way of exaggeration, we are of the view that the appellants deserve to be given benefit of doubt in that regard in the facts of the present case. 

13. Accordingly, we allow this appeal, set aside the conviction and sentence of the appellants under Section 304B IPC without interfering with conviction and sentence under other heads. Since the appellants are said to have already undergone the sentence awarded for other charges which may be verified, they may be released from custody forthwith unless required in any other case.

**********', 1] , 
[ 'HEADNOTE
1.Hira Lal & Others v. State (Govt. of NCT), Delhi JT 2003 (6) SC 195 (Para 11)


SUDHANSU JYOTI MUKHOPADHAYA,J

1. This appeal is directed against judgment dated 9th December, 2009 passed by the High Court of Punjab and Haryana at Chandigarh in Criminal Appeal No. 471-SB of 1999 whereby the High Court confirmed the judgment and order dated 23rd April, 1999 rendered by Additional Sessions Judge, Mansa in Sessions Case No.14 of 12th May, 1997. The Sessions Court by the said judgment convicted the appellant u/s 304-B IPC and sentenced him to undergo rigorous imprisonment for a period of 10 years and to pay fine of Rs.1000/- , in default of payment of fine, to further undergo rigorous imprisonment for a period of 2 months.

2. Apart from the appellant other family members, namely, Kuldip Singh, Darshana Devi and Parveen kaur were also accused before the Trial Court. They were acquitted of the charges leveled against them against which no appeal was filed by the State. Paramjit Kaur and Swaranjit Kaur were two other accused who were juvenile therefore their cases were separated.

3. The case of the prosecution, in brief, is that Amarjit Kaur (deceased) was married to accused-Davinder Singh (appellant herein) 6/7 months before the date of occurrence i.e. 3rd March, 1997. Teja Singh son of Bachittar Singh was the mediator in arranging the marriage. At the time of marriage, sufficient dowry was given by the parents of Amarjit Kaur as per their status, but after the marriage in-laws of Amarjit Kaur started torturing/coercing her to bring more dowry. Jaswinder Singh-complainant-brother of Amarjit Kaur and Teja Singh-mediator had requested the in-laws of Amarjit Kaur not to harass and torture her for dowry but they continued to maltreat and harass the deceased.

3.1 On 9.2.1997, marriage of Jaswinder Singh, complainant, was solemnized. Deceased and her husband Davinder Singh had attended the marriage. After marriage, Davinder Singh demanded Rs.20,000/- from the complainant on the ground that Jaswinder Singh was given more dowry than him. To settle deceased in her in-laws house, Jaswinder Singh borrowed a sum of Rs.20,000/- and gave the amount to the appellant. But in-laws of the deceased were not satisfied and they continued to demand more dowry.

3.2 On 2.3.1997, deceased telephonically informed Jaswinder Singh that her in- laws were torturing and harassing her in connection with dowry. As per message, Jaswinder Singh and his maternal uncle Bhola Singh went to Budhlada to enquire about the welfare of deceased. The deceased informed them that she was being harassed for more dowry by her in-laws. They came back by saying that on the next day, they will come back with some respectable person to settle the dispute.

3.3 On 3.3.1997 at about 5.30 PM, Jaswinder Singh, his maternal uncle Bhola Singh and Teja Singh went to the house of accused-Davinder Singh. When they were near the gate of the house, then they heard shrieks and screams from the roof. After entering the house when they were going to the roof of the house, they found Darshana Devi saying that Amarjit Kaur should not be spared. She should be finished. All of them went to the roof of the house and then noticed Kuldip Singh, accused-Davinder Singh, Darshana Devi, Parveen Kaur, Paramjit Kaur and Swaranjit Kaur coming to the ground through staircase. The dead body of Amarjit Kaur was found in the bathroom in a burnt condition. Plastic cane and match box were found near the dead body. It is alleged that in-laws of Amarjit Kaur has murdered her by setting her on fire. Teja Singh was deputed to guard the dead body, when Jaswinder Singh and Bhola Singh went to lodge report. Rupinder Singh, Sub Inspector met the complainant near the crossing of Civil Hospital, Budhalda, where statement of Jaswinder Singh (Ex.P.D.) was recorded. After making endorsement, statement was forwarded to the Police Station, on the basis of which, formal FIR was registered.

3.4 On 7.3.1997, accused were arrested. After completion of investigation, challans was presented. Accused were charged u/s 304-B/149 IPC to which the accused pleaded not guilty and claimed trial.

4. The prosecution, in support of its case, examined four witnesses. Documentary evidences were also exhibited. Defence also examined seven witnesses. After closure of the prosecution evidence, statements of accused were recoded u/s 313 Cr.PC. Accused denied all the prosecution allegations and pleaded to be innocent. Defence version of the accused-appellant was that he is impotent and on account of this reason, Amarjit Kaur was under depression. Amarjit Kaur was also harassed by her step mother. Because of these reasons, she has committed suicide. Similar plea has been taken by the counsel for the appellant to assail the impugned judgment.

5. PW-2 - Jaswinder Singh brother of the deceased stated that Amarjit Kaur got married with appellant-Davinder Singh in July, 1996. Kuldeep Singh, Darshana Devi and Parveen are respectively father, mother and sister of the appellant. Paramjit Kaur and Swaranjit Kaur are also sisters of the appellant. Teja Singh was mediator of marriage of Amarjit Kaur with Davinder Singh. They had spent on marriage of deceased more than their capacity. The relations of deceased with her husband and in laws remained cordial for about two months. Thereafter her in-laws started ill-treating her on one pretext or the other that her parents had not given scooter and cloths given were not upto mark. The accused were demanding more dowry. He along with his maternal uncle PW-3 Bhola Singh had gone once or twice to house of her in-laws and requested them that since they are poor people and they cannot afford more dowry. But appellant and his family did not agree. PW-2s marriage took place on 9.2.1997 Davinder Singh and Amarjit Kaur attended his marriage. After his marriage accused-Davinder Singh stated that complainant had been given more dowry than him and demanded money from complainant. The complainant took Rs.20,000/- from his uncle and gave it to accused-Davinder Singh. However, the appellant was not satisfied and again started demanding more dowry. On 2.3.1997, he received telephone call from his sister that she is being maltreated by her in-laws on account of dowry. Then PW-2 took his maternal uncle from Goniana and came to Budhlada in the house of the accused. The accused demanded more money from the complainant. Then PW-2 told the accused that he will meet them the next day. On 3.3.1997, PW-2 along with his maternal uncle Bhola Singh and mediator Teja Singh reached the house of the accused. When they reached at the gate of the house, they heard shrieks upstairs. When they were just entering the gate, mother-in-law of the deceased shouted that deceased should be finished today. Then they went upstairs. When they went on roof Kuldeep Singh, Davinder Singh, Darshana Devi, Parveen Kaur, Swaranjit Kaur and Paramjit Kaur came down running. They found Amarjit Kaur lying dead with burns in bathroom. One plastic cane and match box were lying near to her dead body. Teja Singh was left to guard dead body he and his uncle went to the Police Station. Police met them near the Hospital where his statement Ex.PD was recorded. Thereafter the Police came to the house of accused and took into possession plastic cane Ex.P3, match box Ex.P4, and ash wrapped in cloth Ex.P5 vide memo P.E. which was attested by him. During the cross examination, PW-2 denied the suggestion that after his marriage he did not visit Budhlada. He stated that visited there twice or thrice. However, he could not give the exact date of telephone call but stated that she had given call on 10-11 AM and on the same day of receiving the telephone he and his uncle went to Budhlada. He denied the suggestion that the accused had not demanded dowry prior to bhog ceremony of his father.

6. PW-3 Bhola Singh maternal uncle of Amarjit Kaur stated that Amarjit Kaur was married with accused-Davinder Singh about seven months prior to her death. Accused-Davinder Singh used to demand motor cycle as dowry. The in-laws of deceased used to maltreat her. On 2.3.1997 he and his sisters son (PW-2- complainant) came to the house of the accused at Budhlada to see Amarjit Kaur, She told them that her in-laws are maltreating her. They left the house telling that they will come again with some wise person. They again went on 3.3.1997 along with Teja Singh to the house of the accused at Budhlada. At the gate, they heard shrieks from the roof of the house. Then they went running upstairs. When they went upwards, they saw Amarjit Kaur lying dead in bathroom with burns all over the body. Plastic cane and match box were found lying near the dead-body. The matter was reported to the Police Station. The Police met them in front of Hospital. During the cross-examination PW-3 was not in a position to given the exact details of the neighbours of the Devinder Singh. However, for not giving such details of the neighbours, the statement of PW-3 cannot be held to be untrustworthy.

7. PW-1 Dr. Kashmir Singh, had conducted the post mortem examination. He reported that death was due to asphyxia as a result of 95% to 100% burns which were ante mortem in nature and was sufficient to cause death in the ordinary course of nature. The probable duration of time that elapsed between the injuries and death was immediate and between death and the postmortem was within 24 hours. The Ex. P.A. is the copy of the Post Mortem Report.

8. PW-4 Rupinder Kumar, Sub Inspector is the investigating officer. He also deposed about recovery of plastic cane and match box from the house of the accused.

9. Section 304B IPC relates to dowry death and reads as follows:

304B. Dowry death.- (1) Where the death of a woman is caused by any burns or bodily injury or occurs otherwise than under normal circumstances within seven years of her marriage and it is shown that soon before her death she was subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or any relative of her husband for, or in connection with, any demand for dowry, such death shall be called dowry death, and such husband or relative shall be deemed to have caused her death.

Explanation.-For the purpose of this sub-section, dowry shall have the same meaning as in section 2 of the Dowry Prohibition Act, 1961 (28 of 1961).

(2) Whoever commits dowry death shall be punished with imprisonment for a term which shall not be less than seven years but which may extend to imprisonment for life.

10. For the purpose of the said Section, a presumption can be raised only on proof of the following essentials:

(a) Death of woman has been caused by burns or bodily injury or not under normal circumstances.

(b) The said death have occurred within seven years of her marriage

(c) The woman was subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or his relatives.

(d) Such cruelty or harassment was for, or in connection with, any demand for dowry and

(e) She was meted out with such cruelty or harassment was soon before her death.

In this connection, we may refer this Court decision in Kaliaperumal v. State of Tamil Nadu AIR 2003 SC 3828.

11. In the case of Hira Lal & Others v. State (Govt. of NCT), Delhi JT 2003 (6) SC 195 : 2003 (8) SCC 80, this Court considered the expression before death used in the Section 304B IPC and Section 113-B of the Indian Evidence Act which reads as under:

8. Section 304-B IPC which deals with dowry death, reads as follows:

304-B. Dowry death.-(1) Where the death of a woman is caused by any burns or bodily injury or occurs otherwise than under normal circumstances within seven years of her marriage and it is shown that soon before her death she was subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or any relative of her husband for, or in connection with, any demand for dowry, such death shall be called dowry death, and such husband or relative shall be deemed to have caused her death.

Explanation.-For the purpose of this sub-section, dowry shall have the same meaning as in Section 2 of the Dowry Prohibition Act, 1961 (28 of 1961).

(2) Whoever commits dowry death shall be punished with imprisonment for a term which shall not be less than seven years but which may extend to imprisonment for life.

The provision has application when death of a woman is caused by any burns or bodily injury or occurs otherwise than under normal circumstances within seven years of her marriage and it is shown that soon before her death she was subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or any relatives of her husband for, or in connection with any demand for dowry. In order to attract application of Section 304-B IPC, the essential ingredients are as follows:

(i) The death of a woman should be caused by burns or bodily injury or otherwise than under a normal circumstance.

(ii) Such a death should have occurred within seven years of her marriage.

(iii) She must have been subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or any relative of her husband.

(iv) Such cruelty or harassment should be for or in connection with demand of dowry.

(v) Such cruelty or harassment is shown to have been meted out to the woman soon before her death.

Section 113-B of the Evidence Act is also relevant for the case at hand. Both Section 304-B IPC and Section 113-B of the Evidence Act were inserted as noted earlier by Dowry Prohibition (Amendment) Act 43 of 1986 with a view to combat the increasing menace of dowry deaths. Section 113-B reads as follows:

113-B. Presumption as to dowry death.-When the question is whether a person has committed the dowry death of a woman and it is shown that soon before her death such woman had been subjected by such person to cruelty or harassment for, or in connection with, any demand for dowry, the Court shall presume that such person had caused the dowry death.

Explanation.-For the purposes of this section, dowry death shall have the same meaning as in Section 304-B of the Indian Penal Code (45 of 1860).

The necessity for insertion of the two provisions has been amply analysed by the Law Commission of India in its 21st Report dated 10-8-1988 on Dowry Deaths and Law Reform. Keeping in view the impediment in the pre-existing law in securing evidence to prove dowry-related deaths, the legislature thought it wise to insert a provision relating to presumption of dowry death on proof of certain essentials. It is in this background that presumptive Section 113-B in the Evidence Act has been inserted. As per the definition of dowry death in Section 304-B IPC and the wording in the presumptive Section 113-B of the Evidence Act, one of the essential ingredients, amongst others, in both the provisions is that the woman concerned must have been soon before her death subjected to cruelty or harassment for or in connection with the demand of dowry. Presumption under Section 113-B is a presumption of law. On proof of the essentials mentioned therein, it becomes obligatory on the court to raise a presumption that the accused caused the dowry death. The presumption shall be raised only on proof of the following essentials:

(1) The question before the court must be whether the accused has committed the dowry death of the woman. (This means that the presumption can be raised only if the accused is being tried for the offence under Section 304-B IPC.)

(2) The woman was subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or his relatives.

(3) Such cruelty or harassment was for or in connection with any demand for dowry.

(4) Such cruelty or harassment was soon before her death.

12. In the present case, from the statements of PW-2 and PW-3 it is clear that the death took place within seven months of marriage. Admittedly, death of the deceased was due to burn i.e. not in normal circumstances. We have to see now whether the remaining ingredients are satisfied looking into the evidence on record.

13. The statements of the PW-2 and PW-3 are specific as they were eye witnesses. In their statements they specifically stated about the harassment in connection with demand of dowry. Deceased died within seven months of marriage. She also telephonically complained about harassment. The Prosecution thus proved that there was harassment in connection with dowry soon before death of the victim.

14. In view of the evidence on record, as discussed above, we hold that the prosecution was successful to prove the ingredients of Section 304-B IPC. The Trial Court rightly presumed that the accused had caused the dowry death of the victim.

15. We find no merit in this appeal and the same is accordingly dismissed. The appellant is directed to be taken into custody forthwith to serve remainder period of sentence. His bail bonds stand cancelled.

**********', 1] , 
[ 'CROSS CITATION
2014 AIR (SC) 2694
2014 (7) SCC 395
APPEARANCES
Mr. K.K. Mohan, Advocate, for the Appellant.
Mr. Anil Kaushik, Mr. Kamal Mohan Gupta, Advocates, for the Respondent.
HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAWS
Evidence Act, 1872
Sections 32(1), 3, 113B - Penal Code, 1860, Sections 304B, 498A - Dying declaration - Two dying declarations - Dowry death - Appreciation - CJM requested to record statement of deceased - On reaching hospital, obtained fitness certificate from doctor - Statement recorded - Read out to victim, who put her thumb-mark on it - Further certification that victim remained fit to make statement - When asked to thumb-mark her statement, victim desired to make truthful statement - In first statement alleged about bursting of stove - While desiring to make statement again, she told that first statement was tutored by her husband - Second statement recorded at the same time - Clearly implicating husband for demanding dowry and setting her on fire. Held that second part of the declaration inspires confidence and first part was tutored one. (Paras 10, 11)

Sections 3, 32(1) - Penal Code, 1860, Sections 304B, 498A - Evidence - Appreciation - Dowry death - Mother of deceased stated about deceased having told her about quarrel in house due to demand of Rs. 1 lac - Deceased had also sent a letter demanding Rs. 5,000/- to her father - Dying declaration by victim - Clear statement that he would bring her to death if demand of Rs. 1 lac is not met - Earlier also he had tried to hang her - On day of incident, sprinkled oil on her clothes when she was in bathroom and set her on fire - First part of statement alleged to be tutored by her husband. Held that there was demand of dowry. Deceased had no reason to implicate accused. Although he gave blood to save her but it was too late. Hira Lals JT 2003 (6) SC 195 case relied upon. Further held that offences stand proved as there was cruelty and dowry demand.
HELD
Usha Devi (PW-6), mother of the deceased-Manju stated that Manju had told her that there was a quarrel in the family because the accused had been making a demand of Rs. One lakh for running a piggery farm. Manju had also sent a letter to her father making a demand of Rs.5,000/-. Letter is Ex.PJ. (Para 14)

Sapattar Singh (PW-8), father of the deceased has also deposed with regard to the demand of the appellant. (Para 15)

The deceased in the dying declaration stated that her husband had stated that he would hang her to death if his demand for Rs.1 lakh is not met by her parents and on 1st March, 1996, her husband tried to hang her. The appellant had initially tried to set her on fire during the night and when in the morning at 5.30 a.m. she went to bathroom he sprinkled the oil on the clothes from her back side and set her on fire. She categorically stated that earlier part of the statement was made at the instigation of her husband. The deceased had no reason to falsely implicate her husband particularly when she had suffered from burn injury. (Para 15)

From the aforesaid, evidence of Sapattar Singh (PW-8) and dying declaration, we find that there was a demand of dowry and harassment soon before the death. (Para 16)

Marriage took place on 20th June, 1995. Manju, wife of the accused Pradeep Kumar got burnt on 1st March, 1996 and died on 12th March, 1996 within nine months of her marriage. Death of Manju was caused by burns i.e. otherwise than under normal circumstances. It has already been seen that soon before her death she was subjected to cruelty and harassment in connection with demand of dowry. All the five ingredients were proved by the prosecution. Under Section 113-B of the Evidence Act when a question arises whether a person committed dowry death and it is proved that the death of woman took place within seven years of marriage; such death took place not under normal circumstances and soon before the death deceased was subjected to cruelty or harassment by such person for or in connection with any demand for dowry, the Court shall presume that such person had caused the dowry death. (Para 19)

CASES REFERRED
1.Hira Lal & Others v. State (Govt. of NCT), Delhi JT 2003 (6) SC 195 (Para 18)

SUDHANSU JYOTI MUKHOPADHAYA, J.

1. This appeal is directed against the judgment dated 3rd February, 2010, passed by the High Court of Punjab and Haryana at Chandigarh in CRA No.909-SB of 1997. By the impugned common judgment the High Court dismissed the revision application preferred by the appellant and affirmed the conviction and sentence for the offence punishable under Section 498-A and 304-B IPC passed by the Sessions Judge, Karnal vide judgment dated 1st August, 1997.

2. The case of the prosecution is that Manju alias Uma Devi had been married to the accused Pradeep Kumar on 20th June, 1995. On 1st March, 1996 she received burn injuries and was got admitted in the Medical College Hospital, Rohtak. On 2nd March, 1996, she made her dying declaration before the Chief Judicial Magistrate, Rohtak. In the first part of the said dying declaration she asserted that it was a case of accident, whereas in the latter part she alleged that her husband had been pressing to fetch a sum of Rs. One lakh from her parents and had been threatening to kill her if she did not bring the money. She also alleged that around 5.30 a.m. on 1st March, 1996 her husband doused her in kerosene from behind and set her on fire and later on he tried to save her when she raised alarm and on doing so his hands got burnt.

2.1. On the basis of this statement, First Information Report was recorded against the accused. The matter was investigated. On 12th March, 1996 Manju alias Uma died. Thereafter, the case was converted under Section 304-B IPC and after completion of investigation challan was presented in the Court and on commitment, the accused was charged in the manner noticed above.

3. In support of their case, prosecution examined 9 witnesses. Usha (PW-6), mother of the deceased and Sapattar Singh (PW-8), father of the deceased are the material witnesses.

4. On appreciation of evidence and hearing the parties learned Sessions Judge, Karnal, observed as follows:

20. From the totality of the discussion noticed herein above it would appear that the accused had been responsible for the murder of his wife and also of causing torture and harassment to her. However, since he has been charged only under Section 498-A and 304-B Indian Penal Code, I would hold him guilty for the said offence and convict him there under which are lesser offences than Section 302 Indian Penal Code. I call upon the accused to address argument and to show the extenuating circumstances and to address arguments on the quantum of sentence.

5. Learned counsel for the appellant submitted that the medical evidence is contrary to the prosecution story and does not support the case of the prosecution. In this regard it was contended that if kerosene oil was poured on the deceased from behind then the burns would have been on the back of the deceased. However, the medical report/postmortem report does not find any burn injuries on the back of the deceased. It was further contended that the Trial Court and the High Court failed to appreciate that the occurrence was an accident as injuries were on the face, chest, and legs of the deceased which show and prove that the kerosene oil fell on her after bursting of kerosene stove.

6. Learned counsel further submitted that so called dying declaration cannot be relied upon, as first part of it is contradictory to the second part.

7. In the present case, Usha Devi (PW-6), mother of the deceased and Subedar Sapattar Singh (PW-8), father of the deceased are the material witnesses.

8. Usha Devi (PW-6), in her deposition stated that Manju, her daughter was married to the accused Pradeep Kumar on 20th June, 1995. In the evening of 1st March, 1996 at about 7 p.m. Jal Singh came to her and told her that the health of Manju was not proper and that she was admitted in Medical College Hospital, Rohtak. She reached Medical College Hospital, Rohtak around 12/12.30 a.m. In the Hospital the accused Pradeep Kumar and Santosh met her and told that Manju had received burns from a stove. When she went to see her daughter, Manju told her that she had got up around 5.30 a.m. when the accused Pradeep Kumar doused her in kerosene and set her on fire. She then stayed with her daughter, who died on 12th March, 1996. She stated that she did not know whether her daughter ever made a statement to the Magistrate. She further stated that her daughter had told her that there used to be quarrel in the family as the accused used to demand for Rs.1 lakh for running a piggery farm.

8.1. In her examination-in-chief, Usha Devi (PW-6), mother of the deceased deposed that when she reached the Hospital to see her daughter, the accused and other persons were present there so her daughter could not disclose anything to her. The Police did not record her statement so long she was admitted in the Medical College Hospital, Rohtak. She further stated that on 24th March, 1996 she had stated before the Police that her daughter Manju had told her that she received burn injuries from stove. Earlier she had a statement before Police on 13th March, 1996 wherein she stated that she had faith in the statement of Manju made before the Magistrate. She denied the suggestion that she had deposed before the Police that her daughter told her that she received burn injuries on account of bursting of stove. However, when she was confronted with portion A to A in Ex.DA it was found to have been so recorded.

9. Subedar Sapattar Singh (PW-8), stated that on 3rd March, 1996, he received a telephonic call from his wife from Rohtak that his daughter had been burnt and that he should come immediately. After obtaining leave from his Company Commander, he came to Rohtak by the evening of 4th March, 1996. He talked to his daughter (deceased). She told him that she had already made a statement to the Magistrate which should be accepted by them. When he talked to his daughter in the absence of others she told him that she and her husband wanted to open a piggery farm, and that Santosh Devi came to their house and told Pardeep Kumar-accused to obtain a sum of rupees one lakh from his father-in-law i.e. himself and that he should not apply for a loan. Pardeep at the instance of Santosh pressurized his wife (deceased) and also abused her physically in order to coerce her to meet the demand. PW.8 further stated that on 20th January, 1996, he received a letter from his daughter stating that the accused wanted a colour television. In the month of January his daughter and Pradeep came to his house and his daughter told him that she needed her Matriculation Certificate as she had to apply for a loan for piggery farm. She told that mother of Pradeep did not provide food to her. On 12th, his daughter died and on 13th the dead body was taken to village Ardana because the people from Ardana were in large number and in Rohtak he himself and his wife were only present.

9.1. During the cross-examination, Sapattar Singh (PW-8), stated that on 4th March, 1996 his daughter did not tell anything beyond the fact that she had already made a statement before the Magistrate which should be accepted by them. He remained with his daughter from 4th March, 1996 till her death. During this period no police officer met him. Police came to the Medical College Hospital on 13th March, 1996 and he made a statement before the Police.

10. Shri A.K. Bimal, CJM, Rohtak in his deposition stated that on 2nd March, 1996, ASI, Jai Prakash moved an application Ex.PA to him to record the statement of Manju wife of Pradeep Kumar, who was admitted in the Medical College Hospital, Rohtak. He proceeded to the Hospital and reached there at about 2 p.m. He obtained the opinion of the Doctor regarding the fitness of the patient. The Doctor gave his opinion Ex.PA/1 that the patient was fit to make a statement. Thereupon, he recorded the statement of Manju alias Uma Devi - EX.PB. It was read out to her and she gave thumb mark on it in token of its correctness. The Doctor attending upon the patient gave his endorsement Ex.PB/1 that the patient remained fit to make statement throughout the period of making the statement. After recording the statement he allowed a copy of it to be taken by the Police and made his endorsement Ex.PB/2 in this connection. The patient was identified by the Doctor attended upon the patient. The patient had made two statements at the same time. Both these statements were made by her in sequence and were recorded at the same time one after the other.

10.1. In his cross-examination, CJM stated that after recording of the first part of the statement when he asked the patient to put her thumb impression the patient told him that she wanted to make a truthful statement provided he did not say to anybody else. He asked the patient to put her signatures. But she was not in a position to put her signatures, therefore, her thumb impressions were taken.

11. Ex.PA is the dying declaration which reads as follows:

Copy of writing in as under:

Q. Are you married?

Ans. I am married and having pregnancy of 7 month. After getting myself examined in ultra-sound, I have come to know that the foetus has been smashed.

Q. How many years of your marriage have passed?

Ans. My marriage was performed on 20.6.95.

Q. How you caught fire?

Ans. Yesterday at 5.30/6.00 a.m. I started preparing tea outside the varandah. My husband was sleeping in the last room. When the pump of stove was pressed to air and match stock was lit on, the stove at once got burst and the terrycot suit worn by me caught fire and when I raised alarm

RO& AC Sd/- C.J.M.

2.3.1996

Again said my statement be recorded again, because this statement was tutored to me by my husband. Now I want to make the statement again. You may not show the statement to anybody.

Q. What happened with you?

Ans. A dispute was going on with my husband for the last 10/15 days and he used to beat me and used to remain at the house and was doing nothing. One day my husband tried to hang me to death and demanded Rs.One Lakh from my parents otherwise he would hang me to death. He first tried to burn me in the night and when in the morning at 5.30 a.m. I went to bathroom he sprinkled the oil on the clothes from my back side and lit on the match stick and rushed towards inside. I raised noise upon which other persons saved me. Thereafter, my husband came there. He torn my clothes at the spot. I have been brought to Rohtak because I had been told that I shall narrate all this to the police. My mother-in-law prepares the meals herself. She prepares meals for my sister-in-law but she does not provide meals to me.

Q. Why did you make wrong statement earlier?

Ans. I was made to understand to make such statement.

Q. Are you literate?

Ans. Yes. I am matriculate.

RO & AC.

R.T.I. of Manju

Certified that patient remained fit throughout her statement.

Sd/-A.K. Vimal,
S.J.M. Rohtak,
2.3.96 at 2.30 P.M.

11.1. On going through the dying declaration, we find that the second part of dying declaration inspires confidence so as to consider it to be a dying declaration of the deceased. The first part of the dying declaration is tutored by the accused-husband as apparent from the said part of the dying declaration.

12. Dr. S.S. Dahiya (PW-7) conducted postmortem examination on the dead body of Manju wife of 
Pradeep Kumar. He stated that there was superficial to deep burns all over the body except face scalp, both legs and feet and a part of left upper arm. Pockets of pus were preset at some places. Liver spleen kidneys and both lungs were congested. In his opinion the cause of death in this case was burns which were ante-mortem in ordinary cause of events. Probable time that elapsed between injury and death was within few hours to few days and between death and postmortem was about 24 hours.

12.1. In his cross-examination, Dr. S.S.Dahiya (PW-7) stated that since the body of the deceased had been burnt it was unlikely that marks of the other injuries could be seen. If the deceased was sitting in front of the stove and the stove got burst she could have received injuries on her face and scalp which were not there in this case. He agreed with the suggestion that if kerosene was poured from behind the deceased and she was put on fire there would be injuries on the back side of the deceased. It is possible that the deceased could receive burn injuries if on account of pinning of the stove the oil and the flame left from the stove but in that case also the face and scalp should have been burnt which was not there in this case.

13. On going through the dying declaration, we have held that the second part of dying declaration inspires confidence so as to consider it to be a dying declaration of the deceased. The first part of dying declaration is tutored by the accused-husband as apparent from the said part of the dying declaration.


14. Usha Devi (PW-6), mother of the deceased-Manju stated that Manju had told her that there was a quarrel in the family because the accused had been making a demand of Rs. One lakh for running a piggery farm. Manju had also sent a letter to her father making a demand of Rs.5,000/-. Letter is Ex.PJ.


15. Sapattar Singh (PW-8), father of the deceased has also deposed with regard to the demand of the appellant. Although, appellant donated blood to save the life of his wife but it was of no use as it was too late. The deceased in the dying declaration stated that her husband had stated that he would hang her to death if his demand for Rs.1 lakh is not met by her parents and on 1st March, 1996, her husband tried to hang her. The appellant had initially tried to set her on fire during the night and when in the morning at 5.30 a.m. she went to bathroom he sprinkled the oil on the clothes from her back side and set her on fire. She categorically stated that earlier part of the statement was made at the instigation of her husband. The deceased had no reason to falsely implicate her husband particularly when she had suffered from burn injury.

16. From the aforesaid, evidence of Sapattar Singh (PW-8) and dying declaration, we find that there was a demand of dowry and harassment soon before the death.

17. For the purpose of Section 304-B IPC, a presumption can be raised only on the proof of the following essentials:

(a) Death of a woman took place within seven years of her marriage.

(b) Such death took place not under normal circumstances.

(c) The woman was subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or his relatives.

(d) Such cruelty or harassment was for, or in connection with, any demand for dowry and

(e) Such cruelty or harassment was soon before her death.

18. The expression soon before her death used in the substantive Section 304-B IPC and 113-B of the Evidence Act was considered by this Court in Hira Lal & Others v. State (Govt. of NCT), Delhi JT 2003 (6) SC 195 : 2003 (8) SCC 80, which reads as follows:

8. Section 304-B IPC which deals with dowry death, reads as follows:

304-B. Dowry death.- (1) Where the death of a woman is caused by any burns or bodily injury or occurs otherwise than under normal circumstances within seven years of her marriage and it is shown that soon before her death she was subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or any relative of her husband for, or in connection with, any demand for dowry, such death shall be called dowry death, and such husband or relative shall be deemed to have caused her death.

Explanation.-For the purpose of this sub-section, dowry shall have the same meaning as in Section 2 of the Dowry Prohibition Act, 1961 (28 of 1961).

(2) Whoever commits dowry death shall be punished with imprisonment for a term which shall not be less than seven years but which may extend to imprisonment for life.

The provision has application when death of a woman is caused by any burns or bodily injury or occurs otherwise than under normal circumstances within seven years of her marriage and it is shown that soon before her death she was subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or any relatives of her husband for, or in connection with any demand for dowry. In order to attract application of Section 304-B IPC, the essential ingredients are as follows:

(i) The death of a woman should be caused by burns or bodily injury or otherwise than under a normal circumstance.

(ii) Such a death should have occurred within seven years of her marriage.

(iii) She must have been subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or any relative of her husband.

(iv) Such cruelty or harassment should be for or in connection with demand of dowry.

(v) Such cruelty or harassment is shown to have been meted out to the woman soon before her death.

Section 113-B of the Evidence Act is also relevant for the case at hand. Both Section 304-B IPC and Section 113-B of the Evidence Act were inserted as noted earlier by Dowry Prohibition (Amendment) Act 43 of 1986 with a view to combat the increasing menace of dowry deaths. Section 113-B reads as follows:

113-B. Presumption as to dowry death.-When the question is whether a person has committed the dowry death of a woman and it is shown that soon before her death such woman had been subjected by such person to cruelty or harassment for, or in connection with, any demand for dowry, the Court shall presume that such person had caused the dowry death.

Explanation.-For the purposes of this section, dowry death shall have the same meaning as in Section 304-B of the Indian Penal Code (45 of 1860).

The necessity for insertion of the two provisions has been amply analysed by the Law Commission of India in its 21st Report dated 10-8-1988 on Dowry Deaths and Law Reform. Keeping in view the impediment in the pre-existing law in securing evidence to prove dowry-related deaths, the legislature thought it wise to insert a provision relating to presumption of dowry death on proof of certain essentials. It is in this background that presumptive Section 113-B in the Evidence Act has been inserted. As per the definition of dowry death in Section 304-B IPC and the wording in the presumptive Section 113-B of the Evidence Act, one of the essential ingredients, amongst others, in both the provisions is that the woman concerned must have been soon before her death subjected to cruelty or harassment for or in connection with the demand of dowry. Presumption under Section 113-B is a presumption of law. On proof of the essentials mentioned therein, it becomes obligatory on the court to raise a presumption that the accused caused the dowry death. The presumption shall be raised only on proof of the following essentials:

(1) The question before the court must be whether the accused has committed the dowry death of the woman. (This means that the presumption can be raised only if the accused is being tried for the offence under Section 304-B IPC.)

(2) The woman was subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or his relatives.

(3) Such cruelty or harassment was for or in connection with any demand for dowry.

(4) Such cruelty or harassment was soon before her death.

19. In the present case, it is not in dispute that marriage took place on 20th June, 1995. Manju, wife of the accused Pradeep Kumar got burnt on 1st March, 1996 and died on 12th March, 1996 within nine months of her marriage. Death of Manju was caused by burns i.e. otherwise than under normal circumstances. It has already been seen that soon before her death she was subjected to cruelty and harassment in connection with demand of dowry. All the five ingredients were proved by the prosecution. Under Section 113-B of the Evidence Act when a question arises whether a person committed dowry death and it is proved that the death of woman took place within seven years of marriage; such death took place not under normal circumstances and soon before the death deceased was subjected to cruelty or harassment by such person for or in connection with any demand for dowry, the Court shall presume that such person had caused the dowry death. The prosecution having successfully proved the dowry death, the Trial Court and the High Court correctly held the accused Pradeep Kumar guilty of the offence under Section 304B.

20. Section 498-A IPC reads as follows:

498A. Husband or relative of husband of a woman subjecting her to cruelty.- Whoever, being the husband or the relative of the husband of a woman, subjects such woman to cruelty shall be punished with imprisonment for a term which may extend to three years and shall also be liable to fine.

Explanation.-For the purpose of this section, cruelty means-

(a) any wilful conduct which is of such a nature as is likely to drive the woman to commit suicide or to cause grave injury or danger to life, limb or health (whether mental or physical) of the woman; or

(b) harassment of the woman where such harassment is with a view to coercing her or any person related to her to meet any unlawful demand for any property or valuable security or is on account of failure by her or any person related to her to meet such demand.

21. In the present case, on the basis of the evidence of Subedar Sapattar Singh (PW-8) and dying declaration, it can be clearly concluded that the Trial Court and the High Court rightly held that the accused Pradeep Kumar had subjected Manju to harassment as defined under Clause (b) of explanation to Section 498-A.

22. In view of the aforesaid observation and finding, we find no ground to interfere with impugned judgment. In absence of any merit, the appeal is dismissed. Bail bond stands cancelled. Appellant is directed to be taken into custody forthwith to serve the remainder period of sentence.

**********', 1] , 
[ 'HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAWS
Evidence Act, 1872
Section 113B - Penal Code, 1860, Sections 304B and 498A - Presumption under Section 113B, when can be invoked. Held, to invoke the presumption prosecution has to prove that deceased lady was subjected to cruelty or harassment for or in connection with dowry demand by accused soon before her death. This means that prosecution has to substantiate the ingredients of offences under Sections 498A and 302 IPC. Failure to prove this beyond reasonable doubt, cannot be condoned. Shindo Alias Sawinder Kaur JT 2011 (6) SC 364, Rajeev Kumar JT 2013 (14) SC 357, K. Prema S. Rao JT 2002 (8) SC 502, referred. (Para 35)
HELD
Proof of cruelty or harassment by the husband or her relative or the person charged is thus the sine qua non to inspirit the statutory presumption, to draw the person charged within the coils thereof. If the prosecution fails to demonstrate by cogent coherent and persuasive evidence to prove such fact, the person accused of either of the above referred offences cannot be held guilty by taking refuge only of the presumption to cover up the shortfall in proof. (Para 33)

Penal Code, 1860
Sections 304B, 498A - Evidence Act, Section 113B - Dowry death within 7 years of marriage - Deceased found hanging in matrimonial home - Alleged demand for motorcycle, did not surface at the time of finalisation of marriage - This fact conceded by PW5, mother of deceased - Allegedly demand made after marriage and persisted for two years - No complaint made to police - Complaint of harassment founded on confidential communications to parents only and not supported by any other quarter - On the other hand, evidence of defence witnesses found to be consistent - Appellants No.1 was living separately from in-laws - As per DW 3, sister in-law of deceased, deceased abandoned the matrimonial home for her affair with son of a sarpanch - According to DW4, who had given his daughter in marriage to same family, he never encountered any demand for dowry. Held, prosecution has failed to prove the charges. Factum of unnatural death in matrimonial home within seven years of marriage is ipso facto not sufficient to convict accused under Sections 304B and 498A IPC. Further it was not established if death was suicidal or homicidal. Cause of external injuries was not proved. Hence benefit of doubt goes to accused. Trial courts order of acquittal, restored.
HELD
Tested on the judicially adumbrated parameters as above, we are of the unhesitant opinion that the prosecution has failed to prove beyond reasonable doubt, cruelty or harassment to the deceased for or in connection with any demand for dowry as contemplated in either of the two provisions of the Code under which the accused persons had been charged. Noticeably, the alleged demand centers around a motorcycle, which as the evidence of the prosecution witnesses would evince, admittedly did not surface at the time of finalization of the marriage. PW-5, the mother of the deceased has even conceded that there was no dowry demand at that stage. According to her, when the husband (who is dead) had insisted for a motorcycle thereafter he was assured that he would be provided with the same, finances permitting. Noticeably again, the demand, as sought to be projected by the prosecution, if accepted to be true had lingered for almost two years. Yet admittedly, no complaint was made thereof to anyone, far less the police. Apart from the general allegations in the same tone ingeminated with parrot like similarity by the prosecution witnesses, the allegation of cruelty and harassment to the deceased is founded on the confidential communications by her to her parents in particular and is not supported by any other quarter. (Para 36)

To the contrary, the evidence of the defence witnesses is consistent to the effect that no demand as imputed had ever been made as the family of the husband was adequately well-off and further the appellant No.1 Baijnath had been living separately from before the marriage. According to them there was no occasion for any quarrel/confrontation or unpleasantness in the family qua this issue. Significant is also the testimony of DW-3, the sister-in-law of the deceased who indicated abandonment of the matrimonial home by her with the son of Thoran Singh, the Sarpanch of the village for which she understandably had incurred the displeasure of the in-laws. DW-4, the father of DW-3 who had given his daughter in marriage in the same family had deposed that he did not ever encounter any demand for dowry. The testimony of the prosecution witnesses PW-3 and PW-7 fully consolidate the defence version. (Para 37)

A cumulative consideration of the overall evidence on the facet of dowry, leaves us unconvinced about the truthfulness of the charge qua the accused persons. The prosecution in our estimate, has failed to prove this indispensable component of the two offences beyond reasonable doubt. The factum of unnatural death in the matrimonial home and that too within seven years of marriage therefore is thus ipso facto not sufficient to bring home the charge under Sections 304B and 498A of the Code against them. (Para 38)

The predicament of the prosecution is compounded further by the by its failure to prove, the precise cause of the death of the deceased. It is not clear as to whether the death has been suicidal or homicidal. It is also not proved beyond doubt, the origin and cause of the external injuries. Though the obscurity of the causative factors is due to the putrefaction of the body, the benefit of the deficiency in proof, logically would be available to the persons charged. (Para 39)

Penal Code, 1860
Sections 304B, 498A - Provisions and their ingredients, stated. (Paras 27, 28)

Evidence Act
Section 113B - Statutory Presumption as to dowry death, stated. (Para 31)

CASES REFERRED
1.Rajeev Kumar v. State of Haryana JT 2013 (14) SC 357 (Para 35)

2.Shindo Alias Sawinder Kaur and another v. State of Punjab JT 2011 (6) SC 364 (Para 35)

3.K. Prema S. Rao v. Yadla Srinivasa Rao JT 2002 (8) SC 502 (Para 35)

AMITAVA ROY, J.

1. The appellants, the in-laws of the deceased Saroj Bai, being aggrieved by the conversion of their acquittal into conviction by the High Court under Sections 498A and 304B of the Indian Penal Code (for short hereinafter referred to as the Code) seek defeasance of this verdict in the present appeal.

2. Heard Mr. Siddhartha Dave, learned counsel for the appellants and Mr. Naveen Sharma, learned counsel for the respondent.

3. The genesis of the prosecution case lies in the information lodged by appellant Baijnath, the elder brother of the appellant No.2, Shivraj, the father-in-law of the deceased. The information disclosed that on 09.06.1996 at about 8 p.m. the family had dinner together and after watching television, retired to the respective rooms for the night. The deceased was married to Rakesh, son of appellant No.2. According to the informant, in the next morning she was found dead, hanging from the fan by a ligature.

4. On this information Merg No.20/1996 was registered with the Chanderi Police Station and on the completion of the investigation charge-sheet was laid against the appellants together with Rakesh, husband of the deceased and Prem Bai, wife of the appellant No.1 under Sections 302, 304B, 498A, 201 read with Section 34 of the Code. According to the prosecution, the investigation revealed that the husband of the deceased along with the appellants had been demanding dowry and in pursuit thereof had subjected the deceased to harassment and torture in the proximate past of the incident.

5. At the trial, the learned Additional Sessions Judge concerned framed charges against the accused persons under Sections 304B and 498A of the Code, which were denied by the accused persons. Subsequent thereto Rakesh committed suicide on 09.06.1998 by consuming poison and therefore he was deleted from the array of the persons indicted.

6. The prosecution at the trial examined 12 witnesses including the Investigating Officer and the 
Doctor who had performed the postmortem examination. The defence, after the recording of the statements of the appellants under Section 313 Cr.P.C., examined 4 witnesses.

7. The Trial Court on an exhaustive assessment of the evidence adduced, acquitted the accused persons of the charges against which the respondent/State preferred appeal before the High Court. The impugned decision has been rendered thereby upturning the acquittal.

8. The learned Trial Court while recording the admitted fact of marriage between the deceased and 
Rakesh and also that the incident had occurred in the matrimonial home of the wife within 7 years of the alliance, dismissed the evidence with regard to demand of motorcycle in dowry and the imputation of torture, cruelty and harassment as projected by the prosecution and thus exonerated the accused persons of the charges levelled holding that in the attendant materials on record, the statutory presumption as envisaged in Section 113B of the Evidence Act, 1892 (hereinafter referred to as the Act, 1892) was not available for invocation.

9. The High Court however being of the opinion that the deceased had died an unnatural death in suspicious circumstances in her matrimonial home within 7 years of marriage and that the same was preceded by persistent demands for a motorcycle as dowry in marriage accompanied by cruelty, returned the finding of guilt against the appellants but exonerated Prem Bai, the wife of appellant No.1 i.e. Baijnath. It accepted the evidence adduced by the prosecution qua the charge of dowry demand, harassment and cruelty in connection therewith and applied the deeming prescription/statutory presumption contained in Section 304B of the Code and Section 113B of Act, 1892.

10. The learned counsel for the appellants has in this backdrop insistently urged that the evidence in support of the charge of demand for a motorcycle as dowry in marriage by the husband and his family members being patently inadequate and unconvincing to furnish the ingredient relating thereto qua the charges levelled against the appellants, their conviction is utterly unsustainable and if allowed to stand would amount to travesty of justice. According to Mr. Dave, the imperative essentials of Sections 498A and 304B of the Code not having been proved, the High Court had fallen in error in applying the deeming edict/statutory presumption mandated by Section 304B of the Code and Section 113B of Act, 1892 in converting their acquittal to conviction. The learned counsel contended that as the medical evidence as well did not disclose with certainty the cause of death-homicidal or suicidal, there was as such no incriminating evidence on record to prove the culpability of the appellants. As not only the testimony of the prosecution witnesses with regard to demand for a motorcycle as dowry in marriage is visibly inconsistent, mutilating each other, the defence evidence to the contrary formidably establish the falsity of this charge, he urged. According to Mr. Dave the analysis of the evidence on record by the High Court has been erroneous leading to findings not borne out by the materials on record and thus are indefensible in any view of the matter warranting the acquittal of the appellants.

11. In emphatic refutation, the learned counsel for the respondent has argued that as admittedly the unfortunate incident had occurred within seven years of marriage in the matrimonial home and that too in suspicious circumstances, all the prerequisites of the offences under Sections 498A and 304B were proved beyond reasonable doubt and thus the impugned decision does not merit interference. The learned Trial Court did err in evaluating the evidence in the correct perspectives and the High Court having undertaken a painstaking review thereof, the findings arrived at by it, following a proper appreciation of the materials on record are not only valid in law but also in the exigent espousal of the cause of justice.

12. After outlining the rival submissions as above, it is considered expedient next to take a synopsised stock of the evidence adduced by the parties, so as to facilitate a better comprehension of the facets of the lis and the desired adjudication.

13. PW-1 Kundan Singh, the uncle of the deceased, deposed that the families of the accused persons were joint and that at the marriage, cash and other valuables were gifted to the in-laws of the deceased and that the ceremony was solemnized without any hassle. The witness however referred to a grievance being expressed later on by the deceased alleging that she was being harassed by her husband Rakesh and the appellants as well as Prem Bai, the wife of appellant No.1 relating to the demand of motorcycle in dowry. The witness also referred to another occasion where a similar complaint had been made by the deceased to him. He claimed to have seen the dead body of the deceased hanging from the fan.

14. In cross-examination, this witness deposed about a demand for motorcycle at the time of marriage but however conceded that no complaint was made to the police for such demand at any point of time. He denied the suggestion that the deceased had committed suicide as because her fidelity to her husband was being questioned in the face of her love affairs with the son of one Thoran Singh, the Sarpanch of the village.

15. PW-2 Jahar Singh, the father of the deceased mentioned about the demand for a motorcycle by the husband and the in-laws of the deceased at the time of the marriage and also the harassment in connection therewith suffered by the deceased as reported by her to him. The witness also referred to the same demand by the husband in the year 1996 on the occasion of Chowk Vidai, a ritual, whereupon he was assured that as and when it would be financially feasible, the same would be arranged. This witness as well stated that though the demand for the motorcycle was being made since the time of marriage in the year 1994, no complaint was made by him with regard thereto to anybody. When confronted with his statement in course of the investigation, he admitted of the omission in the disclosure that the deceased had confided in him about such demand during her limited stay at the matrimonial home and the harassment and mal-treatment in connection therewith. He denied the suggestion that the deceased had eloped with the son of Thoran Singh and that as a result there was a confrontation between him with the family of Thoran Singh. He also denied the suggestion that in view of this episode there was unpleasantness in the family of the in-laws of the deceased for which they had some reservation in accommodating her in the nuptial house.

16. PW-3 Jhulla, who at the relevant time was the Sarpanch of the village deposed that the deceased had committed suicide and that when he visited the spot, he did not see any injury on her body.

17. In cross-examination, he clarified that the appellant No.1 was living separately from the in-laws of the deceased from before the marriage. He also mentioned that the accused persons were held in high esteem in the village and used to behave decently with their daughter-in-law. He also stated that he had not heard about any demand of dowry made by the accused persons.

18. PW-4 Narayan Singh, a neighbour did mention about the demand of a motorcycle in dowry at the time of marriage and that the deceased had disclosed to her father about harassment meted out to her by the appellants and Prem Bai in connection therewith. In cross-examination the witness testified that there was no demand for dowry before the marriage and that there was no report with regard thereto to the police.

19. PW-5 Prembai, the mother of the deceased testified that no dowry was fixed before the marriage and no demand was made by the accused persons but they still offered Rs.1 lac to them. She stated that her son-in-law while dining made a demand for motorcycle which according to the witness was assured as and when the finances would be available. This witness deposed that even after two years of marriage, the appellants repeated the said demand to which a similar assurance was again given.

20. In cross-examination, this witness admitted that before the marriage no demand for motorcycle 
had been made as dowry, though she mentioned about the complaints made by the deceased to her about harassment by the accused persons for not providing the bike. She admitted that no complaint in this regard was ever made and the relations as well were not informed about the treatment suffered by the deceased.

21. PW-7 Jahar Singh did state about a demand of motorcycle made by Rakesh, the husband of the deceased.

22. PW-8 Gyasibai, a neighbour deposed that the deceased had committed suicide and that when she visited the place of occurrence, she did not notice any injury mark on her body. In cross-examination the witness stated that the deceased did never speak to her about the demand and testified that the in-laws did treat her properly and that there was no confrontation at any point of time.

23. PW-11 Manish Kapuria, the Investigating Officer narrated the steps taken by him in course of the inquisition and mentioned amongst others about the preparation of the panchnama of the dead body. Though this witness stated that the whole exercise was videographed, he admitted that the same had not been produced as evidence. He claimed to have seen two ligature marks on the neck of the deceased.

24. PW-12 Dr. R.P. Sharma, who had performed the postmortem examination, stated to have identified contusion on the right cheek, middle of left side of neck and middle of left parietal region in the dead body. According to him, the ligature mark was found to be ante-mortem in nature. He also mentioned that the 3 contusions were ante-mortem but opined that the ligature mark was postmortem in occurrence. On an overall assessment however, the witness stated that as at the time of autopsy the body had started putrefying, no opinion as to the cause of death could be given. In cross-examination the witness admitted that the dead body did not wear any other injury other than those mentioned.

25. The witnesses of the defence, namely, DW-1 Gaya Prasad, DW-2 Munna, DW-3 Har Kunwar Bai and DW-4 Sirnam Singh in unison testified that there was no demand for dowry or motorcycle ever made by the husband of the deceased or her in-laws. They further stated that the appellant No.1 Baijnath had been residing separately from the in-laws of the deceased from before the marriage. According to them, the family of the in-laws of the deceased was sufficiently well-off and did enjoy appreciable reputation in the society. These witnesses were all neighbours of the appellants.

26. DW-3 Har Kunwar Bai, in addition stated that the deceased had during her marriage eloped with the son of Pradhan of the Village Chitara and that in the night of the incident she was with her, watching television before they parted for their respective rooms to sleep. This witness is the daughter-in-law of appellant No.2 and asserted that neither she nor the deceased had ever been harassed in the family.

27. The evidence on record and the competing arguments have received our required attention. As the prosecution is on the charge of the offences envisaged in Sections 304B and 498A of the Code, the provisions for reference are extracted hereunder:

304B. Dowry death.-(1) Where the death of a woman is caused by any burns or bodily injury or occurs otherwise than under normal circumstances within seven years of her marriage and it is shown that soon before her death she was subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or any relative of her husband for, or in connection with, any demand for dowry, such death shall be called dowry death, and such husband or relative shall be deemed to have caused her death.

Explanation. - For the purpose of this sub-section, dowry shall have the same meaning as in section 2 of the Dowry Prohibition Act, 1961 (28 of 1961).

(2) Whoever commits dowry death shall be punished with imprisonment for a term which shall not be less than seven years but which may extend to imprisonment for life.

498A. Husband or relative of husband of a woman subjecting her to cruelty.-Whoever, being the husband or the relative of the husband of a woman, subjects such woman to cruelty shall be punished with imprisonment for a term which may extend to three years and shall also be liable to fine.

Explanation.-For the purpose of this section, cruelty means-

(a) any wilful conduct which is of such a nature as is likely to drive the woman to commit suicide or to cause grave injury or danger to life, limb or health (whether mental or physical) of the woman; or

(b) harassment of the woman where such harassment is with a view to coercing her or any person related to her to meet any unlawful demand for any property or valuable security or is on account of failure by her or any person related to her to meet such demand.

28. Whereas in the offence of dowry death defined by Section 304B of the Code, the ingredients thereof are:

(i) death of the woman concerned is by any burns or bodily injury or by any cause other than in normal circumstances and

(ii) is within seven years of her marriage and

(iii) that soon before her death, she was subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or any relative of the husband for, or in connection with, any demand for dowry.

the offence under Section 498A of the Code is attracted qua the husband or his relative if she is subjected to cruelty. The explanation to this Section exposits cruelty as:

(i) any wilful conduct which is of such a nature as is likely to drive the woman to commit suicide or to cause grave injury or danger to life, limb or health (whether mental or physical) or

(ii) harassment of the woman, where such harassment is with a view to coercing her or any person related to her to meet any unlawful demand for any property or valuable security or is on account of failure by her or any person related to her to meet such demand.

29. Patently thus, cruelty or harassment of the lady by her husband or his relative for or in connection with any demand for any property or valuable security as a demand for dowry or in connection therewith is the common constituent of both the offences.

30. The expression dowry is ordained to have the same meaning as in Section 2 of the Dowry Prohibition Act, 1961. The expression cruelty, as explained, contains in its expanse, apart from the conduct of the tormentor, the consequences precipitated thereby qua the lady subjected thereto. Be that as it may, cruelty or harassment by the husband or any relative of his for or in connection with any demand of dowry to reiterate is the gravamen of the two offences.

31. Section 113B of the Act enjoins a statutory presumption as to dowry death in the following terms:

113B. Presumption as to dowry death. - When the question is whether a person has committed the dowry death of a woman and it is shown that soon before her death such woman has been subjected by such person to cruelty or harassment for, or in connection with, any demand for dowry, the Court shall presume that such person had caused the dowry death.

Explanation. - For the purpose of this section, dowry death shall have the same meaning as in section 304B of the Indian Penal Code (45 of 1860)

32. Noticeably this presumption as well is founded on the proof of cruelty or harassment of the woman dead for or in connection with any demand for dowry by the person charged with the offence. The presumption as to dowry death thus would get activated only upon the proof of the fact that the deceased lady had been subjected to cruelty or harassment for or in connection with any demand for dowry by the accused and that too in the reasonable contiguity of death.

32.1. Such a proof is thus the legislatively mandated prerequisite to invoke the otherwise statutorily ordained presumption of commission of the offence of dowry death by the person charged therewith.

33. A conjoint reading of these three provisions, thus predicate the burden of the prosecution to unassailably substantiate the ingredients of the two offences by direct and convincing evidence so as to avail the presumption engrafted in Section 113B of the Act against the accused. Proof of cruelty or harassment by the husband or her relative or the person charged is thus the sine qua non to inspirit the statutory presumption, to draw the person charged within the coils thereof. If the prosecution fails to demonstrate by cogent coherent and persuasive evidence to prove such fact, the person accused of either of the above referred offences cannot be held guilty by taking refuge only of the presumption to cover up the shortfall in proof.

34. The legislative imprimatur of relieving the prosecution of the rigour of the proof of the often practically inaccessible recesses of life within the guarded confines of a matrimonial home and of replenishing the consequential void, by according a presumption against the person charged, cannot be over-eased to gloss-over and condone its failure to prove credibly, the basic facts enumerated in the Sections involved, lest justice is the casualty.

35. This Court while often dwelling on the scope and purport of Section 304B of the Code and Section 113B of the Act have propounded that the presumption is contingent on the fact that the prosecution first spell out the ingredients of the offence of Section 304B as in Shindo Alias Sawinder Kaur and another v. State of Punjab JT 2011 (6) SC 364 and echoed in Rajeev Kumar v. State of Haryana JT 2013 (14) SC 357. In the latter pronouncement, this Court propounded that one of the essential ingredients of dowry death under Section 304B of the Code is that the accused must have subjected the woman to cruelty in connection with demand for dowry soon before her death and that this ingredient has to be proved by the prosecution beyond reasonable doubt and only then the Court will presume that the accused has committed the offence of dowry death under Section 113B of the Act. It referred to with approval, the earlier decision of this Court in K. Prema S. Rao v. Yadla Srinivasa Rao JT 2002 (8) SC 502 to the effect that to attract the provision of Section 304B of the Code, one of the main ingredients of the offence which is required to be established is that soon before her death she was subjected to cruelty and harassment in connection with the demand for dowry.

36. Tested on the judicially adumbrated parameters as above, we are of the unhesitant opinion that the prosecution has failed to prove beyond reasonable doubt, cruelty or harassment to the deceased for or in connection with any demand for dowry as contemplated in either of the two provisions of the Code under which the accused persons had been charged. Noticeably, the alleged demand centers around a motorcycle, which as the evidence of the prosecution witnesses would evince, admittedly did not surface at the time of finalization of the marriage. PW-5, the mother of the deceased has even conceded that there was no dowry demand at that stage. According to her, when the husband (who is dead) had insisted for a motorcycle thereafter he was assured that he would be provided with the same, finances permitting. Noticeably again, the demand, as sought to be projected by the prosecution, if accepted to be true had lingered for almost two years. Yet admittedly, no complaint was made thereof to anyone, far less the police. Apart from the general allegations in the same tone ingeminated with parrot like similarity by the prosecution witnesses, the allegation of cruelty and harassment to the deceased is founded on the confidential communications by her to her parents in particular and is not supported by any other quarter.

37. To the contrary, the evidence of the defence witnesses is consistent to the effect that no demand as imputed had ever been made as the family of the husband was adequately well-off and further the appellant No.1 Baijnath had been living separately from before the marriage. According to them there was no occasion for any quarrel/confrontation or unpleasantness in the family qua this issue. Significant is also the testimony of DW-3, the sister-in-law of the deceased who indicated abandonment of the matrimonial home by her with the son of Thoran Singh, the Sarpanch of the village for which she understandably had incurred the displeasure of the in-laws. DW-4, the father of DW-3 who had given his daughter in marriage in the same family had deposed that he did not ever encounter any demand for dowry. The testimony of the prosecution witnesses PW-3 and PW-7 fully consolidate the defence version.

38. A cumulative consideration of the overall evidence on the facet of dowry, leaves us unconvinced about the truthfulness of the charge qua the accused persons. The prosecution in our estimate, has failed to prove this indispensable component of the two offences beyond reasonable doubt. The factum of unnatural death in the matrimonial home and that too within seven years of marriage therefore is thus ipso facto not sufficient to bring home the charge under Sections 304B and 498A of the Code against them.

39. The predicament of the prosecution is compounded further by the by its failure to prove, the precise cause of the death of the deceased. It is not clear as to whether the death has been suicidal or homicidal. It is also not proved beyond doubt, the origin and cause of the external injuries. Though the obscurity of the causative factors is due to the putrefaction of the body, the benefit of the deficiency in proof, logically would be available to the persons charged.

40. In all, tested on the overall scrutiny of the evidence as a whole, in our comprehension, the conviction of the accused persons including the appellants herein on the basis of the materials on record would not be out of risk. To reiterate, the prosecution has failed to prove the crucial ingredient of cruelty and harassment by direct and cogent evidence thereby disentitling itself to the benefit of the statutory presumption available under Section 113B of the Act.

41. Whereas the analysis of the evidence by the Trial Court, in our view, has been in the proper perspectives, factual and legal and thus the findings recorded by it are valid, the High Court based its determination substantially on presumptive inferences taking the aid of Section 113B of the Act, divorced from the attendant facts and the evidence with regard thereto. We are thus of the opinion, that the conclusions of the High Court do not constitute a plausible view on the materials on record and cannot be sustained.

42. The appellants thus in view of the evaluation made hereinabove are entitled to the benefit of doubt. The appeal is allowed. The impugned judgment and order is set-aside. The appellants are hereby ordered to be set at liberty forthwith if not wanted in connection with any other case. Let the records of the Trial Court be remitted immediately for the needful.

**********', 1] , 
[ 'CASES REFERRED
1.Ramesh Panjiyar v. State of Bihar JT 2005 (2) SC 218 (Para 14)

2.Dhian Singh & Anr. v. State of Punjab JT 2004 (7) SC 212 (Para 17)

3.Kanas Raj v. State of Punjab & Ors. JT 2000 (5) SC 223 (Para 16)

4.State of Punjab v. Iqbal Singh AIR 1991 SC 1532 (Para 12)

M.Y. EQBAL, J.

1. This appeal by special leave is directed against the judgment and order dated 17th February, 2010 of the High Court of Punjab and Haryana in Criminal Appeal No. 1006-SB of 1998 whereby learned Judge of the High Court dismissed the appeal preferred by the appellant challenging the judgment of conviction/sentence passed by the trial court.

2. The prosecution version in a nutshell is that marriage of Manju Bala was solemnized with Dinesh, appellant-accused about four years before her death. Dowry in accordance with their financial capacity was given by her parents at the time of marriage. However, appellant and his two brothers, namely Vinod Kumar and Rakesh, were not satisfied with the dowry and started harassing her for not bringing dowry to their satisfaction. Although, mediators also requested accused persons not to harass the deceased Manju Bala, their requests fell flat. It has also been alleged that the accused persons, appellant and his two brothers, did not permit the parents of Manju Bala to meet her for the past several months prior to the death.

3. Manju Bala was carrying a pregnancy of about eight months when accused Vinod went to the house of her parents on the fateful day i.e. on 7.6.1994 and informed them that Manju Bala was seriously ill. When Manju Balas father Ram Naresh and brother Raman were going to the house of accused persons for seeing her, they noticed accused Dinesh and his mother carrying Manju Bala in a tractor to Civil Hospital Fatehabad. Driver of the tractor ignored their signal to stop tractor. On arriving at Civil Hospital, they learnt that Manju Bala had died before reaching the Hospital. Munni Bai - mother of the deceased suspected that her daughter was murdered by her husband Dinesh and his brothers, namely Vinod and Rakesh, for not satisfying their demand for dowry. On her statement, FIR No.441 dated 8.6.1994 under section 498-A and 304-B, Indian Penal Code (in short IPC) was registered in the Police Station, Fatehabad and all the three accused were arrested. On finding a prima facie case under aforesaid sections, the accused persons were charge sheeted.

4. In order to prove its case, the prosecution examined nine witnesses and closed the evidence. Factum of marriage between Manju Bala and Dinesh was admitted when the accused persons were examined under Section 313, Cr.P.C. However, it was denied that Manju Bala was ever harassed for bringing dowry. Accused controverted the allegations and claimed that they had good relations with Manju, who at the time of first delivery developed complication and child died. Thereafter, when she was about to deliver child, she again developed complication and resultantly she died. During trial, the accused examined three witnesses in their defence.

5. The Trial Court after concluding the trial found the charge under Sections 498-A and 304-B, IPC framed against accused Dinesh proved. The Trial Court opined that the prosecution failed to prove the charges under aforesaid sections against the other two accused Vinod and Rakesh and accordingly acquitted them of the charge. The Additional Sessions Judge convicted Dinesh and sentenced him to undergo RI for one year under Section 498-A and to pay a fine of Rs.500/-. In default of payment of fine, the accused-appellant was further directed to undergo RI for six months. He was further sentenced to undergo RI for ten years under Section 304-B, IPC. Both the sentences were ordered to run concurrently.

6. Aggrieved by the judgment and order of the Trial Court, appellant approached the High Court preferring Criminal Appeal No. 1006 of 1998. After hearing learned counsel for the parties and going through the essential ingredients of Section 304-B, IPC, learned Judge of the High Court dismissed the appeal observing that there is evidence with regard to the factum of persisting demand of dowry and on account of failure to meet the demand for dowry, Manju Bala was compelled to commit suicide within a period of four years of marriage, though the precise date of her marriage is not in evidence but both sides admitted that marriage was solemnized about four years prior to her death.

7. We have gone through the judgment passed by Trial Court and also by the Appellate Court. Both the Courts on appreciation of entire evidence came to the conclusion that the prosecution has proved the charges against the appellant. The High Court while affirming the judgment of the Trial Court has considered the provision of Section 304-B, I.P.C. and Section 113-B of the Indian Evidence Act. The High Court relied upon the evidences of PWs.1, 2 and 5 to come to the conclusion that there had been persistent demand for dowry and also the complainant was not allowed to meet the deceased and further the death was caused by the consumption of oreganophosphorus compound, which conclusively establishes the appellant guilty under Section 304-B of the Indian Penal Code. The High Court further recorded the findings that the totality of evidence reveal persisting demand for dowry and on the failure of the complainant to meet the demand, the deceased was compelled to commit the suicide within the period of four years of marriage.

8. Assailing the impugned judgment of conviction, Mr. Rishi Malhotra, learned counsel appearing for the appellant, firstly contended that in absence of evidence that the deceased soon before her death was subjected to cruelty, the conviction of the appellant under Section 304-B, IPC cannot at all be sustained. Learned counsel also submits that Munni Bai, mother of the deceased, who was examined as PW-1 deposed that she was not aware about the reason of the death of the deceased. The witness was declared hostile by the prosecution and during her cross-examination she categorically admitted that the police did not record her statement according to her narration. Learned counsel has further drawn our attention to the evidence of these witnesses on cross examination where she was confronted with the fact of alleged demand for dowry where the witness admitted that she had not stated before the police that accused were demanding T.V. and a golden chain. Learned counsel contended that PW-2 Rakesh Kumar, who was one of the mediators in the said marriage, wrongly stated that the alleged demand for dowry by the accused persons were made approximately four years before the date of occurrence. On the basis of these evidence, learned counsel contended that the courts below without looking into the various material contradictions have passed the impugned order of conviction. Learned counsel submitted that the High Court completely overlooked the most essential ingredient i.e. soon before her death the deceased must have subjected to cruelty or harassment in connection with demand for dowry. Lastly, it was contended that even admitting the evidence on record the demand, if any, was made about four years before the death of the deceased even then by no stretch of imagination it can be held that soon before her death the deceased was subjected to cruelty or harassment in connection with the demand for dowry.

9. Per contra, Mr. Rakesh Kumar, learned counsel appearing for the prosecution, has supported the impugned judgment by drawing our attention to the material evidence brought on record by the prosecution.

10. Before we discuss the facts in evidence brought on record, we wish to discuss the relevant provisions which are involved in this case. As noticed, the appellant is convicted under Section 304-B of I.P.C. The said section reads as under:-

304-B- Where the death of a woman is caused by any burns or bodily injury or occurs otherwise than under normal circumstances within seven years of her marriage and it is shown that soon before her death she was subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or any relative of her husband for, or in connection with, any demand for dowry, such death shall be called dowry death, and such husband or relative shall be deemed to have caused her death.

Explanation.- For the purposes of this sub- section,dowry shall have the same meaning as in section 2 of the Dowry Prohibition Act, 1961 (28 of 1961).

(2) Whoever commits dowry death shall be punished with imprisonment for a term which shall not be less than seven years but which may extend to imprisonment for life.

11. Another relevant provision which needs to be discussed is Section 113-B of the Indian Evidence Act, 1872. The said provision is quoted hereinbelow:-

113-B. Presumption as to dowry death.- When the question is whether a person has committed the dowry death of a woman and it is shown that soon before her death such woman had been subjected by such person to cruelty or harassment for, or in connection with, any demand for dowry, the court shall presume that such person had caused the dowry death.

Explanation.-- For the purposes of this section, dowry death shall have the same meaning as in section 304B of the Indian Penal Code.

12. These two provisions in Indian Penal Code and Indian Evidence Act have been inserted by the Dowry Prohibition (Amendment) Act, 1986 with a view to combating the increasing menace of dowry death. The legislative intent of enacting these provisions is to curb the menace of dowry death. This Court while considering the legislative intent in the case of State of Punjab v. Iqbal Singh AIR 1991 SC 1532 observed as under:-

8. The legislative intent is clear to curb the menace of dowry deaths, etc., with a firm hand. We must keep in mind this legislative intent. It must be remembered that since crimes are generally committed in the privacy of residential homes and in secrecy, independent and direct evidence is not easy to get. That is why the legislature has by introducing Sections 113-A and 113-B in the Evidence Act tried to strengthen the prosecution hands by permitting a presumption to be raised if certain foundational facts are established and the unfortunate event has taken place within seven years of marriage. This period of seven years is considered to be the turbulent one after which the legislature assumes that the couple would have settled down in life. If a married women is subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or his family members Section 498-A, IPC would be attracted. If such cruelty or harassment was inflicted by the husband or his relative for, or in connection with, any demand for dowry immediately preceding death by burns and bodily injury or in abnormal circumstances within seven years of marriage, such husband or relative is deemed to have caused her death and is liable to be punished under Section 304-B, IPC. When the question at issue is whether a person is guilty of dowry death of a woman and the evidence discloses that immediately before her death she was subjected by such person to cruelty and/or harassment for, or in connection with, any demand for dowry, Section 113-B, Evidence Act provides that the court shall presume that such person had caused the dowry death. Of course if there is proof of the person having intentionally caused her death that would attract Section 302, IPC. Then we have a situation where the husband or his relative by his wilful conduct creates a situation which he knows will drive the woman to commit suicide and she actually does so, the case would squarely fall within the ambit of Section 306, IPC. In such a case the conduct of the person would tantamount to inciting or provoking or virtually pushing the woman into a desperate situation of no return which would compel her to put an end to her miseries by committing suicide.

13. If we read the aforementioned two provisions i.e. Section 304-B, IPC and Section 113-B of the Evidence Act, it is evident that the prosecution must have brought on record the materials to show that soon before her death the victim was subjected to cruelty or harassment.

14. In the case of Ramesh Panjiyar v. State of Bihar JT 2005 (2) SC 218 : 2005 (2) SCC 388, this Court held that the prosecution has to rule out the possibility of a natural or incidental death so as to bring it within the purview of Death occurring otherwise than in the normal circumstances. The expression soon before is very relevant where Section 113-B of the Evidence Act and Section 304-B, IPC are pressed into service. Hence, the prosecution is obliged to show that soon before the occurrence there was cruelty or harassment only attracting the provision of Section 113-B.

15. The expression soon before is a relative term as held by this Court, which is required to be considered under the specific circumstances of each case and no straight jacket formula can be laid down by fixing any time of allotment. It can be said that the term soon before is synonyms with the term immediately before. The determination of the period which can come within term soon before is left to be determined by courts depending upon the facts and circumstances of each case.

16. In the case of Kanas Raj v. State of Punjab & Ors. JT 2000 (5) SC 223 : 2000 (5) SCC 207, it was held that in case of dowry death the circumstances showing the existence of cruelty or harassment to the deceased are not restricted to a particular instances but normally refer to a course of conduct. Such conduct may be spread over a period of time. If the cruelty or harassment or demand of dowry is shown to have persisted, it shall be deemed to be soon before death.

17. Prima facie we are of the view that neither definite period has been indicted in the aforementioned section nor the expression soon before has been defined. In the case of Dhian Singh & Anr. v. State of Punjab JT 2004 (7) SC 212 : 2004 (7) SCC 759, this Court held that:-

The contention of the appellants counsel is that even if it is proved that there was cruelty on account of demand of dowry, such cruelty shall be soon before the death and there must be proximate connection between the alleged cruelty and the death of the deceased. It is true that the prosecution has to establish that there must be nexus between the cruelty and the suicide and the cruelty meted out must have induced the victim to commit suicide. The appellant has no case that there was any other reason for her to commit suicide. The evidence shows that the first appellant had demanded dowry and he had sent her away from his house and only after mediation she was taken back to the appellants house and death happened within a period of two months thereafter. These facts clearly show that the suicide was the result of the harassment or cruelty meted out to the deceased. The presumption under Section 113-B of the Indian Evidence Act could be invoked against the appellant and the Sessions Court rightly found the appellant guilty of the offence punishable under Section 304-B IPC and Section 201 IPC.

18. Coming to the facts of the present case, it has been sufficiently proved that the death was caused due to consumption of oreganophosphorus compound which is a pesticide. Dr. S.P. Mimani and Dr. S.P. Dadich (PW-9) conducted postmortem examination on the dead body of the deceased. They collected viscera including parts of stomach, intestine, lung, kidney and blood. On examination of the viscera it was found containing oreganophosphorus compound which is a poisonous substance. In the opinion of Dr. S.P. Mimani (PW-9) the death was caused by the aforementioned compound. Admittedly, the marriage was solemnised before four years from the date of occurrence. The defence of the accused that the death was caused due to some complication developed at the advanced stage of pregnancy, is without any basis. The mother of the deceased, who was examined as PW-1, deposed that at the time of marriage dowry was paid as per their financial position. After the marriage the deceased Manju Bala visited her paternal home and informed her parents that her husband Dinesh and his brothers Vinod Kumar and Rakesh were ill-treating her for not bringing television and gold chain in dowry. This was brought to the notice of Suresh and Rakesh, who acted as mediators at the time of settlement of marriage proposal and requested the accused persons not to harass the deceased but they did not heed to it. PW-1 further deposed that the accused person did not allow them to meet their daughter. The evidence of PW- 1 was corroborated by Ram Naresh (PW-5), who also reiterated that the accused persons were demanding television and a gold chain and the deceased was subjected to cruelty for not bringing enough dowry. PW-5 further deposed that when he went to the house of accused persons at the time of marriage of his brother Vinod, he was again reminded that he should come to their house only after giving television and gold chain. From the evidence of other witnesses, it is sufficiently established that there had been persistent demand for dowry from the side of the accused persons and for non-fulfilment of their demand the deceased Manju Bala was being subjected to cruelty and harassment. Because of persistent demand for dowry and continuous torture, harassment and cruelty meted out on the deceased Manju Bala, she died by consuming pesticide.

19. Considering the evidence referred to hereinbefore and the conduct of the accused persons, there cannot be any difficulty in holding that the deceased died because of cruelty, harassment and demand for dowry. We are also of the considered opinion that there is a proximate connection between cruelty, harassment and death of the deceased as discussed above. There are sufficient materials showing that the accused persons started demanding television and gold chain etc. after the marriage and that their demand continued and the parents were not allowed to meet their daughter unless their demands were fulfilled.

20. In the facts and circumstances of the case, both the Sessions Court and the High Court have come to the correct finding that the accused is guilty of offence under Section 304-B of the IPC and that the presumption contained in Section 113-B of the Evidence Act is fully applicable to the facts of the case.

21. In our considered opinion, therefore, the judgment of conviction passed by the courts below needs no interference by this Court. Hence, there is no merit in this appeal and is accordingly dismissed. The appellant shall be taken into custody forthwith to serve the remaining sentence.

**********', 1] , 
[ 'CROSS CITATION
2014 AIR (SC) 2555
2014 (9) SCC 645
HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAWS
Penal Code, 1860
Section 304B - Evidence Act, 1872, Sections 3, 113B - Conviction under - Evidence - Appreciation - Death of wife within 7 years of marriage - Presumption of dowry death - When can be raised. Principles stated. Kaliaperumals case referred. Sunil Bajajs case relied upon with Hira Lals, Balwant Singhs cases.
HELD
A presumption of dowry death and under Section 113B of Evidence Act can be raised only on proof of the following essentials:

(a) Death of the woman was caused by burns or bodily injury or occurs otherwise than under normal circumstances.

(b) Such death took place within seven years of her marriage.

(c) The woman was subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or his relatives.

(d) Such cruelty or harassment was for, or in connection with, any demand for dowry and

(e) Such cruelty or harassment was soon before her death. (Para 17)

Sections 304B, 498A - Evidence Act, 1872, Sections 3, 113B - Conviction under - Evidence - Appreciation - Death by burning within 5 years of marriage - Statement of complainant/ mother of deceased, not specific but general in nature - No specific incident indicating cruelty by accused - Statement not reliable or trustworthy - Trial Court did not record conviction under 498A. Held that prosecution has failed to establish its case. Accused acquitted.
HELD
Raj Rani (PW.1), mother of the deceased- Darshana @Phullan stated that the accused married her daughter about five years back. The accused used to harass her daughter on account of inadequacy of dowry and used to make demands for cash. According to PW-1, the accused made a demand of Rs. 10,000/- which she could not meet. All the accused persons used to give beatings to Darshana @ Phullan and she was pressurized to bring more items of dowry while sufficient dowry was given to the accused at the time of marriage. Initially for about eight days, the accused kept her daughter nicely but thereafter she used to be harassed and beaten by the accused repeatedly. During the life time of father of the deceased, he used to meet the dowry demands of the appellant. The deceased used to complain that her husband was not allowing her to stay in the matrimonial home unless some payments were made and the complainant (PW.1) had been paying her money and used to sent her back to the matrimonial house by meeting the demands of the appellant. (Para 5)

During the cross-examination, she stated that she made the statement before the police that till the death of her husband, he was meeting the demands of the accused through her daughter and used to give money and other articles. During the cross-examination, she further stated that she was informed by Jindu, her father-in-law that the deceased was being beaten by her husband after consuming liquor and that she wanted the matter to be settled once for all. When confronted with the statement-EX.P.D. it was found that no such statement was given before the police. Her statement that her maternal uncle was also present, when confronted with Ex.P.D., it was not found recorded. Jindu, father-in-law of PW.1 also did not support the case of the prosecution. Therefore, he was declared hostile. (Para 8)

Admittedly, death of the deceased was due to burning i.e. not in normal circumstances. (Para 20)

The statement of the complainant PW.1 is general and not specific. No specific incidence has been indicated suggesting the cruelty or harassment made by the accused-Manohar Lal. Her statement is not reliable and not trustworthy. Though the allegation of demand of dowry was made none of the witnesses including PW.1 stated that the deceased was harassed soon before her death for or in connection with demand of dowry. The accused appellant was charge-sheeted under Sections 498-A and 304-B IPC but the Trial Court has not convicted the accused under Section 498-A. In this background, we are of the opinion that the prosecution has miserably failed to prove that the accused harassed the deceased soon before her death for or in connection with a demand of dowry. (Para 21)

CASES REFERRED
1.Balwant Singh and Another v. State of Punjab 2004 (7) SCC 724 (Para 19.1.)

2.Hira Lal & Others v. State (Govt. of NCT), Delhi JT 2003 (6) SC 195 (Para 19)

3.Kaliaperumal v. State of Tamil Nadu JT 2003 (7) SC 392 (Para 17.1.)

4.Sunil Bajaj v. State of M.P. JT 2001 (8) SC 465 (Para 18)

SUDHANSU JYOTI MUKHOPADHAYA, J.

1. This appeal is directed against the judgment dated 26th March, 2007 passed by the High Court of Punjab and Haryana at Chandigarh in Criminal Appeal No.529-SB of 1994. By the impugned judgment the High Court dismissed the appeal and upheld the conviction and sentence of the appellant under Section 304B IPC for which he stands sentenced to undergo RI for seven years.

2. The case of the prosecution is that Phullan @ Darshana, (deceased) was married to the accused-Manohar Lal about 5 years prior to her death which took place on 27th August, 1991. She was subjected to harassment for dowry and finally she died on account of burn injuries. Raj Rani (PW-1), mother of the deceased on learning about the incident, went to Civil Hospital and found the victim dead. Thereafter she made statement (Exh.PD) before the Police at 12.05 P.M. on 28th August, 1991, on the basis of which FIR was registered. Apart from the appellant, his brothers Krishan Lal, Harbans Lal, his father Gopal Dass, mother Shanti and wife of the brother Smt. Champa were also made accused.

2.1. ASI Surat Kant (PW.9) investigated the case and recorded the D.D.R.-Ex. P.M. on the statement of Hans Raj (PW.8) and Sat Pal. He then alongwith the above-said persons went to the house where the death took place and prepared the inquest report -Ex.P.H./1. He took into possession one pipi-Ex. P.7, steel bowl -Ex. P-8, burnt match sticks Ex.P.9 to Ex.P.11 and half burnt piece of cloth alongwith some cash. .After sealing the same into separate parcels with the seal of SK, vide recovery memo Ex. P.N. attested by PWs site plan-Ex.P.O. was also prepared by him with correct marginal notes. Photographs of the dead body were also taken by Swaran Kumar (PW.7). The dead body was sent to the Civil Hospital, through constable Krishan Lal, for post-mortem examination. On the next day, Raj Rani (PW.1) made her statement -Ex.P.D. on which endorsement -Ex.PD/1 was made and on the basis of which formal FIR -Ex.P.D./2 was recorded by ASI- Ram Krishna. Krishan Lal, Constable produced before him one pair of ear rings of gold which were made into a parcel and sealed with the seal SK and taken into possession vide recovery memo Ex.P.P.. The accused were arrested on 30th August, 1991 and dowry articles were recovered and were taken into possession vide memo Ex.P.O. Complainant-Raj Rani (PW.1) also produced before him the list of Kanayadan Mark A. After completion of the investigation, all the accused were charge-sheeted for offence under Section 498-A /34 IPC and Section 304B/34 IPC, to which the accused pleaded not guilty and claimed trial.

3. The prosecution examined altogether nine witnesses and placed on record the documentary evidence. Defence also produced Ram Prakash as defence witness. The Trial Court after hearing the parties and on appreciation of evidence by the judgment dated 25th August, 1994 convicted the appellant for the offence punishable under Section 304B IPC and sentenced him to undergo RI for seven years. The rest of the accused i.e. his brothers Krishan Lal, Harbans Lal, his father Gopal Dass, mother Shanti and wife of the brother Smt. Champa were acquitted by the Trial Court on the ground that they were all residing separately at a far place from the place of occurrence where deceased was living with the appellant.

4. Learned counsel for the appellant made the following submissions:

(a) There was inordinate delay of twenty hours in lodging FIR.

(b) The prosecution failed to prove that accused harassed the deceased soon before the death for or in connection with the demand of dowry.

(c) Satpal, son of Bodha Ram and Puran Chand in their statements under Section 174 Cr.P.C. did not say anything about cruelty on account of demand of dowry.

(d) The accused Manohar Lal married with Darshana @ Phoolan eight years prior to her death. Therefore, provisions of Section 304B IPC is not attracted in this case.

5. Raj Rani (PW.1), mother of the deceased- Darshana @Phullan stated that the accused married her daughter about five years back. The accused used to harass her daughter on account of inadequacy of dowry and used to make demands for cash. According to PW-1, the accused made a demand of Rs. 10,000/- which she could not meet. All the accused persons used to give beatings to Darshana @ Phullan and she was pressurized to bring more items of dowry while sufficient dowry was given to the accused at the time of marriage. Initially for about eight days, the accused kept her daughter nicely but thereafter she used to be harassed and beaten by the accused repeatedly. During the life time of father of the deceased, he used to meet the dowry demands of the appellant. The deceased used to complain that her husband was not allowing her to stay in the matrimonial home unless some payments were made and the complainant (PW.1) had been paying her money and used to sent her back to the matrimonial house by meeting the demands of the appellant.

6. One day prior to the last Rakhi festival, Jindu Ram-father-in-law of PW.1 went to the house of in-laws of Darshana@Phullan to meet her and on his return, Jindu Ram (father-in-law of PW.1) informed her that Darshana @ Phullan told that she was beaten by the accused after taking liquor and it was not possible for her to live in the matrimonial house. This information was given to PW.1 by her father-in-law in presence of her maternal uncle Devi Lal.

7. She further stated that about 8-9 months after the rakhi festival, her daughter-Darshana @ Phullan died. She had been killed by her-in-laws. She then came to Yamuna Nagar and saw the dead body of her daughter having external injuries on her dead person which appeared to have been caused on being strangulated. Policed recorded the statement of PW.1 and took thumb impression which was marked as Ext.PD. The above statement is not supported by any evidence and contradictory to post-mortem report, which shows that the death was due to shock resulting from burns.

8. During the cross-examination, she stated that she made the statement before the police that till the death of her husband, he was meeting the demands of the accused through her daughter and used to give money and other articles. During the cross-examination, she further stated that she was informed by Jindu, her father-in-law that the deceased was being beaten by her husband after consuming liquor and that she wanted the matter to be settled once for all. When confronted with the statement-EX.P.D. it was found that no such statement was given before the police. Her statement that her maternal uncle was also present, when confronted with Ex.P.D., it was not found recorded. Jindu, father-in-law of PW.1 also did not support the case of the prosecution. Therefore, he was declared hostile.

9. PW.5 -Smt. Usha Rani, neighbor of the deceased also did not support the story of the prosecution. 
Therefore, she was also declared hostile.

10. PW.3 -Dr.N.K.Garg had conducted post-mortem examination of deceased-Darshana @Phullan on 28th August, 1991 at 12.30 P.M. Dr. A.K. Gupta was also present with PW.3. Carbon copy of post-mortem report indicates that death was due to shock resulting from burns. PW.4 -Om Parkash, draftsman had prepared the site plan -Ex.P.J. of the place of occurrence.

11. PW.5-Usha Rani as stated above, informed that Manohar Lal was residing with his wife-Darshana @ Phullan and she did not know how deceased-Darshana @ Phullan was treated by her husband. In her cross-examination, she stated that when she asked, the deceased told her that husband had beaten her. But she did not state the specific date of the incident. PW.5 was also declared hostile.

12. PW.6-Ram Mehar Singh, Constable tendered his affidavit Ex.P.M. in evidence. PW.7-Sarwan Kumar- Photographer went to the house of accused-Manohar Lal and took three photographs- Ex.P.1 to Ex.P.3 and the positives are Ex.P.4 to Ex.P.6. PW.8-Hans Raj alongwith Sat Pal saw smoke coming out from the house of Manohar Lal. They went there and saw that one girl was lying burning. They went to police post and lodged report Ex.P.M. Then they came back with the police and were asked by the police to go to the village Antawa to inform the parents of the accused that their Bahu had died. Then they went there and informed accordingly.

13. PW.9-ASI Surat Kant, Investigating Officer supported the prosecution story and submitted the report of FSL as evidence Ex.P.R.

14. After closing of the prosecution evidence, the accused were examined under Section 313 Cr.P.C. on all the material particulars appearing against them. Accused-Manohar Lal admitted his marriage with the deceased. He denied the other allegations against him. He took specific plea that he had separated from his parents just after the marriage and was living at Yamuna Nagar. He pleaded innocence and stated that for the last 4 or 5 years, he was working with Prakash Transport as driver and was living happily with his wife. A daughter was also born out of their wedlock. He never made any demand of dowry and never maltreated the deceased- Darshana @ Phullan. He also stated that his wife-deceased Darshana @ Phullan got her cousin sister Santosh engaged with his brother Kishan about 2 years prior to the incident. About 2 ï¿½ months before the incident, his brother refused to accept the proposal of relationship due to which relations between his in-laws and his parents became strained. They stopped visiting his parents and his parents also stopped visiting his in-laws. On the day of occurrence, he was away and on return in the evening he found his wife dead. He alleged that his in-laws were demanding money which he did not give, and as a result, false case of dowry-death got registered against him.

15. In defence, the accused produced Ram Prakash, owner of Prakash Transport. He stated that on 26th August, 1991, accused-Manohar Lal was employed with him as driver of a truck and went to Kaithal. He came back at 5.00 P.M. and told him about the incident. He handed over the accused-Manohar Lal to the police.

16. Section 304B IPC relates to dowry death and reads as follows:

304B. Dowry death.- (1) Where the death of a woman is caused by any burns or bodily injury or occurs otherwise than under normal circumstances within seven years of her marriage and it is shown that soon before her death she was subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or any relative of her husband for, or in connection with, any demand for dowry, such death shall be called dowry death, and such husband or relative shall be deemed to have caused her death. Explanation.-For the purpose of this sub-section, dowry shall have the same meaning as in section 2 of the Dowry Prohibition Act, 1961 (28 of 1961).

(2) Whoever commits dowry death shall be punished with imprisonment for a term which shall not be less than seven years but which may extend to imprisonment for life.

17. For the purpose of the said Section, a presumption can be raised only on proof of the following essentials:

(a) Death of the woman was caused by burns or bodily injury or occurs otherwise than under normal circumstances.

(b) Such death took place within seven years of her marriage.

(c) The woman was subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or his relatives.

(d) Such cruelty or harassment was for, or in connection with, any demand for dowry and

(e) Such cruelty or harassment was soon before her death.

17.1. In this connection, we may refer decision of this Court in Kaliaperumal v. State of Tamil Nadu JT 2003 (7) SC 392.

18. In Sunil Bajaj v. State of M.P. JT 2001 (8) SC 465, this Court held:

5. We have given our attention and consideration to the submissions made by the learned counsel for the parties. Normally this Court will be slow and reluctant, as it ought to be, to upset the order of conviction of the trial court as confirmed by the High Court appreciating the evidence placed on record. But in cases where both the courts concurrently recorded a finding that the accused was guilty of an offence in the absence of evidence satisfying the necessary ingredients of an offence, in other words, when no offence was made out, it becomes necessary to disturb such an order of conviction and sentence to meet the demand of justice. In order to convict an accused for an offence under Section 304-B IPC, the following essentials must be satisfied:

(1) the death of a woman must have been caused by burns or bodily injury or otherwise than under normal circumstances;

(2) such death must have occurred within 7 years of her marriage;

(3) soon before her death, the woman must have been subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or by relatives of her husband;

(4) such cruelty or harassment must be for or in connection with demand of dowry.

6. It is only when the aforementioned ingredients are established by acceptable evidence such death shall be called dowry death and such husband or his relative shall be deemed to have caused her death. It may be noticed that punishment for the offence of dowry death under Section 304-B is imprisonment of not less than 7 years, which may extend to imprisonment for life. Unlike under Section 498-A IPC, husband or relative of husband of a woman subjecting her to cruelty shall be liable for imprisonment for a term which may extend to three years and shall also be liable to fine. Normally, in a criminal case the accused can be punished for an offence on establishment of commission of that offence on the basis of evidence, maybe direct or circumstantial or both. But in case of an offence under Section 304-B IPC, an exception is made by deeming provision as to nature of death as dowry death and that the husband or his relative, as the case may be, is deemed to have caused such death, even in the absence of evidence to prove these aspects but on proving the existence of the ingredients of the said offence by convincing evidence. Hence, there is need for greater care and caution, that too having regard to the gravity of the punishment prescribed for the said offence, in scrutinizing the evidence and in arriving at the conclusion as to whether all the above-mentioned ingredients of the offence are proved by the prosecution. In the case on hand, the learned counsel for the appellant could not dispute that the first two ingredients mentioned above are satisfied.

19. The expression soon before her death used in the Section 304B IPC and Section 113B of the Evidence Act was considered by this Court in Hira Lal & Others v. State (Govt. of NCT), Delhi JT 2003 (6) SC 195, which reads as under:

8. Section 304-B IPC which deals with dowry death, reads as follows:

304-B. Dowry death.-(1) Where the death of a woman is caused by any burns or bodily injury or occurs otherwise than under normal circumstances within seven years of her marriage and it is shown that soon before her death she was subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or any relative of her husband for, or in connection with, any demand for dowry, such death shall be called dowry death, and such husband or relative shall be deemed to have caused her death.

Explanation.-For the purpose of this sub-section, dowry shall have the same meaning as in Section 2 of the Dowry Prohibition Act, 1961 (28 of 1961).

(2) Whoever commits dowry death shall be punished with imprisonment for a term which shall not be less than seven years but which may extend to imprisonment for life.

The provision has application when death of a woman is caused by any burns or bodily injury or occurs otherwise than under normal circumstances within seven years of her marriage and it is shown that soon before her death she was subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or any relatives of her husband for, or in connection with any demand for dowry. In order to attract application of Section 304-B IPC, the essential ingredients are as follows:

(i) The death of a woman should be caused by burns or bodily injury or otherwise than under a normal circumstance.

(ii) Such a death should have occurred within seven years of her marriage.

(iii) She must have been subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or any relative of her husband.

(iv) Such cruelty or harassment should be for or in connection with demand of dowry.

(v) Such cruelty or harassment is shown to have been meted out to the woman soon before her death. Section 113-B of the Evidence Act is also relevant for the case at hand. Both Section 304-B IPC and Section 113-B of the Evidence Act were inserted as noted earlier by Dowry Prohibition (Amendment) Act 43 of 1986 with a view to combat the increasing menace of dowry deaths. Section 113-B reads as follows:

113-B. Presumption as to dowry death.-When the question is whether a person has committed the 
dowry death of a woman and it is shown that soon before her death such woman had been subjected 
by such person to cruelty or harassment for, or in connection with, any demand for dowry, the Court shall presume that such person had caused the dowry death.

Explanation.-For the purposes of this section, dowry death shall have the same meaning as in Section 304-B of the Indian Penal Code (45 of 1860).

The necessity for insertion of the two provisions has been amply analysed by the Law Commission of India in its 21st Report dated 10-8-1988 on Dowry Deaths and Law Reform. Keeping in view the impediment in the pre-existing law in securing evidence to prove dowry-related deaths, the legislature thought it wise to insert a provision relating to presumption of dowry death on proof of certain essentials. It is in this background that presumptive Section 113-B in the Evidence Act has been inserted. As per the definition of dowry death in Section 304-B IPC and the wording in the presumptive Section 113-B of the Evidence Act, one of the essential ingredients, amongst others, in both the provisions is that the woman concerned must have been soon before her death subjected to cruelty or harassment for or in connection with the demand of dowry. Presumption under Section 113-B is a presumption of law. On proof of the essentials mentioned therein, it becomes obligatory on the court to raise a presumption that the accused caused the dowry death. The presumption shall be raised only on proof of the following essentials:

(1) The question before the court must be whether the accused has committed the dowry death of the woman. (This means that the presumption can be raised only if the accused is being tried for the offence under Section 304-B IPC.)

(2) The woman was subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or his relatives.

(3) Such cruelty or harassment was for or in connection with any demand for dowry.

(4) Such cruelty or harassment was soon before her death.

19.1. Similar observation was made by this Court in Balwant Singh and Another v. State of Punjab 
2004 (7) SCC 724. In the said case this Court held:

10. These decisions and other decisions of this Court do lay down the proximity test. It has been reiterated in several decisions of this Court that soon before is an expression which permits of elasticity, and therefore the proximity test has to be applied keeping in view the facts and circumstances of each case. The facts must show the existence of a proximate live link between the effect of cruelty based on dowry demand and the death of the victim.

20. In the present case, from the statement of PW.1 it appears that the death took place within seven years of marriage. Admittedly, death of the deceased was due to burning i.e. not in normal circumstances. We have to see now whether the remaining two ingredients are satisfied looking into the evidence on record.

21. The statement of the complainant PW.1 is general and not specific. No specific incidence has been indicated suggesting the cruelty or harassment made by the accused-Manohar Lal. Her statement is not reliable and not trustworthy. Though the allegation of demand of dowry was made none of the witnesses including PW.1 stated that the deceased was harassed soon before her death for or in connection with demand of dowry. The accused appellant was charge-sheeted under Sections 498-A and 304-B IPC but the Trial Court has not convicted the accused under Section 498-A. In this background, we are of the opinion that the prosecution has miserably failed to prove that the accused harassed the deceased soon before her death for or in connection with a demand of dowry.

22. For the reasons aforesaid, the judgment passed by the Trial Court dated 26th August, 1994 as upheld by the High Court by impugned judgment dated 26th March, 2007, cannot be upheld. They are accordingly set aside. The accused-Manohar Lal is acquitted from the charge under Section 304B IPC. The appeal is allowed. Bail Bonds, if any, stand discharged.

**********', 1] , 
[ 'HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAWS
Indian Penal Code, 1860
Sections 304B and 498A - Evidence Act, 1872 - Section 113B - Dowry Prohibition Act, 1961 - Section 2 - Dowry death - Presumption as to dowry death - Objective of introduction of the provisions - Essential ingredients of the offence - Burden of proving cruelty or harassment - Unnatural death of married woman within a few months of the marriage - Deceased found dead in the bed with marks of strangulation on both sides of neck and blood oozing from mouth - No evidence to show that the death was natural - Doctor opining that the possible cause of death was not ascertainable - Evidence establishing demand of dowry and ill treatment to the deceased shortly before the date of occurrence - Trial court convicting husband under Section 304B and sentencing him to ten years imprisonment - High Court upholding the conviction but reducing the sentence to 7 years. Held since the evidence in record clearly established the commission of the offence by the accused his conviction and modified sentence imposed by High Court called for no interference. Appeal therefore dismissed.
HELD
In order to attract application of Section 304B IPC, the essential ingredients are as follows:-

(i) The death of a woman should be caused by burns or bodily injury or otherwise than under a normal circumstance.

(ii) Such a death should have occurred within seven years of her marriage.

(iii) She must have been subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or any relative of her husband.

(iv) Such cruelty or harassment should be for or in connection with demand of dowry.

(v) Such cruelty or harassment is shown to have been meted out to the woman soon before her death. (Para 9)

A conjoint reading of Section 113B of the Evidence Act and Section 304B IPC shows that there must be material to show that soon before her death, the victim was subjected to cruelty or harassment. Prosecution has to rule out the possibility of a natural or accidental death so as to bring it within the purview of the death occurring otherwise than in normal circumstances. The expression soon before is very relevant where Section 113B of the Evidence Act and Section 304B IPC are pressed into service. Prosecution is obliged to show that soon before the occurrence there was cruelty or harassment and only in that case presumption operates. Evidence in that regard has to be led by prosecution. Soon before is a relative term and it would depend upon circumstances of each case and no strait-jacket formula can be laid down as to what would constitute a period of soon before the occurrence. It would be hazardous to indicate any fixed period, and that brings in the importance of a proximity test both for the proof of an offence of dowry death as well as for raising a presumption under Section 113B of the Evidence Act. The expression soon before her death used in the substantive Section 304B IPC and Section 113B of the Evidence Act is present with the idea of proximity test. No definite period has been indicated and the expression soon before is not defined. A reference to expression soon before used in Section 114. Illustration (a) of the Evidence Act is relevant. It lays down that a Court may presume that a man who is in the possession of goods soon after the theft, is the thief who has received the goods knowing them to be stolen, unless he can account for his possession. The determination of the period which can come within the term soon before is left to be determined by the Courts, depending upon facts and circumstances of each case. Suffice, however, to indicate that the expression soon before would normally imply that the interval should not be much between the concerned cruelty or harassment and the death in question. There must be existence of a proximate and live-link between the effects of cruelty based on dowry demand and the concerned death. If alleged incident of cruelty is remote in time and has become stale enough not to disturb mental equilibrium of the woman concerned, it would be of no consequence. (Para 10)

In the instant case, great stress has been laid on the opinion of the doctor that possible cause of death was not ascertainable. As noted by the trial Court and the High Court, black stained rough skin on both sides of neck was found. It has also been noticed by the doctor who conducted the post-mortem examination that blood stained fluid was trickling from the side of mouth and brain matters were found congested. The doctor unfortunately did not consider the effect of the marks on the neck and trickling of blood stained fluid from the mouth. The I.O. (PW-9) had seized a blood stained pillow. There was no evidence that the death was due to normal reasons. Evidence of PWs 1, 3 and 6 amply established demand of dowry and ill treatment of the deceased shortly before the date of occurrence. The trial Court and the High Court were justified in drawing the conclusion about guilt of the accused. Though attempt was made to show that had the accused been guilty he along with family members would not have tried to get treatment for the deceased. The reason for this is not far too seek. The accused person and others were trying to create a smoke screen. If the death was normal as claimed by the accused, nothing was brought on record to explain injuries on the neck of the deceased. The evidence on record clearly establishes the commission of offence by the accused. Therefore, the conviction and the modified sentence as imposed by the High Court do not suffer from any infirmity to warrant interference. (Para 14)

CASES REFERRED
1.Satvir Singh v. State of Punjab JT 2001 (8) SC 208 (Para 13)

2.Akula Ravinder and others v. The State of Andhra Pradesh AIR 1991 SC 1142 (Para 11)

ARIJIT PASAYAT, J.

1. Leave granted.

2. Marriages are made in heaven, is an adage. A bride leaves the parental home for the matrimonial home, leaving behind sweet memories therewith a hope that she will see a new world full of love in her grooms house. She leaves behind not only her memories, but also her surname, gotra and maidenhood. She expects not only to be a daughter-in-law, but a daughter in fact. Alas! the alarming rise in the number of cases involving harassment to the newly wed girls for dowry shatters the dreams. In-laws are characterized to be outlaws for perpetrating terrorism which destroys the matrimonial home. The terrorist is dowry, and it is spreading tentacles in every possible direction.

3. Appellant calls in question legality of the judgment rendered by a learned Single Judge of the Patna High Court upholding his conviction for offences punishable under Section 304B of the Indian Penal Code, 1860 (in short the IPC), while reducing sentence to seven years rigorous imprisonment from ten years imprisonment as was awarded by learned Sessions Judge, Sitamarhi.

4. Prosecution version as unfolded during trial is as follows:

4.1. Jaikali Devi (hereinafter referred to as the deceased) was sister of the informant, Sudhir Kumar Mahto (PW-6). She was married to appellant in 1988. Duragaman was subsequently performed in the month of August, 1989. A sum of Rs.40,000/- was demanded in dowry at the time of marriage and the same was paid. Subsequently, demand for a she-buffalo was made by the appellant at the time of Duragaman which could not be fulfilled. Informant Sudhir Kumar Mahto (PW-6) went several times to the house of her sister and made request for Bidagari of her sister, but the same was not allowed, and on the contrary demand of she-buffalo was pressed. The deceased complained of ill-treatment and torture at the hands of the appellant and other members of his family. The informant was also abused. On 28.11.1989 at about 7.00 a.m., the informant heard some rumour in the village that her sister-the deceased was murdered by the appellant and his family members, and they were contemplating to dispose of the dead body. Thereafter, the informant along with his father Bachu Mahto (PW-3), brother Anup Mahto (PW-5) and uncle Bhuneshwar Mahto (PW-7) went to the village of the appellant and found that the dead body of her sister was lying in the verandah of the appellants house and some blood was oozing from her mouth and there were mark of violence on her neck and it appeared that his sister was murdered by strangulation in the previous night. The officer In-charge of Kanhauli Police Station reached in the village Araria on hearing rumours about murder of a lady and he recorded the Fardbeyan (exhibit 1) of the informant. He sent Fardbeyan to the Officer In-charge of Kanhauli Police Station for instituting a case. He made inquest on the dead body of the deceased and prepared inquest report and sent the dead body to Sitamarhi Sadar Hospital for post mortem examination and a formal FIR was drawn up. The police after completion of investigation submitted charge sheet.

4.2. Appellant pleaded innocence. In order to further its version prosecution examined 9 witnesses. As noted above, Sudhir Kumar Mahto (PW-6) was the informant. According to his evidence shortly before the occurrence, he had talked with his sister i.e. the deceased, who told him about the tortures meted out to her for not bringing the dowry articles. To similar effect is the evidence of Dayanand Mahto (PW-1) who claimed to have accompanied PW-6 and heard deceased telling PW-6 about the torture. Bachu Mahto (PW-3) the father of the deceased also stated about the demand. PW-8 is the doctor who conducted the post-mortem. Three witnesses were examined by the accused to substantiate his plea that the deceased had rheumatic disease and she died because of this. The trial Court considered the evidence on record and came to hold that the presumption in terms of Section 113(B) of the Indian Evidence Act, 1872 (in short the Evidence Act) was to be drawn and since the deceased did not die a natural death as claimed, the accused was guilty of offence in terms of Section 304B IPC. It was noticed that there was no evidence to show that the deceased suffered from any rheumatic disease. The evidence of DWs was found to be unreliable. Accordingly, conviction in terms of Section 304B was recorded and ten years sentence was imposed.

5. Questioning the conviction and the sentence as awarded by the learned trial Judge, the accused filed an appeal before the High Court. As noted above, the High Court upheld the conviction but reduced the sentence.

6. In support of the appeal, learned counsel for the appellant submitted that the doctor (PW-8) had categorically stated that the cause of death was not ascertainable. The trial Court and the High Court were not justified in applying Section 304B IPC to the facts of the case. There was no live-link established between the alleged demand of dowry and the purported unnatural death. That being so, the conviction as recorded is not tenable.

7. In response, learned counsel for the State submitted that the Courts below have analysed the factual position in detail and found the accused-appellant guilty. That being so, no fault can be found with the orders of the courts below.

8. Section 304B IPC deals with dowry death which reads as follows:

 304B. Dowry Death- (1) Where the death of a woman is caused by any burns or bodily injury or occurs otherwise than under normal circumstances within seven years of her marriage and it is shown that soon before her death she was subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or any relative of her husband for, or in connection with any demand for dowry, such death shall be called dowry death and such husband or relative shall be deemed to have caused her death.

Explanation - For the purpose of this sub-section dowry shall have same meaning as in Section 2 of the Dowry Prohibition Act, 1961 (28 of 1961).

(2)Whoever commits dowry death shall be punished with imprisonment for a term which shall not be less than seven years but which may extend to imprisonment for life.

The provision has application when death of a woman is caused by any burns or bodily injury or occurs otherwise than under normal circumstances within seven years of her marriage and it is shown that soon before her death she was subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or any relatives of her husband for, or in connection with any demand for dowry.

9. In order to attract application of Section 304B IPC, the essential ingredients are as follows:-

(i) The death of a woman should be caused by burns or bodily injury or otherwise than under a normal circumstance.

(ii) Such a death should have occurred within seven years of her marriage.

(iii) She must have been subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or any relative of her husband.

(iv) Such cruelty or harassment should be for or in connection with demand of dowry.

(v) Such cruelty or harassment is shown to have been meted out to the woman soon before her death.

Section 113B of the Evidence Act is also relevant for the case at hand. Both Section 304B IPC and Section 113B of the Evidence Act were inserted by the Dowry Prohibition (Amendment) Act 43 of 1986 with a view to combat the increasing menace of dowry deaths. Section 113B reads as follows:-

 113B: Presumption as to dowry death- When the question is whether a person has committed the dowry death of a woman and it is shown that soon before her death such woman has been subjected by such person to cruelty or harassment for, or in connection with, any demand for dowry, the Court shall presume that such person had caused the dowry death.

Explanation - For the purposes of this section dowry death shall have the same meaning as in Section 304B of the Indian Penal Code (45 of 1860).

The necessity for insertion of the two provisions has been amply analysed by the Law Commission of India in its 21st Report dated 10th August, 1988 on Dowry Deaths and Law Reform. Keeping in view the impediment in the pre-existing law in securing evidence to prove dowry related deaths, legislature thought it wise to insert a provision relating to presumption of dowry death on proof of certain essentials. It is in this background presumptive Section 113B in the Evidence Act has been inserted. As per the definition of dowry death in Section 304B IPC and the wording in the presumptive Section 113B of the Evidence Act, one of the essential ingredients, amongst others, in both the provisions is that the concerned woman must have been soon before her death subjected to cruelty or harassment for or in connection with the demand of dowry. Presumption under Section 113B is a presumption of law. On proof of the essentials mentioned therein, it becomes obligatory on the Court to raise a presumption that the accused caused the dowry death. The presumption shall be raised only on proof of the following essentials:

(1) The question before the Court must be whether the accused has committed the dowry death of a woman. (This means that the presumption can be raised only if the accused is being tried for the offence under Section 304B IPC).

(2) The woman was subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or his relatives.

(3) Such cruelty or harassment was for, or in connection with any demand for dowry.

(4) Such cruelty or harassment was soon before her death.

10. A conjoint reading of Section 113B of the Evidence Act and Section 304B IPC shows that there must be material to show that soon before her death, the victim was subjected to cruelty or harassment. Prosecution has to rule out the possibility of a natural or accidental death so as to bring it within the purview of the death occurring otherwise than in normal circumstances. The expression soon before is very relevant where Section 113B of the Evidence Act and Section 304B IPC are pressed into service. Prosecution is obliged to show that soon before the occurrence there was cruelty or harassment and only in that case presumption operates. Evidence in that regard has to be led by prosecution. Soon before is a relative term and it would depend upon circumstances of each case and no strait-jacket formula can be laid down as to what would constitute a period of soon before the occurrence. It would be hazardous to indicate any fixed period, and that brings in the importance of a proximity test both for the proof of an offence of dowry death as well as for raising a presumption under Section 113B of the Evidence Act. The expression soon before her death used in the substantive Section 304B IPC and Section 113B of the Evidence Act is present with the idea of proximity test. No definite period has been indicated and the expression soon before is not defined. A reference to expression soon before used in Section 114. Illustration (a) of the Evidence Act is relevant. It lays down that a Court may presume that a man who is in the possession of goods soon after the theft, is the thief who has received the goods knowing them to be stolen, unless he can account for his possession. The determination of the period which can come within the term soon before is left to be determined by the Courts, depending upon facts and circumstances of each case. Suffice, however, to indicate that the expression soon before would normally imply that the interval should not be much between the concerned cruelty or harassment and the death in question. There must be existence of a proximate and live-link between the effects of cruelty based on dowry demand and the concerned death. If alleged incident of cruelty is remote in time and has become stale enough not to disturb mental equilibrium of the woman concerned, it would be of no consequence.

11. Consequences of cruelty which are likely to drive a woman to commit suicide or to cause grave injury or danger to life, limb or health, whether mental or physical of the woman is required to be established in order to bring home the application of Section 498A IPC. Cruelty has been defined in the Explanation for the purpose of Section 498A. Substantive Section 498A IPC and presumptive Section 113A of the Evidence Act have been inserted in the respective statutes by Criminal Law (Second Amendment) Act, 1983. It is to be noted that Sections 304B and 498A, IPC cannot be held to be mutually inclusive. These provisions deal with two distinct offences. It is true that cruelty is a common essential to both the Sections and that has to be proved. The Explanation to Section 498A gives the meaning of cruelty. In Section 304B there is no such explanation about the meaning of cruelty. But having regard to common background to these offences it has to be taken that the meaning of cruelty or harassment is the same as prescribed in the Explanation to Section 498A under which cruelty by itself amounts to an offence. Under Section 304B it is dowry death that is punishable and such death should have occurred within seven years of marriage. No such period is mentioned in Section 498A. If the case is established, there can be a conviction under both the sections. (See Akula Ravinder and others v. The State of Andhra Pradesh1). Period of operation of Section 113B of the Evidence Act is seven years, presumption arises when a woman committed suicide within a period of seven years from the date of marriage.

12. Section 2 of the Dowry Prohibition Act, 1961 (in short Dowry Act) defines dowry as under:-

Section 2. Definition of dowry - In this Act, dowry means any property or valuable security given or agreed to be given either directly or indirectly -

(a) by one party to a marriage to the other party to the marriage; or

(b)by the parents of either party to a marriage or by any other person, to either party to the marriage or to any other person,

at or before or any time after the marriage in connection with the marriage of the said parties, but does not include dower or mehr in the case of persons to whom the Muslim personal law (Shariat) applies.

Explanation I- For the removal of doubts, it is hereby declared that any presents made at the time of a marriage to either party to the marriage in the form of cash, ornaments, clothes or other articles, shall not be deemed to be dowry within the meaning of this section, unless they are made as consideration for the marriage of the said parties.

Explanation II- The expression valuable security has the same meaning in Section 30 of the Indian Penal Code (45 of 1860).

13. The word dowry in Section 304B IPC has to be understood as it is defined in Section 2 of the Dowry Act. Thus, there are three occasions related to dowry. One is before the marriage, second is at the time of marriage and the third at any time after the marriage. The third occasion may appear to be unending period. But the crucial words are in connection with the marriage of the said parties. Other payments which are customary payments e.g. given at the time of birth of a child or other ceremonies as are prevalent in different societies are not covered by the expression dowry. (See Satvir Singh v. State of Punjab1) As was observed in said case suicidal death of a married woman within seven years of her marriage is covered by the expression death of a woman is caused .......or occurs otherwise than under normal circumstances as expressed in Section 304B IPC.

14. In the instant case, great stress has been laid on the opinion of the doctor that possible cause of death was not ascertainable. As noted by the trial Court and the High Court, black stained rough skin on both sides of neck was found. It has also been noticed by the doctor who conducted the post-mortem examination that blood stained fluid was trickling from the side of mouth and brain matters were found congested. The doctor unfortunately did not consider the effect of the marks on the neck and trickling of blood stained fluid from the mouth. The I.O. (PW-9) had seized a blood stained pillow. There was no evidence that the death was due to normal reasons. Evidence of PWs 1, 3 and 6 amply established demand of dowry and ill treatment of the deceased shortly before the date of occurrence. The trial Court and the High Court were justified in drawing the conclusion about guilt of the accused. Though attempt was made to show that had the accused been guilty he along with family members would not have tried to get treatment for the deceased. The reason for this is not far too seek. The accused person and others were trying to create a smoke screen. If the death was normal as claimed by the accused, nothing was brought on record to explain injuries on the neck of the deceased. The evidence on record clearly establishes the commission of offence by the accused. Therefore, the conviction and the modified sentence as imposed by the High Court do not suffer from any infirmity to warrant interference.

15. The appeal is dismissed.

**********', 1] , 
[ 'CROSS CITATION
2009 AIR (SC) 1454
2008 (16) SCC 155
2008 (17) SCR 379
APPEARANCES
Mr. Mahabir Singh, Senior Advocate, Mr. Rakesh Dahiya, Mr. Gagan Deep Sharma and Mr. S. Srinivasan, Advocates with him for the Appellant.
Mr. Kuldip Singh and Mr. R.K. Pande, Advocates for the Respondent.
HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAWS
Penal Code, 1860
Sections 302, 304B - Evidence Act, 1872, Section 113B - Dowry death - Death within 7 years of marriage at matrimonial home - FIR mentioning harassment by in-laws due to insufficient dowry and inability to bear child - Letters by appellant expressing unwillingness to live with deceased - Letter received ten days prior to incident mentioning that if she is not turned out, she will be murdered - Death due to consumption of insecticide - Appellants and family trying to conceal the reason of death - Sessions judge found all accused guilty - High Court acquitted all but appellant - Contention that neither in the FIR nor in the evidence of PW 5 dowry demand soon before the offence mentioned. Held there was no evidence that cruelty or harassment was given to deceased for bringing insufficient dowry hence ingredient of Section 304B was not satisfied and presumptive evidence could not be invoked. Though two injuries were found on the person of the deceased but appellant alone was made the accused. Had poison been forcefully administered others would have participated, but all others were acquitted. In view of the facts appellant cannot be held guilty. Appeal allowed.
HELD
What the High Court failed to notice in arriving at the said findings is that no evidence was brought on record to show that the cruelty or harassment was meted out to her for bringing insufficient dowry, in absence whereof the ingredients of Section 304B of the Indian Penal Code cannot be said to have been proved. The legal fiction sought to be created must be raised only on fulfillment of the conditions precedent therefor. All the requisite ingredients of the offence must be brought home before the presumptive evidence is put to use by the court for holding the accused guilty of an offence under Section 304B of the Indian Penal Code. (Para 16)

It is true that two injuries were noticed on the person of the deceased by the Autopsy Surgeon, but we could have considered this aspect of the matter had the appellant been not the only accused. The FIR was lodged against others also. Three more persons being sisters and cousin of the appellant were also charged for commission of the said offence. If the deceased was forced to take poison, they must have some hand in it. As they have been acquitted, it is difficult for us to come to the conclusion that it was the appellant and the appellant alone who was responsible for her death. (Para 22)

Section 304B - Offence under - Essential ingredients - Stated. (Para 10.2)

CASES REFERRED
1.T. Aruntperunjothi v. State through S.H.O. Pondicherry JT 2006 (4) SC 300 (Para 18)

2.Harjit Singh v. State of Punjab JT 2005 (10) SC 399 (Para 21)

3.Hira Lal & Ors. v. State (Govt. of NCT), Delhi JT 2003 (6) SC 15 (Para 17)

S.B. SINHA, J.

1. Appellant was prosecuted for committing murder of his wife Amriko. They were married in the year 1983. Appellant was employed in the Army as a Naik. Indisputably, the parents of the deceased came from the lower strata of the society. They were very poor. The father of the deceased was working as a Mate in the Canal Department at Jaura Kothi. They were not in a position to give sufficient dowry to their daughter. At the time of marriage, they had given only few items, such as, utensils, beddings, clothes etc. After the marriage also, they had not been able to give anything to the deceased Amriko by way of dowry or otherwise.

1.1. Allegedly, on the ground that insufficient dowry had been brought by the deceased, she was tortured. The harassment increased as she was unable to bear a child. She used to be thrown out of the house. However, she used to be sent back by her parents. Her visit to the matrimonial home, when appellant visited the village upon obtaining leave, was mandatory. Some disputes appeared to have arisen as to whether the appellant himself on all the occasions should visit her parents house to bring her back to the matrimonial home. On most of the occasions, the father of the appellant used to go to their place and bring her back.

1.2. A few days prior to the date of occurrence, appellant is said to have addressed a few letters, two of which were marked as Exhibit PJ & PH respectively; one of them was in Gurumukhi language, the other being in English vernacular.

1.3. One letter was addressed by the appellant to his father and another which is in Gurumukhi script was addressed to the brother-in-law of the deceased. The common thread in both the letters appears to be that the appellant was unwilling to keep the deceased with him. It was stated that during his visit she should come herself or her parents must get her there.

1.4. Indisputably again, the deceased had mostly been residing with her parents. Ten days prior to the date of occurrence, the deceased came to her house and disclosed that Tarsem Singh had written a letter to her parents asking them to turn her out of the house or otherwise he would kill her. However, as appellant was to come home on leave, Harnam Singh, father of the appellant, came to her parents place. When asked to allow Amriko to go with her, an apprehension was expressed by PW-5-Dato (mother of the deceased) in regard to the said letter and expressed her unwillingness to allow Amriko to go with him. She insisted that she would send Amriko only with Tarsem Singh. However, on assurance by Harnam Singh that no such threatening letter had been received and he treats her as his own daughter, she was allowed to go with him. After a few days, Sukhwinder Singh, brother of the deceased was sent to enquire about the welfare of Amriko and to find out whether Tarsem Singh had come on leave or not. He left his house at 11.00 a.m. but he came back some time thereafter to inform his mother that Amriko had been murdered by her in-laws. At about 4.00 p.m., a First Information Report (FIR) was lodged against Parmjit Kaur, Manjit Kaur, sisters of appellant, Mohinder Singh, cousin of appellant and Tarsem Singh, appellant.

2. Before the learned Sessions Judge, charges under Section 302 and in the alternative under Section 304B of the Indian Penal Code were framed.

3. All the four accused were found guilty for the offences punishable under Section 304B of the Indian Penal Code and convicted by the learned Sessions Judge. The High Court, however, while dismissing the appeal preferred by the appellant recorded a judgment of acquittal in favour of Parmjit Kaur, Manjit Kaur and Mohinder Singh.

4. Mr. Mahabir Singh, learned Senior Counsel appearing on behalf of the appellant would submit that the learned Sessions Judge as also the High Court committed a serious error in passing the impugned judgments of conviction and sentence insofar as they failed to take into consideration that neither in the FIR nor in the evidence of PW-5, any allegation was made to the effect that any dowry was demanded by the appellant. It was urged that in any view of the matter as the prosecution had not been able to show that any dowry was demanded soon before the commission of the offence, the impugned judgment is liable to be set aside.

5. Mr. Kuldip Singh, learned counsel appearing on behalf of the State, however, supported the impugned judgment.

6. Before us, the translated version of the FIR has been produced by Mr. Mahabir Singh to show that no allegation as regards demand of dowry had been made against the appellant. However, Mr. Kuldip Singh contended that upon reading of the FIR in its entirety it would appear that after the name of Tarsem Singh, the names of his parents, namely, Harnam Singh and Parsin Kaur had been mentioned and, thus, it is clear that all of them had been ill-treating Amriko for non-bringing of sufficient dowry and not bearing a child. The learned counsel appears to be correct.

7. It is, therefore, not correct to contend that FIR does not contain any statement of cruelty or harassment of the deceased for non-bringing of dowry. The marriage took place in the year 1983. The occurrence took place on 18.3.1987. The dead body was found in the matrimonial home of the deceased.

The post-mortem report showed that the following injuries were noticed on the person of the deceased:

1. An abrasion 1 cm x .5 cm present on the left cheek. On dissection wound was skin deep.

2. A bluish contusion 3 cm x 2 cm present on the back of left wrist joint.

3. On dissection underlying skin and muscles were normal and underlying bone was not fractured.

8. It is not in dispute that death of Amriko took place due to consumption of organo phosphorus compound. Endocel, which is an insecticide of the chloroco compound group, was recovered. It is now not in dispute that Amriko died of consuming phosphorus compound.

9. Before embarking on further discussions on this issue, we may place on record that the appellant examined Niranjan Dass as DW-1, who is said to have examined the deceased before her death. He found her to be suffering from pain in her chest and breathlessness. According to him, she was suffering from pneumonia. Some medicines were allegedly prescribed for the said disease. Whether any medicine was administered to her or not is not clear. Although there are doubts about the veracity of the said statement, the fact that the appellant and his family tried to conceal the reason for the death of the deceased is of some significance.

10. The materials on record are not sufficient to bring home the charges under Section 304B of the Indian Penal Code.

10.1. Section 304B of the Indian Penal Code reads as under:

304B. Dowry death.- (1) Where the death of a woman is caused by any burns or bodily injury or occurs otherwise than under normal circumstances within seven years of her marriage and it is shown that soon before her death she was subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or any relative of her husband for, or in connection with, any demand for dowry, such death shall be called dowry death, and such husband or relative shall be deemed to have caused her death.

Explanation.- For the purpose of this sub-section, dowry shall have the same meaning as in Section 2 of the Dowry Prohibition Act, 1961 (28 of 1961).

(2) Whoever commits dowry death shall be punished with imprisonment for a term which shall not be less than seven years but which may extend to imprisonment for life.

10.2. The essential ingredients of the said offence are: (i) death of a woman must have been caused by any burns or bodily injury or otherwise than under normal circumstances; (ii) such death must have been occurred within seven years of marriage (iii) soon before her death she was subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or relative of her husband; (iv) such cruelty or harassment must be in connection with the demand of dowry; and (v) such cruelty is shown to have been meted out to the woman soon before her death.

10.3. Explanation appended to Section 304B defines dowry to have the same meaning as contained in Section 2 of the Dowry Prohibition Act, 1961, which reads as under:

2. Definition of dowry.- In this Act, dowry means any property or valuable security given or agreed to be given either directly or indirectly-

(a) by one party to a marriage to the other party to the marriage; or

(b) by the parents of either party to a marriage or by any other person, to either party to the marriage or to any other person,

at or before or any time after the marriage in connection with the marriage of the said parties, but does not include dower or mahr in the case of persons to whom the Muslim Personal Law (Shariat) applied.

11. Parliament has inserted Section 113B in the Evidence Act, which reads as under:

113B. Presumption as to dowry death. - When the question is whether a person has committed the dowry death of a woman and it is shown that soon before her death such woman has been subjected by such person to cruelty or harassment for, or in connection with, any demand for dowry, the Court shall presume that such person had caused the dowry death.

Explanation.-For the purposes of this section dowry death shall have the same meaning as in Section 304B of the Indian Penal Code (45 of 1860)

12. The necessity for insertion of the two provisions has been amply stated by the Law Commission of India in its 21st Report dated 10-8-1988 on Dowry Deaths and Law Reform.

12.1. Keeping in view the impediments in the pre- existing law in securing evidence to prove dowry-related deaths, the Parliament in its wisdom thought to insert a provision relating to presumption of dowry death on proof of certain essentials.

12.2. It is in this background that a provision of presumptive evidence by way of Section 113B in the Evidence Act has been inserted.

12.3. As per the definition of dowry death in Section 304B IPC and the wording in the presumptive provision of Section 113B of the Evidence Act, one of the essential ingredients, amongst others, is that the woman must have been soon before her death subjected to cruelty or harassment for, or in connection with, the demand for dowry.

12.4. Presumption in terms of Section 113B is one of law. On proof of the essentials mentioned therein, it becomes obligatory on the court to raise a presumption that the accused caused the dowry death. The presumption shall be raised only on proof of the following essentials:

(1) The question before the court must be whether the accused has committed the dowry death of a woman. (This means that the presumption can be raised only if the accused is being tried for the offence under Section 304B IPC.)

(2) The woman was subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or his relatives.

(3) Such cruelty or harassment was for, or in connection with, any demand for dowry.

(4) Such cruelty or harassment was soon before her death.

13. Harassment caused to the deceased was on three counts:

1. Insufficient dowry;

2. Inability to bear a child; and

3. Insistence by her parents that every time appellant must go to her parents house for bringing her back.

14. It appears that FIR (Exhibit-PF/2) lodged by PW-5 emphasizes on two reasons of harassment, namely, (1) previously on the pretext of bringing in insufficient dowry, and (2) thereafter for not bearing a child.

15. There is, thus, nothing on record to show that any demand of dowry was made soon before her death. The cause of action for committing the offence appears to be an ego problem on the part of the appellant, namely, the deceased had not been coming to her matrimonial home on her own, while he had been coming to his home on leave.

The High Court also in its judgment recorded:

It is proved from the evidence of PW-1 Dr. Manjit Singh that the death of Amriko had taken place due to consumption of Organo Phosphorus Compound. The prosecution has led evidence to prove that Endocel was got recovered by Parmjit Kaur, appellant, by making a disclosure statement. According to the Chemical report, Exhibit PN, Endocel is an insecticide of the chloroco compound group. Thus, this poison has not been consumed by Smt. Amriko and as such, it cannot be said that Parmjit Kaur or other appellants had given this poison forcibly to Smt. Amriko. The evidence shows that Smt. Amriko used to reside most of the time with her mother and whenever Tarsem Singh visited his house on leave from the Army, then he used to take Amriko from the house of her mother to the matrimonial home. The letter, Exhibit PH, shows that Tarsem Singh was aggrieved of the fact that he had to go to take Amriko from the house of her mother. He had also made clear that he would not keep Smt. Amriko any more. Thus, it was Tarsem Singh, appellant, alone who used to harass her. The other reason must be for harassing her was that she was not able to bear a child.

The statements of PW-5 Smt. Dato and PW-7 Sukhwinder Singh show that they have not stated in their police statements specifically that the appellants except Tarsem Singh used to harass her on account of dowry or that she was unable to bear a child. The very fact that Harnam Singh, father of Tarsem Singh, had taken her from the house of her mother about 8-10 days prior to the arrival of Tarsem Singh suggests that parents of Tarsem Singh wanted to keep her.

16. What the High Court failed to notice in arriving at the said findings is that no evidence was brought on record to show that the cruelty or harassment was meted out to her for bringing insufficient dowry, in absence whereof the ingredients of Section 304B of the Indian Penal Code cannot be said to have been proved. The legal fiction sought to be created must be raised only on fulfillment of the conditions precedent therefor. All the requisite ingredients of the offence must be brought home before the presumptive evidence is put to use by the court for holding the accused guilty of an offence under Section 304B of the Indian Penal Code.

17. In Hira Lal & Ors. v. State (Govt. of NCT), Delhi JT 2003 (6) SC 15 ; 2003 (8) SCC 80, this Court held:

9. A conjoint reading of Section 113B of the Evidence Act and Section 304B IPC shows that there must be material to show that soon before her death the victim was subjected to cruelty or harassment. The prosecution has to rule out the possibility of a natural or accidental death so as to bring it within the purview of death occurring otherwise than in normal circumstances. The expression soon before is very relevant where Section 113B of the Evidence Act and Section 304B IPC are pressed into service. The prosecution is obliged to show that soon before the occurrence there was cruelty or harassment and only in that case presumption operates. Evidence in that regard has to be led by the prosecution. Soon before is a relative term and it would depend upon the circumstances of each case and no straitjacket formula can be laid down as to what would constitute a period of soon before the occurrence. It would be hazardous to indicate any fixed period, and that brings in the importance of a proximity test both for the proof of an offence of dowry death as well as for raising a presumption under Section 113B of the Evidence Act. The expression soon before her death used in the substantive Section 304B IPC and Section 113B of the Evidence Act is present with the idea of proximity test. No definite period has been indicated and the expression soon before is not defined. A reference to the expression soon before used in Section 114 Illustration (a) of the Evidence Act is relevant. It lays down that a court may presume that a man who is in the possession of goods soon after the theft, is either the thief or has received the goods knowing them to be stolen, unless he can account for their possession. The determination of the period which can come within the term soon before is left to be determined by the courts, depending upon facts and circumstances of each case. Suffice, however, to indicate that the expression soon before would normally imply that the interval should not be much between the cruelty or harassment concerned and the death in question. There must be existence of a proximate and live link between the effect of cruelty based on dowry demand and the death concerned. If the alleged incident of cruelty is remote in time and has become stale enough not to disturb the mental equilibrium of the woman concerned, it would be of no consequence.

It was furthermore held:

Consequences of cruelty which are likely to drive a woman to commit suicide or to cause grave injury or danger to life, limb or health, whether mental or physical of the woman are required to be established in order to bring home the application of Section 498A IPC. Cruelty has been defined in the Explanation for the purpose of Section 498A. Substantive Section 498-A IPC and presumptive Section 113B of the Evidence Act have been inserted in the respective statutes by the Criminal Law (Second Amendment) Act, 1983. It is to be noted that Sections 304B and 498A IPC cannot be held to be mutually inclusive. These provisions deal with two distinct offences. It is true that cruelty is a common essential to both the sections and that has to be proved. The Explanation to Section 498-A gives the meaning of cruelty. In Section 304B there is no such explanation about the meaning of cruelty. But having regard to the common background of these offences it has to be taken that the meaning of cruelty or harassment is the same as prescribed in the Explanation to Section 498A under which cruelty by itself amounts to an offence. Under Section 304B it is dowry death that is punishable and such death should have occurred within seven years of marriage. No such period is mentioned in Section 498A. A person charged and acquitted under Section 304B can be convicted under Section 498A without that charge being there, if such a case is made out. If the case is established, there can be a conviction under both the sections (See Akula Ravinder v. State of A.P. 1991 (Supp. 2) SCC 99). Section 498A IPC and Section 113A of the Evidence Act include in their amplitude past events of cruelty. Period of operation of Section 113A of the Evidence Act is seven years; presumption arises as to dowry death when a woman committed suicide within a period of seven years from the date of marriage.

18. In T. Aruntperunjothi v. State through S.H.O. Pondicherry JT 2006 (4) SC 300 ; 2006 (9) SCC 467, this Court held:

37. It, therefore, appears that no cogent evidence had been adduced by the prosecution to establish that the appellant had demanded any dowry. It would bear repetition to state that according to the mother of the deceased, PW-7 only PW-3 demanded dowry and only he was responsible for the death of her daughter. If that be so, he should have also been prosecuted.

19. Mr. Kuldip Singh, however, in our opinion, might be right in contending that on the materials on record it was possible for the trial court as also the High Court to pass a judgment of conviction against the appellant under Section 302 of the Indian Penal Code as the death occurred in the matrimonial home. It was a homicidal death. Appellant in a statement under Section 313 of the Code of Criminal Procedure did not make any statement that the deceased committed suicide or it was an accidental one.

In a case of this nature, even Section 106 of the Indian Evidence Act could be brought to use. However, it was not done. Appellant has been convicted only under Section 304B of the Code.

20. For the aforementioned purpose, the learned counsel wants us to invoke Section 386(b)(iii) of the Code of Criminal Procedure, which reads as under:

386 - Powers of the Appellate Court.- After perusing such record and hearing the appellant or his pleader, if he appears, and the Public Prosecutor, if he appears, and in case of an appeal under Section 377 or Section 378, the accused, if he appears, the Appellate Court may, if it considers that there is no sufficient ground for interfering, dismiss the appeal, or may--

(a) ............

(b) in an appeal from a conviction--

(i) ...............

(ii) ...............

(iii) with or without altering the finding, alter the nature or the extent, or the nature and extent, of 
the sentence, but not so as to enhance the same;

21. In Harjit Singh v. State of Punjab JT 2005 (10) SC 399 ; 2006 (1) SCC 463, this Court held:

16. A legal fiction has been created in the said provision to the effect that in the event it is established that soon before the death, the deceased was subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or any of his relative; for or in connection with any demand of dowry, such death shall be called dowry death, and such husband or relative shall be deemed to have caused her death

Noticing the provisions of Section 113B of the Evidence Act, it was opined:

17. From a conjoint reading of Section 304B of the Indian Penal Code and Section 113B of the Indian Evidence Act, it will be apparent that a presumption arising thereunder will operate if the prosecution is able to establish the circumstances as set out in Section 304B of the Indian Penal Code.

xxxxxxxxx

19. In the case of unnatural death of a married woman as in a case of this nature, the husband could be prosecuted under Section 302. Section 304B and Section 306 of the Indian Penal Code. The distinction as regards commission of an offence under one or the other provisions as mentioned hereinbefore came up for consideration before a Division Bench of this Court in Satvir Singh and Ors. v. State of Punjab and Anr. JT 2001 (8) SC 208, wherein it was held :

21.Thus, there are three occasions related to dowry. One is before the marriage, second is at the time of marriage and the third is at any time after the marriage. The third occasion may appear to be an unending period. But the crucial words are in connection with the marriage of the said parties. This means that giving or agreeing to give any property or valuable security on any of the above three stages should have been in connection with the marriage of the parties. There can be many other instances for payment of money or giving property as between the spouses. For example, some customary payments in connection with birth of a child or other ceremonies are prevalent in different societies. Such payments are not enveloped within the ambit of dowry. Hence the dowry mentioned in Section 304B should be any property or valuable security given or agreed to be given in connection with the marriage.

22. It is not enough that harassment or cruelty was caused to the woman with a demand for dowry at some time, if Section 304B is to be invoked. But it should have happened soon before her death. The said phrase, no doubt, is an elastic expression and can refer to a period either immediately before her death or within a few days or even a few weeks before it. But the proximity to her death is the pivot indicated by that expression. The legislative object in providing such a radius of time by employing the words soon before her death is to emphasise the idea that her death should, in all probabilities, have been the aftermath of such cruelty or harassment. In other words, there should be a perceptible nexus between her death and the dowry-related harassment or cruelty inflicted on her. If the interval elapsed between the infliction of such harassment or cruelty and her death is wide the court would be in a position to gauge that in all probabilities the harassment or cruelty would not have been the immediate cause of her death. It is hence for the court to decide, on the facts and circumstances of each case, whether the said interval in that particular case was sufficient to snuff its cord from the concept soon before her death.

xxxxxxxxx

30. The ingredients of Section 306 and Section 304B are different and distinct. In any event, no evidence has been brought on record to show that there has been any act of omission or commission on the part of the accused, before the death of the deceased to demonstrate that the appellant was responsible for the same. We have noticed hereinbefore that the High Court, for the first time, in its judgment on a hypothesis observed that when her father came to see her, he must have been insulted or felt hurt as she might have been subjected to harassment. Unfortunately, no evidence whatsoever has been brought to our notice to enable us to sustain the said finding and in that view of the matter we are unable to accept the submissions of the learned Counsel appearing for the Respondent State.

22. It is true that two injuries were noticed on the person of the deceased by the Autopsy Surgeon, but we could have considered this aspect of the matter had the appellant been not the only accused. The FIR was lodged against others also. Three more persons being sisters and cousin of the appellant were also charged for commission of the said offence. If the deceased was forced to take poison, they must have some hand in it. As they have been acquitted, it is difficult for us to come to the conclusion that it was the appellant and the appellant alone who was responsible for her death.

23. For the aforementioned reasons, the impugned judgment cannot be sustained and it is set aside accordingly. The appeal is allowed. The appellant who is in custody is directed to be set at liberty and released forthwith unless wanted in connection with any other case.

**********', 1] , 
[ 'APPEARANCES
Mr. Pradip Ghosh, Senior Advocate, Mr. Sanjay Sen, Mr. Rana S. Biswas, Mr. Manish P.S. Chouhar, Mr. Vishal Anand, Ms. Ruchi Rathi and Mrs. Sarla Chandra, Advocates with him for the Appellants

Ms. Radha Rangaswamy, Advocate for the Respondent
HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAWS
Indian Penal Code, 1860
Section 304B - Indian Evidence Act, 1872, Section 113B - Dowry death - Ingredients of the offence - Unnatural death of married woman within seven years of her marriage - Suicidal death - Parents of the victim complaining of dowry death - No evidence or finding to the effect that there was any cruelty or harassment for or in connection with the demand of dowry. Held mere evidence of cruelty and harassment is not sufficient to bring the offence within Section 304B but it has to be shown in addition that such cruelty or harassment was for or in connection with demand for dowry. Since the prosecution failed to prove that aspect the conviction cannot be maintained.
HELD
If Section 304 B IPC is read together with Section 113 B of the Evidence Act, a comprehensive picture emerges that if a married woman dies in an unnatural circumstances at her matrimonial home within 7 years from her marriage and there are allegations of cruelty or harassment upon such married woman for or in connection with demand of dowry by the husband or relatives of the husband, the case would squarely come under dowry death and there shall be a presumption against the husband and the relatives. (Para 9)

In this case we find that there is practically no evidence to show that there was any cruelty or harassment for or in connection with the demand of dowry. There is also no finding in that regard. This deficiency in evidence proves fatal for the prosecution case. Even otherwise mere evidence of cruelty and harassment is not sufficient to bring in application of Section 304B IPC. It has to be shown in addition that such cruelty or harassment was for or in connection with the demand for dowry. (See: Kanchy Ramchander v. State of A.P. Since the prosecution failed to prove that aspect, the conviction as recorded cannot be maintained. (Para 10)

CASES REFERRED
1.Kanchy Ramchander v. State of A.P. (1996 SCC (Crl.) 31) (Para 10)



2.Smt. Shanti and Anr. v. State of Haryana JT 1991 (1) SC 118 (Para 5)

Dr. ARIJIT PASAYAT, J.

1. Leave granted.

2. Appellants call in question legality of the judgment rendered by a Division Bench of the Calcutta High Court dismissing the appeal filed by the appellants, but modifying the sentence. Appellants faced trial for commission of offences punishable under Section 304B read with Section 34 of the Indian Penal Code, 1860 (in short the IPC) and Sections 3 and 4 of the Dowry Prohibition Act, 1961 (in short the DP Act).

3. The prosecution version in brief is as follows:

3.1 Rupali, sister of informant Dilip Patra (PW-1) was married to appellant Biswajit Halder-appellant no.1 on 6th March, 1992. Appellants Dulal Chandra Halder and Maya Halder are the parents of Biswajit. At the time of marriage dowry i.e. of Rs.43,000/-, gold ornaments and the household articles were given to the appellants, but they were not satisfied with the dowry items. Since marriage Rupali was put under pressure to bring one colour television, English Khat and VIP bag for her father-in-law and other relatives. Rupali time and again had reported about the persistent demand of the appellants to her father and brothers. Rupalis brother (PW-1) on different occasions requested the appellants not to harass Rupali for non-payment of those items. On 27th July, 1992 Rupali committed suicide at the house of the appellants by consuming poison and after getting the sad news from his relatives, PW-1, who being a member of Indian Armed Forces was posted at Punjab, came to his native village and lodged the FIR on 6th August, 1992.

3.2 On receipt of the FIR, police started investigation and on completion of investigation, charge sheet was submitted against the appellants for their trial.

3.3 The learned Additional Sessions Judge, after framing charges against all the three appellants examined 17 witnesses in all, including PW-1, relatives of the victim woman, two doctors and the investigating officer.

3.4 On examination of the prosecution evidence and after hearing both the prosecution and defence, the learned Additional Sessions Judge found sufficient materials against all the appellants to convict them for offences punishable under Sections 304B/34 and 498A/34 of the IPC and also under Sections 3 and 4 of the DP Act. Learned trial Judge, after convicting the appellants, sentenced them to suffer rigorous imprisonment for ten years each for the offence punishable under Section 304B of the IPC. The appellants were sentenced to suffer rigorous imprisonment for one year each and to pay a fine of Rs.1,000/- for the offence punishable under Section 498A of the IPC. In default of the payment rigorous imprisonment for three months was stipulated. Learned trial Judge also sentenced the appellants to suffer rigorous imprisonment for five years each and to pay a fine of Rs.15,000/- each under Section 3(1) of the DP Act and that apart, the appellants were also sentenced to suffer rigorous imprisonment for six months each and to pay a fine of Rs.10,000/- each for the offence under Section 4 of the DP Act with default stipulation. Learned trial Judge directed that all the sentences were to run concurrently.

3.5 Questioning correctness of the conviction and the sentences imposed appellants preferred appeal before the Calcutta High Court which held that the appellants were to suffer the minimum sentence as prescribed under Section 304B IPC, but there was no necessity for separately sentencing the appellants on either Section 498A IPC or Sections 3 and 4 of the DP Act.

4. In support of the appeal, learned counsel for the appellants submitted that there was no finding that there was demand for dowry and/or that deceased was subjected to cruelty or harassment, or that harassment was for or in connection with the demand of dowry.

5. Learned counsel for the respondent on the other hand submitted that Section 304B IPC has to be read in the context of Section 113B of the Indian Evidence Act, 1872 (in short Evidence Act). The court could presume the death of the deceased to be dowry death and it was open to the Court to presume further that the appellants being members of the matrimonial home at the relevant were responsible for the dowry death of the deceased. Reliance was placed on a decision of this Court in Smt. Shanti and Anr. v. State of Haryana1.

6. The basic ingredients to attract the provisions of Section 304B are as follows:-

(1) The death of a woman should be caused by burns or fatal injury or otherwise than under normal circumstances;

(2) Such death should have occurred within seven years of her marriage;

(3) She must have been subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or any relative of her husband; and

(4) Such cruelty or harassment should be for or in connection with demand for dowry.

7. Alongside insertion of Section 304B in IPC, legislature also introduced Section 113B of Evidence Act, which lays down when the question as to whether a person has committed the dowry death of a woman and it is shown that soon before her death such woman had been subjected by such person to cruelty or harassment for, or in connection with, any demand for dowry, the court shall presume that such person had caused the dowry death.

8. Explanation appended to Section 113 B lays down that for the purpose of this section dowry death shall have the same meaning as in Section 304 B of IPC.

9. If Section 304 B IPC is read together with Section 113 B of the Evidence Act, a comprehensive picture emerges that if a married woman dies in an unnatural circumstances at her matrimonial home within 7 years from her marriage and there are allegations of cruelty or harassment upon such married woman for or in connection with demand of dowry by the husband or relatives of the husband, the case would squarely come under dowry death and there shall be a presumption against the husband and the relatives.

10. In this case we find that there is practically no evidence to show that there was any cruelty or harassment for or in connection with the demand of dowry. There is also no finding in that regard. This deficiency in evidence proves fatal for the prosecution case. Even otherwise mere evidence of cruelty and harassment is not sufficient to bring in application of Section 304B IPC. It has to be shown in addition that such cruelty or harassment was for or in connection with the demand for dowry. (See: Kanchy Ramchander v. State of A.P.2 Since the prosecution failed to prove that aspect, the conviction as recorded cannot be maintained.

11. The appeal is allowed.

**********', 1] , 
[ 'HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAWS
Penal Code, 1860
Section 304B - Evidence Act, 1872, Section 113B - Dowry death - Death by consuming poison within 7 years of marriage - Complaint lodged by father, disclosed dowry harassment after 20-25 days of marriage, despite payment of dowry on eve of marriage - A sum of Rs. 20,000/- and later Rs. 25,000/- was given as dowry - Threats were given to deceaseds brother - Deceased was made to leave matrimonial home when a further demand of Rs. 30,000/- was not met - Though she was brought back in June, 1996, demand persisted - On 26.6.1996, she died - Plea that deceased committed suicide not due to dowry harassment but due to mental depression. Held Section 304B does not categorise death as homicide, suicide or accidental. When all other ingredients are fulfilled, any death occurring in unnatural circumstances will be called dowry death. Words shall presume in section 113B of 1872 Act leaves no option but to presume dowry death untill, accused prove their innocence. As per doctor DW2, deceased had developed suicidal tendencies due to harassment and cruelty by her-in-laws and she had told DW2 about it a month before her death. No effort was made by appellant no.2 (husband) to take deceased to hospital which was nearby. He falsely stated that he had left for Delhi to inform her parents about her death, but he never went there. Appellant no.1 (mother-in-law) also played a dominant role by accompanying appellant no.2 to all meetings for dowry demands. In view of ample evidence showing harassment for dowry soon before her unnatural death within seven year of marriage, High Court rightly dismissed the appeal against conviction.
HELD
There is ample evidence that the deceased was harassed, maltreated and was subjected to cruelty, for and in connection with the demands for dowry by the accused. Admittedly, appellant No. 2 was present in his office on 26.09.1996 located at M.D. University Campus at Rohtak but he did not attend to his wife at the relevant time. The assertion made by learned senior counsel for the appellants that the deceased was suffering from moderate depressing episode and was having suicidal tendencies prior to her death is of no consequence. Dr. V.P. Mehla (DW-2) was apprised by the deceased about the harassment and the maltreatment by her in-laws a month prior to her death when she was taken to the aforesaid doctor for the alleged treatment. According to DW-2, the deceased was so much depressed as a result of the act of cruelty meted out to her at the hands of the appellants that she developed suicidal tendencies. The testimony of DW-2 shows that the accused had created such a charged environment in her matrimonial home that she developed suicidal tendencies. Except appellant No. 1 herein, all were living in the house at Rohtak. Appellant No. 1 herein was a frequent visitor to that house and she herself admitted this fact in her statement under Section 313 of the Code. Thus, it is very much clear that accused persons maltreated, harassed and subjected the deceased to cruelty, after the solemnization of her marriage with the appellant No.2 herein, during her life time and soon before her death, for and in connection with the demands for dowry, who died at her matrimonial home within seven years of her marriage otherwise than in normal circumstances. (Para 20)

Section 304B IPC does not categorise death as homicidal or suicidal or accidental. This is because death caused by burns can, in a given case, be homicidal or suicidal or accidental. Similarly, death caused by bodily injury can, in a given case, be homicidal or suicidal or accidental. Finally, any death occurring otherwise than under normal circumstances can, in a given case, be homicidal or suicidal or accidental. Therefore, if all the other ingredients of Section 304B IPC are fulfilled, any death (homicidal or suicidal or accidental) whether caused by burns or by bodily injury or occurring otherwise than under normal circumstances shall, as per the legislative mandate, be called a dowry death and the womans husband or his relative shall be deemed to have caused her death. The section clearly specifies what constitutes the offence of dowry death and also identifies the single offender or multiple offenders who has or have caused the dowry death. (Para 21)

The key words under Section 113B of the Evidence Act, 1872 are shall presume leaving no option with a court but to presume an accused brought before it of causing a dowry death guilty of the offence. However, the redeeming factor of this provision is that the presumption is rebuttable. Section 113B of the Act enables an accused to prove his innocence and places a reverse onus of proof on him or her. In the case on hand, accused persons failed to prove beyond reasonable doubt that the deceased died a natural death. When Kavita allegedly committed suicide, her husband-appellant No.2, though he was not present in the house, was present in his office at M.D. University, Rohtak at the relevant time but he did not make any sincere effort to take her to the hospital which was very near to the place of the incident. Similarly, appellant No. 2 got the deceased examined by DW-2 in order to create an impression that she was struggling with chronic depression but the truth floated upon the surface when the deceased reveals that the accused persons were maltreating her and she had started picking up the ideas of suicide. Lastly, appellant No. 2 falsely informed the court that having learnt about the death of his wife Kavita, he left for Delhi to inform her family members. In fact, the accused never went to Delhi and the complainant received a telephonic message from an unknown person regarding the death of his daughter. So far as Maya Devi- appellant No. 1 herein is concerned, there is no denying the fact that she was working as a teacher in a government school and she was not present at the relevant time at the place of incident but it is very much clear from the evidence on record that both the accused persons had a dominating role in the entire episode and she had always accompanied her son-appellant No. 2 herein to the house of the complainant (PW-3) for the dowry demands. The presumption under Section 113B of the Act is mandatory may be contrasted with Section 113A of the Act which was introduced contemporaneously. Section 113A of the Act, dealing with abetment of suicide, uses the expression may presume. This being the position, a two-stage process is required to be followed in respect of an offence punishable under Section 304-B IPC: it is necessary to first ascertain whether the ingredients of the Section have been made out against the accused; if the ingredients are made out, then the accused is deemed to have caused the death of the woman but is entitled to rebut the statutory presumption of having caused a dowry death. From the evidence on record, we are of the opinion that in the present case Kavita died an unnatural death by committing suicide as she was subjected to cruelty/harassment by her husband and in-laws in connection with the demand for dowry which started from the time of her marriage and continued till she committed suicide. Thus, the provisions of Sections 304B and 498A of the IPC will be fully attracted. (Para 22)

CASES REFERRED
1.Ramesh Vithal Patil v. State of Karnataka JT 2014 (8) SC 219 (Para 19)

2.Mustafa Shahadal Shaikh v. State of Maharashtra JT 2012 (9) SC 20 (Para 18)

3.Bansi Lal v. State of Haryana JT 2011 (5) SC 373 (Para 17)

4.Durga Prasad and Another v. State of Madhya Pradesh JT 2010 (8) SC 28 (Para 7)

5.Satvir Singh and Others v. State of Punjab and Another JT 2001 (8) SC 208 (Para 8)

6.Sharad Birdhichand Sarda v. State of Maharashtra 1984 (4) SCC 116 (Para 5)

R.K. AGRAWAL, J.

1. This appeal has been filed against the judgment and order dated 14.01.2010 passed by the High Court of Punjab and Haryana at Chandigarh in Criminal Appeal No. 488-DB of 1999 whereby the Division Bench of the High Court dismissed the appeal.

2. Brief facts:

(a) As per the prosecution story, the marriage of Kavita @ Kusum (since deceased) was solemnized with Karamvir, son of Mahavir, resident of House No. 36, Type II, M.D. University Campus, Rohtak according to Hindu rites and ceremonies on 17.07.1994. After 20-25 days of the solemnization of the marriage, Karamvir (appellant No. 2 herein), his mother Maya Devi (appellant No. 1 herein), brothers Dharamveer and Paramveer and Sister Sonika@Pinki started harassing, maltreating and beating Kavita (since deceased) on account of dowry. Despite all efforts, the attitude and relations of her in-laws towards her went from bad to worse.

(b) On 26.09.1996, the police got a telephonic message from a stranger at 3:30 a.m. that the dead body of a woman was lying in House No. 36, Type II, M.D. University Campus, Rohtak. On coming to know about the incident, Kanwar Singh (the complainant) - father of Kavita reached the spot and identified the body to be that of his daughter.

(c) A complaint was lodged by Kanwar Singh (PW-3) at the P.S. Civil Lines, Rohtak regarding the incident on 27.09.1996 alleging torture and harassment meted out to the deceased on account of demand of dowry who had committed suicide by consuming some poisonous substance. On the basis of the said complaint, FIR No. 466 of 1966 was registered under Sections 498A, 304B, 306/34 of the Indian Penal Code, 1860 (in short the IPC). After investigation, charges under Sections 498A and 304B read with Section 34 of the IPC were framed against the accused persons.

(d) The case was committed to the Court of Sessions and numbered as 11/10.04.1997 and Maya Devi-mother-in-law of the deceased (appellant No. 1 herein), Karamvir-husband of the deceased (appellant No. 2 herein) and Dharamveer and Paramveer-brothers of Karamvir were arrayed as accused.

(e) The Court of Sessions Judge, Rohtak, by order dated 22/27.09.1999, while acquitting Dharamveer and Paramveer -brothers of Karamvir, convicted the appellant Nos. 1 and 2 herein for the commission of offence under Sections 498A and 304B of the IPC and sentenced them to suffer rigorous imprisonment (RI) for life under Section 304B of the IPC. Both the accused were further sentenced to undergo rigorous imprisonment (RI) for 2 (two) years, along with a fine of Rs. 500/- each, for the offence under Section 498A of the IPC.

(f) Being aggrieved, the appellant herein filed Criminal Appeal No. 488- DB of 1999 before the High Court. Kanwar Singh-the complainant also filed Criminal Revision No. 208 of 2000 before the High Court for setting aside the judgment and order dated 22/27.09.1999 to the extent of acquittal of Dharamveer and Paramveer.

(g) The Division Bench of the High Court, by order dated 14.01.2010, dismissed the appeal filed by the appellants herein while modifying the sentence of life imprisonment to that of rigorous imprisonment for 10 years for the offence under Section 304B while maintaining the sentence in respect of other offence. The Division Bench also dismissed the revision filed by the complainant.

(h) Aggrieved by the said judgment, the appellants have preferred this appeal by way of special leave before this Court.

3. Heard Mr. T.S. Doabia, learned senior counsel for the appellants and Mr. Narender Hooda, learned senior counsel for the respondent-State.

Rival Submissions:

4. Learned senior counsel for the appellants submitted before this Court that Kavita (since deceased) was suffering from mental depression and psychosis and no case has been made out for bringing the same within the definition of dowry as contained in the Dowry Prohibition Act, 1961. Learned senior counsel further contended that she was suffering from mental depression even before her marriage. Her brother and uncle used to administer anti-depression medicines to her secretly. In support of the same, learned senior counsel relied upon the deposition of Dr. V.P. Mehla, MD, Consultant Psychiatric Centre, Civil Hospital, Rohtak who deposed as under:-

Kavita wife of Karambir remained under my treatment and because I have seen her in the OPD on 26.08.1996 vide OPD No. 1034/96. Ex. DC is her OPD slip. As per my record, patient was suffering from moderate depressing episode. The patient suffered from sadness of mood, absent mindless, loss of interest in the usual activities, decreased sleep and appetite for the last two month, when I first saw her. On mental status examination by me, she was found to have said, irritable facets. She was having depressed mood and expressed pessimistic ideas and complained against her in-laws and husband. She also expressed occasional suicidal ideas. Her Judgment and insight was read to be fair by me. On the basis of above findings, I judged her to be suffering from moderate depressive episode and I had prescribed her capsule flute 20 mg. / OD and I have counseled her and her husband who had accompanied her, regarding the needful treatment and importance of psychosocial support in this disease. History of the patient is contained in Ex. DB.

XXXC. Question : How much time did you take examining patient Kavita in this case?

Ans :- I can give no time in this case but routine I used to take new patient 20 to 30 minutes.

I have not mentioned any marks of identification or signatures of the patient Kavita in Ex. DD. Whatever was stated by husband of the patient was recorded in Ex. DD. (Volunteered that Chief Complaints recorded in Ex. DD were told by patients husband and patient herself). I cannot specifically state as to what was told by the patient and what was by her husband, Ex. DD contains the mixture of observation of the complaints of patient and her husband. It is correct that patient only came to me on 26.08.1996. There is no pagination in the patient register but serial no. has been maintained. There is one entry only on 26.08.1996 and that is at the fag end of the page. Besides Kavita, who was examined on 26.8.96 as a new patient, I also examined old patients on the said date and their registration no is mentioned as 226/94 and 983/96 by the side of entry no. 1034. Patient had this illness as first episode. As per my record there was no family or past history of psychiatric illness. Moderate depressing episode is a diagnostic category as defined in ICD/10 as a depressive illness with symptoms of depression with moderate intensity. In an expert hand, this disease is 100% curable. I did not feel the need of any test of the patient. In a predisposed individual any kind of stress can lead to the precipitation of a depressive disease and illness. It is incorrect to suggest that I have deposed falsely.

5. In view of the above, learned senior counsel relied upon a decision of this Court in Sharad Birdhichand Sarda v. State of Maharashtra 1984 (4) SCC 116 wherein it was held as under:-

40. Thus, from the recitals in the letters we can safely hold that there was a clear possibility and a tendency on her part to commit suicide due to desperation and frustration. She seems to be tired of her married life, but she still hoped against hope that things might improve. At any rate, the fact that she may have committed suicide cannot be safely excluded or eliminated. It may be that her husband may have murdered her but when two views are reasonably possible the benefit must go to the accused. In order to buttress our opinion, we would like to cite some passages of an eminent psychiatrist, Robert J. Kastenbaum where in his book Death, Society and Human Experience he analyses the causes, the circumstances, the moods and emotions which may drive a person to commit suicide. The learned author has written that a person who is psychotic in nature and suffers from depression and frustration is more prone to commit suicide than any other person. In support of our view, we extract certain passages from his book:

The fact is that some people who commit suicide can be classified as psychotic or severely disturbed.

If we are concerned with the probability of suicide in very large populations, then mental and emotional disorder is a relevant variable to consider.

And it is only through a gross distortion of the actual circumstances that one could claim all suicides are enacted in a spell of madness.

Seen in these terms, suicide is simply one of the ways in which a relatively weak member of society loses out in the jungle-like struggle.

The individual does not destroy himself in hope of thereby achieving a noble post-mortem reputation or a place among the eternally blessed. Instead he wishes to subtract himself from a life whose quality seems a worse evil than death,

The newly awakened spirit of hope and progress soon became shadowed by a sense of disappointment and resignation that, it sometimes seemed, only death could swallow,

Revenge fantasies and their association with suicide are well known to people who give ear to those in emotional distress.

People who attempt suicide for reasons other than revenge may also act on the assumption that, in a sense, they will survive the death to benefit by its effect.

* * *

The victim of suicide may also be the victim of self-expectations that have not been fulfilled. The sense of disappointment and frustration may have much in common with that experienced by the person who seeks revenge through suicide.... However, for some people a critical moment arrives when the discrepancy is experienced as too glaring and painful to be tolerated. If something has to go it may be the person himself, not the perhaps excessively high standards by which the judgment has been made.... Warren Breed and his colleagues found that a sense of failure is prominent among many people who take their own lives.

41. The above observations are fully applicable to the case of Manju. She solemnly believed that her holy union with her husband would bring health and happiness to her but unfortunately it seems to have ended in a melancholy marriage which in view of the circumstances detailed above, left her so lonely and created so much of emotional disorder resulting from frustration and pessimism that she was forced to end her life. There can be no doubt that Manju was not only a sensitive and sentimental woman but was extremely impressionate (sic) and the letters show that a constant conflict between her mind and body was going on and unfortunately the circumstances which came into existence hastened her end. People with such a psychotic philosophy or bent of mind always dream of an ideal and if the said ideal fails, the failure drives them to end their life, for they feel that no charm is left in their life.

42. Mary K. Hinchliffe, Douglas Hooper and F. John Roberts in their book The Melancholy Marriage observe that-

Studies of attempted suicide cases have also revealed the high incidence of marital problems which lie behind the act. In our own study of 100 consecutive cases (Roberts and Hooper 1969), we found that most of them could be understood if the patients interactions with others in their environment were considered. (p. 5)

43. Such persons possess a peculiar psychology which instills extreme love and devotion but when they are faced with disappointment or find their environment so unhealthy or unhappy, they seem to lose all the charms of life. The authors while describing these sentiments observe thus:

Hopelessness, despair, lousy and miserable draw attention to the relationship of the depressed person to his environment. The articulate depressed person will often also struggle to put into words the fact that not only does there appear to be no way forward and thus no point to life - but that the world actually looks different. (p. 7)

44. Coleridge in Ode to Dejection in his usual ironical manner has very beautifully explained the sentiments of such persons thus:

I see them all so excellently fair -

I see, not feel, how beautiful they are;

45. At another place the authors (Hinchliffe, Hooper, and John) come to the final conclusion that ruptured personal relationships play a major part in the clinical picture and in this connection observed thus:

Initially we applied these ideas to study of cases of attempted suicide (Roberts and Hooper 1969) and although we did not assume that they were all necessarily depressed, we looked for distal and proximal causes for their behaviour and found that ruptured personal relationships played a major part in the clinical picture.

The observations of the authors aptly and directly apply to the nature, mood and the circumstances of the unfortunate life of Manju which came to an end within four months of her marriage.

6. Learned senior counsel further submitted that Kavita had committed suicide on account of the fact that she was mentally depressed and no case is made out under Section 304B of the IPC as the requirement of law is that the harassment and cruelty should be soon before her death and no evidence has come on record for this purpose. In order to bring home conviction under Section 304B of the IPC, it will not be sufficient to only lead evidence showing that cruelty or harassment had been meted out to the victim, but that such treatment was in connection with the demand for dowry. The phrase, soon before her death, no doubt, is an elastic expression and can refer to a period either immediately before her death or within a few days or even a few weeks before it. But the proximity to her death is the pivot indicated by that expression. The legislative intent in providing such a radius of time by employing the words soon before her death is to emphasis the idea that her death should, in all probabilities, has been the aftermath of such cruelty or harassment. There should be a perceptible nexus between her death and the dowry related harassment or cruelty inflicted on her.

7. In support of the above contention, learned senior counsel for the appellants referred to a decision of this Court in Durga Prasad and Another v. State of Madhya Pradesh JT 2010 (8) SC 28 : 2010 (9) SCC 73 wherein it was held as under:-

7. It was pointed out that the only evidence on which reliance had been placed both by the trial court, as well as the High Court, for convicting the appellants, was the evidence of Vimla Bai, PW 1, the mother of the deceased and Radheshyam, PW 3, the brother of the deceased. In fact, the prosecution story was that since no dowry had been received from the family of the victim, she had been beaten and treated with cruelty. There is no other evidence regarding the physical and mental torture which the deceased was alleged to have been subjected to.

8. Mr. Gupta urged that the marriage of Appellant 1 with the deceased was performed as part of a community marriage being celebrated on account of the poverty of couples who could not otherwise meet the expenses of marriage and that even the few utensils which were given at the time of such community marriage were given by the persons who had organised such marriages.

9. Mr. Gupta submitted that the evidence in this case was wholly insufficient to even suggest that the victim had been subjected to cruelty or harassment which was sufficient to compel her to commit suicide. In support of his submissions, Mr Gupta firstly referred to the decision of this Court in Biswajit Halder v. State of W.B. wherein, in facts which were very similar, it was held that there was practically no evidence to show that there was any cruelty or harassment for, or in connection with, the demands for dowry. There was also no finding in that regard. It was further observed that this deficiency in evidence proved fatal for the prosecution case and even otherwise mere evidence of cruelty and harassment was not sufficient to attract Section 304-B IPC. It had to be shown in addition that such cruelty or harassment was for, or in connection with, demand of dowry. Mr Gupta urged that since the appellants had not been convicted under the provisions of the Dowry Prohibition Act, 1961, the charge under Section 304-B would also fail since the same was linked with the question of cruelty or harassment for, or in connection with, the demand for dowry.

14. Ms. Makhija then contended that as had been laid down by this Court in Anand Kumar v. State of M.P., in order to counter the presumption available under Section 113-B, which is relatable to Section 304-B, a heavy burden has been shifted on to the accused to prove his innocence. Having regard to the language of Section 113-B of the Evidence Act, which indicates that when a question arises as to whether a person has committed the dowry death of a woman and it is shown that soon before her death such woman was subjected to cruelty or harassment by such other person or in connection with any demand for dowry, the court shall presume that such person had caused such dowry death. Ms. Makhija urged that the aforesaid wording of Section 113-B of Evidence Act and the use of the expression shall would clearly indicate that the court shall presume such death as dowry death provided the conditions in Section 113-B were satisfied and it would then be for the accused to prove otherwise.

15. Ms Makhija, thereupon, urged that the order of conviction passed by the trial court holding the appellants guilty under Sections 498-A and 304-B IPC, confirmed by the High Court, did not warrant any interference by this Court.

16. Having carefully considered the submissions made on behalf of the respective parties, we are inclined to allow the benefit of doubt to the appellants having particular regard to the fact that except for certain bald statements made by PWs 1 and 3 alleging that the victim had been subjected to cruelty and harassment prior to her death, there is no other evidence to prove that the victim committed suicide on account of cruelty and harassment to which she was subjected just prior to her death, which, in fact, are the ingredients of the evidence to be led in respect of Section 113-B of the Evidence Act, 1872, in order to bring home the guilt against an accused under Section 304-B IPC.

17. As has been mentioned hereinbefore, in order to hold an accused guilty of an offence under Section 304-B IPC, it has to be shown that apart from the fact that the woman died on account of burn or bodily injury, otherwise than under normal circumstances, within 7 years of her marriage, it has also to be shown that soon before her death, she was subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or any relative of her husband for, or in connection with, any demand for dowry. Only then would such death be called dowry death and such husband or relative shall be deemed to have caused the death of the woman concerned.

18. In this case, one other aspect has to be kept in mind, namely, that no charges were framed against the appellants under the provisions of the Dowry Prohibition Act, 1961 and the evidence led in order to prove the same for the purposes of Section 304-B IPC was related to a demand for a fan only.

19. The decision cited by Mr R.P. Gupta, learned Senior Advocate, in Biswajit Halder case was rendered in almost similar circumstances. In order to bring home a conviction under Section 304-B IPC, it will not be sufficient to only lead evidence showing that cruelty or harassment had been meted out to the victim, but that such treatment was in connection with the demand for dowry. In our view, the prosecution in this case has failed to fully satisfy the requirements of both Section 113-B of the Evidence Act, 1872 and Section 304-B of the Penal Code.

8. Learned senior counsel further relied upon Satvir Singh and Others v. State of Punjab and Another JT 2001 (8) SC 208 which is as under:-

21. Thus, there are three occasions related to dowry. One is before the marriage, second is at the time of marriage and the third is at any time after the marriage. The third occasion may appear to be an unending period. But the crucial words are in connection with the marriage of the said parties. This means that giving or agreeing to give any property or valuable security on any of the above three stages should have been in connection with the marriage of the parties. There can be many other instances for payment of money or giving property as between the spouses. For example, some customary payments in connection with birth of a child or other ceremonies are prevalent in different societies. Such payments are not enveloped within the ambit of dowry. Hence the dowry mentioned in Section 304-B should be any property or valuable security given or agreed to be given in connection with the marriage.

22. It is not enough that harassment or cruelty was caused to the woman with a demand for dowry at some time, if Section 304-B is to be invoked. But it should have happened soon before her death. The said phrase, no doubt, is an elastic expression and can refer to a period either immediately before her death or within a few days or even a few weeks before it. But the proximity to her death is the pivot indicated by that expression. The legislative object in providing such a radius of time by employing the words soon before her death is to emphasise the idea that her death should, in all probabilities, have been the aftermath of such cruelty or harassment. In other words, there should be a perceptible nexus between her death and the dowry-related harassment or cruelty inflicted on her. If the interval elapsed between the infliction of such harassment or cruelty and her death is wide the court would be in a position to gauge that in all probabilities the harassment or cruelty would not have been the immediate cause of her death. It is hence for the court to decide, on the facts and circumstances of each case, whether the said interval in that particular case was sufficient to snuff its cord from the concept soon before her death.

9. Learned senior counsel for the appellants further contended that so far as Maya Devi-appellant No. 1 herein is concerned, she was not staying at Rohtak at the relevant time and she was a teacher in Municipal School at Delhi which is apparent from the statement of Smt. Rajbala (DW-3), Head Mistress, Nagar Nigam Prathmik Balika Vidyalaya, Ladpur, Delhi as also from the investigation and the case of the prosecution. Even, Karamvir-husband of the deceased was not present in the house when Kavita committed the act of suicide. He finally contended that there is nothing on record to show that any demand for dowry was made and she meted out cruelty or harassment soon before her death. Learned senior counsel further contended that even for the purpose of Section 498A the evidence is lacking.

10. On the other hand, learned senior counsel for the respondent-State submitted that there is no dispute that Kavita died on 26.09.1996 in her matrimonial home otherwise than under normal circumstances due to poisoning. Admittedly, there were persistent demands put up by the accused right from the solemnization of the marriage which continued till the date of the death of the deceased. He further contended that the accused had been maltreating, harassing and subjecting her to cruelty for the fulfillment of their demands for additional dowry. It was next contended that in the present case, besides Kavita, the accused had also humiliated Pankaj (PW-4) - brother of the deceased. When PW-4 visited the house of the accused with some ceremonial articles on the day of sakrant, the accused expressed displeasure upon the articles brought by him. He further contended that the claim that the deceased was suffering from moderate depressing episode and was having suicidal tendencies prior to her death which had come true on 26.09.1996 is hardly of any consequence. A series of transactions of maltreatment and cruelty which commenced just 20-25 days after the solemnization of the marriage of the deceased with appellant No.2 herein and culminated on the date of the death of the deceased would go a long way to show that she was harassed, maltreated and was subjected to cruelty soon before her death for and in connection with the demands for dowry. It was further submitted that the deceased was so much depressed as a result of cruelty/harassment meted out to her at the hands of the appellants that she developed the suicidal tendencies. He further submitted that the accused had created such a vicious and charged atmosphere in the matrimonial home that Kavita (since deceased) started picking up the ideas of committing suicide.

11. Learned senior counsel for the respondent-State vehemently contended that all the accused except appellant No. 1 were living in a house and the claim of the appellants that there is no point of involvement of Maya Devi in the whole incident is wholly irrelevant as she too was a frequent visitor to Rohtak as admitted by her in the statement made under Section 313 of the Code of Criminal Procedure, 1973 (in short the Code) and there is sufficient evidence on record to show that as and when the demands were put up by the accused to the complainant party, Maya Devi always accompanied her son.

12. Learned senior counsel for the respondent-State finally contended that the trial Court rightly convicted and sentenced the appellants under Section 304B and 498A of the IPC and the High Court upheld the same with some modification in the sentence. The appellants deserve a deterrent punishment in the present case.

Discussion:

13. Before considering the prosecution case as well as the defence pleaded, it is desirable to extract the relevant provisions of Section 304B which relates to dowry death:

304B. Dowry death.-(1) Where the death of a woman is caused by any burns or bodily injury or occurs otherwise than under normal circumstances within seven years of her marriage and it is shown that soon before her death she was subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or any relative of her husband for, or in connection with, any demand for dowry, such death shall be called dowry death, and such husband or relative shall be deemed to have caused her death.

Explanation.-For the purpose of this sub-section, dowry shall have the same meaning as in Section 2 of the Dowry Prohibition Act, 1961 (28 of 1961).

(2) Whoever commits dowry death shall be punished with imprisonment for a term which shall not be less than seven years but which may extend to imprisonment for life.

The above provision was inserted by Act 43 of 1986 and came into force with effect from 19.11.1986. There is no dispute about the applicability of the above provision since the marriage and the death occurred in the year 1994 and 1996 respectively.

14. In order to convict an accused for the offence punishable under Section 304B IPC, the following essentials must be satisfied:

(i) the death of a woman must have been caused by burns or bodily injury or otherwise than under normal circumstances;

(ii) such death must have occurred within seven years of her marriage;

(iii) soon before her death, the woman must have been subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or any relatives of her husband;

(iv) such cruelty or harassment must be for, or in connection with, demand for dowry.

14.1. When the above ingredients are established by reliable and acceptable evidence, such death shall be called dowry death and such husband or his relatives shall be deemed to have caused her death. If the above-mentioned ingredients are attracted in view of the special provision, the court shall presume and it shall record such fact as proved unless and until it is disproved by the accused. However, it is open to the accused to adduce such evidence for disproving such conclusive presumption as the burden is unmistakably on him to do so and he can discharge such burden by getting an answer through cross-examination of the prosecution witnesses or by adducing evidence on the defence side.

15. Section 113B of the Evidence Act, 1872 speaks about presumption as to dowry death which reads as under:

113-B. Presumption as to dowry death.-When the question is whether a person has committed the dowry death of a woman and it is shown that soon before her death such woman has been subjected by such person to cruelty or harassment for, or in connection with, any demand for dowry, the Court shall presume that such person had caused the dowry death.

Explanation.-For the purposes of this section, dowry death shall have the same meaning as in Section 304B of the Indian Penal Code (45 of 1860).

15.1. As stated earlier, the prosecution under Section 304B IPC cannot escape from the burden of proof that the harassment or cruelty was related to the demand for dowry and such was caused soon before her death. In view of the Explanation to the said section, the word dowry has to be understood as defined in Section 2 of the Dowry Prohibition Act, 1961 which reads as under:

2. Definition of dowry.-In this Act, dowry means any property or valuable security given or agreed to be given either directly or indirectly-

(a) by one party to a marriage to the other party to the marriage; or

(b) by the parent of either party to a marriage or by any other person, to either party to the marriage or to any other person, at or before or any time after the marriage in connection with the marriage of the said parties, but does not include dower or mahr in the case of persons to whom the Muslim Personal Law (Shariat) applies.

16. To attract the provisions of Section 304B, one of the main ingredients of the offence which is required to be established is that soon before her death she was subjected to cruelty or harassment for, or in connection with the demand for dowry. The expression soon before her death used in Section 304B IPC and Section 113B of the Evidence Act is present with the idea of proximity test. In fact, learned senior counsel appearing for the appellants submitted that there is no proximity for the alleged demand of dowry and harassment. With regard to the said claim, we shall advert to while considering the evidence led in by the prosecution. Though the language used is soon before her death, no definite period has been enacted and the expression soon before her death has not been defined in both the enactments. Accordingly, the determination of the period which can come within the term soon before her death is to be determined by the courts, depending upon the facts and circumstances of each case. However, the said expression would normally imply that the interval should not be much between the cruelty or harassment concerned and the death in question. In other words, there must be existence of a proximate and live link between the effect of cruelty based on dowry demand and the death concerned. If the alleged incident of cruelty is remote in time and has become stale enough not to disturb the mental equilibrium of the woman concerned, it would be of no consequence.

17. The aforesaid provisions were considered by this Court in Bansi Lal v. State of Haryana JT 2011 (5) SC 373 : 2011 (11) SCC 359 wherein it was held that while considering the case under Section 304B cruelty has to be proved during the close proximity of the time of death and it should be continuous and such continuous harassment, physical or mental, by the accused should make life of the deceased miserable which may force her to commit suicide. This Court further held that where the cruelty has been proved during the close proximity of the time of death then the provisions of Section 113B of the Indian Evidence Act, 1872 providing for presumption that the accused is responsible for dowry death, have to be pressed in service. In paras 19 and 20 of the judgment, this Court has further held as follows:-

19. It may be mentioned herein that the legislature in its wisdom has used the word shall thus, making a mandatory application on the part of the court to presume that death had been committed by the person who had subjected her to cruelty or harassment in connection with any demand of dowry. It is unlike the provisions of Section 113-A of the Evidence Act where a discretion has been conferred upon the court wherein it had been provided that court may presume abetment of suicide by a married woman. Therefore, in view of the above, onus lies on the accused to rebut the presumption and in case of Section 113-B relatable to Section 304-B IPC, the onus to prove shifts exclusively and heavily on the accused. The only requirements are that death of a woman has been caused by means other than any natural circumstances; that death has been caused or occurred within 7 years of her marriage; and such woman had been subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or any relative of her husband in connection with any demand of dowry.

20. Therefore, in case the essential ingredients of such death have been established by the prosecution, it is the duty of the court to raise a presumption that the accused has caused the dowry death. It may also be pertinent to mention herein that the expression soon before her death has not been defined in either of the statutes. Therefore, in each case, the Court has to analyse the facts and circumstances leading to the death of the victim and decide if there is any proximate connection between the demand of dowry and act of cruelty or harassment and the death.

18. This Court, in Mustafa Shahadal Shaikh v. State of Maharashtra JT 2012 (9) SC 20 : 2012 (11) SCC 397 held as under:-

9. In order to convict an accused for the offence punishable under Section 304-B IPC, the following essentials must be satisfied:

(i) the death of a woman must have been caused by burns or bodily injury or otherwise than under normal circumstances;

(ii) such death must have occurred within seven years of her marriage;

(iii) soon before her death, the woman must have been subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or any relatives of her husband;

(iv) such cruelty or harassment must be for, or in connection with, demand for dowry.

When the above ingredients are established by reliable and acceptable evidence, such death shall be called dowry death and such husband or his relatives shall be deemed to have caused her death. If the above-mentioned ingredients are attracted in view of the special provision, the court shall presume and it shall record such fact as proved unless and until it is disproved by the accused. However, it is open to the accused to adduce such evidence for disproving such compulsory presumption as the burden is unmistakably on him to do so and he can discharge such burden by getting an answer through cross-examination of the prosecution witnesses or by adducing evidence on the defence side.

11. To attract the provisions of Section 304-B, one of the main ingredients of the offence which is required to be established is that soon before her death she was subjected to cruelty or harassment for, or in connection with the demand for dowry. The expression soon before her death used in Section 304-B IPC and Section 113-B of the Evidence Act is present with the idea of proximity test. In fact, the learned counsel appearing for the appellant submitted that there is no proximity for the alleged demand of dowry and harassment. With regard to the said claim, we shall advert to the same while considering the evidence led in by the prosecution. Though the language used is soon before her death, no definite period has been enacted and the expression soon before her death has not been defined in both the enactments. Accordingly, the determination of the period which can come within the term soon before her death is to be determined by the courts, depending upon the facts and circumstances of each case. However, the said expression would normally imply that the interval should not be much between the cruelty or harassment concerned and the death in question. In other words, there must be existence of a proximate and live link between the effect of cruelty based on dowry demand and the death concerned. If the alleged incident of cruelty is remote in time and has become stale enough not to disturb the mental equilibrium of the woman concerned, it would be of no consequence. These principles have been reiterated in Kaliyaperumal v. State of T.N. and Yashoda v. State of M.P.

19. In the case of Ramesh Vithal Patil v. State of Karnataka JT 2014 (8) SC 219 : 2014 (11) SCC 516 this Court held as follows:-

20. Moreover, admittedly the deceased committed suicide within a period of seven years from the date of her marriage. Section 113-A of the Evidence Act is, therefore, clearly attracted to this case. Presumption contemplated therein must spring in action. This provision was introduced by the Criminal Law (Second Amendment) Act, 1983 to resolve the difficulty of proof where married women are forced to commit suicide but incriminating evidence is difficult to get as it is usually available within the four walls of the matrimonial home.....

20. With these principles in mind, let us analyse the evidence led in by the prosecution. The marriage of Kavita@Kusum (since deceased) was solemnized with Karamvir on 17.07.1994. Kavita died on 26.09.1996 after consuming some poisonous substance at her matrimonial home. The father of the deceased lodged a complaint against the accused persons that he had given dowry on the eve of marriage beyond his means but after 20-25 days of marriage, Karamvir-appellant No. 2 herein, Maya Devi-appellant No.1 herein and brothers Dharamveer and Paramveer and sister Sonika, started harassing his daughter for more money. When Kavita visited her fathers house, she narrated the entire tale of woes to her parents and brother. When the complainant enquired about the matter, the appellants informed the complainant that the appellant No. 2 is in need of money and they also have to perform the marriage of Sonika. A sum of Rs. 20,000/- was paid to appellant No. 2 so that the daughter of the complainant is not harassed. It was further stated that the complainant received a letter of his daughter regarding continuous demand for dowry and sufferings meted out to her. The complainant paid a further sum of Rs. 25,000/- for the purchase of refrigerator and gold chain to the appellant No. 2. Kavita was sent with her husband on the assurance that the accused family would not harass her in future. Even on the day of sakrant, when the brother of the deceased visited her matrimonial home, the accused threatened them that the household articles of Kavita will be thrown out. A further demand of Rs.30,000/- was made to meet the kitchen expenses by the appellants. Since that demand was not fulfilled, the deceased was left with her father at Delhi. Subsequently, the complainant requested to compromise the matter and tendered his apology in writing. In June 1996, the deceased was brought to home by the accused persons. After some days, when the complainant visited her matrimonial home at Rohtak, he was informed that situation has not changed and whenever she brings money, the peace returns for 10-20 days otherwise she is beaten mercilessly by the accused persons. On 26.09.1996, the complainant got the information about the death of his daughter. The case was committed to the Court of Sessions and the accused were found guilty under Section 304B and 498A of the IPC. There is ample evidence that the deceased was harassed, maltreated and was subjected to cruelty, for and in connection with the demands for dowry by the accused. Admittedly, appellant No. 2 was present in his office on 26.09.1996 located at M.D. University Campus at Rohtak but he did not attend to his wife at the relevant time. The assertion made by learned senior counsel for the appellants that the deceased was suffering from moderate depressing episode and was having suicidal tendencies prior to her death is of no consequence. Dr. V.P. Mehla (DW-2) was apprised by the deceased about the harassment and the maltreatment by her in-laws a month prior to her death when she was taken to the aforesaid doctor for the alleged treatment. According to DW-2, the deceased was so much depressed as a result of the act of cruelty meted out to her at the hands of the appellants that she developed suicidal tendencies. The testimony of DW-2 shows that the accused had created such a charged environment in her matrimonial home that she developed suicidal tendencies. Except appellant No. 1 herein, all were living in the house at Rohtak. Appellant No. 1 herein was a frequent visitor to that house and she herself admitted this fact in her statement under Section 313 of the Code. Thus, it is very much clear that accused persons maltreated, harassed and subjected the deceased to cruelty, after the solemnization of her marriage with the appellant No.2 herein, during her life time and soon before her death, for and in connection with the demands for dowry, who died at her matrimonial home within seven years of her marriage otherwise than in normal circumstances.

21. Section 304B IPC does not categorise death as homicidal or suicidal or accidental. This is because death caused by burns can, in a given case, be homicidal or suicidal or accidental. Similarly, death caused by bodily injury can, in a given case, be homicidal or suicidal or accidental. Finally, any death occurring otherwise than under normal circumstances can, in a given case, be homicidal or suicidal or accidental. Therefore, if all the other ingredients of Section 304B IPC are fulfilled, any death (homicidal or suicidal or accidental) whether caused by burns or by bodily injury or occurring otherwise than under normal circumstances shall, as per the legislative mandate, be called a dowry death and the womans husband or his relative shall be deemed to have caused her death. The section clearly specifies what constitutes the offence of dowry death and also identifies the single offender or multiple offenders who has or have caused the dowry death.

22. The key words under Section 113B of the Evidence Act, 1872 are shall presume leaving no option with a court but to presume an accused brought before it of causing a dowry death guilty of the offence. However, the redeeming factor of this provision is that the presumption is rebuttable. Section 113B of the Act enables an accused to prove his innocence and places a reverse onus of proof on him or her. In the case on hand, accused persons failed to prove beyond reasonable doubt that the deceased died a natural death. When Kavita allegedly committed suicide, her husband-appellant No.2, though he was not present in the house, was present in his office at M.D. University, Rohtak at the relevant time but he did not make any sincere effort to take her to the hospital which was very near to the place of the incident. Similarly, appellant No. 2 got the deceased examined by DW-2 in order to create an impression that she was struggling with chronic depression but the truth floated upon the surface when the deceased reveals that the accused persons were maltreating her and she had started picking up the ideas of suicide. Lastly, appellant No. 2 falsely informed the court that having learnt about the death of his wife Kavita, he left for Delhi to inform her family members. In fact, the accused never went to Delhi and the complainant received a telephonic message from an unknown person regarding the death of his daughter. So far as Maya Devi- appellant No. 1 herein is concerned, there is no denying the fact that she was working as a teacher in a government school and she was not present at the relevant time at the place of incident but it is very much clear from the evidence on record that both the accused persons had a dominating role in the entire episode and she had always accompanied her son-appellant No. 2 herein to the house of the complainant (PW-3) for the dowry demands. The presumption under Section 113B of the Act is mandatory may be contrasted with Section 113A of the Act which was introduced contemporaneously. Section 113A of the Act, dealing with abetment of suicide, uses the expression may presume. This being the position, a two-stage process is required to be followed in respect of an offence punishable under Section 304-B IPC: it is necessary to first ascertain whether the ingredients of the Section have been made out against the accused; if the ingredients are made out, then the accused is deemed to have caused the death of the woman but is entitled to rebut the statutory presumption of having caused a dowry death. From the evidence on record, we are of the opinion that in the present case Kavita died an unnatural death by committing suicide as she was subjected to cruelty/harassment by her husband and in-laws in connection with the demand for dowry which started from the time of her marriage and continued till she committed suicide. Thus, the provisions of Sections 304B and 498A of the IPC will be fully attracted.

Conclusion:

23. In the light of the above discussion, we are of the opinion that Kavita@Kusum suffered death at her matrimonial home, otherwise than under normal circumstances, within seven years of her marriage, and the case squarely falls within the ambit of dowry death. In the present case, from the evidence of the Doctor (DW-2), PW-3 and PW-4, we find that the harassment of the deceased was with a view to coerce her to convince her parents to meet the demands for dowry.

24. All the above factors clearly established the legal requirements for an offence falling under Sections 304B and 498A IPC with the aid of Section 113B of the Evidence Act, 1872 against the appellants and the conviction and sentence imposed, therefore, do not call for interference. Hence, the appeal fails and is accordingly dismissed.

**********', 1] , 
[ 'CROSS CITATION
2016 AIR (SC) 2319
HEADNOTE
EVIDENCE
Evidence Act, 1872
Sections 123 and 124 - Claim of privilege - Complaint of sexual harassment by appellant against two seniors - Separate enquiries made by separate committees - Disciplinary Authority considered reports of both committees and did not find sufficient material to proceed against Seniors - Whether appellant is entitled to get copy of the report - Union of India claimed privilege under Sections 123 and 124 of Evidence Act as disclosure of the contents of the report would be against national interest and would compromise national security - Reports and accompanying documents filed in the Court, not suggesting any threat to integrity of the country, if contents thereof are disclosed. Held how can Union of India claim privilege under Sections 123 and 124 in the matter of an enquiry of alleged sexual harassment. Such allegation has nothing to do with national security. Appellant is entitled to the report. Court master directed to hand over the report along with other documents to her.
HELD
We find it very odd that in a matter of an enquiry in respect of an allegation of sexual harassment, the Union of India should claim privilege under Sections 123 and 124 of the Evidence Act. The contents of Reports alleging sexual harassment can hardly relate to affairs of State or anything concerning national security. In any event, absolutely nothing has been shown to us to warrant withholding the Reports and the documents from the appellant in relation to the enquiry of allegations of sexual harassment made by the appellant against Sunil Uke and Ashok Chaturvedi. (Para 13)

We accordingly dispose of this appeal by holding that the appellant is entitled to the Reports in respect of the allegations made by her of sexual harassment by Sunil Uke and Ashok Chaturvedi and that none of the respondents have committed any contempt of court. In any case Ashok Chaturvedi has since passed away. (Para 15)

We direct the Union of India to supply to the appellant the missing pages of the deposition marked as Annexure Q-2 and Annexure Q-5 of the witnesses as well as the CD containing the deposition of six officers/staff recorded on 22nd April, 2008 and the CD containing the deposition of Sunil Uke. The needful be done within one week from today. (Para 18)


MADAN B. LOKUR, J.


1. Leave granted.

2. The appellant is aggrieved by the judgment and order dated 12th November, 2009 passed by the Delhi High Court in Contempt Case (C) No.449 of 2009. By the impugned judgment and order, the High Court held that the respondents had not committed any violation of the order dated 12th November, 2008 passed in W.P. (C) No.7971 of 2008.

3. In W.P. (C) No.7971 of 2008 the appellant had made several prayers but during the course of hearing in the High Court, five of the prayers were not pressed with liberty to take appropriate proceedings in accordance with law. The sixth prayer which was pressed related to respondent No.2 (Ashok Chaturvedi). It was prayed that he should be asked to proceed on leave pending the independent enquiry into the appellants complaint of sexual harassment so that this respondent could not use his power and authority to influence any independent enquiry. As will be evident from the prayer, the enquiry relating to the allegation of sexual harassment made by the appellant was already pending. In the order dated 12th November, 2008 a direction was given by the High Court to expeditiously conclude the enquiry.

4. A few brief facts are necessary for a proper appreciation of the controversy before us.

5. The appellant had complained of sexual harassment by her senior Sunil Uke, Joint Secretary in the department and Ashok Chaturvedi. The allegation of sexual harassment by Sunil Uke was looked into by a Committee constituted for this purpose. The Committee gave its Report on 19th May, 2008.

6. A separate enquiry was held by a separate Committee into the allegation of sexual harassment by Ashok Chaturvedi. This Committee gave its Report on 23rd January, 2009.

7. In the Contempt Petition filed by the appellant in the Delhi High Court, it was brought out that the Committee inquiring into the allegation against Ashok Chaturvedi had since given its Report. It appears that pursuant to the Report an order dated 22nd September, 2009 was passed against the appellant but she disputed that this order was based on the Report. In any event, we are not concerned with the order dated 22nd September, 2009 except to say that it noted that the appellants disciplinary authority had considered both Reports and had approved the conclusion that there was not enough evidence to take action against Sunil Uke or Ashok Chaturvedi.

8. Be that as it may, the controversy that arose during the pendency of the proceedings in the High Court and in this Court related to the entitlement of the appellant to a copy of the Report dated 23rd January, 2009. The High Court did not pass any substantive order relating to furnishing that Report to the appellant.

9. At this stage, it may be noted that on 7th July, 2014 this Court recorded that Ashok Chaturvedi had since passed away.

10. With respect to furnishing the Report dated 23rd January, 2009 an affidavit has been filed on behalf of the Union of India claiming privilege under Sections 123 and 124 of the Evidence Act. We have been taken through the affidavit dated 22nd July, 2010 and all that the affidavit says is that disclosure of the contents of the Report would be against national interest and would compromise national security. Apparently, this is only because the appellant happens to belong to the highly sensitive organization which is entrusted with the delicate job of collecting and analyzing intelligence inputs necessary to maintain the unity, integrity and sovereignty of the country.

11. Both the Reports and the accompanying documents have been filed by the Union of India in a sealed cover in this Court.

12. We have gone through both the Reports and the accompanying documents and find absolutely nothing therein which could suggest that there is any threat to the integrity of the country or anything contained therein would be detrimental to the interests of the country. We had also specifically asked the learned Additional Solicitor General to tell us exactly what portion of the Reports and the documents would be detrimental to the interests of the country but nothing could be pointed out during the hearing.

13. We find it very odd that in a matter of an enquiry in respect of an allegation of sexual harassment, the Union of India should claim privilege under Sections 123 and 124 of the Evidence Act. The contents of Reports alleging sexual harassment can hardly relate to affairs of State or anything concerning national security. In any event, absolutely nothing has been shown to us to warrant withholding the Reports and the documents from the appellant in relation to the enquiry of allegations of sexual harassment made by the appellant against Sunil Uke and Ashok Chaturvedi.

14. The Report relating to allegations of sexual harassment made by the appellant against Sunil Uke is not the subject matter of any dispute of controversy before us. However, since that Report has also been filed in this Court in a sealed cover, we did go through it and find nothing in the Report that would require it to be withheld from the appellant on any ground whatsoever.

15. We accordingly dispose of this appeal by holding that the appellant is entitled to the Reports in respect of the allegations made by her of sexual harassment by Sunil Uke and Ashok Chaturvedi and that none of the respondents have committed any contempt of court. In any case Ashok Chaturvedi has since passed away.

16. While going through the Report dated 19th May, 2008 we found that by mistake one or two pages of the deposition marked as Annexure Q-2 and Annexure Q-5 of the witnesses were not photocopied. Similarly, the CD containing the deposition of 6 officers/staff on 22nd April, 2008 has not been filed nor has the CD containing the deposition of Sunil Uke been filed in the sealed cover, perhaps to prevent damage to the CD.

17. We direct the Court Master to handover to the appellant the Report and documents pertaining to the enquiry in relation to the allegations made by the appellant against Sunil Uke and against Ashok Chaturvedi and which have been filed in this Court in a sealed cover.

18. We direct the Union of India to supply to the appellant the missing pages of the deposition marked as Annexure Q-2 and Annexure Q-5 of the witnesses as well as the CD containing the deposition of six officers/staff recorded on 22nd April, 2008 and the CD containing the deposition of Sunil Uke. The needful be done within one week from today.

19. With the above directions the appeal is disposed of.

**********', 1] , 
[ 'CROSS CITATION
1997 AIR (SC) 3011
1997 (6) SCC 241
1997 (3) (Suppl) SCR 404
APPEARANCES
Mr. F.S. Nariman, Senior Advocate, Ms. Meenakshi Arora and Ms. Niti Dixit, Advocates with him for the Petitioners.
Mr. T.R. Andhyarujina, Solicitor General, Mr. Mukul Mudgal, Ms. Suvira Lal, Mr. C.V.S. Rao, Mr. K.S. Bhati and Mr. M.K. Singh, Advocates with him for the Respondents.

HEADNOTE
CONSTITUTION OF INDIA
Articles 14, 19, 21, 15, 32, 141 - Gender Equality - Sexual harassment of working women at work places - Held violation of fundamental rights of women workers require for effective redressal that guidelines be laid down for protection of these rights to fill legislative vacuum - Right is also covered under Article 19(1)(g) to practice profession - In exercise of power under Article 32 guidelines are issued for enforcement of fundamental rights and these would be treated as the law declared by this Court under Article 141 of constitution and be observed at all work places for preservation and enforcement of the right to gender equality of working women and be binding on all employers who have to provide procedures for resolution, settlement or prosecution of acts of sexual harassment by taking all steps required - International law on the subject considered.

Sexual harassment
Sexual harassment defined in guidelines issued to be treated as law and would include unwelcome sexually determined behaviour - Prohibitions as per guidelines to be included under standing orders under Industrial Employment (Standing Orders) Act 1946 and for Govt in Conduct Rules - Complaints mechanism to be set up - Govt to consider adopting suitable legislation to ensure implementation of guidelines.
HELD
Each such incident results in violation of the fundamental rights of Gender Equality and the Right to Life and Liberty. It is a clear violation of the rights under Articles 14, 15 and 21 of the Constitution. One of the logical consequences of such an incident is also the violation of the victims fundamental right under Article 19(1)(g) to practice any profession or to carry out any occupation, trade or business. Such violations, therefore, attract the remedy under Article 32 for the enforcement of these fundamental rights of women. This class action under Article 32 of the Constitution is for this reason. A writ of mandamus in such a situation, if it is to be effective, needs to be accompanied by directions for prevention; as the violation of fundamental rights of this kind is a recurring phenomenon. The fundamental right to carry on any occupation, trade or profession depends on the availability of a safe working environment. Right to life means life with dignity. The primary responsibility for ensuring such safety and dignity through suitable legislation, and the creation of a mechanism for its enforcement, is of the legislature and the executive. When, however, instances of sexual harassment resulting in violation of fundamental rights of women workers under Articles 14, 19 and 21 are brought before us for redress under Article 32, an effective redressal requires that some guidelines should be laid down for the protection of these rights to fill the legislative vacuum.

In the absence of domestic law occupying the field, to formulate effective measures to check the evil of sexual harassment of working women at all work places, the contents of International Conventions and norms are significant for the purpose of interpretation of the guarantee of gender equality, right to work with human dignity in Articles 14, 15, 19(1)(g) and 21 of the Constitution and the safeguards against sexual harassment implicit therein. Any International Convention not inconsistent with the fundamental rights and in harmony with its spirit must be read into these provisions to enlarge the meaning and content thereof, to promote the object of the constitutional guarantee. This is implicit from Article 51(c) and the enabling power of the Parliament to enact laws for implementing the International Conventions and norms by virtue of Article 253 read with Entry 14 of the union List in Seventh Schedule of the Constitution. Article 73 also is relevant. It provides that the executive power of the Union shall extend to the matters with respect to which Parliament has power to make laws. The executive power of the Union is, therefore, available till the Parliament enacts legislation to expressly provide measures needed to curb the evil.

The obligation of this Court under Article 32 of the Constitution for the enforcement of these fundamental rights in the absence of legislation must be viewed along with the role of judiciary envisaged in the Beijing Statement of Principles of the Independence of the Judiciary in the LAWASIA region. These principles were accepted by the Chief Justices of the Asia and the Pacific at Beijing in 1995 as those representing the minimum standards necessary to be observed in order to maintain the independence and effective functioning of the judiciary.

At the Fourth World Conference on Women in Beijing, the Government of India has also made an official commitment, inter alia, to formulate and operationalize a national policy on women which will continuously guide and inform action at every level and in every sector; to set up a Commission for Womens Rights to act as a public defender of womens human rights; to institutionalise a national level mechanism to monitor the implementation of the Platform for Action. We have, therefore, no hesitation in placing reliance on the above for the purpose of construing the nature and ambit of constitutional guarantee of gender equality in our Constitution.

The meaning and content of the fundamental rights guaranteed in the Constitution of India are of sufficient amplitude to encompass all the facets of gender equality including prevention of sexual harassment or abuse. Independence of Judiciary forms a part of our constitutional scheme. The international conventions and norms are to be read into them in the absence of enacted domestic law occupying the field when there is no inconsistency between them. It is now an accepted rule of judicial construction that regard must be had to international conventions and norms for construing domestic law when there is no inconsistency between them and there is a void in the domestic law. The High Court of Australia in Minister for Immigration and Ethnic Affairs v. Teoh, 128 ALR 353, has recognised the concept of legitimate expectation of its observance in the absence of a contrary legislative provision, even in the absence of a Bill of Rights in the Constitution of Australia.

There is no reason why these international conventions and norms cannot, therefore, be used for construing the fundamental rights expressly guaranteed in the Constitution of India which embody the basic concept of gender equality in all spheres of human activity.

In view of the above, and the absence of enacted law to provide for the effective enforcement of the basic human right of gender equality and guarantee against sexual harassment and abuse, more particularly against sexual harassment at work places, we lay down the guidelines and norms specified hereinafter for due observance at all work places or other institutions, until a legislation is enacted for the purpose. This is done in exercise of the power available under Article 32 of the Constitution for enforcement of the fundamental rights and it is further emphasised that this would be treated as the law declared by this Court under Article 141 of the Constitution.

It shall be the duty of the employer or other responsible persons in work places or other institutions to prevent or deter the commission of acts of sexual harassment and to provide the procedures for the resolution, settlement or prosecution of acts of sexual harassment by taking all steps required.

All employers or persons in charge of work place whether in public or private sector should take appropriate steps to prevent sexual harassment. Without prejudice to the generality of this obligation they should take the following steps:

(a) Express prohibition of sexual harassment as defined above at the work place should be notified, published and circulated in appropriate ways.

(b) The Rules/Regulations of Government and Public Sector bodies relating to conduct and discipline should include rules/regulations prohibiting sexual harassment and provide for appropriate penalties in such rules against the offender.

(c) As regards private employers steps should be taken to include the aforesaid prohibitions in the standing orders under the Industrial Employment (Standing Orders) Act, 1946.

(d) Appropriate work conditions should be provided in respect of work, leisure, health and hygiene to further ensure that there is no hostile environment towards women at work places and no employee woman should have reasonable grounds to believe that she is disadvantaged in connection with her employment.

Accordingly, we direct that the above guidelines and norms would be strictly observed in all work places for the preservation and enforcement of the right to gender equality of the working women. These directions would be binding and enforceable in law until incomplete suitable legislation is enacted to occupy the field. Para 3, 7, 11, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18 & 19


J.S. VERMA, CJI.:

1. This Writ Petition has been filed for the enforcement of the fundamental rights of working women under Articles 14, 19 and 21 of the Constitution of India in view of the prevailing climate in which the violation of these rights is not uncommon. With the increasing awareness and emphasis on gender justice, there is increase in the effort to guard against such violations; and the resentment towards incidents of sexual harassment is also increasing. The present petition has been brought as a class action by certain social activists and NGOs with the aim of focussing attention towards this societal aberration, and assisting in finding suitable methods for realisation of the true concept of gender equality; and to prevent sexual harassment of working women in all work places through judicial process, to fill the vacuum in existing legislation.

2. The immediate cause for the filing of this writ petition is an incident of alleged brutal gang rape of a social worker in a village of Rajasthan. That incident is the subject matter of a separate criminal action and no further mention of it, by us, is necessary. The incident reveals the hazards to which a working woman may be exposed and the depravity to which sexual harassment can degenerate; and the urgency for safeguards by an alternative mechanism in the absence of legislative measures. In the absence of legislative measures, the need is to find an effective alternative mechanism to fulfil this felt and urgent social need.

3. Each such incident results in violation of the fundamental rights of Gender Equality and the Right to Life and Liberty. It is a clear violation of the rights under Articles 14, 15 and 21 of the Constitution. One of the logical consequences of such an incident is also the violation of the victims fundamental right under Article 19(1)(g) to practice any profession or to carry out any occupation, trade or business. Such violations, therefore, attract the remedy under Article 32 for the enforcement of these fundamental rights of women. This class action under Article 32 of the Constitution is for this reason. A writ of mandamus in such a situation, if it is to be effective, needs to be accompanied by directions for prevention; as the violation of fundamental rights of this kind is a recurring phenomenon. The fundamental right to carry on any occupation, trade or profession depends on the availability of a safe working environment. Right to life means life with dignity. The primary responsibility for ensuring such safety and dignity through suitable legislation, and the creation of a mechanism for its enforcement, is of the legislature and the executive. When, however, instances of sexual harassment resulting in violation of fundamental rights of women workers under Articles 14, 19 and 21 are brought before us for redress under Article 32, an effective redressal requires that some guidelines should be laid down for the protection of these rights to fill the legislative vacuum.

4. The notice of the petition was given to the State of Rajasthan and the Union of India. The learned Solicitor General appeared for the Union of India and rendered valuable assistance in the true spirit of a Law Officer to help us find a proper solution to this social problem of considerable magnitude. In addition to Ms. Meenakshi Arora and Ms. Naina Kapur who assisted the Court with full commitment, Shri Fali S. Nariman appeared as Amicus Curiae and rendered great assistance. We place on record our great appreciation for every counsel who appeared in the case and rendered the needed assistance to the Court which has enabled us to deal with this unusual matter in the manner considered appropriate for a cause of this nature.

5. Apart from Article 32 of the Constitution of India, we may refer to some other provisions which envisage judicial intervention for eradication of this social evil. Some provisions in the Constitution in addition to Articles 14, 19(1)(g) and 21, which have relevance are :

Article 15 :

15. Prohibition of discrimination on grounds of religion, race, caste sex or place of birth.

(1) The State shall not discriminate against any citizen on only of religion, race, caste, sex, place of birth or any of them.

(2) xxx xxx xxx

(3) Nothing in this article shall prevent the State from making any special provision for women and children.

(4) xxx xxx xxx

Article 42 :

42. Provision for just and humane conditions of work and maternity relief - The State shall make provision for securing just and humane conditions of work and for maternity relief.

Article 51A :

51A. Fundamental duties. - It shall be the duty of every citizen of India.-

(a) to abide by the Constitution and respect its ideals and institutions, ....

xxx xxx xxx

(e) to promote harmony and the spirit of common brotherhood amongst all the people of India transcending religious, linguistic and regional or sectional diversities, to renounce practices derogatory to the dignity of women;

xxx xxx xxx

6. Before we refer to the international conventions and norms having relevance in this field and the manner in which they assume significance in application and judicial interpretation, we may advert to some other provisions in the Constitution which permit such use. These provisions are :

Article 51 :

51. Promotion of international peace and security - The State shall endeavour to -

xxx xxx xxx

(c) foster respect for international law and treaty obligations in the dealings of organised people with one another; and

xxx xxx xxx

Article 253 :

253. Legislation for giving effect to international agreements - Notwithstanding anything in the foregoing provisions of this Chapter, Parliament has power to make any law for the whole or any part of the territory of India for implementing any treaty, agreement or convention with any other country or countries or any decision made at any international conference, association or other body.

Seventh Schedule :

List I - Union List :

xxx xxx xxx

14. Entering into treaties and agreements with foreign countries and implementing of treaties, agreements and conventions with foreign countries.

7. In the absence of domestic law occupying the field, to formulate effective measures to check the evil of sexual harassment of working women at all work places, the contents of International Conventions and norms are significant for the purpose of interpretation of the guarantee of gender equality, right to work with human dignity in Articles 14, 15, 19(1)(g) and 21 of the Constitution and the safeguards against sexual harassment implicit therein. Any International Convention not inconsistent with the fundamental rights and in harmony with its spirit must be read into these provisions to enlarge the meaning and content thereof, to promote the object of the constitutional guarantee. This is implicit from Article 51(c) and the enabling power of the Parliament to enact laws for implementing the International Conventions and norms by virtue of Article 253 read with Entry 14 of the union List in Seventh Schedule of the Constitution. Article 73 also is relevant. It provides that the executive power of the Union shall extend to the matters with respect to which Parliament has power to make laws. The executive power of the Union is, therefore, available till the Parliament enacts legislation to expressly provide measures needed to curb the evil.

8. Thus, the power of this Court under Article 32 for enforcement of the fundamental rights and the executive power of the Union have to meet the challenge to protect the working women from sexual harassment and to make their fundamental rights meaningful. Governance of the society by the rule of law mandates this requirement as a logical concomitant of the constitutional scheme. The exercise performed by the Court in this matter is with this common perception shared with the learned Solicitor General and other members of the Bar who rendered valuable assistance in the performance of this difficult task in public interest.

9. The progress made at each hearing culminated in the formulation of guidelines to which the Union of India gave its consent through the learned Solicitor General, indicating that these should be the guidelines and norms declared by this Court to govern the behaviour of the employers and all others at the work places curb this social evil.

10. Gender equality includes protection from sexual harassment and right to work with dignity, which is an universally recognised basic human right. The common minimum requirement of this right has received global acceptance. The International Conventions and norms are, therefore, of great significance in the formulation of the guidelines to achieve this purpose.

11. The obligation of this Court under Article 32 of the Constitution for the enforcement of these fundamental rights in the absence of legislation must be viewed along with the role of judiciary envisaged in the Beijing Statement of Principles of the Independence of the Judiciary in the LAWASIA region. These principles were accepted by the Chief Justices of the Asia and the Pacific at Beijing in 1995 as those representing the minimum standards necessary to be observed in order to maintain the independence and effective functioning of the judiciary. The objectives of the judiciary mentioned in the Beijing Statement are:

Objectives of the Judiciary:

10. The objectives and functions of the Judiciary include the following :

(a) to ensure that all persons are able to live securely under the Rule of Law;

(b) to promote, within the proper limits of the judicial function, the observance and the attainment of human rights; and

(c) to administer the law impartially among persons and between persons and the State.

12. Some provisions in the Convention on the Elimination of All Forms of Discrimination against Women, of significance in the present context are :

Article 11 :

1. States Parties shall take all appropriate measures to eliminate discrimination against women in the field of employment in order to ensure, on a basis of equality of men and women, the same rights, in particular :

(a) The right to work as an inalienable right of all human beings;

xxx                  xxx                 xxx

(f) The right to protection of health and to safety in working conditions, including the safeguarding of the function of reproduction.

xxx                 xxx                 xxx

Article 24 :

States Parties undertake to adopt all necessary measures at the national level aimed at achieving the full realization of the rights recognised in the present Convention.

13. The general recommendations of CEDAW in this context in respect of Article 11 are :

Violence and equality in employment :

22. Equality in employment can be seriously impaired when women are subjected to gender specific violence, such as sexual harassment in the work place.

23. Sexual harassment includes such unwelcome sexually determined behaviour as physical contacts and advances, sexually coloured remarks, showing pornography and sexual demands, whether by words or actions. Such conduct can be humiliating and may constitute a health and safety problem; it is discriminatory when the woman has reasonable grounds to believe that her objection would disadvantage her in connection with her employment, including recruiting or promotion, or when it creates a hostile working environment. Effective complaints procedures and remedies, including compensation should be provided.

24. States should include in their reports information about sexual harassment, and on measures to protect women from sexual harassment and other forms of violence of coercion in the work place.

14. The Government of India has ratified the above Resolution on June 25, 1993 with some reservations which are not material in the present context. At the Fourth World Conference on Women in Beijing, the Government of India has also made an official commitment, inter alia, to formulate and operationalize a national policy on women which will continuously guide and inform action at every level and in every sector; to set up a Commission for Womens Rights to act as a public defender of womens human rights; to institutionalise a national level mechanism to monitor the implementation of the Platform for Action. We have, therefore, no hesitation in placing reliance on the above for the purpose of construing the nature and ambit of constitutional guarantee of gender equality in our Constitution.

15. The meaning and content of the fundamental rights guaranteed in the Constitution of India are of sufficient amplitude to encompass all the facets of gender equality including prevention of sexual harassment or abuse. Independence of Judiciary forms a part of our constitutional scheme. The international conventions and norms are to be read into them in the absence of enacted domestic law occupying the field when there is no inconsistency between them. It is now an accepted rule of judicial construction that regard must be had to international conventions and norms for construing domestic law when there is no inconsistency between them and there is a void in the domestic law. The High Court of Australia in Minister for Immigration and Ethnic Affairs v. Teoh, 128 ALR 353, has recognised the concept of legitimate expectation of its observance in the absence of a contrary legislative provision, even in the absence of a Bill of Rights in the Constitution of Australia.

16. In Nilabati Behera v. State of Orissa, 1993(2) SCC 746, a provision in the ICCPR was referred to support the view taken that an enforceable right to compensation is not alien to the concept of enforcement of a guaranteed right, as a public law remedy under Article 32, distinct from the private law remedy in torts. There is no reason why these international conventions and norms cannot, therefore, be used for construing the fundamental rights expressly guaranteed in the Constitution of India which embody the basic concept of gender equality in all spheres of human activity.

17. In view of the above, and the absence of enacted law to provide for the effective enforcement of the basic human right of gender equality and guarantee against sexual harassment and abuse, more particularly against sexual harassment at work places, we lay down the guidelines and norms specified hereinafter for due observance at all work places or other institutions, until a legislation is enacted for the purpose. This is done in exercise of the power available under Article 32 of the Constitution for enforcement of the fundamental rights and it is further emphasised that this would be treated as the law declared by this Court under Article 141 of the Constitution.

18. The GUIDELINES and NORMS prescribed herein are as under :-

HAVING REGARD to the definition of human rights in Section 2(d) of the Protection of Human Rights Act, 1993, TAKING NOTE of the fact that the present civil and penal laws in India do not adequately provide for specific protection of women from sexual harassment in work places and that enactment of such legislation will take considerable time,

It is necessary and expedient for employers in work places as well as other responsible persons or institutions to observe certain guidelines to ensure the prevention of sexual harassment of women:

1. Duty of the Employer or other responsible persons in work places and other institutions:

It shall be the duty of the employer or other responsible persons in work places or other institutions to prevent or deter the commission of acts of sexual harassment and to provide the procedures for the resolution, settlement or prosecution of acts of sexual harassment by taking all steps required.

2. Definition:

For this purpose, sexual harassment includes such unwelcome sexually determined behaviour (whether directly or by implication) as :

a) Physical contact and advances;

b) a demand or request for sexual favours;

c) sexually coloured remarks;

d) showing pornography;

e) any other unwelcome physical, verbal or non-verbal conduct

of sexual nature.

Where any of these acts is committed in circumstances where- under the victim of such conduct has a reasonable apprehension that in relation to the victims employment or work whether she is drawing salary, or honorarium or voluntary, whether in government, public or private enterprise such conduct can be humiliating and may constitute a health and safety problem. It is discriminatory for instance when the woman has reasonable grounds to believe that her objection would disadvantage her in connection with her employment or work including recruiting or promotion or when it creates a hostile work environment. Adverse consequences might be visited if the victim does not consent to the conduct in question or raises any objection thereto.

3. Preventive Steps:

All employers or persons in charge of work place whether in public or private sector should take appropriate steps to prevent sexual harassment. Without prejudice to the generality of this obligation they should take the following steps:

(a) Express prohibition of sexual harassment as defined above at the work place should be notified, published and circulated in appropriate ways.

(b) The Rules/Regulations of Government and Public Sector bodies relating to conduct and discipline should include rules/regulations prohibiting sexual harassment and provide for appropriate penalties in such rules against the offender.

(c) As regards private employers steps should be taken to include the aforesaid prohibitions in the standing orders under the Industrial Employment (Standing Orders) Act, 1946.

(d) Appropriate work conditions should be provided in respect of work, leisure, health and hygiene to further ensure that there is no hostile environment towards women at work places and no employee woman should have reasonable grounds to believe that she is disadvantaged in connection with her employment.

4. Criminal Proceedings:

Where such conduct amounts to a specific offence under the Indian Penal Code or under any other law, the employer shall initiate appropriate action in accordance with law by making a complaint with the appropriate authority.

In particular, it should ensure that victims, or witnesses are not victimized or discriminated against while dealing with complaints of sexual harassment. The victims of sexual harassment should have the option to seek transfer of the perpetrator or their own transfer.

5. Disciplinary Action:

Where such conduct amounts to mis-conduct in employment as defined by the relevant service rules, appropriate disciplinary action should be initiated by the employer in accordance with those rules.

6. Complaint Mechanism:

Whether or not such conduct constitutes an offence under law or a breach of the service rules, an appropriate complaint mechanism should be created in the employers organization for redress of the complaint made by the victim. Such complaint mechanism should ensure time bound treatment of complaints.

7. Complaints Committee:

The complaint mechanism, referred to in (6) above, should be adequate to provide, where necessary, a Complaints Committee, a special counsellor or other support service, including the maintenance of confidentiality.

The Complaints Committee should be headed by a woman and not less than half of its member should be women. Further, to prevent the possibility of any undue pressure or influence from senior levels, such Complaints Committee should involve a third party, either NGO or other body who is familiar with the issue of sexual harassment.

The Complaints Committee must make an annual report to the Government department concerned of the complaints and action taken by them.

The employers and person in charge will also report on the compliance with the aforesaid guidelines including on the reports of the Complaints Committee to the Government department.

8. Workers Initiative:

Employees should be allowed to raise issues of sexual harassment at workers meeting and in other appropriate forum and it should be affirmatively discussed in Employer-Employee Meetings.

9. Awareness:

Awareness of the rights of female employees in this regard should be created in particular by prominently notifying the guidelines (and appropriate legislation when enacted on the subject) in a suitable manner.

10. Third Party Harassment:

Where sexual harassment occurs as a result of an act or omission by any third party or outsider, the employer and person in charge will take all steps necessary and reasonable to assist the affected person in terms of support and preventive action.

11. The Central/State Governments are requested to consider adopting suitable measures including legislation to ensure that the guidelines laid down by this order are also observed by the employers in Private Sector.

12. These guidelines will not prejudice any rights available under the Protection of Human Rights Act, 1993.

19. Accordingly, we direct that the above guidelines and norms would be strictly observed in all work places for the preservation and enforcement of the right to gender equality of the working women. These directions would be binding and enforceable in law until incomplete suitable legislation is enacted to occupy the field. These writ petitions are disposed of accordingly.

**********', 1] , 
[ 'HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAWS
Evidence Act, 1872
Section 113B As inserted by Dowry Prohibition (Amendment Act, 43 of 1986 - Indian Penal Code, 1860 - Section 304B - Presumption under - Nature of Presumption - Essentials for raising presumptions - Expression, soon before death - Import mentioned.
HELD
Presumption under section 113B is a presumption of law. On proof of the essentials mentioned therein, it becomes obligatory on the court to raise a presumption that the accused caused the dowry death. The presumption shall be raised only on proof of the following essentials:

(1) The question before the court must be whether the accused has committed the dowry death of a woman. (This means that the presumption can be raised only if the accused is being tried for the offence under section 304B IPC).

(2) The woman was subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or his relatives.

(3) Such cruelty or harassment was for, or in connection with any demand for dowry.

(4) Such cruelty or harassment was soon before her death. (Para 10)

The expression soon before is very relevant where section 113B of the Evidence Act and section 304B IPC are pressed into service. Prosecution is obliged to show that soon before the occurrence there was cruelty or harassment and only in that case presumption operates. Evidence in that regard has to be led by prosecution. Soon before is a relative term and it would depend upon circumstances of each case and no straitjacket formula can be laid down as to what would constitute a period of soon before the occurrence. It would be hazardous to indicate any fixed period, and that brings in the importance of a proximity test both for the proof of an offence of dowry death as well as for raising a presumption under section 113B of the Evidence Act. The expression soon before would normally imply that the interval should not be much between the concerned cruelty or harassment and the death in question. There must be existence of a proximate and live-link between the effect of cruelty based on dowry demand and the concerned death. (Para 11)


ARIJIT PASAYAT, J.

1. Menace of dowry cuts across caste, religion and geographical location. In the instant case, victim belonged to a remote village in the State of Kerala. The two appellants stood charged for alleged commission of offence punishable under section 304B read with section 34 of the Indian Penal Code, 1860 (in short the IPC). The trial court found that the prosecution has failed to establish the accusations and directed their acquittal.

2. In appeal preferred by the State, the judgment of acquittal was set aside and the accused persons were found guilty under section 304B read with section 34 IPC and each was sentenced to undergo RI for seven years.

3. The victim in this case was one Sherifa (hereinafter referred to as the deceased) and the accused-appellants 1 and 2 were her husband and mother-in-law respectively.

4. According to the prosecution following is the factual scenario:

The deceased was married to the appellant no.1 (A-1) on 19.1.1989. At the time of marriage, there was an agreement to pay Rs.35000/- as dowry. Since the entire amount was not paid, the accused was subjected to mental and physical harassment. On 29.8.1991 about 9.00 a.m. she committed suicide by jumping into a well. Information was lodged by Kunhimoidi (PW-1), a neighbour and investigation was undertaken. The case was registered under the heading unnatural death. On completion of investigation, charge sheet was filed. Seventeen witnesses were examined to further the prosecution version, while the accused persons pleaded innocence and examined 3 witnesses. According to them, the deceased had accidentally fallen into the well and it was not a case of suicide. As noted above, the trial court found that there were some unexplained discrepancies in the evidence of the main witnesses i.e PWs 5, 6 and 15 relating to demand of dowry and, therefore, it would be unsafe to convict accused persons.

5. In appeal, the High Court found that the approach of the trial court was not correct. It found that the evidence of PWs 6 and 15 clearly established the commission of offence by the accused persons.

6. In support of the appeal, learned counsel for the accused-appellants submitted that there was no dispute regarding payment of a sum of Rs.30,000/- as dowry. In fact, this amount was kept in a bank account in the name of the deceased and this itself negates the plea of prosecution that there was greed for money. Further, the deceased had herself withdrawn money and given the same to somebody. The claim of Kunhammed and Kunhi Choyi (PWs 6 and 15 respectively) that they witnessed the occurrence is improbabilised by the evidence of Prema (PW-5) who was stated to be an eyewitness. Her evidence rules out theory of suicide and the possibility of PWs 6 and 15 seeing the alleged occurrence. The well admittedly was not covered on the sides and it was possible as was held by the trial court that the deceased had slipped. Since the view taken by the sessions judge was a possible view, the High Court should not have interfered with the same. Furthermore, the evidence of prosecution in no way shows that the accused no.2 allegedly demanded dowry. Moideen (PW-8) had himself stated that he did not have any idea if any amount in excess of Rs.30,000/- was demanded as dowry. There was no harassment after the payment of Rs.30,000/-. Therefore, there was no question of any demand immediately prior to the alleged occurrence. Section 304B has therefore no application.

7. In response, learned counsel for the State of Kerala submitted that both the trial court and the High Court have discarded the plea taken by the accused persons that the deceased accidentally fell into the well. The trial court proceeded on erroneous premises to hold that the demand of dowry has not been established overlooking the cogent evidence of Moideen and Kunhammed (PWs 8 and 12 respectively). Moreover, PWs 3 and 4 who were neighbours categorically stated about the harassment meted out to the deceased for non-payment of dowry.

8. Section 304B IPC deals with dowry death which reads as follows:

304B. Dowry Death- (1) Where the death of a woman is caused by any burns or bodily
injury or occurs otherwise than under normal circumstances within seven years of her marriage and it is shown that soon before her death she was subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or any relative of her husband for, or in connection with any
demand for dowry, such death shall be called dowry death and such husband or relative shall be deemed to have caused her death.

Explanation - For the purpose of this sub-section dowry shall have same meaning as in section 2 of the Dowry Prohibition Act, 1961 (28 of 1961).

(2) Whoever commits dowry death shall be punished with imprisonment for a term which
shall not be less than seven years but which may extend to imprisonment for life.

9. The provision has application when death of a woman is caused by any burns or bodily injury or occurs otherwise than under normal circumstances within seven years of her marriage and it is shown that soon before her death she was subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or any relatives of her husband for, or in connection with any demand for dowry. In order to attract application of section 304B IPC, the essential ingredients are as follows:-

(i) The death of a woman should be caused by burns or bodily injury or otherwise than under a normal circumstance.

(ii) Such a death should have occurred within seven years of her marriage.

(iii) She must have been subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or any relative of her husband.

(iv) Such cruelty or harassment should be for or in connection with demand of dowry.

(v) Such cruelty or harassment is shown to have been meted out to the woman soon before her death.

10. Section 113B of the Indian Evidence Act, 1872 (in short the Evidence Act) is also relevant for the case at hand. Both section 304B IPC and section 113B of the Evidence Act were inserted by the Dowry Prohibition (Amendment) Act 43 of 1986 with a view to combat the increasing menace of dowry deaths. Section 113B reads as follows:-

113B: Presumption as to dowry death- When the question is whether a person has
committed the dowry death of a woman and it is shown that soon before her death such
woman has been subjected by such person to cruelty or harassment for, or in connection with, any demand for dowry, the court shall presume that such person had caused the dowry death.

Explanation - For the purposes of this section dowry death shall have the same meaning as in section 304B of the Indian Penal Code (45 of 1860).

The necessity for insertion of the two provisions has been amply analysed by the Law Commission of India in its 21st Report dated 10th August, 1988 on Dowry Deaths and Law Reform. Keeping in view the impediment in the pre-existing law in securing evidence to prove dowry related deaths, legislature thought it wise to insert a provision relating to presumption of dowry death on proof of certain essentials. It is in this background presumptive section 113B in the Evidence Act has been inserted. As per the definition of dowry death in section 304B IPC and the wording in the presumptive section 113B of the Evidence Act, one of the essential ingredients, amongst others, in both the provisions is that the concerned woman must have been soon before her death subjected to cruelty or harassment for or in connection with the demand of dowry. Presumption under section 113B is a presumption of law. On proof of the essentials mentioned therein, it becomes obligatory on the court to raise a presumption that the accused caused the dowry death. The presumption shall be raised only on proof of the following essentials:

(1) The question before the court must be whether the accused has committed the dowry death of a woman. (This means that the presumption can be raised only if the accused is being tried for the offence under section 304B IPC).

(2) The woman was subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or his relatives.

(3) Such cruelty or harassment was for, or in connection with any demand for dowry.

(4) Such cruelty or harassment was soon before her death.

11. A conjoint reading of section 113B of the Evidence Act and section 304B IPC shows that there must be material to show that soon before her death the victim was subjected to cruelty or harassment. Prosecution has to rule out the possibility of a natural or accidental death so as to bring it within the purview of the death occurring otherwise than in normal circumstances. The expression soon before is very relevant where section 113B of the Evidence Act and section 304B IPC are pressed into service. Prosecution is obliged to show that soon before the occurrence there was cruelty or harassment and only in that case presumption operates. Evidence in that regard has to be led by prosecution. Soon before is a relative term and it would depend upon circumstances of each case and no straitjacket formula can be laid down as to what would constitute a period of soon before the occurrence. It would be hazardous to indicate any fixed period, and that brings in the importance of a proximity test both for the proof of an offence of dowry death as well as for raising a presumption under section 113B of the Evidence Act. The expression soon before her death used in the substantive section 304B IPC and section 113B of the Evidence Act is present with the idea of proximity test. No definite period has been indicated and the expression soon before is not defined. A reference to expression soon before used in section 114. Illustration (a) of the Evidence Act is relevant. It lays down that a court may presume that a man who is in the possession of goods soon after the theft, is either the thief, or has received the goods knowing them to be stolen, unless he can account for its possession. The determination of the period which can come within the term soon before is left to be determined by the courts, depending upon facts and circumstances of each case. Suffice, however, to indicate that the expression soon before would normally imply that the interval should not be much between the concerned cruelty or harassment and the death in question. There must be existence of a proximate and live-link between the effect of cruelty based on dowry demand and the concerned death. If alleged incident of cruelty is remote in time and has become stale enough not to disturb mental equilibrium of the woman concerned, it would be of no consequence.

12. When the aforesaid factual scenario as described by Narayani (PW 3), Safiya (PW-4), and PWs 8 and 12 is considered in the background of legal principles set out above, the inevitable conclusion is that accusations have been clearly established so far as accused-appellant no.1 husband of the deceased is concerned. But in respect of accused-appellant no.2, evidence against her relating to alleged demand of dowry is not cogent, and no credible evidence has been brought on record to substantiate the accusations. Therefore, while upholding the conviction and sentence imposed so far accused-appellant no.1 is concerned, we direct acquittal of accused-appellant no.2.

13. The accused-appellant no.1 is directed to surrender to custody to serve remainder of sentence, if any. The bail bonds of accused-appellant no.2 be cancelled.

14. The appeal is accordingly disposed of.

**********', 1] , 
[ 'CROSS CITATION
2010 (9) SCC 73
2010 (7) SCR 104
HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAWS
Penal Code, 1860
Sections 498A and 304B - Evidence Act, 1872, Section 113B - Dowry death - Conviction - Bald statements by PWs.1 and 3 alleging that victim was subjected to cruelty and harassment just prior to her death - No evidence to show that the victim committed suicide due to cruelty and harassment - No charges framed under the provisions of the Dowry Prohibition Act, 1961- Evidence produced related to demand for a fan only. Held, prosecution failed to fully satisfy the requirements of both Section 113B of the Evidence Act, 1872 and Section 304B IPC. In view of insufficient evidence, appellant is given benefit of doubt. Conviction set aside.
HELD
Having carefully considered the submissions made on behalf of the respective parties, we are inclined to allow the benefit of doubt to the Appellants having particular regard to the fact that except for certain bald statements made by PWs.1 and 3 alleging that the victim had been subjected to cruelty and harassment prior to her death, there is no other evidence to prove that the victim committed suicide on account of cruelty and harassment to which she was subjected just prior to her death, which, in fact, are the ingredients of the evidence to be led in respect of Section 113B of the Indian Evidence Act, 1872, in order to bring home the guilt against an accused under Section 304B IPC.

No charges were framed against the Appellants under the provisions of the Dowry Prohibition Act, 1961 and the evidence led in order to prove the same for the purposes of Section 304B IPC was related to a demand for a fan only. (Para 16)

In order to bring home a conviction under Section 304B IPC, it will not be sufficient to only lead evidence showing that cruelty or harassment had been meted out to the victim, but that such treatment was in connection with the demand for dowry. Prosecution in this case has failed to fully satisfy the requirements of both Section 113B of the Evidence Act, 1872 and Section 304B of the Indian Penal Code. (Para 17)

No case can be made out on the ground of insufficient evidence against the Appellants for conviction under Sections 498A and 304B IPC. (Para 18)

CASES REFERRED
1.Anand Kumar v. State of M.P. JT 2009 (2) SC 662 (Para 12)

2.Biswajit Halder @ Babu Halder & Ors. v. State of W.B. JT 2007 (5) SC 360 (Para 7)

3.Shri Gopal & Anr. v. Subhash & Ors. JT 2004 (2) SC 158 (Para 8)

ALTAMAS KABIR, J.

1. Leave granted.

2. This appeal is directed against the judgment and order dated 28th April, 2009, passed by Jabalpur Bench of the Madhya Pradesh High Court, dismissing Criminal Appeal No.103 of 2000, which had been directed against the judgment of conviction and sentence under Section 498A and Section 304B Indian Penal Code. By the said judgment, the learned Sessions Judge had sentenced the Appellants to undergo rigorous imprisonment for 3 years and to pay a fine of Rs.1,000/- and in default of payment of fine to undergo rigorous imprisonment for 3 months under Section 498A IPC and to undergo rigorous imprisonment for 7 years and to pay a fine of Rs.5,000/- and in default of payment of such fine, to undergo rigorous imprisonment for a further period of 3 years. Upon consideration of the materials on record, the High Court was of the view that the prosecution had proved its case beyond all reasonable doubts and that the appeal, therefore, deserved to be dismissed.

3. Appearing in support of the appeal, Mr. R.P. Gupta, learned Senior Advocate, contended that both the Courts below had erred in convicting the Appellants on the basis of evidence on record. Mr. Gupta submitted that in the absence of any evidence to prove the charges under Sections 304B and 498A IPC, the trial Court, as also the High Court, had erred in merely relying on the presumption available under Section 304B regarding the death of a woman by any burn or bodily injury or otherwise than under normal circumstances, within 7 years of her marriage, in coming to a conclusion that there would be a natural inference in such circumstance under Section 113A and 113B of the Indian Evidence Act, 1872, that the accused persons had caused the death of Kripa Bai by torturing her physically and mentally so as to drive the deceased to commit suicide. Mr. Gupta submitted that both the Courts below appear to have overlooked the fact that in order to prove a case of dowry death it would have to be shown that in addition to the fact that the death took place otherwise than in normal circumstances within 7 years of marriage, that soon before her death, the wife was subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or any relative of her husband for, or in connection with, any demand for dowry. It was pointed out by Mr. Gupta that in the explanation to Sub-Section (1) of Section 304B it had been mentioned that for the purpose of the said Sub-Section, dowry shall have the same meaning as under Section 2 of the Dowry Prohibition Act, 1961.

4. Mr. Gupta also submitted that the provisions of Section 113A of the Indian Evidence Act were not applicable in this case since no case for abetment of suicide by the husband or any of the husbands relatives had been alleged. On the other hand, the case sought to be made out is one under Section 113B relating to presumption as to dowry death. Mr. Gupta submitted that the provisions in Section 113B relating to presumption as to dowry death are similar to that of Section 304B IPC. He urged that in order to arrive at the presumption of dowry death, it would have to be shown by the prosecution that soon before her death, such woman had been subjected to cruelty or harassment for, or in connection with, any demand for dowry, which would lead to a presumption that such person caused the dowry death.

5. Mr. Gupta submitted that in the instant case, the Appellants had not been convicted under the provisions of the Dowry Prohibition Act, but under Section 304B and 498A IPC. Mr. Gupta submitted that the prosecution had not established that prior to the death of the victim Kripa Bai, she had been either subjected to cruelty or harassment for, or in connection with, any demand for dowry, particularly, when the Appellants had not been convicted under the provisions of the Dowry Prohibition Act, 1961.

6. It was pointed out that the only evidence on which reliance had been placed both by the trial Court, as well as the High Court, for convicting the Appellants, was the evidence of Vimla Bai, PW.1, the mother of the deceased and Radheshyam, PW.3, the brother of the deceased. In fact, the prosecution story was that since no dowry had been received from the family of the victim, she had been beaten and treated with cruelty. There is no other evidence regarding the physical and mental torture which the deceased was alleged to have been subjected to. Mr. Gupta urged that the marriage of the Appellant No.1 with the deceased was performed as part of a community marriage being celebrated on account of the poverty of couples who could not otherwise meet the expenses of marriage and that even the few utensils which were given at the time of such community marriage were given by the persons who had organized such marriages.

7. Mr. Gupta submitted that the evidence in this case was wholly insufficient to even suggest that the victim had been subjected to cruelty or harassment which was sufficient to compel her to commit suicide. In support of his submissions, Mr. Gupta firstly referred to the decision of this Court in Biswajit Halder @ Babu Halder & Ors. v. State of W.B. JT 2007 (5) SC 360 : 2008 (1) SCC 202, wherein, in facts which were very similar, it was held that there was practically no evidence to show that there was any cruelty or harassment for, or in connection with, the demands of dowry. There was also no finding in that regard. It was further observed that this deficiency in evidence proved fatal for the prosecution case and even otherwise mere evidence of cruelty and harassment was not sufficient to attract Section 304B IPC. It had to be shown in addition to that such cruelty or harassment was for, or in connection with, demand of dowry. Mr. Gupta urged that since the Appellants had not been convicted under the provisions of the Dowry Prohibition Act, 1961, the charge under Section 304B would also fail since the same was linked with the question of cruelty or harassment for, or in connection with, the demand for dowry.

8. Mr. Gupta then urged that even the evidence of PW.3, Radheshyam, and also that of PW.2, Ashok Kumar, were full of omissions as to their statements before the police authorities and their evidence during the trial. Mr. Gupta submitted that such omissions were also fatal to the prosecution case since the same was mere embellishment and improvement of the evidence led by the prosecution. In this regard, Mr. Gupta referred to the decision of this Court in Shri Gopal & Anr. v. Subhash & Ors. JT 2004 (2) SC 158 : 2004 (13) SCC 174. In the said decision, while dealing with statements made by prosecution witnesses under Section 162 CrPC and omissions made during their evidence in Courts, this Court held that the same would amount to contradiction and their evidence on such point would not, therefore, be acceptable.

9. Mr. Gupta urged that both the trial Court, as well as the High Court, did not take into consideration any of the aforesaid matters while convicting the Appellants under Sections 304B and 498A IPC. Mr. Gupta urged that in such circumstances, the judgment and order of the trial Court, as well as that of the High Court, affirming the said judgment, are liable to be set aside.

10. Opposing the submissions made by Mr. R.P. Gupta, learned Senior Advocate, Ms. Vibha Datta Makhija, learned Advocate appearing for the State of Madhya Pradesh, submitted that the trial Court had considered the evidence of Vimla Bai, PW.1, the mother of the deceased and Radheshyam, PW.3, the brother of the deceased, in coming to a finding that their evidence was sufficient to bring home the guilt of the Appellants under Sections 498-A and 304-B IPC.

11. Ms. Makhija also reiterated the submissions which had been made before the trial Court regarding the presumption that was to be drawn both under Section 304B IPC, as also under Section 113B of the Indian Evidence Act, 1872, having regard to the fact that Kripa Bai had committed suicide within 7 years of her marriage. Ms. Makhija submitted that once it was found that by their actions the Appellants had driven Kripa Bai to commit suicide, the provisions of Section 304B IPC were immediately attracted and the Appellants, therefore, had been rightly convicted by the trial Court under Sections 498A and 304B IPC. Ms. Makhija urged that the evidence of PWs.1 and 3 were sufficient to meet the requirements of both Sections 113B of the Indian Evidence Act and Section 304B IPC.

12. Ms. Makhija then contended that as had been laid down by this Court in the case of Anand Kumar v. State of M.P. JT 2009 (2) SC 662 : 2009 (3) SCC 799, in order to counter the presumption available under Section 113B, which is relatable to Section 304B, a heavy burden has been shifted on to the accused to prove his innocence. Having regard to the language of Section 113B of the Indian Evidence Act, which indicates that when a question arises as to whether a person has committed the dowry death of a woman and it is shown that soon before her death such woman was subjected to cruelty or harassment by such other person or in connection with any demand for dowry, the Court shall presume that such person had caused such dowry death. Ms. Makhija urged that the aforesaid wording of Section 113B of Evidence Act and the use of the expression shall would clearly indicate that the Court shall presume such death as dowry death provided the conditions in Section 113B were satisfied and it would then be for the accused to prove otherwise.

13. Ms. Makhija, thereupon, urged that the order of conviction passed by the trial Court holding the Appellants guilty under Sections 498A and 304B IPC, confirmed by the High Court, did not warrant any interference by this Court.

14. Having carefully considered the submissions made on behalf of the respective parties, we are inclined to allow the benefit of doubt to the Appellants having particular regard to the fact that except for certain bald statements made by PWs.1 and 3 alleging that the victim had been subjected to cruelty and harassment prior to her death, there is no other evidence to prove that the victim committed suicide on account of cruelty and harassment to which she was subjected just prior to her death, which, in fact, are the ingredients of the evidence to be led in respect of Section 113B of the Indian Evidence Act, 1872, in order to bring home the guilt against an accused under Section 304B IPC.

15. As has been mentioned hereinbefore, in order to hold an accused guilty of an offence under Section 304-B IPC, it has to be shown that apart from the fact that the woman died on account of burn or bodily injury, otherwise than under normal circumstances, within 7 years of her marriage, it has also to be shown that soon before her death, she was subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or any relative of her husband for, or in connection with, any demand for dowry. Only then would such death be called dowry death and such husband or relative shall be deemed to have caused the death of the woman concerned.

16. In this case, one other aspect has to be kept in mind, namely, that no charges were framed against the Appellants under the provisions of the Dowry Prohibition Act, 1961 and the evidence led in order to prove the same for the purposes of Section 304B IPC was related to a demand for a fan only.

17. The decision cited by Mr. R.P. Gupta, learned Senior Advocate, in Biswajit Halders case (supra) was rendered in almost similar circumstances. In order to bring home a conviction under Section 304B IPC, it will not be sufficient to only lead evidence showing that cruelty or harassment had been meted out to the victim, but that such treatment was in connection with the demand for dowry. In our view, the prosecution in this case has failed to fully satisfy the requirements of both Section 113B of the Evidence Act, 1872 and Section 304B of the Indian Penal Code.

18. Accordingly, we are unable to agree with the views expressed both by the trial Court, as well as the High Court, and we are of the view that no case can be made out on the ground of insufficient evidence against the Appellants for conviction under Sections 498A and 304B IPC. The decision cited by Ms. Makhija in Anand Kumars case (supra) deals with the proposition of shifting of onus of the burden of proof relating to the presumption which the Court is to draw under Section 113B of the Evidence Act and does not help the case of the State in a situation where there is no material to presume that an offence under Section 304B IPC had been committed.

19. In that view of the matter, we allow the Appeal and set aside the judgment of the trial Court convicting and sentencing the Appellants of offences alleged to have been committed under Sections 498A and 304B IPC. The judgment of the High Court impugned in the instant Appeal is also set aside. In the event, the Appellants are on bail, they shall be discharged from their bail bonds, and, in the event they are in custody, they should be released forthwith.

**********', 1] , 
[ 'HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAWS
Indian Penal Code, 1860
Sections 498A, 304B - Evidence Act, 1872 - Section 3 - Dowry death - Evidence - Sufficiency - Sisters-in law - Both aged 18 and 16 years at the time of incident - Alleged to have harassed deceased for not bringing car and to have beaten with their brother, the husband of deceased - Evidence of informant general in nature - Mother and father also involved, but acquitted by High Court - No particulars of time and date of harassment by sisters - Not party to any demand - Evidence showing some harassment for lack of dowry about 2 and 1/2 years prior to death. Held that there was no sufficient ground to hold the sisters-in-law guilty for the offences charged as the allegations are not proximate to the death.
HELD
The complainant states that these appellants along with their brother used to harass Baljit Kaur for not bringing sufficient dowry and a Maruti car. In that process they used to beat the deceased. It is rather difficult to believe that these two young girls would go to the extent of beating the deceased merely based on a statement made by the brother of the deceased that too after the incident of his sister committing suicide without his evidence being corroborated in material particulars. (Para 6)

Neither PW-6 nor PW-7 or for that matter the complaint does give the particulars of the time and date when the alleged harassment was meted out by the appellants. As noticed by us hereinabove, these statements are omnibus in nature. The specific allegations of harassment made only involves A-1 and his father with whose case we are not concerned now. The appellants are neither parties to the demand for a buffalo or Rs.25,000 which seems to be the proximate cause of Baljit Kaur committing suicide. If at all the prosecution case against these appellants is to be accepted it would only show that soon after the marriage i.e. about 2ï¿½ years prior to the death of the deceased, there was some alleged harassment for lack of dowry which, is not a sufficient ground to hold the appellants guilty for the offence charged, since these allegations are not proximate to the death of the deceased. (Para 7)


SANTOSH HEGDE, J.

1. Two appellants and 3 others were charged before the additional sessions judge, Kurukshetra for offence punishable under section 304B read with section 34 IPC in connection with the suicide of one Baljit Kaur who was married to the first accused Surinder Kumar about 2ï¿½ years prior to her death on 28.1.1992. It was the prosecution case that because of the harassment meted out to said Baljit Kaur, she consumed poison on the intervening night of 27th and 28th January, 1992 and died at about 4 a.m. in Ismailpur village within the jurisdiction of
Police Station Thaska Miranji in Kurukshetra district. The information of death of Baljit Kaur was conveyed to her family on the said morning by one Dewa (not examined). On receipt of the said information, her family members including her brother Hari Chand PW-6 went to the village where Baljit Kaurs in-laws were residing and PW-6 having come to the conclusion that his sister had died under suspicious circumstances, lodged
a complaint with Thaska Miranji P.S. on 28.1.1992 at about 12.40 p.m. The initial investigation in regard to the death of Baljit Kaur was conducted by PW-10 which was later completed by Sub-Inspector of Police who was examined as
PW-9 who submitted the chargesheet for the offence stated hereinabove and after trial the sessions court came to the conclusion that the prosecution has established its case as against all the accused and it awarded 10 years RI to A-2
Basawa Singh who was the father-in-law of the deceased, while A-3 Shanti Devi, mother-in-law, was awarded 8 years RI and A-4 Surinder Kaur and A-5 Rajvinder Kaur were awarded 7 years RI each all under section 304B IPC while A-1 Surinder Kumar, the husband of the deceased was awarded life imprisonment under section 304B IPC.

2. Aggrieved accused persons preferred an appeal before the High Court of Punjab & Haryana at Chandigarh which by the impugned judgment confirmed the conviction and sentence awarded to A-1 Surinder Kumar, husband and A-4 and A-5 Surinder Kaur and Rajvinder Kaur, the sisters-in-law of the deceased. It allowed the appeal of A-2 Basawa Singh, the father-in-law and A-3 Shanti Devi, the mother-in-law of the deceased and acquitted them of the charges.

3. The present appeal before us is preferred by A-3 Rajvinder Kaur and A-4 Surinder Kaur who, at the time of the incident, were aged 18 and 16 years respectively and were unmarried. We are told at the Bar that their brother Surinder
Kumar, the husband of the deceased has not preferred any appeal, hence, the conviction and sentence imposed on him by
the two courts below has attained finality.

4. Mr. K.B. Sinha, learned senior counsel appearing for the appellants, contended that both the courts below have committed serious error in accepting the prosecution case as against the appellants herein though no specific allegation
whatsoever has been made by the prosecution against them. He pointed out that the only allegation found against these appellants is in a general manner in the FIR filed by PW-6 and in the evidence of PWs.-6 and 7 in their examinations-in-chief which the learned counsel submitted under no stretch of imagination could be construed as sufficient evidence to base a conviction. He submitted that one of the ingredients necessary for establishing the allegation of harassment against an accused person under section 304B is that the concerned accused had harassed the victim soon before the death.

5. After reading the evidence of PWs.6 and 7 in conjunction with the contents of the FIR, the learned counsel pointed out that so far as the allegation against these appellants are concerned, it is omnibus in nature and has been made without any specific instance only to involve the entire family of the appellants. He pointed out that the appellants who were then 18 and 16 years of age and unmarried, could not have gone to the extent of causing such harassment which would compel the deceased to commit suicide. At any rate the learned counsel pointed out that whatever allegation that is found in the FIR and in the evidence of PWs.6 & 7, could only relate to a period immediately after the marriage of deceased to A-1 which was about 2ï¿½ years prior to the incident.

6. Mr. D P Singh, learned counsel appearing for the State, however, defended the judgments of the two courts below contending that the same being a concurrent finding of fact, the same does not require any interference in this appeal. Since the present appeal is preferred by accused 4 and 5 who are the sisters-in-law of the deceased, we will confine our consideration of the evidence led by the prosecution as against them only. It is noticed, as contended by learned counsel for the appellants, that the complainant states that these appellants along with their brother used to harass Baljit Kaur for not bringing sufficient dowry and a Maruti car. In that process they used to beat the deceased. It is rather difficult to believe that these two young girls would go to the extent of beating the deceased merely based on a statement made by the brother of the deceased that too after the incident of his sister committing suicide without his evidence being corroborated in material particulars. From a perusal of the evidence of PW-6, two facts emerge. One is a general allegation of harassment against the mother of A-1 and the appellants herein. It is to be noted that mother of A-1 who was an accused has been acquitted by the courts below solely on the ground that hers and her husbands name did not find mention in the complaint even though the prosecution has alleged harassment by similar evidence as is available against the appellants. The second fact that arises out of the evidence of PW-6 is that he has made specific allegations against the husband A-1 and the father in regard to the demand of Maruti car, a buffalo, Rs.25,000 just before the death of the deceased. Therefore, this factum shows that these 2 persons might have been responsible for harassment soon before the victims death which is one of the conditions precedent under section 304B IPC but then the High Court thought it fit to acquit the father of A-1 (father-in-law of the deceased) because his name was also not mentioned in the FIR which means the High Court did not believe the oral evidence led by the prosecution in regard to him and his wife. Therefore the evidence led by the prosecution should be appreciated in this background.

7. We have noticed neither PW-6 nor PW-7 or for that matter the complaint does give the particulars of the time and date when the alleged harassment was meted out by the appellants. As noticed by us hereinabove, these statements are omnibus in nature. The specific allegations of harassment made only involves A-1 and his father with whose case we are not concerned now. The appellants are neither parties to the demand for a buffalo or Rs.25,000 which seems to be the
proximate cause of Baljit Kaur committing suicide. The courts below in appreciating the evidence have failed to appreciate the material on record properly nor have they applied the required standard of proof necessary to base a conviction on the appellants. We have already noticed that if at all the prosecution case against these appellants is to be accepted it would only show that soon after the marriage i.e. about 2ï¿½ years prior to the death of the deceased, there was some alleged harassment for lack of dowry which, in our opinion, is not a sufficient ground to hold the appellants guilty for the offence charged, since these allegations are not proximate to the death of the deceased.

8. Having perused the evidence of PW-7 also, in our opinion, the same does not further the cause of the prosecution any more than what is discussed by us hereinabove about the evidence of PW-6. As a matter of fact, a careful consideration of the evidence of PW-7 in regard to the involvement of the appellants herein clearly shows that part of the evidence of PW-7 is an improvement inasmuch as he has not stated the specific allegations now he is making before the trial court in his previous statement to the police as could be seen from exhibit D-8.
9. It is also be noted that the High Court on the same set of evidence has chosen to acquit the mother of the appellants whose case is no better than that of the appellant. Of course, the only difference between the evidence led by the prosecution in regard to their mother and the appellants is that the name of the mother is not found in the FIR. That by itself in the facts of this case is not sufficient to differentiate the case of the appellants for conviction. Even the allegation made against the appellants in the FIR assuming it to be proved shows certain harassment much before the death which is not sufficient to bring home the guilt under section 304 B IPC otherwise the evidence led by the prosecution is similar to that led against their mother. We agree with the High Court that the evidence against the mother is insufficient to convict her and in our opinion it is the same against appellants.

10. For the reasons stated above, we are of the considered opinion that the evidence led by the prosecution in regard to the involvement of the appellants in the death of Baljit Kaur is not proved beyond all reasonable doubts by the prosecution, hence, the courts below were in error in basing a conviction as against
these appellants.

11. For the reasons stated above, this appeal succeeds and the same is allowed. The appellants are on bail. Their bail-bonds shall stand discharged.

**********', 1] , 
[ 'CROSS CITATION
2015 (1) SCC 797
APPEARANCES
Mr. G.C. Shahpuri, Mr. Surinder Singh, Mr. Balbir Singh Gupta, Advocates for the Appellant.
Mr. Kamal Mohan Gupta, Advocate for the Respondent.
HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAWS
Penal Code, 1860
Section 304-B - Dowry demand - Deceased died of burn injuries within 10 months of marriage - She had informed her father PW3 about harassment for dowry three months after marriage and also three days prior to incident - She was brought to parental home but again taken back by accused on threat of divorce - Next day she died - Version of PW3 corroborated version of PWs 10 & 12. Held, there was live and proximate link between death and dowry demand.
HELD
There is consistent evidence on record to prove harassment for dowry soon before the death of the deceased. The deceased died within 10 months of the marriage. According to PW3, father of the deceased, after three months of the marriage, the deceased informed him that the appellant and his family were harassing her for dowry. He, along with PW-12, went to the house of the appellant and requested them not to harass her. Again, three days before the occurrence, on 28 April, 2001, the deceased informed her father about the dowry harassment on which her uncle PW-12, along with his wife, went to the house of the accused and brought the deceased to her parental home. The appellant took her away on the threat of divorce and on the next day, she died of burn injuries. Similar version has been given by Guddar Mal (PW-10) and Raghubir Lal (PW-12). The version is supported by her death by burning. There is no other cogent reason to explain the cause of her death except the harassment for dowry. There is live and proximate link between the demand of dowry and death. In these circumstances, it cannot be held that there is no evidence of demand of dowry soon before the death. (Para 9)

Dowry harassment - Suicide note showing depression, helplessness and inability to come out of it - No one held responsible - Whether inference can be drawn that there was no dowry demand. Held from the note it is clear that she was not happy in her matrimonial home. Ample evidence was on record to show dowry demand.
HELD
When a young married girl finds herself in helpless situation and decides to end her life, in absence of any other circumstance, it is natural to infer that she was unhappy in her matrimonial home. A suicide note cannot be treated as conclusive of there being no one responsible for the situation when evidence on record categorically points to harassment for dowry. (Para 10.1)

There is plethora of evidence to prove the demand of dowry soon before the death giving rise to the presumption against the appellant. (Para 11)

Section 304B - Dowry demand - Conviction by Trial Court - In appeal, High Court acquitting mother and brother of husband but upholding conviction of husband - Claim for parity, held is rejected as husbands case was distinguishable. Responsibility of husband towards wife is qualitatively different and higher as against other relatives. Conviction upheld. (Paras 12-13)

CASES REFERRED
1.Manohar Lal v. State of Haryana JT 2014 (8) SC 265 (Para 7)

2.Hira Lal and Ors. v. State (Govt. of NCT) Delhi JT 2003 (6) SC 195 (Para 10.1.)

ADARSH KUMAR GOEL, J.

1. This appeal has been preferred against Judgment and Order dated 12th March, 2013 of the High Court of Punjab and Haryana at Chandigarh in Criminal Appeal No.S-736-SB of 2003 upholding the conviction of the appellant under Section 304-B of the Indian Penal Code (IPC) and sentence of Rigorous Imprisonment for seven years.

2. Case of the prosecution is that the appellant was married to the deceased Rekha Rani on 7th July, 2000. After the marriage, she was harassed for having brought insufficient dowry and the appellant raised a demand for motor cycle apart from the demands by his mother and younger brother. After about three months of marriage, the deceased gave a telephonic call to her father about the demand for dowry. Her father, Kashmiri Lal (PW-3), along with his younger brother Raghubir Lal (PW-12), met the husband of the deceased and his other relatives and pleaded that she may not be harassed as he was not in a position to give more dowry. The accused, however, continued to harass her. On 29th April, 2001, the deceased again telephoned her father about the harassment on which Raghubir Lal (PW-12) went to the house of the accused and brought back the deceased to her parental home. However, on the next day, the appellant came to the place of his in-laws and insisted that the deceased be sent with him, threatening that otherwise he will divorce her. On this, the deceased was sent with the appellant. Next day, on 1st May, 2001, at about 12 Oclock, information was received by the family of the deceased that she had received burn injuries and was taken to the hospital. Father of the deceased Kashmiri Lal (PW-3) along with his younger brother Raghubir Lal (PW-12) and brother in-law Guddar Mal (PW-10) reached the hospital at 2.00 P.M. where the deceased told them that she was given beatings and set on fire by the appellant and his family members. Thereafter, the deceased died on account of extensive burn injuries.

3. Kashmiri Lal (PW-3) lodged the First Information Report (Exhibit PA/1). SI Rakham Singh (PW-13) conducted the investigation and sent up the accused for trial. The prosecution led evidence in support of its case comprising of relatives to prove demand of dowry, apart from medical evidence and evidence of investigation. The accused denied the prosecution allegations and stated that the deceased committed suicide on account of harassment by her uncle Raghubir Lal (PW-12) who wanted her to relinquish her rights in the parental property. The accused examined Vinod Kumar (DW-1) who had taken the deceased to the hospital and stated that her relations with the accused were cordial. Raj Kumar (DW-2) employer of the appellant was also examined who stated that at the time of alleged incident, the appellant was on duty.

4. The trial Court, after considering the evidence on record, held that the prosecution case was proved beyond reasonable doubt and convicted the appellant and the co-accused.

5. On further appeal, the High Court upheld the conviction of the appellant but acquitted the co-accused Champa Devi (mother of the appellant) and Lalit Kumar (brother of the appellant).

6. We have heard learned counsel for the parties and perused the evidence on record.

7. Appearing on behalf of the appellant, learned counsel Shri G.C. Shahpuri submitted that the prosecution failed to prove the demand of dowry soon before the death which was the necessary ingredient for the offence under Section 304 B, IPC. He relied upon Judgment of this Court in Manohar Lal v. State of Haryana JT 2014 (8) SC 265. It was also submitted that the deceased had left a suicide note (Exhibit P-4) to the effect that nobody be held responsible if something happened to her and in the said note there is no allegation of demand of dowry. He lastly submitted that since the High Court had acquitted mother and brother of the appellant on the same evidence, the case of the appellant being at par, there was no justification to convict him.

8. We have given due consideration to the submissions advanced on behalf of the appellant but we do not find any merit.

9. There is consistent evidence on record to prove harassment for dowry soon before the death of the deceased. The deceased died within 10 months of the marriage. According to PW3, father of the deceased, after three months of the marriage, the deceased informed him that the appellant and his family were harassing her for dowry. He, along with PW-12, went to the house of the appellant and requested them not to harass her. Again, three days before the occurrence, on 28 April, 2001, the deceased informed her father about the dowry harassment on which her uncle PW-12, along with his wife, went to the house of the accused and brought the deceased to her parental home. The appellant took her away on the threat of divorce and on the next day, she died of burn injuries. Similar version has been given by Guddar Mal (PW-10) and Raghubir Lal (PW-12). The version is supported by her death by burning. There is no other cogent reason to explain the cause of her death except the harassment for dowry. There is live and proximate link between the demand of dowry and death. In these circumstances, it cannot be held that there is no evidence of demand of dowry soon before the death. In Manohar Lal (supra) relied upon on behalf of the appellant, this Court noted that there was neither any specific instance suggesting cruelty or harassment nor any of the witnesses had stated that the deceased was harassed soon before the death in connection with the demand of dowry. Contrary to the fact situation noticed in the said case, in the present case, all the three witnesses mentioned above - Kashmiri Lal, Guddar Mal and Raghubir Lal have specifically and categorically deposed about demand of dowry soon before her death.

10. We may now refer to the suicide note. It, inter alia, states:

All the doors are closed for me. Besides this, no other way is available to me and I adopted the way which I liked.

10.1. The tenor of the suicide note clearly shows that the deceased was in helpless condition and she found no other way to come out of the situation. The suicide note cannot be taken to be encyclopaedia of the entire situation in which the deceased was placed. It is not possible to infer from the said note that the deceased was happy in her matrimonial home. Mere mention that nobody may be held responsible, while also stating that all the doors were closed for her and she had no other way available (except to leave the world), is not enough to exonerate the appellant. When a young married girl finds herself in helpless situation and decides to end her life, in absence of any other circumstance, it is natural to infer that she was unhappy in her matrimonial home. A suicide note cannot be treated as conclusive of there being no one responsible for the situation when evidence on record categorically points to harassment for dowry. One cannot lose sight of the fact that unfortunately the menace dowry deaths still exists in our society and has been subject of expert studies. The Law Commission, in its 91st Report dated 10th August, 1983, recommended reform of the law to deal with the situation which led to incorporation of Sections 304 B in IPC, making dowry death an offence and Section 113B in the Evidence Act which provides for raising a presumption as to dowry death in case of an unnatural death within seven years of marriage when it is shown that a woman was subjected to harassment for dowry soon before her death. These aspects have been considered by this Court in Hira Lal and Ors. v. State (Govt. of NCT) Delhi JT 2003 (6) SC 195 : 2003 (8) SCC 80 and other judgments.

11. The circumstances have thus to be appreciated in the light of the above social and legislative background. As already noted, in the present case, there is plethora of evidence to prove the demand of dowry soon before the death giving rise to the presumption against the appellant.

12. As regards the claim for parity of the case of the appellant with his mother and brother who have been acquitted, the High Court has rightly found his case to be distinguishable from the case of his mother and brother. The husband is not only primarily responsible for safety of his wife, he is expected to be conversant with her state of mind more than any other relative. If the wife commits suicide by setting herself on fire, proceeded by dissatisfaction of the husband and his family from the dowry, the interference of harassment against the husband may be patent. Responsibility of the husband towards his wife is qualitatively different and higher as against his other relatives.

13. On proof of the essential ingredients mentioned in Section 113 B, if the statutory presumption arises against the accused which shifts the burden on the accused, the accused must give cogent explanation. Failure to give an explanation or giving of false explanation can be taken as an additional circumstance against him. The requirement of allegations of demand of dowry against the relatives of the husband may have to be more specific and the Court may be more cautious in dealing with such allegations, if there is any doubt about over implication, but responsibility of the husband may be obvious from the circumstances. In these circumstances, the case of the appellant cannot stand at par with his mother and brother who have been acquitted by the High Court, by way of caution against over implication, as well as for want of cogent evidence against them. Case of the husband stands on different footing.

14. Thus, we have no hesitation in upholding the conviction and sentence of the appellant as we do not find any reason to interfere with the concurrent orders of the courts below in convicting and sentencing the appellant.

15. The appeal is accordingly, dismissed. The appellant is directed to surrender to undergo the remaining sentence failing which he may be arrested and committed to custody to complete the sentence awarded to him.

**********', 1] , 
[ 'CROSS CITATION
2007 (11) SCR 219
APPEARANCES
Mr. Sanjay R. Hegde, Advocate for the Appe-llant.
Mr. Navin Singh, Mr.Aruneshwar Gupta and Mr. Shashwat Gupta, Advocates for the Res-pondent.
HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAWS
Indian Penal Code, 1860
Sections 304B and 306 read with 498A - Indian Evidence Act, 1872, Sections 113A and 113B - Unnatural death of married woman- Presumption as to dowry death- Deceased getting married to the appellant in 1991 - Right from the time immediately after the marriage deceased complaining to her parents about the persistent harassment for insufficient dowry at her matrimonial home- Relative of the woman who was sent to see her, bringing the news of her death - In-laws stating the death due to suicide - By the time the father of the deceased reached the village where she died, her body consigned to flames-Thereafter father lodging FIR against the husband and his mother only - Trial Court convicting both- High Court acquitting the mother-in-law but confirming the convict-ion and sentence imposed on the husband (appellant). Dismissing further appeal held that cruelty and harassment on account of dowry having been established by the prosecution evidence, the conviction of the appellant husband called for no interfer-ence.
HELD
The question, as to what are the ingredients of the provisions of Section 304B of the Indian Penal Code is no longer res integra. They are: (1) That the death of the woman was caused by any burns or bodily injury or in some circumstances which were not normal; (2) such death occurs within 7 years from the date of her marriage; (3) that the victim was subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or any relative of her husband; (4) such cruelty or harassment should be for or in connection with the demand of dowry; and (5) it is established that such cruelty and harassment was made soon before her death. {See Harjit Singh v. State of Punjab JT 2005 (10) SC 399; Ram Badan Sharma v. State of Bihar JT 2006 (7) SC 490 (Para 20)

Indisputably, before an accused is found guilty for commission of an offence, the Court must arrive at a finding that the ingredients thereof have been established. The statement of a witness for the said purpose must be read in its entirety. It is not necessary for a witness to make a statement in consonance with the wording of the section of a statute. What is needed is to find out as to whether the evidences brought on record satisfy the ingredients thereof. (Para 25)

Evidence brought on record by the prosecution clearly suggest that Pushpa had all along been subjected to harassment or cruelty only on the ground that her father had not given enough dowry at the time of marriage. For proving the said fact, it was not necessary that demand of any particular item should have been made. (Para 26)

It is not one of those cases, where omnibus allegations have been made against the members of the family. First information report was lodged against the accused persons only. Nobody else was implicated. Hazari Ram (PW-1) has been categorical in stating that Pushpas father-in-law was a gentleman. His effort to persuade his wife and son not to harass Pushpa might not have ultimately succeeded but his attempt in that behalf was appreciated by him (PW-1) and other members of his family with gratitude. It is, therefore, cannot be said to be a case where Hazari Ram (PW-1) has falsely implicated anybody. His evidence was supported in material particulars by his brother Ranveer (PW-2). The very fact that harassment or cruelty on Pushpa did not abate even after her coming back to the matrimonial home with a son and the fact that she had been assaulted even a few days prior to the incident, in our opinion, tests of Section 304-B of the Indian Penal Code stood satisfied. Ranveer (PW-2) informed his brother, Hazari Ram (PW-1), about the harassment meted out to Pushpa. He was asked to go there. He went there to find his daughter dead; her cremation having already taken place. (Para 28)

In this view of the matter, we are of the opinion that no case has been made out for interference with the impugned judgment. The appeal is, therefore, dismissed. (Para 30)

CASES REFERRED
1.Ram Badan Sharma v. State of Bihar JT 2006 (7) SC 490 (Para 20)

2.T. Aruntperunjothi v. State through SHO, Pondicherry JT 2006 (4) SC 300 (Para 21)

3.Harjit Singh v. State of Punjab JT 2005 (10) SC 399 (Para 20)

4.Hans Raj v. State of Haryana JT 2004 (3) SC 45 (Para 23)

5.Satvir Singh v. State of Punjab JT 2001 (8) SC 208 (Para 22)

S.B. SINHA, J.

1. In the year 1991, Appellant married Pushpa Devi, the deceased. A male child was born to them.

2. At the time of marriage, father of Pushpa, Hazari Ram, allegedly, spent a lot of money. Appellants family, however, was not happy with the dowry given by the bride side. Pushpa was allegedly tortured and continuously harassed. She had, however, no grievance against her father in law, namely, Ram Swaroop. He had all along been assuring Pushpa and her parents that he would do his best to see that she is not harassed for not bringing enough dowry.

3. After the birth of the child, she came back to her matrimonial home. A few days prior to the incident which took place on 9.5.1994 her uncle Ranveer (PW-2) visited her. She made complaints about the harassments meted out to her. Ranveer conveyed the same to her father. On 9.5.1994, his nephew, Madan Lal (PW-7) was going to some place. Hazari Ram asked him to take him to his daughters place. On reaching the house of Pushpa, he enquired about her. No response thereto was made but later on he was informed that she had died and the dead body has been cremated. Hazari Ram allegedly came back to his village. He went back to Umawali. A Panchayat was held. Appellants family accepted the purported mistake that they should have informed Hazari Ram about the death of his daughter. It was agreed that some lands would be settled in the name of the son of Pushpa.

4. On 9.5.1994, a first information report was lodged by Hazari Ram. It appears from the records that investigating agency had been helping the accused. A purported supplementary statement of Hazari Ram was recorded wherein he had allegedly accepted that he was present at the time of funeral. A final form was submitted. However, a protest petition was filed whereupon cognizance of the offence under Section 304B of the Indian Penal Code (Code) was taken. Charges were framed under Section 304B of the Code and in the alternative under Section 306 read with Section 498A thereof. The Trial Court convicted both the accused, namely, Devi Lal and his mother Sukh Devi.

5. An appeal having been preferred by the accused thereagainst before the High Court, the appeal of the appellant was dismissed; but that of Sukh Devi was allowed.

6. Mr. Sanjay Hegde, learned counsel appearing on behalf of the appellant, would submit that the High Court committed an error in passing the impugned judgment insofar as it failed to take into consideration that no demand of dowry was made in respect of any specific item. It was urged that the prosecution has also not proved as to whether the purported harassment meted out to the deceased was as a result of demand of dowry or not. Section 113-B of the Evidence Act, whereupon reliance has been placed by learned Trial Judge as also the High Court, Mr. Parekh would contend, is not attracted to the facts of the present case.

7. Mr. Naveen Singh, learned counsel appearing on behalf of the State of Rajasthan, on the other hand, submitted that from the deposition of the prosecution witnesses, it would be evident that all the ingredients of Section 304-B of the Indian Penal Code have been proved.

8. Defence of the accused before the learned Trial Judge was that as Pushpa Devi delivered a child, the societal norms by way of custom demanded that the occasion be celebrated by offering gifts and distributing sweets, meal etc. by the maternal grandfather of the child. It was pointed out that almost at the same time, elder brother Banwari Lals wife also delivered a child and there was a big celebration. Pushpa wanted his father to celebrate the function of her son in a similar manner. But the same was not done. She not only came back from her parents house but after a few days committed suicide. It was furthermore the case of the defence that Hazari Ram was informed about the death of his daughter through one Nand Ram, pursuant whereto, he attended the funeral. Prior thereto, a village panchayat was held and he was informed about his right to lodge a first information report but he declined to do so as a representation was made that some land would be transferred in the name of the child.

9. The fact that death of Pushpa took place within the period of seven years from the date of marriage is not in dispute. Unnatural death of Pushpa is also not in dispute.

10. Hazari Ram examined himself as PW-1. According to him, he gave to his daughter at the time of her marriage articles beyond his capacity, but the family members of the appe-llant were not pleased with the amount of dowry given and, therefore, they used to harass Pushpa. According to him, Ram Swaroop, father of the appellant, was a gentleman and he had all along been assuring him that they would try to make the appellant and his mother understand but they had not been heeding his advice. He categorically stated that even after the delivery of child, Pushpa asked him to call his father-in-law so that would be pleased. She had also asked him to give some gifts to him. Ram Swaroop came to his place and took his daughter-in-law back. He stated that whenever he would go to his daughter-in-laws house, Ram Swaroop used to assure him with folded hands that he would make Devi Lal and his mother understand. Five to seven days prior to the death of his daughter, his brother Ranveer had gone to meet her. He had informed him about the beating and harassment to his daughter and that he was asked to visit his daughters place. He, in his examination-in-chief, supported the statement made by him in his first information report.

11. We may notice that Ranveer (PW-2) in his deposition before the learned Trial Judge, stated :

My brother had given a good dowry and articles to his daughter according to capacity. Thereafter, whenever, the girl returned back to her parents house from her in-laws house, she told to us that my in-laws persons are not happy with the articles of this dowry and trouble me. Later on, I along with my brother went to Umewali and said that do not trouble and harass her. As possible, we will give continuously more dowry. My brother told me to meet my niece. I went to meet the girl prior to 5-7 days of death of her. When I went to meet, the girl started to weeping and said that they trouble and harass to me. I returned back after advised to her. I narrated this to my brother that they (in-laws persons) trouble and harass to the girl, taking the issue of dowry.

12. PW-7, Madan Lal, was the nephew of Hazari Ram. He took Hazari Ram to the village Umewala on 9th May, 1994. After visiting the house of his daughter, Hazari Ram came back and told him they have murdered to pushpa (sic) and cremated.

13. We need not notice the deposition of other witnesses who had turned hostile.

14. Some witnesses were examined on behalf of the appellant. According to them, Hazari Ram when asked by the elders of the village as to whether he had any doubt on any person as regards the death of Pushpa or whether he intended to inform the Police, answered in the negative stating that he would not take recourse thereto. The said witnesses, however, accepted that they had come to depose in court only at the instance of the appellant.

15. It is significant to note that even in the first information report, Hazari Ram categorically stated that no assistance had been rendered to him by the villagers.

16. Two courts have concurrently accepted the evidence of the prosecution witnesses. The testimonies of the prosecution witnesses have been relied on for arriving at the finding of guilt of the appellant. We do not see any reason to take a different view.

17. The core question which has been raised for our consideration in this appeal is as to whether a case had been made out for application of Section 113B of the Indian Evidence Act (the Act).

18. The Parliament by Act No.46 of 1983 and Act No.43 of 1986 inserted Sections 113A and 113B in the Act. They read as under :

113A. Presumption as to abetment of suicide by a married woman - When the question is whether the commission of suicide by a woman had been abetted by her husband or any relative of her husband and it is shown that she had committed suicide within a period of seven years from the date of her marriage and that her husband or such relative of her husband had subjected her to cruelty, the Court may presume, having regard to all the other circumstances of the case, that such suicide had been abetted by her husband or by such relative of her husband.

Explanation.- For the purposes of this section, cruelty shall have the same meaning as in section 498A of the Indian Penal Code (45 of 1860).

113B. Presumption as to dowry death. When the question is whether a person has committed the dowry death of a woman and it is shown that soon before her death such woman has been subjected by such person to cruelty or harassment for, or in connection with, any demand for dowry, the Court shall presume that such person had caused the dowry death.-

Explanation.- For the purposes of this section dowry death shall have the same meaning as in section 304B, of the Indian Penal Code (45 of 1860).

19. Section 113A of the Act relates to offences under Sections 498-A and 306 of the Code, whereas Section 113B relates to Section 304-B thereof. Whereas in terms of Section 113A of the Act, the prosecution is required to prove that the deceased was subjected to cruelty, in terms of Section 113B, the prosecution must prove that the deceased was -subject by such person to cruelty or harassment for, or in connection with, any demand for dowry.

20. The question, as to what are the ingredients of the provisions of Section 304B of the Indian Penal Code is no longer res integra. They are: (1) That the death of the woman was caused by any burns or bodily injury or in some circumstances which were not normal; (2) such death occurs within 7 years from the date of her marriage; (3) that the victim was subjected to cruelty or harassment by her husband or any relative of her husband; (4) such cruelty or harassment should be for or in connection with the demand of dowry; and (5) it is established that such cruelty and harassment was made soon before her death. {See Harjit Singh v. State of Punjab1, Ram Badan Sharma v. State of Bihar2.

21. In T. Aruntperunjothi v. State through SHO, Pondicherry3, this Court held :

It is now well settled in view of a catena of decisions of this Court that what would constitute soon before her death depends upon the facts and circumstances of each case.

22. Distinction between Section 113A and 113B was noticed by the Court in Satvir Singh v. State of Punjab4, stating:

No doubt, Section 306 IPC read with Section 113-A of the Evidence Act is wide enough to take care of an offence under Section 304-B also. But the latter is made a more serious offence by providing a much higher sentence and also by imposing a minimum period of imprisonment as the sentence. In other words, if death occurs otherwise than under normal circumstances within 7 years of the marriage as a sequel to the cruelty or harassment inflicted on a woman with demand of dowry, soon before her death, Parliament intended such a case to be treated as a very serious offence punishable even up to imprisonment for life in appropriate cases. It is for the said purpose that such cases are separated from the general category provided under Section 306 IPC (read with Section 113-A of the Evidence Act) and made a separate offence.

23. In Hans Raj v. State of Haryana1, this Court held:

13. Unlike Section 113-B of the Indian Evidence Act, a statutory presumption does not arise by operation of law merely on proof of the circumstances enumerated in Section 113-A of the Indian Evidence Act. Under Section 113-A of the Indian Evidence Act, the prosecution has first to establish that the woman concerned committed suicide within a period of seven years from the date of her marriage and that her husband (in this case) had subjected her to cruelty. Even if these facts are established the court is not bound to presume that the suicide had been abetted by her husband. Section 113-A gives a discretion to the court to raise such a presumption, having regard to all the other circumstances of the case, which means that where the allegation is of cruelty it must consider the nature of cruelty to which the woman was subjected, having regard to the meaning of the word cruelty in Section 498-A IPC. The mere fact that a woman committed suicide within seven years of her marriage and that she had been subjected to cruelty by her husband, does not automatically give rise to the presumption that the suicide had been abetted by her husband. The court is required to look into all the other circumstances of the case. One of the circumstances which has to be considered by the court is whether the alleged cruelty was of such nature as was likely to drive the woman to commit suicide or to cause grave injury or danger to life, limb or health of the woman.

24. Submissions of Mr. Hegde that as Hazari Ram (PW-1) in his deposition did not categorically state that Pushpa was subjected to harassment for and in connection with any demand of dowry soon before her death, no case for convicting the appellant under Section 304-B has been made out.

25. Indisputably, before an accused is found guilty for commission of an offence, the Court must arrive at a finding that the ingredients thereof have been established. The statement of a witness for the said purpose must be read in its entirety. It is not necessary for a witness to make a statement in consonance with the wording of the section of a statute. What is needed is to find out as to whether the evidences brought on record satisfy the ingredients thereof.

26. Evidence brought on record by the prosecution clearly suggest that Pushpa had all along been subjected to harassment or cruelty only on the ground that her father had not given enough dowry at the time of marriage. For proving the said fact, it was not necessary that demand of any particular item should have been made.

27. Evidence of Hazari Ram (PW-1) and his brother Ranveer (PW-2) go a long a way to establish the ingredients of offence. Reading their testimonies in their entirety, we have no doubt in our mind that the harassment and cruelty meted out to Pushpa was for and in connection with the demand of dowry. Demand of dowry did not abate at any point of time. Demands were made both before and after the birth of the son. A plain reading of the deposition of Hazari Ram (PW-1) would categorically show that Pushpas father-in-law, Ram Swaroop had all along been apologetic. He persuaded the appellant and his mother not to insist for dowry or at least not harass her therefor. He, however, did not succeed in his efforts. Sentimental attachment of Pushpa to her father-in-law becomes apparent when we find that after giving birth to a male child she requested her father to invite him and give him some gifts so that he would be pleased.

28. It is not one of those cases, where omnibus allegations have been made against the members of the family. First information report was lodged against the accused persons only. Nobody else was implicated. Hazari Ram (PW-1) has been categorical in stating that Pushpas father-in-law was a gentleman. His effort to persuade his wife and son not to harass Pushpa might not have ultimately succeeded but his attempt in that behalf was appreciated by him (PW-1) and other members of his family with gratitude. It is, therefore, cannot be said to be a case where Hazari Ram (PW-1) has falsely implicated anybody. His evidence was supported in material particulars by his brother Ranveer (PW-2). The very fact that harassment or cruelty on Pushpa did not abate even after her coming back to the matrimonial home with a son and the fact that she had been assaulted even a few days prior to the incident, in our opinion, tests of Section 304-B of the Indian Penal Code stood satisfied. Ranveer (PW-2) informed his brother, Hazari Ram (PW-1), about the harassment meted out to Pushpa. He was asked to go there. He went there to find his daughter dead; her cremation having already taken place.

29. Learned Trial Judge, as also the High Court commented upon the manner in which the Police made all efforts to help the accused. The investigating officer purported to have recorded a supplementary statement of Hazari Ram (PW-1) which, according to the learned Trial Judge, was not at all necessary. Recording of the said supplementary statement has been disbelieved by the courts below.

30. In this view of the matter, we are of the opinion that no case has been made out for interference with the impugned judgment. The appeal is, therefore, dismissed.

**********', 1] , 
[ 'HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAWS
Penal Code, 1860
Sections 306, 304B - Criminal Procedure Code, 1973, Section 211 - Evidence Act, 1872, Sections 3, 113B - Offences under - Evidence - Driving a married woman to commit suicide - Conviction under Section 304B converted to Section 306 - No charge under Section 306 framed - If conviction under Section 306 justified. Held that High Court was justified as there was no demand of dowry. Sangaraboina Sreenus JT 1997 (5) SC 47 case held not applicable with Shamnsaheb M. Multtanis JT 2001 (2) SC 92 case.
HELD
There was no evidence of any demand for dowry soon before the death, and there was no demand whatsoever that the house in question should be transferred to either of the accused. Under Section 304B IPC, the cruelty or harassment by her husband or any relative of her husband for, or in connection with, any demand for dowry is a prelude to the suicidal death of the wife. Such suicidal death is defined as dowry death. The High Court has recorded a firm finding that the harassment was not for or in connection with any demands for dowry. But, at the same time, the High Court has concluded that the wife committed suicide due to the harassment of the appellant, in particular. In such circumstances, the High Court was, therefore, fully justified in convicting the appellant under Section 306 IPC. (Para 10)

The High Court upon meticulous scrutiny of the entire evidence on record rightly concluded that there was no evidence to indicate the commission of offence under Section 304B IPC. It was also observed that the deceased had committed suicide due to harassment meted out to her by the appellant but there was no evidence on record to suggest that such harassment or cruelty was made in connection to any dowry demands. Thus, cruelty or harassment sans any dowry demands which drives the wife to commit suicide attracts the offence of abetment of suicide under Section 306 IPC and not Section 304B IPC which defines the offence and punishment for dowry death. (Para 11.3.)

Mere omission or defect in framing charge would not disable the Court from convicting the accused for the offence which has been found to be proved on the basis of the evidence on record. In such circumstances, the matter would fall within the purview of Section 221 (1) and (2) of the Cr.P.C. In the facts of the present case, the High Court very appropriately converted the conviction under Section 304B to one under Section 306 IPC. (Para 12)

CASES REFERRED
1.Shamnsaheb M. Multtani v. State of Karnataka JT 2001 (2) SC 92 (held not applicable) (Para 11)

2.Sangaraboina Sreenu v. State of A.P. JT 1997 (5) SC 47 (held not applicable) (Para 11)

SURINDER SINGH NIJJAR, J.

1. This appeal has been filed against the judgment and order dated 6th October, 2004 of the Punjab and Haryana High Court at Chandigarh in Criminal Appeal No. 406-SB of 1992 wherein the appellant has been convicted under Section 306 Indian Penal Code (IPC for short) and sentenced to rigorous imprisonment for two years and to pay a fine of Rs.1,000/- and in default of payment thereof to undergo further rigorous imprisonment for one month.

2. We may briefly notice the facts.

2.1. Sukhjit Kaur, alias Rani was married to Narwinder Singh of Village Mehdipur on 30th September, 1984. A male child had first been born to the couple and at the time of the incident, the wife was pregnant a second time. According to the in-laws of the appellant, they had given sufficient dowry at the marriage of their daughter to the appellant. It appears that the appellant and his parents Daljit Singh and Joginder Kaur remained dissatisfied. About two months after the marriage, Sukhjit Kaur informed her mother Gursharan Kaur that her in-laws were asking her to bring valuable articles such as a scooter from her parents. It is also the case of the prosecution that an additional demand of Rs.5,000/- was made by Narwinder Singh, in the year 1986, which amount too was paid by his mother-in-law Gursharan Kaur. Unfortunately, on 25th May, 1987, Bhai Davinder Singh, father of Sukhjit Kaur was murdered by extremists. After the death of Bhai Davinder Singh, there was sea-change in the attitude of the appellant and her parents, and they started maltreating her. About six months prior to the fatal incident, there had been a quarrel between the husband and wife, which was settled with the intervention of several relatives including Kulbir Singh and Onkar Singh, PW-5. About ten days prior to the incident, Sukhjit Kaur went to Onkar Singhs house in Village Nabipur and informed him that the accused were demanding Rs.50,000/-. They were saying that her late father had left enough money for the family and that she should get her share. Onkar Singh told her that he would inform Gursharan Kaur, who was then living in England about the demand and seek instructions from her. Unfortunately, on 30th May, 1988, Onkar Singh came to know about the death of his niece Sukhjit Kaur (hereinafter referred to as the deceased). He alongwith Gurjit Kaur, sister of the deceased, Hanwant Singh, Darshan Singh and Mohan Singh went to village Mehdipur and saw the dead body of Sukhjit Kaur alias Rani lying in the house. Blood was oozing from her nose. Onkar Singh, thereafter, lodged a FIR naming the accused as having been responsible for her death. Initially, a case under Section 306 IPC was registered against the accused but, a charge under Section 304-B of the IPC was ultimately framed by the Court.

3. In support of its case, the prosecution relied inter-alia on the evidence of Kulbir Singh (PW-2) and Onkar Singh (PW-5), both uncles of the deceased, Gursharan Kaur (PW-6) the mother and Gurjit Kaur (PW-7). The sister of Sukhjit Kaur stated that the demands made by the accused had been satisfied off and on and that the behaviour of the accused had compelled Sukhjit Kaur to commit suicide. The prosecution also relied upon the evidence of Dr. H.S. Bajwa (PW-3), who on the basis of the report of the Forensic Science Laboratory opined that she had died of Organo Phosphorus poisoning. A large number of documents including some letters allegedly written by the deceased to her family members and by them to her were also produced in evidence.

4. The prosecution case was then put to the accused and their statements recorded under Section 313 of Cr.P.C. They denied the allegations levelled against them and pleaded that as a matter of fact Sukhjit Kaur had fallen ill as she was pregnant and depressed after the murder of her father (to whom she had been deeply attached) and that she had been taken to Oberoi Hospital by her father-in-law on seeing her condition deteriorating, and that despite all efforts on the part of the accused to save her, she had died. The accused also produced three witnesses in defence, namely Hardev Singh (DW-1), Jarnail Singh (DW-2) and Pritam Singh (DW-3), as also certain letters written inter-se the parties.

5. The trial court held that from the evidence of Kulbir Singh, Onkar Singh, Gursharan Kaur and Gurjit Kaur (PWs) and the letter Ex.P.1, it appeared that demands for dowry had been made by the accused from Sukhjit Kaur time and again and that she had been harassed and thus compelled to commit suicide. It further held that the ingredients of Section 304-B IPC were satisfied on the presumptions raised under Section 113B of the Evidence Act with regard to dowry deaths and that the letters Exs. PA, PB, PC, PD and PE did not in any way show that the relation between the parties had been cordial. The trial court accordingly convicted the accused for an offence punishable under Section 304-B IPC, and sentenced them to undergo rigorous imprisonment for seven years and to fine and in default of payment of fine to undergo further rigorous imprisonment for a specified period.

6. Aggrieved, against the aforesaid conviction and sentence, the appellant and his parents filed an appeal before the Punjab and Haryana High Court. Upon reconsideration of the entire evidence, the High Court concluded that the deceased had not committed suicide on account of demands for dowry but due to harassment caused by the husband, in particular. The appeal was, therefore, partly allowed. The High Court acquitted the parents of the appellant. However, the conviction of the appellant was converted from one under Section 304-B IPC to Section 306 IPC. He was sentenced to undergo rigorous imprisonment for two years and to pay a fine of Rs.1,000/- and in default of payment, he has to undergo further rigorous imprisonment for one month. The aforesaid judgment is challenged in the present appeal.

7. Mr. Vikram Mahajan, learned senior counsel appearing for the appellant submitted that there is no distinction between the case of the appellant and that of his parents, who have been acquitted. The High Court having acquitted the parents, the appellant also could not have been convicted. He further submitted that this was a plain and simple case of suicide due to the mental state of the deceased. He submits that since the murder of her father by extremists, the deceased had been under acute depression and she, therefore, had suicidal tendencies. Learned senior counsel further submitted that there is no evidence on the record to show that the victim had died an unnatural death. Lastly, it is submitted that the High Court committed a grave error in convicting the appellant under Section 306 IPC. It is submitted by Mr. Mahajan that the nature of offence under Section 304-B IPC is distinct and different from the offence under Section 306 IPC. The basic constituent of an offence under Section 304-B IPC is homicidal death (dowry death) and those of Section 306 IPC is suicidal death and abetment thereof. Furthermore, according to the learned senior counsel, the nature of evidence required under both the categories of offences are totally different. The appellant was never charged under Section 306 IPC, nor is there any evidence on the record to sustain the conviction under Section 306 IPC.

8. Mr. Kuldip Singh, learned counsel, appearing for the State of Punjab submits that the appellant is in fact fortunate being convicted only under Section 306 IPC. There is overwhelming evidence to prove that the appellant and his parents had been harassing the deceased to bring more dowry. He submits that there is evidence that the wife had been subjected to harassment on account of dowry immediately after the marriage. The death occurred within seven years of marriage, therefore, by virtue of Section 113-B of the Evidence Act, the trial court had rightly presumed that the appellant and his parents had committed the offence under Section 304-B IPC.

9. We have considered the submissions made by the learned counsel. The High Court, upon close scrutiny of the evidence, concluded that there was evidence of a quarrel between the husband and wife about six months prior to the occurrence, which had been settled with the intervention of the eldest. There were complaints that the deceased did not know how to do any household work. The in-laws had also complained that she was not well mannered. Their ill-treatment of the wife escalated after the murder of her father by extremists. It was at that stage the husband had started demanding that the deceased should claim one of the two houses left behind by her father in Village Nabipur. About ten months prior to her death, she was actually sent by the appellants to demand possession of the house. The appellant and his parents were suspecting that the sister of the deceased, Gurjit Kaur had taken everything after the death of the father of the deceased. The appellant and his parents were insisting that the house be legally conveyed in the name of the deceased. However, mother of the deceased left for England after the first death anniversary of her husband in May, 1988. The High Court, on examination of the entire evidence, concluded that the deceased had not committed suicide on account of demands for dowry but due to harassment caused by her husband, in particular. The deceased had committed suicide by drinking Organo Phosphorus poison. In view of the findings recorded, the High Court converted the conviction of the appellant from one under Section 304-B IPC to one under Section 306 IPC.

10. We do not find much substance in the submission of Mr. Mahajan that the High Court could not have convicted the appellant under Section 306 IPC as the charge had been framed under Section 304-B IPC. On scrutiny of the entire evidence, the High Court has come to the conclusion that the deceased had not committed suicide on account of demands for dowry but due to harassment caused by her husband, in particular. The harassment by the appellant had compounded the acute depression from which the deceased was suffering after the murder of her father. There was no evidence of any demand for dowry soon before the death, and there was no demand whatsoever that the house in question should be transferred to either of the accused. Under Section 304-B IPC, the cruelty or harassment by her husband or any relative of her husband for, or in connection with, any demand for dowry is a prelude to the suicidal death of the wife. Such suicidal death is defined as dowry death. The High Court has recorded a firm finding that the harassment was not for or in connection with any demands for dowry. But, at the same time, the High Court has concluded that the wife committed suicide due to the harassment of the appellant, in particular. In such circumstances, the High Court was, therefore, fully justified in convicting the appellant under Section 306 IPC.

11. We also do not find any substance in the submission of Mr. Mahajan that the appellant could not have been convicted under Section 306 IPC in the absence of a charge being framed against him under the aforesaid section. The learned counsel had relied upon the judgments of this court in the case of Sangaraboina Sreenu v. State of A.P. JT 1997 (5) SC 47 : 1997 (5) SCC 348 and Shamnsaheb M. Multtani v. State of Karnataka JT 2001 (2) SC 92 : 2001 (2) SCC 577. We are of the opinion that the aforesaid judgments are of no assistance to the appellant, in the facts and circumstances of the present case. We may, however, notice the observations made therein. In the case of Sangaraboina Sreenu (supra), it was observed as follows:

This appeal must succeed for the simple reason that having acquitted the appellant of the charge under Section 302 IPC -- which was the only charge framed against him -- the High Court could not have convicted him of the offence under Section 306 IPC. It is true that Section 222 CrPC entitles a court to convict a person of an offence which is minor in comparison to the one for which he is tried but Section 306 IPC cannot be said to be a minor offence in relation to an offence under Section 302 IPC within the meaning of Section 222 CrPC for the two offences are of distinct and different categories. While the basic constituent of an offence under Section 302 IPC is homicidal death, those of Section 306 IPC are suicidal death and abetment thereof.

11.1. In the present case, both the trial court and the High Court have held that the deceased had committed suicide. Therefore, the nature of the offence under Sections 304-B and 306 IPC are not distinct and different categories.

11.2. Again in the case of Shamnsaheb M. Multtani (supra), this court observed:

18. So when a person is charged with an offence under Sections 302 and 498A IPC on the allegation that he caused the death of a bride after subjecting her to harassment with a demand for dowry, within a period of 7 years of marriage, a situation may arise, as in this case, that the offence of murder is not established as against the accused. Nonetheless, all other ingredients necessary for the offence under Section 304-B IPC would stand established. Can the accused be convicted in such a case for the offence under Section 304-B IPC without the said offence forming part of the charge?

19. A two-Judge Bench of this Court (K. Jayachandra Reddy and G.N. Ray, JJ.) has held in Lakhjit Singh v. State of Punjab that if a prosecution failed to establish the offence under Section 302 IPC, which alone was included in the charge, but if the offence under Section 306 IPC was made out in the evidence it is permissible for the court to convict the accused of the latter offence.

20. But without reference to the above decision, another two-Judge Bench of this Court (M.K. Mukherjee and S.P. Kurdukar, JJ.) has held in Sangaraboina Sreenu v. State of A.P. that it is impermissible to do so. The rationale advanced by the Bench for the above position is this:

It is true that Section 222 CrPC entitles a court to convict a person of an offence which is minor in comparison to the one for which he is tried but Section 306 IPC cannot be said to be a minor offence in relation to an offence under Section 302 IPC within the meaning of Section 222 CrPC for the two offences are of distinct and different categories. While the basic constituent of an offence under Section 302 IPC is homicidal death, those of Section 306 IPC are suicidal death and abetment thereof.

21. The crux of the matter is this: Would there be occasion for a failure of justice by adopting such a course as to convict an accused of the offence under Section 304-B IPC when all the ingredients necessary for the said offence have come out in evidence, although he was not charged with the said offence? In this context a reference to Section 464(1) of the Code is apposite:

464. (1) No finding, sentence or order by a court of competent jurisdiction shall be deemed invalid merely on the ground that no charge was framed or on the ground of any error, omission or irregularity in the charge including any misjoinder of charges, unless, in the opinion of the court of appeal, confirmation or revision, a failure of justice has in fact been occasioned thereby.

(emphasis supplied)

22. In other words, a conviction would be valid even if there is any omission or irregularity in the charge, provided it did not occasion a failure of justice.

23. We often hear about failure of justice and quite often the submission in a criminal court is accentuated with the said expression. Perhaps it is too pliable or facile an expression which could be fitted in any situation of a case. The expression failure of justice would appear, sometimes, as an etymological chameleon (the simile is borrowed from Lord Diplock in Town Investments Ltd. v. Deptt. of the Environment). The criminal court, particularly the superior court should make a close examination to ascertain whether there was really a failure of justice or whether it is only a camouflage.

11.3. We are of the considered opinion that the aforesaid observations do not apply to the facts of the present case. The High Court upon meticulous scrutiny of the entire evidence on record rightly concluded that there was no evidence to indicate the commission of offence under Section 304-B IPC. It was also observed that the deceased had committed suicide due to harassment meted out to her by the appellant but there was no evidence on record to suggest that such harassment or cruelty was made in connection to any dowry demands. Thus, cruelty or harassment sans any dowry demands which drives the wife to commit suicide attracts the offence of abetment of suicide under Section 306 IPC and not Section 304-B IPC which defines the offence and punishment for dowry death.

12. It is a settled proposition of law that mere omission or defect in framing charge would not disable the Court from convicting the accused for the offence which has been found to be proved on the basis of the evidence on record. In such circumstances, the matter would fall within the purview of Section 221 (1) and (2) of the Cr.P.C. In the facts of the present case, the High Court very appropriately converted the conviction under Section 304-B to one under Section 306 IPC.

13. In our opinion, there has been no failure of justice in the conviction of the appellant under Section 306 IPC by the High Court, even though the specific charge had not been framed.

14. Therefore, we see no reason to interfere with the judgment of the High Court. The appeal is accordingly dismissed.

**********', 1] , 
[ 'CROSS CITATION
2009 AIR (SC) 1803
2008 (17) SCR 1364
APPEARANCES
Dr. Rajeev B. Masoodkar and Mr. Anil K. Jha, Advocates for the Appellants.
Mr. Anuj Prakash and Mr. Gopal Singh, Advocates for the Respondent.
HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAWS
Penal Code, 1860
Sections 34, 302 - Evidence Act, 1872, Section 3 - Common intention - Murder - About 11 persons coming together - All armed - Asking for particular person - Quarrel led to shooting of another person. Held that the very fact that they came together with many arms would show that common intention was formed to commit murder. (Para 16)

Sections 34, 302 - Evidence Act, 1872, Section 3 - Common intention - Murder - Several persons coming armed - Asking for particular person - On intervention, shooting another. Held that it cannot be said that they had no common intention to cause offence of murder. (Para 17)

Sections 34, 302 - Evidence Act, 1872, Section 3 - Common intention - Murder - Evidence - Several persons appearing - All armed with various weapons - One of them armed with gandasa, gave blow on head - All leaving together, firing shots together to prevent PWs to come near. Held that common intention is proved. (Para 18)

Sections 34, 302 - Evidence Act, 1872, Section 3 - Common intention - Murder - Evidence - Genesis of occurrence proved - Motive for offence established. Held that common intention may develop at spot. Longer interval is not required in forming common intention and doing of an act. (Para 18)

CASES REFERRED
1.Nishan Singh v. State of Punjab 2008 (3) Scale 416 (Para 20)

2.Prakash v. State of Madhya Pradesh 2006 (13) SCC 508 (Para 21)

3.Mohan Singh v. State of Punjab AIR 1963 SC 174 (Para 19)

S.B. SINHA, J.

1. Appellants, who are three in number, are before us aggrieved by and dissatisfied with a judgment and order dated 9.8.2005 passed by the High Court of Judicature at Patna dismissing the Criminal Appeals preferred by them and thereby upholding the judgments of conviction and sentence dated 9.1.2002 and 11.1.2002 passed by the 7th Additional Sessions Judge, Nalanda.

2. Appellants, the deceased and the prosecution witnesses are residents of village Govindpur, P.S. Silao in the District of Nalanda (Bihar). The prosecution case, shorn of all unnecessary details, is as under:

2.1. On or about 29.5.1997 at about 3 p.m. Sanjib Yadav (informant) along with his father Mauji Yadav (the deceased) were working in his field. Lakhan Yadav, Ragho Yadav, Anil Yadav, Inderdeo Yadav, Ramjee Yadav and Dwarika Yadav were sitting under the shadow of a Pipal tree at some distance.

2.2. Accused persons who were eleven in number, including the appellants herein, armed with country made gun, country made rifle, country made pistol, Gandasa, along with four to five unknown persons armed with firearms came to the place of occurrence and started abusing the informant and his father. They are said to have inquired about one Patali and asking him to come out.

2.3. The deceased advised them not to fight whereupon Ramdeo Kahar (Accused No. 4) made an exhortation whereupon Upendra Kahar (Accused No. 1) shot from his gun hitting the deceased on the right side of the stomach over his waist. He tried to flee away but fell down in the field of Prayag Yadav. Ramdeo Kahar (Accused No.4) assaulted Ragho Yadav (P.W. 7) with lathi on his left hand and Shiv Shankar Paswan (Accused No. 5) assaulted Anil Yadav (P.W. 6) with Gandasa on his head. Accused persons thereafter made good their escape. The deceased, however, while being taken to the hospital breathed his last. The motive for commission of the said offence was said to be long standing enmity between the parties. It was furthermore alleged that on or about 28.5.1997 while some female members of the informants family were bringing water from a well, Upendra Kahar (Accused No. 1) in a state of intoxication misbehaved with them to which Patali Yadav objected wherefor he was threatened by the Accused No.1.

3. A large number of witnesses were examined by the prosecution in support of its case.

The learned Sessions Judge relying upon the evidences of P.W.1 - Inderdeo Yadav, P.W.2 - Ramjee Yadav, P.W. 3 - Lakhan Yadav, P.W. 4 - Dwarika Yadav, P.W. 5 - Ramadhin Yadav, P.W. 8 - Sanjib Yadav (informant) as also the evidences of the injured witnesses P.W. 6 - Anil Yadav and P.W. 7 - Ragho Yadav; held that the prosecution had proved its case.

4. The learned Sessions Judge, however, while recording a judgment of conviction against the appellants herein acquitted the other eight accused persons, stating:

...All the witnesses have stated that it was Ramdeo Kahar who passed an order upon which Upendra Kahar fired causing fatal injury to Mauji. Ramdeo further assaulted Ragho Yadav with Lathi on his left hand and Sheo Shankar Paswan gave a Gandasa blow on the head of Anil Yadav. Except these three accused persons no overt act has been alleged against any other accused persons or even whispered a single word against them although all were alleged to have been armed with rifle, gun and pistol. The prosecution case is that only one shot was fired by Upendra Kahar. The remaining accused persons who were also armed with lethal weapons did not commit any overt act nor they used their arms against any one. The learned defence counsel further submitted that the remaining eight accused persons have been falsely implicated in this case without any basis. If they would have present at the place of occurrence armed with lethal weapons as have been alleged they must have committed some overt act but not a single witness whispered a single word that the remaining eight accused persons even touched the body of any of the persons of the prosecution party. It has been further submitted that one of the accused Shankar Ram was arrested by the I.O. from the house of his brother-in-law Upendra Kahar in the night of 29.5.97 itself. During investigation it has come that in the night intervening 27/28th of May 1997 he slept on the roof of the house of his father-in-law and he fell down from the roof and sustained injuries in his both legs and at the time of occurrence he was lying injured in the house of the father-in-law. His complicity in the alleged occurrence was found to be false and accordingly he was not charge- sheeted but cognizance was taken against him also. The paper regarding his treatment has been brought on record as ext. C and C/1. D.W. 2 in para 15 of his cross-examination has stated that the fracture which Shankar Ram sustained might be caused due to fall.

23. Taking into account all the facts and circumstances of the case and the evidence available on the record the involvement and complicity of the accused persons namely Bilas Paswan, Arbind Paswan, Shankar Ram, Lallan Paswan @ Lalin Paswan, Nagina Paswan, Bengali Kahar, Dashrath Kahar and Mahendra Kahar appears to be highly doubtful and therefore all these accused persons are acquitted giving them benefit of doubt.

5. It has, however, been brought on record that a First Information Report (for short, FIR) was also lodged by Accused No. 5 against the prosecution witnesses under Section 307 of the Indian Penal Code (for short, the IPC) for causing injury to him and Nagina Paswan. What has happened to the said case, however, is not known.

6. Appellants in their defence examined Ashok Kumar Acharya (D.W.1), a Sub-Inspector of Police who had examined Accused No. 5 and Nagina Paswan and prepared requisitions for their medical treatment. D.W. 2 - Dr. Atma Nand Kumar examined them and found the following injuries on their person.

On the person of Nagina Paswan he found the following injuries:

(i) lacerated wound 1 x ï¿½  x muscle deep on lateral aspect of left sole.

(ii) Abrasion ï¿½ x ï¿½ on middle portion of left sole.

The injuries were caused by hard and blunt substance.

On the person of Shiv Shankar Paswan he found the following injuries:

(1) Lacerated wound ï¿½ x ï¿½ x muscle deep on upper portion of lateral aspect of left fore arm.

(2) Abrasion ï¿½ x ï¿½ on upper portion of lateral aspect of left fore arm.

These injuries too were caused by hard blunt substance.

7. As regards the injuries suffered by Nagina Paswan and Accused No.5, the learned trial judge opined that the same might have been caused due to fall. The High Court held:

It is, thus, to be seen that the injuries on the persons of accused were so trivial and nominal that they required hardly any explanation by the prosecution. Having regard to the nature of the injuries it can not even be ruled out that those were caused by some friendly hands.

8. Dr. Rajeev B. Masoodkar, learned counsel appearing on behalf of the appellants would submit:

i. Admittedly, the accused persons having come to cause murder of Patali, the appellants cannot be said to have formed any common intention to commit the offence of murdering Mauji Yadav.

ii. As the assault on the hands of P.W. 7 - Ragho Yadav is said to have been caused by Ramdeo Kahar (Accused No. 4) and that on Anil Yadav (P.W. 6) having been caused by Shiv Shankar Paswan (Accused No. 5) after the shot was fired, they could not have been held guilty for commission of offence punishable under Section 302/34 of the IPC.

iii. The entire prosecution case must be considered on three parts, i.e., (1) coming of the mob, exhortation by accused no. 4 and firing of a shot by accused No. 1; (2) individual assaults by accused Nos. 4 and 5 on Ragho Yadav and Anil Yadav; and (3) injuries caused on Nagina Paswan and Shiv Shankar Paswan (accused No. 5) by the prosecution witnesses.

iv. The learned Sessions Judge, as also the High Court committed a serious error insofar as they failed to take into consideration that an FIR was also lodged against the prosecution witnesses and two of them suffered injuries which had not been explained by the prosecution and in the aforementioned situation the conviction of Ramdeo Kahar (accused No. 4) and Shiv Shankar Paswan (accused No. 5) must be held to be bad in law.

9. Mr. Anuj Prakash, learned counsel appearing on behalf of the State, on the other hand, would contend that keeping in view the manner in which the incident took place, namely, appellants came together with fire arms, caused death of Mauji Yadav by using firearms and went back together is a pointer to show that they had a common intention to commit the crime.

10. The prosecution examined eight witnesses in support of its case. The fact that Mauji Yadav suffered a homicidal death is not in dispute.

The post-mortem examination of the deceased was conducted by P.W.12 - Dr. Shashi Bhushan Singh, who found the following ante-mortem injuries suffered by the deceased:

One wound of entry 1 in diameter with inverted charred margin with bleeding over right iliac fossa near anterior - superior iliac spine was present.

The High Court noticed:

On dissection the abdominal cavity was found full of blood, about 500 c.c. in volume. Liver, was ruptured and embedded with bullet like structure on external surface with laceration of transverse colon with mesentery. Other abdominal viscera like spleen, kidney, stomach were intact.

In the opinion of the Doctor, death was caused due to shock and hemorrhage by reason of the injuries caused by a firearm damaging vital organs. The medical report, thus, corroborates that Mauji Yadav was killed by gun shot injuries.

11. P.W. 11 - Dr. Awadhesh Pd. examined Ragho Yadav (P.W.7) and Anil Yadav (PS 6) and found the following injuries on their person as noticed in the judgment of the High Court.

On the person of Ragho Yadav, he found the following injuries which according to him were caused by some hard and blunt substance:

I. Lacerated bleeding wound over middle of back of left fore hand size ï¿½ x ï¿½ x 1/6.

II. Reddish bruise over back of left arm, size 3 x 1.

On the person of Anil Yadav, P.W.11 found the following injuries:

(i) Incised bleeding wound with clean cut margin over left parietal area of head.

Size of injury - 2 2/1 x ï¿½ x ï¿½

(ii) Tender swelling with redness over back region of head.

Size - 1 ï¿½ diameter.

Injury No. (i) was caused by some sharp cutting instrument while injury No. (ii) was caused by some hard and blunt substance.

12. The FIR had been lodged only within two hours.

The prosecution case, inter alia, was proved by six eye-witnesses and two injured eye-witnesses. It had clearly been proved that the appellants and others variously armed came to the place where the deceased was standing in the field. They asked whereabouts of Patali stating that he would be killed. On a reply by the deceased that Patali was not there and that there was no use for fighting, Accused No. 4 gave exhortation that he should be killed, whereupon Accused No. 1 fired a shot from his country made rifle which had hit on the right side of his abdomen, slightly above the waist as a result whereof he took a few steps and fell down in the land of Prayag Yadav.

When P.W. 7 - Ragho Yadav and P.W.6 -Anil Yadav ran towards the deceased, they were not only intercepted, but also assaulted by Accused No. 4 and Accused No. 5. Whereas a lathi blow was given on the person of Ragho Yadav (P.W. 7) by Accused No.4; Anil Yadav (P.W. 6), who was coming behind him was given a Gandasa blow on his head by Accused No. 5 as a result of which he fell down.

13. Indisputably, thereafter all the accused fled away together and while doing so they made indiscriminate firing from their weapons. The injured witnesses P.W. 6 and P.W.7 described the entire occurrence in great details. We need not refer to their evidences as veracity thereof is not seriously in question.

14. Appellants in their examination under Section 313 of the Code of Criminal Procedure did not question the homicidal nature of death of Mauji Yadav. It was, however, contended that the prosecution witnesses had fired at Shiv Shankar Paswan (Accused No. 5) and caused injury to Nagina Paswan and in the process Mauji Yadav was killed by his own men.

15. The defence of the appellants, in our opinion, has rightly been rejected by the courts below. Unlike the learned Sessions Judge or the High Court, we would, however, assume that the prosecution has not explained the injuries suffered by Nagina Paswan and Accused No. 5. The injuries suffered by them were caused by a hard and blunt substance. The injuries were simple in nature. They were not caused on any vital part of the body. Whereas Nagina Paswan suffered injuries on his left sole, Accused No. 5 suffered injuries on his left fore arm. It is because of the nature of the injuries, the learned Sessions Judge opined that the same might have been caused by a fall. That may or may not be correct. But the fact that they suffered simple injuries itself shows that non-explanation thereof would not be sufficient to brush aside the prosecution case, particularly when the case of the defence that one of them had suffered gun shot injury had not been proved.

We, therefore, agree with the findings of the courts below that death of Mauji Yadav and the injuries suffered by the P.W.6 and P.W. 7 took place in the manner stated by the prosecution.

16. The question which now arises for consideration is as to whether appellants can be said to have formed a common intention. Indisputably, they came together. They were also searching for one Patali. The very fact that all of them came heavily armed and that too with many firearms clearly goes to show that a common intention was formed to commit a murder.

17. Only because they did not find Patali and instead committed the murder of Mauji Yadav by itself may not be sufficient to arrive at a conclusion that they had no intention to commit any offence of causing murder. Furthermore, whether they had the requisite intention or not must also be judged from the surrounding circumstances. Admittedly, Upendra Kahar (Accused No.1) fired a shot on exhortation by Ramdeo Kahar (Accused No. 4). It has furthermore been proved that both Accused No. 4 and Accused No. 5 used the weapons in their hands in foiling the attempts of Ragho Yadav (P.W. 7) and Anil Yadav (P.W. 6) to come to the place of occurrence to help the deceased.

18. Shiv Shankar Paswan (Accused No. 5) was carrying a Gandasa; he had given a Gandasa blow on the head of Anil Yadav, a vital part of his body. All of them also left the place of occurrence together; they fired shot together at random so as to prevent the prosecution witnesses to chase them. Common intention of the appellants, in our opinion, had, thus, been proved. Even otherwise, common intention may develop suddenly at the spot. In this case, the genesis of the occurrence has been proved. The motive for commission of the offence has sufficiently been established. The law does not state that there has to be a long interval of time between the formation of the common intention and the doing of the act. The prosecution also is not required to adduce direct evidence as regards formation of common intention. Thus, it must be inferred from the surrounding circumstances.

19. If an unlawful assembly was formed and if an offence was committed by a member of the unlawful assembly in prosecution of the common object and with a knowledge that the same is likely to be committed in prosecution thereof, the common intention must be said to have been proved. When a common intention is proved, each of the persons sharing the common intention is constructively liable for the criminal act done by one of them. {see Mohan Singh v. State of Punjab AIR 1963 SC 174}

20. In Nishan Singh v. State of Punjab 2008 (3) Scale 416, this Court held:

20. In that case, two separate trials were held in the sense that the examination in chief and the cross-examination of the prosecution witnesses were over, when the trial restarted. It was in that factual matrix, this Court laid down the afore-mentioned proposition of law.

Sub-section 4 of Section 319 CrPC, however, must be read with the residuary provision contained in of Section 375 thereof. Complaint in regard to non compliance of statutory provisions must be made at the earliest opportunity. When a judgment is pronounced; a case must be made out that by reason of a procedural irregularity, failure of justice has occurred. Section 465 of the Code of Criminal Procedure seeks to achieve a salutary principle. 21. What would constitute failure to justice came up for consideration before this Court in State of Madhya Pradesh v. Bhooraji and Ors.JT 2001 (7) SC 55, wherein, inter alia, it was held that:

We conclude that the trial held by the Sessions Court reaching the judgment impugned before the High Court in appeal was conducted by a court of competent jurisdiction and the same cannot be erased merely on account of a procedural lapse, particularly when the same happened at a time when the law which held the field in the State of Madhya Pradesh was governed by the decision of the Full Bench of the Madhya Pradesh High Court.

In Dr. M.C. Sulkunte v. State of Mysore AIR 1971 SC 508, this Court held:

It has been emphasized in a number of decisions of this Court that to set aside a conviction it must be shown that there has been miscarriage of justice as a result of an irregular investigation.

21. Dr. Masoodkar, however, has relied upon a decision of this Court in Prakash v. State of Madhya Pradesh 2006 (13) SCC 508 wherein it was held:

19. Proof of participation by acceptable evidence in certain circumstances would lead to a conclusion that the accused had a common intention to commit the offence. Presence or absence of community of interests may not be of much significance. Each case, however, has to be considered on its own merit. Facts of each case may have to be dealt with differently. Common intention may develop on the spot. Although a pre- arranged plan and meeting of minds is one of the pre-requisites to infer common intention, a prior concert, however, can be inferred from the conduct of the accused. The role played by him, the injuries inflicted and the mode and manner in which the same was done as also the conduct of all the accused are required to be taken into consideration for arriving at a finding as to whether the accused shared a common intention with others or not. Common intention may have to be inferred also from other relevant circumstances of the case. The totality of the circumstances must be taken into consideration in arriving at such a conclusion

As noticed in the said decision each case depends on its own facts. In that case itself it was noticed:

28. Common intention on the part of the Appellant herein is evident. All the accused were armed with lathis. The deceased was unarmed. He was taken by surprise. He started running, but was chased. The witnesses intervened. They tried to pacify the appellant and the co-accused. They did not pay any heed thereto. They for the purpose of committing the assault even jumped over a hedge. As the deceased was running, evidently a blow on leg was given so as to stop him from doing so. Evidently he fell down, which facilitated the other accused to cause injuries on his person, including the fatal injury on his head.

22. In this case also the deceased tried to pacify the appellants and other co-accused to which also they did not pay any heed. In fact, the genesis of the occurrence started at the instance of Ramdeo Kahar (Accused No. 4) himself who gave exhortation to Upendra Kahar (Accused No. 1).

23. For the reasons aforementioned, we do not find any infirmity in the impugned judgment of the High Court. The appeals are dismissed.

**********', 2] , 
[ 'HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAWS
Criminal Procedure Code, 1973
Sections 366, 354 (3) - Penal Code, 1860, Section 302 - Death sentence - Award of - Accused, a police constable having licensed gun - Under influence of liquor, killing 3 persons of a family and injuring three others - All unarmed - Quarrel among ladies on trivial matter. Held that it was not a rarest of rare case inviting capital punishment. Sentence modified to life imprisonment. Case law discussed.
HELD
In Rajendra Prasad v. State of U.P.. Court held that neither the shocking nature of the crime nor the number of murders committed was the criterion to determine whether death sentence should be imposed. It was held that the special reasons necessary for imposing death penalty must not relate to the crime as such but to the criminal. (Para 7)

Even if only one person is killed, the gruesome or shocking nature of the crime and/or the motive for the murder may make it the rarest among rare cases deserving death penalty. On the other hand, murder of even two or three persons may not invite death penalty where there is no premeditation, no cruelty or torture of the victim or where the act is not diabolic. (Para 7)

There can be no doubt that this is not a case which calls for imposition of death sentence. This is not a murder to satisfy any greed or lust. This is not a case involving cruelty to or torture of the victim. This is not a case where the act is brutal, diabolic or revolting. The accused has no bad antecedents nor is a hard core criminal nor an anti- social nor an anti-national element. The action was impulsive and without premeditation arising out of a sudden quarrel. Each of the victims was shot at only once. The repeated firing by appellant is an over-reaction of an inebriated brain to a petty issue. (Para 8)

The mitigating circumstances have not been given their due importance. On a careful balancing of the aggravating and mitigating circumstances, we find that in spite of the gravity of the crime involving triple murder, the aggravating circumstances noticed and enumerated by the High Court do not outweigh, much less overwhelmingly, the mitigating circumstances. This is not that rarest of rare case, which invites death penalty. (Para 8)

CASES REFERRED
1.Bablu v. State of Rajasthan AIR 2007 SC 697 (Para 5)

2.Renuka Bai v. State of Maharashtra JT 2006 (8) SC 282 (Para 9)

3.Saibanna v. State of Karnataka 2005 (4) SCC 15 (Para 9)

4.Dayanidhi Bisoi v. State of Orissa JT 2003 (5) SC 590 (Para 9)

5.Rajasthan v. Kheraj Ram JT 2003 (7) SC 419 (Para 5)

6.Lehna v. State of Haryana JT 2002 (Suppl.1) SC 577 (Para 5)

7.Machhi Singh v. State of Punjab 1983 (3) SCR 413 (Para 5)

8.Bachan Singh v. State of Punjab 1980 (2) SCC 684 (Para 5)

9.Rajendra Prasad v. State of U.P. 1979 (3) SCR 78 (Para 7)

10.Dalbir Singh v. State of Punjab 1979 (3) SCR 1059 (Para 7)

R. V. Raveendran, J.

1. In this appeal by special leave, the common judgment of the Punjab and Haryana High Court dated 22.12.2006 in Murder Reference No. 12 of 2005 and Criminal Appeal No. 10-DB of 2006, affirming the conviction and sentence of death imposed on the appellant by the Sessions Judge, Sangrur by judgment dated 7.12.2005 in Sessions Case No.25 of 2003 is under challenge.

2. The appellant Des Raj is a retired police constable. Chand Singh, the complainant is a distant relative of Des Raj. Des Raj and Chand Singh with their respective families reside in adjoining houses. On 16.2.2003, both families attended the Bhog ceremony in connection with the Birth Anniversary of Baba Ravi Dass and returned home in the afternoon. Des Raj was fully drunk when he returned home. At about 4 p.m., a quarrel arose between Manjit Kaur (wife of Chand Singh) and Jaswant Kaur (wife of Des Raj), when Manjit Kaur objected to the family members of Des Raj throwing rubbish in front of her house. On hearing the quarrel, Chand Singhs brothers - Lal Singh and Bhagwan Singh, and Chand Singhs son - Shamsher Singh, and nephew Tarlok Singh came out of his house. Des Raj also came out of his house along with his three sons and two daughters-in-law. Des Raj was carrying his licensed double barrel gun. Des Raj shouted that if the family members of Chand Singh raised their voice, he would finish them, and fired a shot towards Manjit Kaur, which hit the left side of her head. She collapsed and died. Shamsher Singh, son of Chand Singh, rushed to the rescue of his mother. Des Raj fired another shot which hit the right hand of Shamsher Singh. Shamsher Singh raised an alarm. Bhagwan Singh and Lal Singh, the two brothers of Chand Singh, rushed to the assistance of Shamsher Singh. Des Raj re-loaded his gun and fired at them. Bhagwan Singh was hit on the left side of the chest and died. Lal Singh was hit on left side of his abdomen (and died later in the hospital). Des Raj again loaded his gun and fired towards Chand Singh which hit him on his right arm. A few pellets also hit his nephew Tarlok Singh and a neighbourhood child Raveena. According to the prosecution, all through this, the family members of Des Raj (his wife, three sons and two daughters-in-law) exhorted Des Raj by shouting do not leave any members of the family alive. After the incident, Des Raj and his family members fled from the scene.

2. Des Raj (accused No.1) and his six family members (accused 2 to 7) were charged and tried for offences under sections 148, 302/149, 307/149 and 114 IPC. The prosecution examined 14 witnesses. Chand Singh (PW-2) and his son Shamsher Singh (PW-3) who were injured eye-witnesses gave a graphic account of what transpired. After appreciating the evidence, the Sessions Judge, Sangrur by judgment dated 7.12.2005, convicted Des Raj under section 302 IPC for the murder of Manjit Kaur, Bhagwan Singh and Lal Singh and also convicted him under section 307 IPC for attempting to murder Shamsher Singh and Chand Singh. After hearing on the question of sentence, the trial court came to the conclusion that the sentence of life imprisonment was inadequate and having regard to the gravity of the offence, the appellant deserved sentence to death. Accused 2 to 7 who allegedly exhorted appellant, were acquitted. The trial court was of the view that as accused 2 to 7 were not armed, and as there was no evidence of any common object to kill Manjit Kaur and others, there was a possibility that the exhortation attributed to Accused 2 to 7 may be only to implicate them in the crime.

3. The reference seeking confirmation of sentence of death was registered as Murder Reference No.12 of 2005. The appeal filed by Des Raj against his conviction and sentence was registered as Criminal Appeal No.10-DB of 2006. The appeal filed by the State against the acquittal of accused 2 to 7 was registered as Criminal Appeal No.670-DBA of 2006. The revision petition filed by Chand Singh challenging the acquittal of accused 2 to 7 was registered as Cri. Revision No. 1835 of 2006. The four cases were heard together. By common judgment dated 22.12.2006, the High Court affirmed the judgment of the trial court, and confirmed the death sentence awarded to Des Raj. It rejected the appeal filed by Des Raj, as also the appeal filed by the State and the revision filed by Chand Singh. The High Court held that on balancing the mitigating circumstance and the following aggravating circumstances, the scales tilted in favour of death sentence :

(i)In order to impress his authority on his neighbours over a petty dispute and to satisfy his ego, Des Raj opened fire, killing three members and injuring three members of the family of a neighbour, and a child who was a bystander - - all unarmed and helpless.

(ii)Premeditation was writ large in view of the fact that Des Raj brought the gun and cartridges from inside the house, and though neither provoked, nor instigated, continued firing by loading and re-loading the gun in order to silence the voice of genuine protest. The only fault of the hapless members of Chand Singhs family was that they objected to the improper act of Des Rajs wife throwing rubbish in front of their house.

(iii)Des Raj went berserk and created havoc by killing and injuring whosoever came in front of him. The accused did not even bother that bystanders are likely to be hit. He did not show any sense of remorse after the incident, but ran away.

The High Court held that the gruesome, unscrupulous and diabolic attack on unarmed and innocent men, woman and child, committed in a cold blooded manner by a person who had been trained to protect the life and liberty of the people as a Police Constable, not only shocked the judicial conscience of the court but also shocked the collective conscience of the society.

4. The said judgment is challenged in this appeal. The appellant does not challenge the finding of guilt and conviction under section 302 IPC. The challenge is restricted only to the imposition of capital punishment. The appellant drew our attention to the various mitigating circumstances and contended that this is not a rarest of rare case, requiring death sentence. The learned counsel for the State countered by relying upon the aggravating circumstances listed by the High Court. The only question that therefore arises for our consideration is whether the courts below were justified in imposing the sentence of death.

5. In Bachan Singh v. State of Punjab1 and Machhi Singh v. State of Punjab2, this Court has stated the principles and guidelines relating to award of death sentence. The principles have been reiterated in several subsequent decisions including State of Rajasthan v. Kheraj Ram1 , Lehna v. State of Haryana2 and Bablu v. State of Rajasthan3.

5.1. In Bachan Singh (supra), a Constitution Bench of this Court while upholding the constitutional validity of the provision for penalty of death for murder, indicated the broad criteria which should guide the courts in the matter of sentencing a person convicted of murder under section 302 IPC. This Court held :

As we read sections 354(3) and 235(2) and other related provisions of the Code of 1973, it is quite clear to us that for making the choice of punishment or for ascertaining the existence or absence of special reasons in that context, the court must pay due regard both to the crime and the criminal. What is the relative weight to be given to the aggravating and mitigating factors, depends on the facts and circumstances of the particular case. More often than not, these two aspects are so intertwined that it is difficult to give a separate treatment to each of them. In many cases, the extremely cruel or beastly manner of the commission of murder is itself a demonstrated index of the depraved character of the perpetrator. That is why, it is not desirable to consider the circumstances of the crime and the circumstances of the criminal in two separate watertight compartments. In a sense, to kill is to be cruel and therefore all murders are cruel. But such cruelty may vary in its degree of culpability. And it is only when the culpability assumes the proportion of extreme depravity that special reasons can legitimately be said to exist.

But this much can be said that in order to qualify for inclusion in the category of aggravating circumstances which may form the basis of special reasons in section 354(3), circumstance found on the facts of a particular case must evidence aggravation of an abnormal or special degree.

It is, therefore, imperative to voice the concern that courts, aided by the broad illustrative guidelines indicated by us, will discharge the onerous function with evermore scrupulous care and humane concern, directed along the highroad of legislative policy outlined in section 354(3), viz., that for persons convicted of murder, life imprisonment is the rule and death sentence an exception. A real and abiding concern for the dignity of human life postulates resistance to taking a life through laws instrumentality. That ought not to be done save in the rarest of rare cases when the alternative option is unquestionably foreclosed. 

(emphasis supplied)

5.2. In Machhi Singh (supra), this Court addressed the issue of practical application of the rarest of rare case rule laid down in Bachan Singh :

... every member of the community is able to live with safety without his or her own life being endangered because of the protective arm of the community and on account of the rule of law enforced by it..... Every member of the community owes a debt to the community for this protection. When ingratitude is shown instead of gratitude by killing a member of the community which protects the murderer himself from being killed, or when the community feels that for the sake of self- preservation the killer has to be killed, the community may well withdraw the protection by sanctioning the death penalty. But the community will not do so in every case. It may do so in rarest of rare cases when its collective conscience is so shocked that it will expect the holders of the judicial power centre to inflict death penalty irrespective of their personal opinion as regards desirability or otherwise of retaining death penalty. The community may entertain such a sentiment when the crime is viewed from the platform of the motive for, or the manner of commission of the crime, or the anti-social or abhorrent nature of the crime....

This Court recognised that special reasons attracting death penalty may relate to manner of commission of murder, or the motive for murder, the abhorrent nature of the crime or the magnitude of the crime, or even the personality of the victim. This Court gave the following illustrations (not to be considered as exhaustive) :

(a) Manner of commission of murder : When the murder is committed in an extremely brutal, grotesque, diabolical, revolting, or dastardly manner so as to arouse intense and extreme indignation of the community. (Examples : setting a house ablaze to roast alive the victim inside; subjecting the victim to inhuman acts of torture or cruelty to bring about his death; cutting the body of the victim into pieces or dismembering the body in a fiendish manner).

(b) Motive for commission of murder : When the murder is committed for a motive which evinces total depravity and meanness. (Examples: murder by hired assassin for money or reward; or cold- blooded murder for inheriting a property to gain control over property of a person under the control of the murderer or vis-a-vis whom the murderer is in a dominating position or in a position of trust; murder is committed in the course for betrayal of the motherland).

(c) Anti-social or socially abhorrent nature of the crime : When murder of a member of a Scheduled Caste or minority community etc., is committed not for personal reasons but in circumstances which arouse social wrath. Or in cases of bride burning or dowry deaths or when murder is committed in order to remarry for the sake of extracting dowry once again or to marry another woman on account of infatuation.

(d) Magnitude of the crime : When the crime is enormous in proportion. For instance when multiple murders, say of all or almost all the members of a family or a large number of persons of a particular caste, community, or locality, are committed.

(e) Personality of victim of murder : When the victim of murder is an innocent child, or a helpless woman or old or infirm person or a public figure generally loved and respected by the community.

6. The following guidelines emerging from Bachan Singh (supra) and Machhi Singh (supra) will be of assistance to decide whether death sentence is warranted, on the facts and circumstances of a case :

(i) Life imprisonment is the rule and death sentence is an exception. Death sentence must be imposed only when life imprisonment appears to be an altogether inadequate punishment having regard to the relevant facts and circumstances of the crime.

(ii) There must be special reasons for imposing the sentence of death. Except in gravest cases of extreme culpability, the extreme penalty of death should not be inflicted. The circumstances of the crime should leave no alternative but to impose death sentence even after according maximum weightage to the mitigating circumstances. In short death penalty is warranted only in the rarest of rare cases.

(iii) A balance-sheet of aggravating and mitigating circumstances has to be drawn up. The circumstances of the offender as also the circumstances of the crime should go into such balance sheet. Only when the aggravating circumstances overwhelmingly outweigh the mitigating circumstances, the court should consider the option of death penalty.

7. Whether the number of persons killed has a bearing on the sentence to be imposed was considered in Rajendra Prasad v. State of U.P.1. This Court held that neither the shocking nature of the crime nor the number of murders committed was the criterion to determine whether death sentence should be imposed. It was held that the special reasons necessary for imposing death penalty must not relate to the crime as such but to the criminal. In Dalbir Singh v. State of Punjab2, the Bench which decided Rajendra Prasad, while following Rajendra Prasad, put the matter in a somewhat better perspective. It held :

Counting the casualties is not the main criterion for sentencing to death, nor recklessness in the act of murder. The sole focus on the crime and the total farewell to the criminal and his social-personal circumstances mutilate sentencing justice.

In Bachhan Singh, the Constitution Bench did not agree with the decision in Rajendra Prasad that the special reasons necessary for imposing death penalty must relate not to the crime as such but the criminal. It held that for making the choice of punishment or for ascertaining the existence or absence of special reasons, the court must pay due regard both to the crime and the criminal. Thus the number of persons killed when coupled with the shocking nature of other features of the crime, can certainly furnish the grounds for choice of punishment. Even if only one person is killed, the gruesome or shocking nature of the crime and/or the motive for the murder may make it the rarest among rare cases deserving death penalty. On the other hand, murder of even two or three persons may not invite death penalty where there is no premeditation, no cruelty or torture of the victim or where the act is not diabolic. We may in this context refer to the following observations in Lehna (supra) :

It is true three lives have been lost. But at the same time, the mental condition of the accused which led to the assault cannot be lost sight of. The same may not be relevant to judge culpability, but is certainly a factor while considering question of sentence. There is no evidence of any diabolic planning to commit the crime, though cruel was the act. Deprived of his livelihood on account of the land being taken away, the accused was, as the evidence shows, exhibiting his displeasure, his resentment. Frequency of the quarrels indicates lack of any sinister planning to take away lives of the deceased. The factual scenario gives impressions of impulsive act and not planned assaults. In the peculiar background, death sentence would not be proper. A sentence of imprisonment for life will be more appropriate.

8. Applying the above principles, there can be no doubt that this is not a case which calls for imposition of death sentence. This is not a murder to satisfy any greed or lust. This is not a case involving cruelty to or torture of the victim. This is not a case where the act is brutal, diabolic or revolting. The accused has no bad antecedents nor is a hard core criminal nor an anti- social nor an anti-national element. The action was impulsive and without premeditation arising out of a sudden quarrel between appellants wife and Chand Singhs wife. Each of the victims was shot at only once. The repeated firing by appellant is an over-reaction of an inebriated brain to a petty issue. We hasten to add that drunkenness cannot be an excuse for any brutal or diabolic acts. The entire incident occurred in the span of a few minutes. The repeated loading and firing in utter disregard for life, in the circumstances, is not an indication of extreme depravity or brutality, but of a drunken rage. The trial court and the High Court have persuaded themselves to award the death penalty by considering only the aggravating circumstances, and to an extent carried away by the fact that three died and four (two directly and two indirectly) were injured. The mitigating circumstances have not been given their due importance. On a careful balancing of the aggravating and mitigating circumstances, we find that in spite of the gravity of the crime involving triple murder, the aggravating circumstances noticed and enumerated by the High Court do not outweigh, much less overwhelmingly, the mitigating circumstances. This is not that rarest of rare case, which invites death penalty.

9. Learned counsel for the respondents relied on the decisions of this Court in Dayanidhi Bisoi v. State of Orissa1, Saibanna v. State of Karnataka2 and Renuka Bai v. State of Maharashtra3 to contend that the appellant deserved death penalty. We find that all the three decisions are clearly distinguishable on facts. All are cases of gruesome and diabolical murders which fell in the category of rarest of rare cases. In Dayanidhi, the accused who was in financial difficulties, visited the house of the deceased, enjoyed their hospitality, and during night when they were asleep, stabbed and killed the entire host family of three (husband, wife and their three year child) without provocation and stole the valuables. In Saibanna, the appellant who was released on parole, while serving the sentence of life imprisonment, suspected the fidelity of his wife and assaulted her and their minor child with a hunting knife. He inflicted as many as 21 injuries on his wife and six injuries on his minor child. As a consequence, both his wife and daughter died. In Renuka Bai, the appellant along with two others, kidnapped several minor children, used them for committing thefts and other illegal activities and killed them when they were no longer useful. As many as 13 children were kidnapped and nine out of them were killed during between 1992 and 1996. The facts of those cases are no way comparable to this case.

10. We, therefore, allow this appeal in part. While confirming the conviction under section 302 IPC, we modify the sentence of death imposed on the appellant to one of life imprisonment. The conviction and sentence under section 307 IPC remains undisturbed.

**********', 2] , 
[ 'CROSS CITATION
2013 AIR (SC) 3641
APPEARANCES
Mr. Neeraj Kumar Jain, Senior Advocate Mr. Kamal Singh Pundir, Mr. Pratham Kant, Mr. Anil Kimar Sharma, Mr. Rameshwar Prasad Goyal, Advocates with him for the Appellant.
Mr. Abhishek Atrey, Ms. Aishverya Shandilya, Advocates for the Respondent.
HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAWS
Penal Code, 1860
Sections 302, 117, 201, 420, 364 - Conviction under - Murder - Allegation that appellant dishonestly induced PW2, the complainant to deliver his car and Rs 15000/- and for that he abducted and murdered deceased - Acquittal by High Court under Section 302, while maintaining conviction under Sections 117, 201 and 420 - Conviction under Section 364 modified to one under Section 365 - On appeals from both appellant and state, notice issued to appellant for reversal of acquittal under Section 302 - Application for withdrawal by appellant declined as notice issued. Held, the concurrent findings of courts below relating to other offences being supported by evidence and there being no challenge to conviction therefor, no miscarriage of justice has resulted. No interference needed. (Para 8)

Sections 302,117 201, 420, 364 - Conviction under - Corpus delicti not found - Case based on circumstantial evidence - No direct evidence to show that deceased A was murdered and his dead body was disposed of by appellant - Whether conviction for murder justified when corpus delicti not found. Held, conviction in absence of corpus delicti requires clinching evidence to show that victim was murdered. There being no such evidence, conviction cannot be sustained. Rama Nand and Ors. v. State of Himachal Pradesh, Ram Chandra & Ram Bharosey v. State of Uttar Pradesh, State of Karnataka v. M. V. Mahesh, Lakshmi and Ors. v. State of Uttar Pradesh, referred and followed
HELD
In the absence of corpus delicti what the court looks for is clinching evidence that proves that the victim has been done to death. If the prosecution is successful in providing cogent and satisfactory proof of the victim having met a homicidal death, absence of corpus delicti will not by itself be fatal to a charge of murder. Failure of the prosecution to assemble such evidence will, however, result in failure of the most essential requirement in a case involving a charge of murder. That is precisely the position in the case at hand. There is no evidence either direct or circumstantial about Abdul Mabood having met a homicidal death. (Para 13)

Murder of A, alleged - No motive - Plea that appellant fraudulently induced complainant PW 2, to deliver car and money, so that he could take away the car and for said reason he killed A. Held plea is baseless. Car could have been taken without killing A as it was in appellants possession. Both A and appellant were together. There was no enmity between them. Appellant could have dropped him any where. However appellant was rightly convicted for his fraudulent act of grabbing the car and money. Conviction confirmed. Sukhram v. State of Maharashtra JT 2007 (10) SC 177, Sunil Clifford David v. State of Punjab JT 2012 (8) SC 639, Pannayar v. State of Tamil Nadu JT 2009 (10) SC 461, referred.
HELD
It is not the case of the prosecution that there existed any enmity between Abdul Mabood and the appellant nor is there any evidence to prove any such enmity. All that was suggested by learned counsel appearing for the State was that the appellant got rid of Abdul Mabood by killing him because he intended to take away the car which the complainant-Dr. Mohd. Alam had given to him. That argument has not impressed us. If the motive behind the alleged murder was to somehow take away the car, it was not necessary for the appellant to kill the deceased for the car could be taken away even without physically harming Abdul Mabood. It was not as though Abdul Mabood was driving the car and was in control thereof so that without removing him from the scene it was difficult for the appellant to succeed in his design. The prosecution case on the contrary is that the appellant had induced the complainant to part with the car and a sum of Rs.15,000/-. The appellant has been rightly convicted for that fraudulent act which conviction we have affirmed. Such being the position, the car was already in the possession and control of the appellant and all that he was required to do was to drop Abdul Mabood at any place en route to take away the car which he had ample opportunity to do during all the time the two were together while visiting different places. Suffice it to say that the motive for the alleged murder is as weak as it sounds illogical to us. It is fairly well-settled that while motive does not have a major role to play in cases based on eye-witness account of the incident, it assumes importance in cases that rest entirely on circumstantial evidence. (Para 14)

Murder - Last seen evidence - Murder of A, alleged - Appellant last seen with A by PWs. 7, 8 - PW 11 also saw appellant going with A but returning alone - Told by Appellant that A was with his friend - Whether conviction possible on basis of last seen evidence. Held, no. Though some suspicion arose but it was not enough to justify conviction. Mohibur Rahmans JT 2002 (6) SC 235, Arjun Mariks JT 1994 (2) SC 627, Godabarish Mishras JT 1996 (9) SC 708, Bharats JT 2003 (1) SC 635, Sanjay Thakrans JT 2007 (5) SC 146, Bodh Rajs case, Jaswant Girs cases referred and relied.
HELD
On 2nd July, 1986 the appellant had gone to the house of one Akash Garg P.W.7 accompanied by a boy whom the witness identified as the deceased-Abdul Mabood. The deposition of PW8 Badlu Ram, posted as a Peon at Naval Cinema, Panipat, is also to the same effect. The boy was identified by T PW 11 by reference to a photograph shown to him as the alleged deceased-Abdul Mabood. According to the witness the appellant had gone away with his companion boy and when he returned at night he was all alone. He also appeared troubled and his clothes were stained with dust and sand. The appellant asked for a towel to take a bath and explained that his car had broken down and while trying to put it in order his clothes got soiled. When the witness asked him about the boy accompanying the appellant the latter is alleged to have explained that he had stayed back with his friend. High Court found that the charge of murder could not be held to be proved on the basis of the evidence on record. The High Court was, in our opinion, correct in arriving at that conclusion. It is true that the tell-tale circumstances proved on the basis of the evidence on record give rise to a suspicion against the appellant but suspicion howsoever strong is not enough to justify conviction of the appellant for murder. The trial Court has, in our opinion, proceeded more on the basis that the appellant may have murdered the deceased-Abdul Mabood. In doing so the trial Court over looked the fact that there is a long distance between may have and must have which distance must be traversed by the prosecution by producing cogent and reliable evidence. No such evidence is unfortunately forthcoming in the instant case. The disappearance of deceased-Abdul Mabood is not explainable as sought to be argued before us by the prosecution only on the hypothesis that the appellant killed him near some canal in a manner that is not known or that the appellant disposed of his body in a fashion about which the prosecution has no evidence except a wild guess that the body may have been dumped into a canal from which it was never recovered. (Para 15)

The High Court was justified in setting aside the order passed by the trial Court and acquitting the appellant of the offence of murder under Section 302 IPC. The order passed by the High Court deserves to be affirmed giving to the appellant the benefit of doubt. (Para 20)

CASES REFERRED
1.Sunil Clifford Daniel (Dr.) v. State of Punjab JT 2012 (8) SC 639 (Para 14)

2.Pannayar v. State of Tamil Nadu by Inspector of Police JT 2009 (10) SC 461 (referred) (Para 14)

3.Sukhram v. State of Maharashtra JT 2007 (10) SC 177 (Para 14)

4.State of Goa v. Sanjay Thakran and Anr. JT 2007 (5) SC 146 (referred & relied) (Para 17)

5.Jaswant Gir v. State of Punjab 2005 (12) SCC 438 (referred & relied) (Para 18)

6.State of Karnataka v. M.V. Mahesh 2003 (3) SCC 353 (Para 11)

7.Bharat v. State of M.P. JT 2003 (1) SC 635 (referred & relied) (Para 16)

8.Bodh Raj alias Bodha and Ors. v. State of Jammu and Kashmir 2002 (8) SCC 45 (referred & relied) (Para 17)

9.Lakshmi and Ors. v. State of Uttar Pradesh JT 2002 (6) SC 392 (Para 12)

10.Mohibur Rahman and Anr. v. State of Assam JT 2002 (6) SC 235 (referred & relied) (Para 16)

11.Godabarish Mishra  v. Kuntala Mishra and Another JT 1996 (9) SC 708 (referred & relied) (Para 16)

12.Arjun Marik and Ors. v. State of Bihar JT 1994 (2) SC 627 (referred & relied) (Para 16)

13.Rama Nand and Ors. v. State of Himachal Pradesh 1981 (1) SCC 511 (Para 9)

14.Ram Chandra & Ram Bharosey v. State of Uttar Pradesh AIR 1957 SC 381 (Para 10)


T.S. THAKUR, J.

1. This appeal arises out of a judgment and order dated 27th August, 2008 passed by the High Court of Uttarakhand at Nainital whereby Criminal Appeal No.298 of 2001 filed by the appellant has been partly allowed. The High Court has while setting aside the conviction and sentence awarded to the appellant under Section 302 IPC, upheld his conviction for offences punishable under Sections 171, 201 and 420 IPC and the sentence awarded by the trial Court for these offences. The High Court has further convicted the appellant for an offence punishable under Section 365 IPC and sentenced him to undergo rigorous imprisonment for a period of seven years on that count.

2. The facts giving rise to the arrest and eventual conviction of the appellant have been set out by the High Court at length. We need not, therefore, recapitulate the same over again except to the extent it is absolutely necessary to do so for the disposal of this appeal. Suffice it to say that the appellant according to the prosecution dishonestly induced the complainant Dr. Mohd. Alam (P.W.2) at Dehradun to deliver his car bearing registration No.URM 2348 and a sum of Rs.15,000/- and at about 1.30 p.m. on the same day abducted Abdul Mabood, brother of the complainant with the intention to commit his murder. The prosecution case further is that sometime between 1.7.1987 and 2.7.1987, Abdul Mabood was murdered near a canal on Kairana Panipat Road in District Panipat and with a view to cause disappearance of any signs of the crime committed by him threw the dead body of Abdul Mabood in the Canal. A report for the alleged commission of offences under Sections 406, 419, 420 and 365 IPC was lodged by Dr. Mohd. Alam on 6.7.1987 at Police Station Dalanwala based on which Crime No.185/1987 was registered and the investigation undertaken by Muzaffar Ali - Sub-Inspector, examined as PW17 at the trial. In the course of investigation the said witness took the appellant into custody, recovered the car bearing Registration No.U.R.M.2348 from Panipat and effected seizure of some letters allegedly written by him. Further investigation of the case was then handed over to Mr. J.P. Sharma (P.W.18) who completed the same and submitted a charge sheet against the appellant for offences punishable under Sections 364, 302, 201, 420, 170 and 171 I.P.C.

3. The appellant was in due course committed to the Court of Sessions to face trial before the III Additional Sessions Judge, Dehradun who framed charges against the appellant to which the appellant pleaded not guilty and claimed to be tried.

4. At the trial Court the prosecution examined P.W. 1 Raees Ahmad, P.W.2 Dr. Mohd. Alam, also complainant in the case; P.W.3 Hari Om, P.W.4 Jiledar Singh, P.W.5 Hizfur Rahman the brother of Abdul Mabood-deceased; P.W.6 Anees Ahmad, P.W.7 Akash Garg, P.W.8 Badloo Ram, P.W.9 Jai Bhagwan, P.W.10 Ajit Chopra, and nine other witnesses including P.W.17 Muzaffar Ali and P.W.18 J. P. Sharma who concluded the investigation and P.W.19 Ramanand Pandey, another Scientific Officer of Forensic Laboratory, Agra. The appellant examined D.W.1 Yashveer Singh, his brother and D.W.2 Constable Om Prakash, in his defence.

5. Appreciation of evidence thus assembled at the trial led the trial Court to the conclusion that the appellant had committed offences punishable under the provisions with which he stood charged and accordingly sentenced him to life imprisonment for the offence of murder besides a fine of Rs.3,000/-. For the remaining offence he was sentenced to undergo rigorous imprisonment ranging between two months to five years with the direction that all the sentences shall run concurrently.

6. Aggrieved by the judgment and order passed by the trial Court the appellant preferred an appeal to the High Court of Allahabad from where the same was transferred to the High Court of Uttarakhand at Nainital in terms of Section 35 of the U.P. Re-organisation Act, 2000. The transferee High Court allowed the appeal but only in part and to the extent that the appellant was acquitted of the charge of murder while his conviction for offences under Sections 171, 201 and 420 was maintained. The High Court also altered the conviction from Section 364 IPC to Section 365 IPC and sentenced him to undergo rigorous imprisonment for a period of seven years on that count. The present appeal assails the correctness of the said order of the High Court.

7. When this appeal came up for hearing before S.B. Sinha and Cyriac Joseph, JJ. on 24th October, 2008, this Court not only issued notice to the State in the appeal but also directed notice to the appellant to show cause why the order passed by the High Court acquitting the appellant under Section 302 may not be set aside. At this stage the appellant made a prayer for withdrawal of the SLP filed by him against his conviction which prayer was declined by this Court by order dated 5th January, 2009 on the ground that the Court had issued a show cause notice for reversal of the appellants acquittal under Section 302 IPC.

8. We have heard learned counsel for the parties at some length who have taken us through the evidence on record. The only question that was argued before us with some amount of seriousness on both sides was whether the High Court was justified in acquitting the appellant of the charge of murder held proved against him by the trial Court. There was no attempt made by the counsel for the appellant to question the correctness of the findings recorded by the trial Court in so far as the commission of offences punishable under other provisions of the IPC were concerned. As seen above, the appellant had sought withdrawal of the SLP which implied that he did not question the correctness of the sentence recorded by the High Court in so far as other offences were concerned. That prayer was rejected which effectively kept the SLP alive, but no serious attempt was made to pursue the challenge against the order passed by the High Court in so far as the conviction recorded by the said Court under other offences was concerned. We are not in that view of the matter called upon to examine the correctness of the conviction of the appellant for other offences. Even otherwise the findings recorded by the trial Court and affirmed by the High Court are in our opinion supported by evidence in so far as commission of other offences are concerned. There is no miscarriage of justice in the appreciation of the evidence or recording of those finding to call for our interference.

9. Coming next to the question whether the prosecution has brought home the charge of murder levelled against the appellant, we must at the outset point out that the case is entirely based on circumstantial evidence. No direct evidence has been adduced to prove that Abdul Mabood, whose corpus delicti has not been recovered, was done to death, nor any evidence adduced to show where and when the same was disposed of by the appellant assuming that he had committed the crime alleged against him. The legal position regarding production of corpus delicti is well settled by a long line of decisions of this Court. We may briefly refer to some of those cases. In Rama Nand and Ors. v. State of Himachal Pradesh 1981 (1) SCC 511, this Court summed up the legal position on the subject as:

...........In other words, we would take it that the corpus delicti, i.e., the dead-body of the victim was not found in this case. But even on that assumption, the question remains whether the other circumstances established on record were sufficient to lead to the conclusion that within all human probability, she had been murdered by Rama Nand appellant? It is true that one of the essential ingredients of the offence of culpable homicide required to be proved by the prosecution is that the accused caused the death of the person alleged to have been killed.

28. This means that before seeking to prove that the accused is the perpetrator of the murder, it must be established that homicidal death has been caused. Ordinarily, the recovery of the dead-body of the victim or a vital part of it, bearing marks of violence, is sufficient proof of homicidal death of the victim. There was a time when under the old English Law, the finding of the body of the deceased was held to be essential before a person was convicted of committing his culpable homicide.

I would never convict, said Sir Mathew Hale, a person of murder or manslaughter unless the fact were proved to be done, or at least the body was found dead. This was merely a rule of caution, and not of law. But in those times when execution was the only punishment for murder, the need for adhering to this cautionary rule was greater. Discovery of the dead-body of the victim bearing physical evidence of violence, has never been considered as the only mode of proving the corpus delicti in murder. Indeed, very many cases are of such a nature where the discovery of the dead-body is impossible. A blind adherence to this old body doctrine would open the door wide open for many a heinous murderer to escape with impunity simply because they were cunning and clever enough to destroy the body of their victim. In the context of our law, Sir Hales enunciation has to be interpreted no more than emphasising that where the dead-body of the victim in a murder case is not found, other cogent and satisfactory proof of the homicidal death of the victim must be adduced by the prosecution. Such proof may be by the direct ocular account of an eye-witness, or by circumstantial evidence, or by both. But where the fact of corpus delicti, i.e. homicidal death is sought to be established by circumstantial evidence alone, the circumstances must be of a clinching and definitive character unerringly leading to the inference that the victim concerned has met a homicidal death. Even so, this principle of caution cannot be pushed too far as requiring absolute proof. Perfect proof is seldom to be had in this imperfect world, and absolute certainty is a myth. That is why under Section 3, Evidence Act, a fact is said to be proved, if the Court considering the matters before it, considers its existence so probable that a prudent man ought, under the circumstances of the particular case, to act upon the supposition that it exists. The corpus delicti or the fact of homicidal death, therefore, can be proved by telling and inculpating circumstances which definitely lead to the conclusion that within all human probability, the victim has been murdered by the accused concerned....

(emphasis supplied)

10. To the same effect is the decision in Ram Chandra & Ram Bharosey v. State of Uttar Pradesh AIR 1957 SC 381, where this Court said:

It is true that in law a conviction for an offence does not necessarily depend upon the corpus delicti being found. There may be reliable evidence, direct or circumstantial, of the commission of the murder though the corpus delicti are not traceable.

11. Reference may also be made to State of Karnataka v. M.V. Mahesh 2003 (3) SCC 353 where this Court observed:

It is no doubt true that even in the absence of the corpus delicti it is possible to establish in an appropriate case commission of murder on appropriate material being made available to the court. In this case no such material is made available to the court.

12. In Lakshmi and Ors. v. State of Uttar Pradesh JT 2002 (6) SC 392 : 2002 (7) SCC 198 the legal position was reiterated thus:

16. Undoubtedly, the identification of the body, cause of death and recovery of weapon with which the injury may have been inflicted on the deceased are some of the important factors to be established by the prosecution in an ordinary given case to bring home the charge of offence under Section 302 I.P.C. This, however, is not an inflexible rule. It cannot be held as a general and broad proposition of law that where these aspects are not established, it would be fatal to the case of the prosecution and in all cases and eventualities, it ought to result in the acquittal of those who may be charged with the offence of murder. It would depend on the facts and circumstances of each case. A charge of murder may stand established against an accused even in absence of identification of the body and cause the death.

13. In the absence of corpus delicti what the court looks for is clinching evidence that proves that the victim has been done to death. If the prosecution is successful in providing cogent and satisfactory proof of the victim having met a homicidal death, absence of corpus delicti will not by itself be fatal to a charge of murder. Failure of the prosecution to assemble such evidence will, however, result in failure of the most essential requirement in a case involving a charge of murder. That is precisely the position in the case at hand. There is no evidence either direct or circumstantial about Abdul Mabood having met a homicidal death. The charge of murder levelled against the appellant, therefore, rests on a rather tenuous ground of the two having been last seen together to which aspect we shall presently advert when we examine whether the two being last seen together is proved as a circumstance and can support a charge of murder.

14. The second aspect to which we must straightaway refer is the absence of any motive for the appellant to commit the alleged murder of Abdul Mabood. It is not the case of the prosecution that there existed any enmity between Abdul Mabood and the appellant nor is there any evidence to prove any such enmity. All that was suggested by learned counsel appearing for the State was that the appellant got rid of Abdul Mabood by killing him because he intended to take away the car which the complainant-Dr. Mohd. Alam had given to him. That argument has not impressed us. If the motive behind the alleged murder was to somehow take away the car, it was not necessary for the appellant to kill the deceased for the car could be taken away even without physically harming Abdul Mabood. It was not as though Abdul Mabood was driving the car and was in control thereof so that without removing him from the scene it was difficult for the appellant to succeed in his design. The prosecution case on the contrary is that the appellant had induced the complainant to part with the car and a sum of Rs.15,000/-. The appellant has been rightly convicted for that fraudulent act which conviction we have affirmed. Such being the position, the car was already in the possession and control of the appellant and all that he was required to do was to drop Abdul Mabood at any place en route to take away the car which he had ample opportunity to do during all the time the two were together while visiting different places. Suffice it to say that the motive for the alleged murder is as weak as it sounds illogical to us. It is fairly well-settled that while motive does not have a major role to play in cases based on eye-witness account of the incident, it assumes importance in cases that rest entirely on circumstantial evidence. See Sukhram v. State of Maharashtra JT 2007 (10) SC 177 : 2007 (7) SCC 502, Sunil Clifford Daniel (Dr.) v. State of Punjab JT 2012 (8) SC 639 : 2012 (8) Scale 670, Pannayar v. State of Tamil Nadu by Inspector of Police JT 2009 (10) SC 461 : 2009 (9) SCC 152. Absence of strong motive in the present case, therefore, is something that cannot be lightly brushed aside.

15. Coming then to the circumstances which according to the prosecution prove the charge of murder against the appellant, all that we have is that the appellant and Abdul Mabood, the deceased, had left in a car bearing registration No.URM 2348 from No.1, Circular Road, Police Station Dalanwala, Dehradun and that on 2nd July, 1986 the appellant had gone to the house of one Akash Garg P.W.7 accompanied by a boy whom the witness identified as the deceased-Abdul Mabood. The deposition of PW8 Badlu Ram, posted as a Peon at Naval Cinema, Panipat, is also to the same effect. According to the said witness the appellant had gone to the cinema accompanied by a boy between 20-22 years of age whom he recognised as the alleged deceased-Abdul Mabood on the basis of a photograph shown to him at the trial. The only other evidence which has any relevance to the circumstances that led to the disappearance of Abdul Mabood is the deposition of Tejveer Singh P.W.11, resident of Budha Kheri, Panipat, a businessman by occupation, who claims to have seen the appellant with Abdul Mabood when the two visited his farm. The boy was identified by T PW 11by reference to a photograph shown to him as the alleged deceased-Abdul Mabood. According to the witness the appellant had gone away with his companion boy and when he returned at night he was all alone. He also appeared troubled and his clothes were stained with dust and sand. The appellant asked for a towel to take a bath and explained that his car had broken down and while trying to put it in order his clothes got soiled. When the witness asked him about the boy accompanying the appellant the latter is alleged to have explained that he had stayed back with his friend. The deposition of PW10 Ajit Chopra who is also a resident of Panipat proved that the appellant had visited his residence in the first week of July, 1987 and had left his car at Naval Talkies which was then brought to his factory by their driver Jai Bhagwan examined as PW9. The trial Court on the basis of the above evidence held that the deceased-Abdul Mabood had been taken by the appellant to Panipat and disposed of by him on the basis that the two were last seen together. The trial Court had, however, found no motive or evidence for the alleged murder of the deceased- Abdul Mabood. The High Court took a contrary view and found that the charge of murder could not be held to be proved on the basis of the evidence on record. The High Court was, in our opinion, correct in arriving at that conclusion. It is true that the tell-tale circumstances proved on the basis of the evidence on record give rise to a suspicion against the appellant but suspicion howsoever strong is not enough to justify conviction of the appellant for murder. The trial Court has, in our opinion, proceeded more on the basis that the appellant may have murdered the deceased-Abdul Mabood. In doing so the trial Court over looked the fact that there is a long distance between may have and must have which distance must be traversed by the prosecution by producing cogent and reliable evidence. No such evidence is unfortunately forthcoming in the instant case. The legal position on the subject is well settled and does not require any reiteration. The decisions of this Court have on numerous occasions laid down the requirements that must be satisfied in cases resting on circumstantial evidence. The essence of the said requirement is that not only should the circumstances sought to be proved against the accused be established beyond a reasonable doubt but also that such circumstances form so complete a chain as leaves no option for the Court except to hold that the accused is guilty of the offences with which he is charged. The disappearance of deceased-Abdul Mabood in the present case is not explainable as sought to be argued before us by the prosecution only on the hypothesis that the appellant killed him near some canal in a manner that is not known or that the appellant disposed of his body in a fashion about which the prosecution has no evidence except a wild guess that the body may have been dumped into a canal from which it was never recovered.

16. In Mohibur Rahman and Anr. v. State of Assam JT 2002 (6) SC 235 : 2002 (6) SCC 715, this Court held that the circumstance of last seen does not by itself necessarily lead to the inference that it was the accused who committed the crime. It depends upon the facts of each case. There may however be cases where, on account of close proximity of place and time between the event of the accused having been last seen with the deceased and the factum of death, a rational mind may be persuaded to reach an irresistible conclusion that either the accused should explain how and in what circumstances the victim suffered the death or should own the liability for the homicide. Similarly in Arjun Marik and Ors. v. State of Bihar JT 1994 (2) SC 627 : 1994 (Suppl. 2) SCC 372, this Court reiterated that the solitary circumstance of the accused and victim being last seen will not complete the chain of circumstances for the Court to record a finding that it is consistent only with the hypothesis of the guilt of the accused. No conviction on that basis alone can, therefore, be founded. So also in Godabarish Mishra  v. Kuntala Mishra and Another JT 1996 (9) SC 708 : 1996 (11) SCC 264, this Court declared that the theory of last seen together is not of universal application and may not always be sufficient to sustain a conviction unless supported by other links in the chain of circumstances. In Bharat v. State of M.P. JT 2003 (1) SC 635 : 2003 (3) SCC 106; two circumstances on the basis whereof the appellant had been convicted were (i) the appellant having been last seen with the deceased and (ii) Recovery of ornaments made at his instance. This Court held:

........Mere non-explanation cannot lead to the proof of guilt against the appellant. The prosecution has to prove its case against the appellant beyond reasonable doubt. The chain of circumstances, in our opinion, is not complete so as to sustain the conviction of the appellant.....

17. We may also refer to State of Goa v. Sanjay Thakran and Anr. JT 2007 (5) SC 146 : 2007 (3) SCC 755 where this Court held that in the absence of any other corroborative piece of evidence to complete the chain of circumstances it is not possible to fasten the guilt on the accused on the solitary circumstance of the two being seen together. Reference may also be made to Bodh Raj alias Bodha and Ors. v. State of Jammu and Kashmir 2002 (8) SCC 45 where this Court held:

The last-seen theory comes into play where the time-gap between the point of time when the accused and the deceased were seen last alive and when the deceased is found dead is so small that possibility of any person other than the accused being the author of the crime becomes impossible. It would be difficult in some cases to positively establish that the deceased was last seen with the accused when there is a long gap and possibility of other persons coming in between exists. In the absence of any other positive evidence to conclude that the accused and the deceased were last seen together, it would be hazardous to come to a conclusion of guilt in those cases....

18. Finally in Jaswant Gir v. State of Punjab 2005 (12) SCC 438, this Court held that it is not possible to convict Appellant solely on basis of last seen evidence in the absence of any other links in the chain of circumstantial evidence, the Court gave benefit of doubt to accused persons.

19. Abdul Mabood-deceased was a young, physically stout boy aged 20-22 years. In the absence of any suggestion as to how and where he was done to death it is difficult to infer anything incriminating against the appellant except a strong suspicion when he returned at night to the farm of Tajveer Singh with soiled clothes. The explanation given by the appellant for his clothes getting soiled can also not said to be so absurd that one could straightway reject and count the same as an incriminating circumstance so conclusive in nature that the Court could presume that they were explainable only on the hypothesis that the appellant had committed the crime alleged against him.

20. Suffice it to say that even if we take the most charitable liberal view in favour of the prosecution, all that we get is a suspicion against the appellant and no more. The High Court was in that view justified in setting aside the order passed by the trial Court and acquitting the appellant of the offence of murder under Section 302 IPC. The order passed by the High Court deserves to be affirmed giving to the appellant the benefit of doubt. We accordingly dismiss the appeal filed by the appellant and discharge the notice of show-cause issued to him.

**********', 2] , 
[ 'HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAW
Indian Penal Code, 1860
Sections  302, 307, 450 - Conviction for murder of  real  brother  and his family members in brutal manner without any provocation  when  they were sleeping - Death Sentence - Held such brutal  and  merciless murders of absolutely innocent persons when there was  no  occasion to come in conflict and in a cool and  calculative  manner shocks conscience of socieÂty - Court must award deterrent  punishment  conforming to gravity of offence - Crime  falls  in  the category of rarest of rare cases for which extreme  penalty  of death is fully justified - No interference.

Held

After  giving  our anxious consideration to  the  facts  and circumstances  of  the case, it appears to us that  for  deciding just  and appropriate sentence to be awarded for an offence,  the aggravating  and mitigating factors and circumstances in which  a crime  has  been  committed are to be delicately  balanced  in  a dispassionate  manner.  Such act of balancing is indeed a  difficult  task.  It has been very aptly indicated in  Dennis  Lounde Mcgautha  v. State of California (402) U.S. 183 L. Ed.  II  711) that  no  formula of a full proof nature is possible  that  would provide  a reasonable criterion in determining a just and  appropriate  punishment in the infinite variety of circumstances  that may affect the gravity of the crime of murder.  In the absence of any full proof formula which may provide any basis for reasonable criteria to correctly assess various circumstances germane to the consideration  of gravity of crime of murder,  the  discretionary judgment in the facts of each case, is the only way in which such judgment may be equitably distinguished.  

In Shanker  v.  State of Tamil Nadu (1994 (4) SCC 478), this Court  has indicated that the choice as to which one of  the  two punishments  provided for murder is a proper one in a given  case will  depend upon the particular circumstances of that  case  and the Court has to exercise its discretion  judicially and on well-recognised  principles  after  balancing all  the  mitigating  or aggravating circumstances of the case. 

In  Jashubha  Bharat Singh and others  v. State  of  Gujarat (1994  (4) SCC 353), it has been held by this Court that  in  the matter  of death sentence, the Courts are required to answer  new challenges  and would the sentencing system to meet  these  challenges.  The object should be to protect the society and to deter the  criminal in achieving the avowed object of law  by  imposing appropriate  sentence.  It  is expected that  the  courts  would operate  the sentencing system as to impose such  sentence  which reflects the conscience of the Society and the sentencing process has to be stern where it should be.  

In  Dhananjoy Chatterjee  v. State of West Bengal (1994  (2) SCC 220), this Court has observed that shockingly large number of criminals  go  unpunished  thereby  increasing,  encouraging  the criminals and in the ultimate making, justice suffer by weakening the systems credibility.  The imposition of appropriate  punishment  is the manner in which the Court responds to the  societys cry  for  justice  against the criminal.  Justice  demands  that courts  should impose punishment befitting the crime so that  the courts  reflect public abhorrence of the crime.  The  Court  must not  only  keep in view the right of the criminal  but  also  the rights  of the victim of the crime and the society at last  while considering the imposition of appropriate punishment.  

Similar view has also been expressed in Ravji @ Ram  Chandra  v. State of Rajasthan (JT 1995 (8) SC 520).  It has been held  in the said case that it is the nature and gravity of the crime  but not  the criminal, which are germane for consideration of  appropriate punishment in a criminal trial.  The Court will be failing in its duty if appropriate punishment is not awarded for a  crime which  has been committed not only against the individual  victim but  also  against the society to which the criminal  and  victim belong.  The  punishment to be awarded for a crime must  not  be irrelevant  but it should conform to and be consistent  with  the atrocity and brutality with which the crime has been perpetrated, the  enormity  of the crime warranting public abhorrence  and  it should  respond  to the societys cry for  justice  against  the criminal.  If for extremely heinous crime of murder  perpetrated in  a very brutal manner without any provocation, most  deterrent punishment  is not given, the case of deterrent  punishment  will lose its relevance.  

In the instant case, there is absence of any  provocation.  There is  no  material on record from which it can be  reasonably  held that  the accused had any occasion to reasonably  feel  aggrieved for  any unjust and improper conduct on the part of the  deceased brother.  It  has transpired from evidence  adduced  that  joint lands  had  been partitioned long back amongst the  brothers  and each  of the brothers including the deceased and the accused  had been possessing his respective allotted lands. From the  evidence it  transpires that all the three brothers had been  residing  in separate portions within their residential compound or Ahata. A  few  days  before  the  incident,  there was a quarrel  between the  accused and the deceased when the accused intended to put  a barbed fencing on a portion of their residential complex but  the deceased objected to such course of action.  Such incident cannot be reasonably held to be a cause for being temperamentally  upset and for entertaining so much wrath and spirit of vengeance as may impel  a man of normal composure and frame of mind to run  amock and  perpetrate ghastly murders of such magnitude.  There  is  no evidence to indicate that in view of such quarrel happening a few days  prior  to  the incident there had been  any  aftermath  and further  dispute  and  resentment between the  deceased  and  the accused either immediately before or even proximately before  the incident  of  murders and attempts to commit murders.  From  the evidence  adduced, it is clearly revealed that the accused, in  a cool and calculated manner intended to wipe out the entire family of his brother.  In that end in view, he selected the most opportune  moment,  namely, dead of night when his brother  and  other members  of his family would remain asleep so that they would  be absolutely  helpless and not capable to give any defence to  save themselves.  In order to ensure death, the accused chose to  cut vital  part  of  the body, namely, the neck by  a  sharp  cutting weapon  (kassi)  when his victims were  asleep.  He,  therefore, succeeded  in  murdering his brother Raji Ram and his  two  minor sons by cutting their necks without any resistance from them.  He did not even spare the poor old aunt and brutally murdered her by cutting  her neck when she was asleep. In order to wipe  out  the whole  family  of  his brother, the accused  also  attempted  to murder  the brothers wife and the brothers daughter  when  they were also asleep. It has been indicated by the learned Additional Sessions  Judge that the accused was in full senses and had  committed  the murders of four close relations one after  the  other and  also  attempted to commit murder of his brothers  wife  and daughter  in a cool and calculated manner.  He did not even  feel remorsed  and  being  quite alive to the enormity  of  the  crime committed by him he escaped from the place of occurrence.  

The  murders had been committed very brutally and mercilessly  of absolutely  innocent persons, namely, the Bua and two minor  sons of  his brother with whom there was no occasion to come  in  conflict and to entertain any grudge or ill feeling.  Even if it  is assumed  that there was still some property dispute  between  the brothers despite sorting out of such dispute at the  intervention of  the Sarpanch, for such common place property dispute  between brothers particularly when the accused was not dispossessed  from the possession and enjoyment of his demarcated landed property by the  deceased  brother,  it cannot be reasonably  held  that  the accused had a genuine cause to feel aggrieved for injustice meted out  to him in the hands of his deceased brother which may  impel him  to  cause the murder of his brother.  In  any  event,  there could not be any cause to take a decision to wipe out the  entire family  of the brother in a very cruel manner when  being  asleep they were absolutely helpless.  The members of the family of  his brother  were  absolutely  innocent and two  of  them  were  even minors.  Such murders and attempt to commit murders in a cool and calculated  manner without provocation cannot but shock the  conscience  of the society which must abhor such heinous crime  committed  on helpless innocent persons.  Punishment must  also  respond  to  the societys cry for justice  against  the  criminal.  While considering the punishment to be given to the accused,  the Court should be alive not only to the right of the criminal to be awarded  just and fair punishment by administering  justice  tempered  with  such mercy as the criminal may justly  deserve,  but also  to the rights of the victims of the crime to have  the  assailant  appropriately  punished  and  the  societys  reasonable expectation from the court for the appropriate deterrent  punishment conforming to the gravity of the offence and consistent with the  public  abhorrence for the heinous crime  committed  by  the accused.  In the facts and circumstances of the case, we are  of the  view, that the crime committed by the accused falls  in  the category  of  rarest of rare cases for which extreme  penalty  of death  is  fully  justified.  We, therefore, find  no  reason  to  interfere  with the sentence of death awarded against the appellant since confirmed by the High Court. Paras 18, 19, 20 , 21, 22, 23, 24

CASES REFERRED
1. Ravji @ Ram Chandra v. State of Rajasthan JT 1995 (8) SC 520 

2. Anshad and others v. State of Karnataka JT 1994 (3) SC 324 (Para 14) 

3. Shanker v. State of Tamil Nadu JT 1994 (3) SC 54 (Para 19) 

4. Jashubha Bharat Singh and others v. State of Gujarat JT 1994 (3) SC 250 (Para 20) 

5. Dhananjoy Chatterjee v. State of West Bengal JT 1994 (1) SC 33 (Para 21) 

6. Shashi Nayar v. Union of India and others 1992 SCC (Crl.) 24 (Para 12) 

7. Bachan Singh v. State 1980 (2) SCC 684 (Para 12) 

8. Shiv Mohan Singh v. State AIR 1977 (SC) 949 (Para 12) 

9. Jagmohan Singh v. State of U.P. AIR 1973 (SC) 947 (Para 12) 

10. Dennis Lounde Mcgautha v. State of California (402) U.S. 183 L. Ed. II 711 (Para 18)

G.N. RAY, J.

1.  Leave granted.

2.  The  appellant  Surja Ram was convicted  by  the  learned  Additional  Sessions Judge, Hanumangarh in Sessions Trial No.  28 of  1991 for the offence under Section 302 IPC for murdering  his real  brother Raji Ram,  Raji Rams two sons  Naresh  and  Ramesh  and  Niko  Bai their Bua, and  for an offence under  Section  307  IPC  for attempting  to  murder Sudesh, the daughter of Raji  Ram and  Phoola  Devi  the  wife of Raji Ram and also  for  offence under  Section 450 IPC for  committing  house  trespass in  order to  commit  offence punishable with imprisonment  for life.  The learned Additional Sessions Judge awarded death sentence  against the  said accused Surja Ram  for  the  offence  of  murder.  He  was sentenced  to  suffer  imprisonment  for  life  and  a  fine  of  Rs.2,000/-, in default of payment of fine, further  rigorous imprisonment  for  three  months  for  the  offence under Section 307 IPC and he was also sentenced to suffer rigorous imprisonment  for  ten years  and  fine  of  Rs.1,000/-, in default of  payment of  fine, to suffer further rigorous imprisonment for  one  month for the offence under Section 450 IPC. 

3.  Against  such  convictions  and  sentences,  the  accused Surja Ram preferred D.B. Criminal Appeal No. 265 and 266 of  1995 before  the Rajasthan High Court (Jodhpur Bench).  The  said  appeals  were heard along with D.B. Criminal Murder Reference  No.1 of  1995 by the Rajasthan High Court and by the  impugned  common judgment  dated January 18, 1996, the High Court  dismissed  both the  appeals preferred  by  the  accused  Surja  Ram  and  confirmed  the death sentence passed against him.  

4.  Surja  Ram filed S.L.P. (Crl.) No. 744 of  1996  through  a learned counsel against his convictions and sentences before this Court. He also sent another special  leave petition from Jail  to the Registry of this Court which has been numbered as D.No.  1007 of 1996.  His special leave petition was dismissed by this  Court after hearing the learned counsel so far as the order of  convictions  passed against the said accused is concerned  but  notice  was issued to the State of Rajasthan limited only on the question of sentences to be passed against the accused for his convictions for  the offences aforesaid. 

5.  Mr.  Rajib Dutt, the learned counsel appearing for  the  accused appellant Raji Ram  has submitted that it is not a fit case calling  for awarding extreme penalty of death  sentence  because sufficient  grounds  warranting such extreme penalty  by  holding it as one of the rarest of rare cases are not present.  Mr.  Dutt has submitted that certain facts, relevant for the  consideration of  appropriate  punishment  to be awarded  against  the  accused appellant, should be noted.

6.  The accused appellant and his two brothers Dalip Ram and the deceased  Raji  Ram had been living  in one compound  (Ahata)  in their respective residential unit.  The accused appellant used to reside  in  the middle portion of the said compound and  the  deceased Raji Ram and Dalip Ram used to reside respectively on  the northern and southern side of the said compound.  The parents  of the accused and his brothers were residing in Punjab.  There  had been  partition of joint property amongst the brothers.  On  such partition the accused and Dalip Ram each got 13 killa of land and the deceased Raji Ram got 14 killa. 

7.  There was some land  dispute amongst the brothers about 6 to 7  months prior  to the said incident of murder but such  dispute is stated to have been sorted out at the intervention of Sarpanch Chandra Pal.

8.  About  5  or 6 days prior to the incident, the  accused  expressed the desire to erect wire fencing in the compound but  the deceased Raji Ram protested against such proposal of the accused.  

9.  The  prosecution case as proved by the evidences adduced  in the  trial,  is that on August 7, 1990 at about  9.00  P.M.,  the members  of  the family of the deceased Raji  Ram  retired  after taking  their  dinner.  The informant  Dalip Ram,  who  is  the  other  brother of the deceased and  the wife of  Dalip  Ram  were sleeping  in their courtyard.  Raji Ram and his two  sons  Naresh and  Ramesh  were sleeping in the outer room of  his  residential unit.  Raji Rams wife Phoola Devi, her daughter Sudesh and  Raji Rams fathers sister Niko  Bai  were  sleeping  in  their courtyard.  In the courtyard of Surja Ram the wife  of  the  accused Imarti was also sleeping.  After taking meal, the appellant  went out  of  the house.  At about 12.30 A.M.,  Dalip  Ram  heard  the cries of Sudesh.  When he came out, he saw in the light that  the accused  Surja Ram was standing  with  a  kassi  in his hand  and was  assaulting  Sudesh.  Dalip Ram and the wife of  the  accused Imarti  challenged the accused and the accused had run away.  It  has  been proved that Sudesh had suffered severe injuries on  her neck and she fell down in the courtyard and Niko and Phoola  were also  found  lying seriously injured.  Niko was,  however,  found dead and Phoola was gasping for life.  When Dalip Ram went inside the room, he found that Raji Ram and his son Naresh  were  lying  dead  and the other son Ramesh though alive, was  critically  injured.  The  said  Ramesh, however, died shortly thereafter  and Sudesh and Phoola  were  taken  in  a  jeep and admitted  in  the  hospital  at  Sangaria.  On being  treated  in  the  hospital  both  of them survived.  

10.  In  awarding  the  sentence  of  death against  the  accused-appellant, the learned Additional Sessions Judge noted that :

a)  The  accused had committed extremely barbaric  and  heinous crime  of  causing murder of four persons and also  attempted  to murder the other two who, though seriously injured, providentially survived.  

(b)  The accused committed murder of his own real  brother,  two minor  sons of his said brother and also his Bua.  Although  the accused  also attempted to kill the daughter  and  the  wife  of his brother, they, being seriously injured, luckily survived.  

(c)  The  accused committed the murder of  the  said persons  and also  attempted  to murder the other two close  relations  while  all  the  said victims were defenseless  as they were asleep then and  therefore, had no opportunity to save themselves  or  resist the attack.  

(d)  The  accused  attempted  to  kill  Phoola his brothers wife by  cutting her neck and being critically injured,  she  remained unconscious  for about 15 days and  hovered  between  life  and  death  but  luckily  survived.  Attempt was also made  to  kill  the  daughter of his brother by cutting her neck with  kassi  but she also luckily survived.  

(e)  The  intention  of  the accused was only to murder all  the said persons because he inflicted injuries on the neck of all the said persons with a sharp cutting weapon (kassi).  

(f)  The accused ensured that no male member in the family of his brother  Raji Ram was alive.  As a matter of fact,  he  attempted  to  wipe  out  the whole family of  Raji  Ram but the widow  and the  daughter  of  Raji Ram survived even  though  they  suffered serious  injuries on their necks by the kassi blows inflicted  by the accused.  

(g)  There  was  no  instigation  or provocation  for causing the said  murders  of four  very close relations  and  attempting  to cause murders of the other two persons.  

(h)  For some land dispute which was settled six  months  before and the dispute and altercation over a small incident of  putting the  barbed  wire in the compound of  the  residential  complex which  had also taken place 2 to 3 days before the incident,  the accused  in  a cool and calculated manner attacked all  the  said persons  when they were sleeping in their house and were  utterly helpless in resisting attacks made on them.  

(i)  The  previous and the subsequent conduct  of  the  accused clearly revealed that he was mentally alert for which he selected  the  opportune  moment  to commit the said  murders  when  the victims  were asleep and after committing the crime escaped  from the scene of crime.  

(j)  There was complete absence of any feeling of remorse of  the accused.  

11.  The  learned Additional Sessions Judge after indicating  the aforesaid  aggravating  factors in the commission of  the  crime came  to  the finding that there was absence  of  any  mitigating  factor  in  favour  of the accused and the  heinous  act  of  murder  of four persons including an old aunt and two minor  sons of  his real brother  and attempting also to kill  his  brothers wife  and her daughter in a most cool  and calculated  manner  by ensuring  that  none  of the victim could  offer  any  resistance because they were asleep at the time  of  being attacked, constituted the offence committed by the accused as one  of  the rarest of rare cases for which the extreme penalty of death was warranted.  

12.  The  learned Judge held that the death sentence per se  was not unconstitutional as  has been held by this Court in  Jagmohan Singh  v. State of U.P. (AIR) 1973 SC 947), Shiv Mohan  Singh  v.  State  (AIR 1977 SC 949), Bachan Singh  v.  State (1980 (2)  SCC 684), Shashi Nayar v. Union of India and others (1992 SCC  (Crl.) 24).  

13.  Mr.Dutta, the  learned  counsel  for  the  accused-appellant  has  submitted  that  though the appellant has committed  a  very serious crime by killing his own brother, his two minor sons  and his Bua when they were asleep and he also attempted  to kill  his brothers wife and brothers daughter, the appellant  did not act  with cruelty or  in  a  barbaric  manner and also did not torture anyone  of them before  committing  the murder or  attempting  to cause  murder.  The learned counsel has submitted that though  it is  extremely unfortunate that the appellant committed  the  said ghastly  murders of his  brother and his two minor sons  and  the old aunt and also attempted to kill brothers wife and  daughter, it  should  be kept in mind that the appellant  felt  deeply  aggrieved against the conduct of his brother Raji Ram on account of dispute  with him in land matter and the recent quarrel which  he had  with  the deceased for  not  allowing the appellant  to  put fencing  as desired by him, in the compound of their  residential complex.  The  appellant unfortunately fell victim to  his  deep seeded ill feeling towards his brother and members of the  family of  the said brother and lost his normal frame of mind for  which he  could not restrain himself and being mad with rage and  being actuated by an urge for vengeance, murdered the said persons  and attempted to murder the other two.  

14.  The learned counsel for the appellant has further  submitted that life once put to  end can  never  be  brought  back.  It is, therefore,  essentially  necessary to give  a  very  careful  and serious  consideration  as to whether such  extreme  penalty  of  death  which  will  put  an  end of the life  of  the  accused, should be awarded in a case or not.  The learned counsel has also submitted  that the number of persons murdered though a  relevant consideration  in  weighing  the gravity of a crime is  not  the only  consideration  in  selecting  the  extreme  penalty  for  murder and unless the crime perpetrated by an accused can  safely be  placed in the category of rarest of rare cases,  the  extreme penalty  of  death  should not be awarded.  In  support  of  such contention,  the  learned  counsel  for  the  appellant  has  referred  to a decision of this Court in Anshad  and  others  v.  State  of Karnataka (1994 (4) SCC 381).

15.  The learned counsel for the appellants was further submitted that  the facts and circumstances of the case do not reveal  the  that  the accused was a maniac or otherwise blood-thirsty with  a high  degree  of propensity to commit murder of innocent persons. On  the  contrary, the accused is a poor agriculturist  who  was  not booked for any crime. Unfortunately, for the said land  dispute  and  the  quarrel with the  deceased  in  connection  with  putting  of a barbed fence in  the domestic house, the  appellant suddenly  became very much engaged and lost  the  normal  frame  of mind and control over his passions. In such uncontrolled frame of mind, be decided to murder  his brother and his family members so  as to out an end of any dispute with them for ever. Such  act though very heinous and extremely lamentable, cannot be  categorised as a rarest of rare cases. The learned counsel has submitted that  the  accused attacked each of the victim with a sharp  cutting instrument kassi and inflicted  injuries  on  the neck  of each  of the  victim so that the death could be  hastened.  There was  no tendency on his part to subject any of the victim to  any cruel treatment or torture before killing them. In the  aforesaid circumstances, the learned Additional Sessions Judge and the High Court  should  not  appellant. The appellant should  be  given  a chance to reform himself in jail and recent for his crime  during long span of imprisonment for  life and thereafter to be a useful member  in  the society, he has, therefore, submitted  that  the death  penalty  should be set  by commuting the sentence  to  the sentence of imprisonment for life.

16.  The  learned  counsel for the State,  however,  opposed  the submissions  of the learned counsel for the appellant that  crime committed  by the accused did not constitute a rarest  cases  for which  the  extreme penalty of death is warranted.  It  has  been submitted  by  the  learned counsel for the State  that  all  the brothers  had  specific share of the land on partition  of  joint property  and they have been enjoying their respective  share  of land. There is nothing on record to indicate that peaceful enjoyment of the land allotted to the share of the accused was  sought to  be interfered with by the deceased who was none else but  his real brother. On the contrary, it has been proved that there  was a  dispute between the brothers in respect of only one  killa  of partitioned land. Such dispute was also sorted out at the  intervention  of  the  Surpanch of the village  several  months  back. Hence, there was no just cause for nursing any aggrieved  feeling and sense of injustice meted out to him in the hands of the  said brother.  There was a minor dispute between the deceased and  the accused  5  to 6 days before the date of the  incident  when  the accused wanted to but a barbed fencing on portion of their  residential complex and the deceased protested against such intention of  the accused. In a domestic life. Such petty discord and  dissension  often happen. For such a petty discord, there cannot  be any  occasion for any man of normal composure to lose control  of his senses and to become so enraged as to commit murder of brother  and  his  two minor sons and an old aunt and  to  attempt  to murder  the brothers wife and daughter unless he is a person  of cruel  nature and absolutely mean minded. Even if it  is  assumed that  because of such dispute, the appellant had  felt  aggrieved and became enraged, the murders had not been committed immediately  after the occurrence when the accused might have lost  normal frame of mind. The incident of dispute in connection with putting of  fencing had taken place several days before the date of  commission of murders. It is quite evident that the accused did  not commit  said crime under a grave and sudden provocation and in  a fit  of emotional set back but being determined to wipe  out  the entire  family  of his brother, he selected  the  most  opportune moment  to commit the said ghastly murders at dead of night  when the  brother and the members of his family were fast  asleep  and were completely helpless to put up any defence.

17.  The learned counsel for the State has also submitted that if the  accused had occasion to feel aggrieved against  his  brother either  on  account of the land dispute, though in fact  no  such dispute  was then existing, or on account of resistance given  by the brother in not allowing the accused to put a fencing in their residential  complex,  there was no occasion for the  accused  to kill  two innocent minor sons of his brother who were  asleep  at the time of murder.  Similarly, there was no occasion to kill the old  aunt and also to attempt to kill the brothers wife and  the brothers  daughter  when they were also  asleep  and  completely defenceless.  The brothers wife and daughter were given  serious injuries  by the sharp cutting instrument on their necks  and  it was due to extreme good luck that they ultimately survived  after prolonged medical treatment in the hospital.  The learned counsel for the State has submitted that such act of murders and  attempt to  murder  had  not been committed on account of  any  grave  or sudden provocation but the same had been committed in a cool  and calculated  manner with clear and definite intention to wipe  out each  member of the family of his real brother.  Such act on  the part  of the accused has been rightly categorised by the  learned Additional  Sessions Judge and also by the High Court as  one  of the  rarest  of rare cases of murder.  The  learned  counsel  has submitted  that the said act of extreme brutality  in  committing the  murder  of helpless innocent persons is bound to  shock  the conscience of the society and the cry of the society for  justice and just punishment to the criminal cannot be met by showing  any sympathy to the accused, when there is no real mitigating  factor in  favour of the accused.  He has, therefore, submitted that  no interference  is called for against the capital sentence  awarded against the accused.  

18.  After  giving  our anxious consideration to  the  facts  and circumstances  of  the case, it appears to us that  for  deciding just  and appropriate sentence to be awarded for an offence,  the aggravating  and mitigating factors and circumstances in which  a crime  has  been  committed are to be delicately  balanced  in  a dispassionate  manner.  Such act of balancing is indeed a  difficult  task.  It has been very aptly indicated in  Dennis  Lounde Mcgautha  v. State of California (402) U.S. 183 L. Ed.  II  711) that  no  formula of a full proof nature is possible  that  would provide  a reasonable criterion in determining a just and  appropriate  punishment in the infinite variety of circumstances  that may affect the gravity of the crime of murder.  In the absence of any full proof formula which may provide any basis for reasonable criteria to correctly assess various circumstances germane to the consideration  of gravity of crime of murder,  the  discretionary judgment in the facts of each case, is the only way in which such judgment may be equitably distinguished.  

19.  In Shanker  v.  State of Tamil Nadu (1994 (4) SCC 478), this Court  has indicated that the choice as to which one of  the  two punishments  provided for murder is a proper one in a given  case will  depend upon the particular circumstances of that  case  and the Court has to exercise its discretion  judicially and on well-recognised  principles  after  balancing all  the  mitigating  or aggravating circumstances of the case. 

20.  In  Jashubha  Bharat Singh and others  v. State  of  Gujarat (1994  (4) SCC 353), it has been held by this Court that  in  the matter  of death sentence, the Courts are required to answer  new challenges  and would the sentencing system to meet  these  challenges.  The object should be to protect the society and to deter the  criminal in achieving the avowed object of law  by  imposing appropriate  sentence.  It  is expected that  the  courts  would operate  the sentencing system as to impose such  sentence  which reflects the conscience of the Society and the sentencing process has to be stern where it should be.  

21.  In  Dhananjoy Chatterjee  v. State of West Bengal (1994  (2) SCC 220), this Court has observed that shockingly large number of criminals  go  unpunished  thereby  increasing,  encouraging  the criminals and in the ultimate making, justice suffer by weakening the systems credibility.  The imposition of appropriate  punishment  is the manner in which the Court responds to the  societys cry  for  justice  against the criminal.  Justice  demands  that courts  should impose punishment befitting the crime so that  the courts  reflect public abhorrence of the crime.  The  Court  must not  only  keep in view the right of the criminal  but  also  the rights  of the victim of the crime and the society at last  while considering the imposition of appropriate punishment.  

22.  Similar view has also been expressed in Ravji @ Ram  Chandra  v. State of Rajasthan (JT 1995 (8) SC 520).  It has been held  in the said case that it is the nature and gravity of the crime  but not  the criminal, which are germane for consideration of  appropriate punishment in a criminal trial.  The Court will be failing in its duty if appropriate punishment is not awarded for a  crime which  has been committed not only against the individual  victim but  also  against the society to which the criminal  and  victim belong.  The  punishment to be awarded for a crime must  not  be irrelevant  but it should conform to and be consistent  with  the atrocity and brutality with which the crime has been perpetrated, the  enormity  of the crime warranting public abhorrence  and  it should  respond  to the societys cry for  justice  against  the criminal.  If for extremely heinous crime of murder  perpetrated in  a very brutal manner without any provocation, most  deterrent punishment  is not given, the case of deterrent  punishment  will lose its relevance.  

23.  In  the instant case, there is absence of any  provocation.  There  is no material on record from which it can  be  reasonably held  that  the accused had any occasion to reasonably  feel  aggrieved  for any unjust and improper conduct on the part  of  the deceased  brother.  It has transpired from evidence adduced  that joint  lands had been partitioned long back amongst the  brothers and  each of the brothers including the deceased and the  accused had been possessing his respective allotted lands.  There was  an occasion  for difference and dispute between the accused and  the deceased  in respect  of only one killa of land but such  dispute had  been sorted out at the intervention of the Sarpanch  of  the village  about  eight to ten months before the  incident.  After that  no fresh incident had taken place in recent past for  which there was any occasion for the accused to feel aggrieved concerning  his landed property.  From the evidence it  transpires  that all  the  three brothers had been residing in  separate  portions within  their  residential  compound or  Ahata.  A  few  days  before  the  incident,  there was a quarrel between the  accused and the deceased when the accused intended to put a barbed  fencing  on a portion of their residential complex but  the  deceased objected  to  such  course of action.  Such  incident  cannot  be reasonably held to be a cause for being temperamentally upset and for  entertaining  so much wrath and spirit of vengeance  as  may impel  a man of normal composure and frame of mind to run  amock and  perpetrate ghastly murders of such magnitude.  There  is  no evidence to indicate that in view of such quarrel happening a few days  prior  to  the incident there had been  any  aftermath  and further  dispute  and  resentment between the  deceased  and  the accused either immediately before or even proximately before  the incident  of  murders and attempts to commit murders.  From  the evidence  adduced, it is clearly revealed that the accused, in  a cool and calculated manner intended to wipe out the entire family of his brother.  In that end in view, he selected the most opportune  moment,  namely, dead of night when his brother  and  other members  of his family would remain asleep so that they would  be absolutely  helpless and not capable to give any defence to  save themselves.  In order to ensure death, the accused chose to  cut vital  part  of  the body, namely, the neck by  a  sharp  cutting weapon  (kassi)  when his victims were  asleep.  He,  therefore, succeeded  in  murdering his brother Raji Ram and his  two  minor sons by cutting their necks without any resistance from them.  He did not even spare the poor old aunt and brutally murdered her by cutting  her neck when she was asleep. In order to wipe  out  the whole  family  of  his brother, the accused  also  attempted  to murder  the brothers wife and the brothers daughter  when  they were also asleep.  Both the brothers wife and the daughter  were critically  injured by the accused by cutting their  necks.  The wife  of the brother, as a matter of fact, hovered  between  life and  death and remained unconscious for a number of days but  out of  sheer  luck she could survive.  The daughter of  the  brother also luckily survived after being seriously injured when her neck was  also  cut by giving a number of injuries in and  around  the neck.  It has been indicated by the learned Additional  Sessions Judge  that the accused was in full senses and had committed  the murders  of  four close relations one after the  other  and  also attempted to commit murder of his brothers wife and daughter  in a cool and calculated manner.  He did not even feel remorsed  and being  quite alive to the enormity of the crime committed by  him he escaped from the place of occurrence.  

24.  It  is  true that the appellant was not  convicted  for  any other offence on any previous occasion.  Such fact can hardly  be considered as a mitigating factor in favour of the appellant that will  outweigh all the aggravating factors and  circumstances  in which  the crime of the murders had been committed.  The  murders had  been committed very brutally and mercilessly  of  absolutely innocent  persons,  namely,  the Bua and two minor  sons  of  his brother  with whom there was no occasion to come in conflict  and to  entertain any grudge or ill feeling.  Even if it  is  assumed that  there was still some property dispute between the  brothers despite  sorting out of such dispute at the intervention  of  the Sarpanch, for such common place property dispute between brothers particularly  when  the  accused was not  dispossessed  from  the possession and enjoyment of his demarcated landed property by the deceased brother,  it cannot be reasonably held that the  accused had a genuine cause to feel aggrieved for injustice meted out  to him  in the hands of his deceased brother which may impel him  to cause  the murder of his brother.  In any event, there could  not be any cause to take a decision to wipe out the entire family  of the  brother in a very cruel manner when being asleep  they  were absolutely  helpless.  The members of the family of  his  brother were absolutely innocent and two of them were even minors.  Such murders  and attempt to commit murders in a cool  and  calculated manner without provocation cannot but shock the conscience of the society which must abhor such heinous crime committed on helpless innocent persons.  Punishment must also respond to the  societys cry  for  justice against the criminal.  While  considering  the punishment to be given to the accused, the Court should be  alive not only to the right of the criminal to be awarded just and fair punishment  by administering justice tempered with such mercy  as the  criminal may justly deserve, but also to the rights  of  the victims of the crime to have the assailant appropriately punished and  the societys reasonable expectation from the court for  the appropriate deterrent punishment conforming to the gravity of the offence and consistent with the public abhorrence for the heinous crime  committed by the accused.  In the facts and  circumstances of the case, we are of the view, that the crime committed by  the accused  falls in the category of rarest of rare cases for  which extreme penalty of death is fully justified.  We, therefore, find no  reason  to  interfere  with the sentence  of  death  awarded against  the appellant since confirmed by the High  Court.  This appeal and the jail petition being numbered as D.No.1007/96 stand dismissed.

**********', 2] , 
[ 'HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAW
Indian Penal Code, 1860:
Section 300, Exception 4 read with sections 302 and 304 Part II - Murder or culpable homicide not amounting to murder - Conditions to attract exception 4 - Sudden altercation - Deceased fell down after the Appellant caused the first injury - Appellant thereafter inflicted two injuries of fatal nature on the fallen man - Held that the offence is of murder and the appellant was rightly convicted under section 302.
HELD
... If the accused knows that the act he causes is so imminently dangerous that it must, in all probability, cause death or such bodily injury as is likely to cause death, and commits such act without any excuse for incurring the risk of causing death or such injury it would attract clause fourthly. It would be murder unless it is brought in any one of the exceptions. In a given case even if the case does not fall in any of the exceptions, still if the ingredients of clauses 1 to 4 of Section 300 are not satisfied, then it would be culpable homicide not amounting to murder punishable under s.304 either clause 1 or clause 2. It is, therefore, the duty of the prosecution to prove the offence of murder. 
. ... To bring the case within exception 4 ... all the conditions enumerated therein must be satisfied. The act must be committed without premeditation in a sudden fight in the heat of passion; (2) upon a sudden quarrel; (3) without the offenders having taken undue advantage; (4) and the accused had not acted in a cruel or unusual manner. Therefore, there must be a mutual combat on exchanging blows on each other. And however slight the first blow, or provocation, every fresh blow becomes a fresh provocation. The blood already heated or warms up at every subsequent stroke. The voice of reason is heard on neither side in the heat of passion. Therefore, it is difficult to apportion between them respective degrees of blame with reference to the state of things at the commencement of the fray but it must occur as a consequence of a sudden fight i.e. mutual combat and not one side track. It matters not what the cause of the quarrel is, whether real or imaginary, or who draws or strikes first. The strike of the blow must be without any intention to kill or seriously injure the other. If two men start fighting and one of them is unarmed while the other uses a deadly weapon, the one who uses such weapon must be held to have taken an undue advantage denying him the entitlement to exception 4. True the number of wounds is not the criterion, but the position of the accused and the deceased with regard to their arms used, the manner of combat must be kept in mind when applying exception 4. When the deceased was not armed but the accused was and caused injuries to the deceased with fatal results, the exception 4 engrafted to Section 300 is excepted and the offences committed would be one of murder. 
The occasion for sudden quarrel must not only be sudden but the party assaulted must be on an equal footing in point of defence, at least at the onset. This is specially so where the attack is made with dangerous weapons. Where the deceased was unarmed and did not cause any injury to the accused even following a sudden quarrel if the accused has inflicted fatal blows on the deceased, exception 4 is not attracted and commission must be one of murder punishable under s.302. Equally for attracting exception 4 it is necessary that blows should be exchanged even if they do not all find their target. Even if the fight is unpremeditated and sudden, yet if the instrument or manner of retaliation be greatly disproportionate to the offence given, and cruel and dangerous in its nature, the accused cannot be protected under exception 4. .....
If the weapon used or the manner of attack by the assailant is out of all proportion to the offence given, that circumstance must be taken into consideration to decide whether undue advantage has been taken. Where a person, during the course of a sudden fight, without premeditation and probably in the heat of passion, took undue advantage and acted in a cruel manner in using a deadly weapon there was no ground to hold that his act did not amount to murder. Therefore, if the appellant used deadly weapons against the unarmed man and struck him a blow on the head it must be held that using the blows with the knowledge that they would likely to cause death and he had taken undue advantage. He did not stop with the first blow, he inflicted two more blows on the fallen man and the third one proved to be fatal. He acted crudely with no justification. By his conduct the appellant denied himself of the benefit of exception 4 to S.300 I.P.C. 
.................................
It is not necessary that death must be inevitable or in all circumstances the injury inflicted must cause death. If the probability of death is very great the requirement of clause third is satisfied. If there is probability in a less degree of death ensuing from the act committed the finding should be of culpable homicide not amounting to murder. The emphasis is sufficiency of injury to cause death. A judge must always try to find whether the bodily injury inflicted was that which the accused intended to inflict. The intention must be gathered from a careful examination of all the facts and circumstances in a given case. The citus at which the injury was inflicted, nature of the injury, weapon used, force with which it was used are all relevant facts. We find from the facts that the appellant inflicted fatal blow, i.e. 3rd injury severing the neck after the deceased had fallen on the ground due to impact of the first injury on parietal region. The third injury is proved to be sufficient in the ordinary course of nature to cause death. Even otherwise death is inevitable. When the appellant inflicted two injuries on a fallen man, it must be held that he intended to inflict those two injuries, though the first injury may be assumed to have been inflicted during the course of altercation. Thus we hold that the offence is one of murder and the appellant was rightly convicted and sentenced to imprisonment for life under s.302 I.P.C. (Paras 7, 8, 10 and 12)

CASES REFERRED
1. Pandurang Narayan Jawalekar v. State of Maharashtra, 1979 (1) SCC 132. (Para 9)
2. Rajwant Singh v. State of Kerala, AIR 1966 SC 1874. (Para 11)
3. Vira Singh v. State of Punjab, AIR 1958 SC 465. (Para 11)

J U D G M E N T
1. Special leave granted. 
2. The appellant was convicted under s.302 I.P.C. and sentenced to undergo imprisonment for life for causing the death of Jeet Singh on May 22, 1983 at about 11.00 a.m. in the field of the deceased. The Rajasthan High Court confirmed the conviction in Criminal Appeal No.105 of 1984. The case of the prosecution in nutshell was that the deceased and the appellant are neighbouring owners of lands. There was an altercation between them due to the appellant throwing soil into the lands of the deceased from Dali (strip of land dividing the two fields of the deceased and the appellant). Thereon the deceased went to the appellant to persuade him not to throw the soil into their field and to have the matter settled amicably through negotiations and if need be by measuring the lands, yet the appellant was annoyed with the conduct of the deceased and his sons PW-1 and PW-2 and son-in-law PW-3. At the instigation of his son by name Pappu (who was a juvenile offender and was dealt with separately), the appellant inflicted with Kassi (spade, sharp edged cutting instrument) on the head of the deceased and with its impact the deceased fell down. Thereafter the appellant inflicted two more injuries . When PW-1 to 3 raised alarm, the accused ran away. PWs-1 to 3 went near Jeet Singh and found him dead with bleeding injuries on head, neck and back. PW-1 went and lodge at the police station the report Ex.P-1 narrating the entire prosecution case. At the trial PWs-1 to 3 were examined as direct witnesses whose evidence was believed by both the courts below as natural witnesses and the appellant was convicted for the offence of murder. We found no infirmity in the assessment of the evidence, though the counsel for the appellant attempted to argue the case in that behalf. However, notice was issued to the State on the nature of the offence and the State has appeared. 
3. We have heard the counsel on both sides. During post-mortem the doctor found the following three injuries on the dead body: 
1. Incised wound 11 cm x 2-1/2 cm x 5 cm on the right pariete occipital area. Bone fractured Dura matter was seen from the wound. 
2. Incised wound 15 cm x 6 cm x 5 cm on the right scapular area bone fractured. 
3. Incised wound 13 cm x 10 cm x 12 cm on the right side of neck. All vessels of the right side neck were cut cervical vertebrae 4 and 5 along with the spinal cord was cut through and Larynx and right side of mandible cut. 
4. The witnesses have stated that when the appellant caused the first injury on the head, the deceased fell down and thereafter the appellant inflicted the other two injuries while the deceased was lying on the ground. The incised injury on the parieto occipital region was the first injury. The doctor found that by the third injury on the right side of the neck, the vessels on the right side of the neck, were completely cut, cervical vertebra along with spinal cord were cut through larynx and also right side of mandible. According to him, the third injury was sufficient to cause death in the ordinary course of nature. 
5. The contention of the learned counsel is that the appellant committed the offence on the spur of moment when quarrel ensued between the appellant and the deceased, when the appellant was prevented to spread the soil in his field. So in heat of passion and on the spur of moment without premeditation the appellant inflicted injuries on the deceased. He had no intention to cause particular injuries, though later on proved to be fatal, Since he had no intention to cause such injury as is likely to cause the death and there was no pre-meditation, nor intention to kill, the case would fall under Exception (4) to s.300 I.P.C. Even otherwise no offence of murder has been made out. Therefore, it is only culpable homicide not amounting to murder punishable under s.304 Part II I.P.C. Having given our anxious consideration and the facts and circumstances do indicate that there are no merits in either contentions. Even if we assume that the appellant committed the offence during the course of a verbal quarrel between the appellant and the deceased one cannot escape from the conclusion that the offence is one of murder. 
6. Section 299 I.P.C. defines that whoever causes death by doing an act with the intention of causing death, or with the intention of causing such bodily injury as is likely to cause death, or with the knowledge that he is likely by such act to cause death, commits the offence of culpable homicide. Under s.300 except in the cases hereinafter excepted, culpable homicide is murder.........., thirdly if it is done with the intention of causing bodily injury to any person and the bodily injury intended to be inflicted is sufficient in the ordinary course of nature to cause death. Exception 4 thereof provides that culpable homicide is not murder if it is committed without premeditation in a sudden fight in the heat of passion upon a sudden quarrel and without the offenders having taken undue advantage or acted in a cruel or unusual manner. Under s.302 whoever commits murder shall be punished with death, or imprisonment for life, and shall also be liable to fine. Whoever commits culpable homicide not amounting to murder, shall be punished with imprisonment for life, or imprisonment of either description for a term which may extend to ten years, or with fine, or with both. Under second part of s.304 I.P.C. if the act is done with the knowledge that it is likely to cause death, but without any intention to cause death, or to cause such bodily injury as is likely to cause death. 
7. It is, therefore, clear that culpable homicide is murder when the accused causes death by doing an act with the intention of causing death, or causing such bodily injury as is likely to cause death, or with the knowledge that he is likely by such act to cause death. If the accused intentionally causes bodily injury which is found to be sufficient in the ordinary course of nature to cause death attract clause thirdly of s.300 I.P.C. If the accused knows that the act he causes is so imminently dangerous that it must, in all probability, cause death or such bodily injury as is likely to cause death, and commits such act without any excuse for incurring the risk of causing death or such injury it would attract clause fourthly. It would be murder unless it is brought in any one of the exceptions. In a given case even if the case does not fall in any of the exceptions, still if the ingredients of clauses 1 to 4 of Section 300 are not satisfied, then it would be culpable homicide not amounting to murder punishable under s.304 either clause 1 or clause 2. It is, therefore, the duty of the prosecution to prove the offence of murder. 
8. The counsel attempted to bring the case within exception 4. For its application all the conditions enumerated therein must be satisfied. The act must be committed without premeditation in a sudden fight in the heat of passion; (2) upon a sudden quarrel; (3) without the offenders having taken undue advantage; (4) and the accused had not acted in a cruel or unusual manner. Therefore, there must be a mutual combat on exchanging blows on each other. And however slight the first blow, or provocation, every fresh blow becomes a fresh provocation. The blood already heated or warms up at every subsequent stroke. The voice of reason is heard on neither side in the heat of passion. Therefore, it is difficult to apportion between them respective degrees of blame with reference to the state of things at the commencement of the fray but it must occur as a consequence of a sudden fight i.e. mutual combat and not one side track. It matters not what the cause of the quarrel is, whether real or imaginary, or who draws or strikes first. The strike of the blow must be without any intention to kill or seriously injure the other. If two men start fighting and one of them is unarmed while the other uses a deadly weapon, the one who uses such weapon must be held to have taken an undue advantage denying him the entitlement to exception 4. True the number of wounds is not the criterion, but the position of the accused and the deceased with regard to their arms used, the manner of combat must be kept in mind when applying exception 4. When the deceased was not armed but the accused was and caused injuries to the deceased with fatal results, the exception 4 engrafted to Section 300 is excepted and the offences committed would be one of murder. 
9. The occasion for sudden quarrel must not only be sudden but the party assaulted must be on an equal footing in point of defence, at least at the onset. This is specially so where the attack is made with dangerous weapons. Where the deceased was unarmed and did not cause any injury to the accused even following a sudden quarrel if the accused has inflicted fatal blows on the deceased, exception 4 is not attracted and commission must be one of murder punishable under s.302. Equally for attracting exception 4 it is necessary that blows should be exchanged even if they do not all find their target. Even if the fight is unpremeditated and sudden, yet if the instrument or manner of retaliation be greatly disproportionate to the offence given, and cruel and dangerous in its nature, the accused cannot be protected under exception 4. In Pandurang Narayan Jawalekar v. State of Maharashtra ((1979)1 SCC 132), the facts proved were that the appellant gave a blow on the head of the deceased old man who was advising him not to quarrel. The injury caused to the brain from one end to the other resulted in fracture as could appear from the evidence of the doctor. It would show that the accused must have struck the blow on the head of the deceased with an iron bar with very great force. Accordingly it was held that exception 4 does not apply though there was sudden quarrel and that the fight was not premeditated to cause death. It must be shown that the injury caused is not cruel one. The conviction for offence under s.302 by the High Court reversing the acquittal by trial court was upheld. 
10. If the weapon used or the manner of attack by the assailant is out of all proportion to the offence given, that circumstance must be taken into consideration to decide whether undue advantage has been taken. Where a person, during the course of a sudden fight, without premeditation and probably in the heat of passion, took undue advantage and acted in a cruel manner in using a deadly weapon there was no ground to hold that his act did not amount to murder. Therefore, if the appellant used deadly weapons against the unarmed man and struck him a blow on the head it must be held that using the blows with the knowledge that they would likely to cause death and he had taken undue advantage. He did not stop with the first blow, he inflicted two more blows on the fallen man and the third one proved to be fatal. He acted crudely with no justification. By his conduct the appellant denied himself of the benefit of exception 4 to S.300 I.P.C. 
11. In Virsa Singh v. State of Punjab (AIR 1958 SC 465), a leading forerunner on the point, this Court held that the prosecution must prove that bodily injury is present. The nature of the injury must be proved. Thirdly, it must be proved that there was an intention to inflict that particular bodily injury, that is to say, that it was not accidental or unintentional, or that some other kind of injury was intended. Once these three elements are proved to be present, the Court must further proceed with the enquiry and found that the prosecution has proved that the injury described is sufficient to cause death in the ordinary course of nature. This part of the enquiry is purely objective and inferential and has nothing to do with the intention of the offender. Once these four elements are established by the prosecution the offence of murder falls under clause thirdly of Section 300. It matters not that there was no intention to cause death or that there was no intention even to cause death in the ordinary course of nature. Once it is proved that the intention to cause the bodily injury actually found to be present, the rest of the enquiry is purely objective to be deduced by inference. But where no evidence or explanation is given about why the accused thrust a spear into the abdomen of the deceased with such force that it penetrated the bowels and three coils of the intestines came out of the wound and that digested food oozed out from cuts in three places, it would be perverse to conclude that he did not intend to inflict the injury that he did. The question whether there is intention or not is one of fact and not one of law. Whether the wound is serious or otherwise, and if serious, how serious, is a totally separate and distinct question and has nothing to do with the question whether the accused intended to inflict the injury in question. It was held in that case that the offence was one of murder falling under clause thirdly of Section 302. In Rajwant Singh v. State of Kerala (AIR 1966 SC 1874), the bodily injury consisted of tying up the hands and the feet of the victim, closing the mouth with adhesive plaster and plugging the nostrils with cotton soaked in chloroform. All these acts were deliberate acts which had been pre-planned and, therefore, this Court held that the acts satisfied the objective tests of clause 3 of s.300 and were held to be sufficient in the ordinary course to cause death. Accordingly it was one punishable under s.302. 
12. It is not necessary that death must be inevitable or in all circumstances the injury inflicted must cause death. If the probability of death is very great the requirement of clause third is satisfied. If there is probability in a less degree of death ensuing from the act committed the finding should be of culpable homicide not amounting to murder. The emphasis is sufficiency of injury to cause death. A judge must always try to find whether the bodily injury inflicted was that which the accused intended to inflict. The intention must be gathered from a careful examination of all the facts and circumstances in a given case. The citus at which the injury was inflicted, nature of the injury, weapon used, force with which it was used are all relevant facts. We find from the facts that the appellant inflicted fatal blow, i.e. 3rd injury severing the neck after the deceased had fallen on the ground due to impact of the first injury on parietal region. The third injury is proved to be sufficient in the ordinary course of nature to cause death. Even otherwise death is inevitable. When the appellant inflicted two injuries on a fallen man, it must be held that he intended to inflict those two injuries, though the first injury may be assumed to have been inflicted during the course of altercation. Thus we hold that the offence is one of murder and the appellant was rightly convicted and sentenced to imprisonment for life under s.302 I.P.C. 
13. The appeal is, therefore, dismissed.
**********', 2] , 
[ 'HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAWS
Penal Code, 1860
Sections 299, 300, 302, 304, 304A - Culpable homicide amounting to murder and homicide not amounting to murder. Distinction inter-se and with rash or negligent act, stated. Cases of Alister Anthony Pereira JT 2012 (1) SC 100 and Sanjeev Nanda JT 2012 (7) SC 251 referred.
HELD
There are two kinds of culpable homicide: (i) Culpable homicide amounting to murder (Section 300/302 of the IPC), and (ii) Culpable homicide not amounting to murder (Section 304 of the IPC). A rash or negligent act that results in the death of a person may not amount to culpable homicide in view of Section 304-A of the IPC. In other words, such a rash or negligent act would be not-culpable homicide. But, there could be a rash or negligent act that results in the death of a person and yet amount to a culpable homicide falling within the scope and ambit of Section 299 of the IPC. This distinction was clearly brought out (following Naresh Giri v. State of M.P. JT 2007 (12) SC 433 which contains a very useful discussion) in State of Punjab v. Balwinder Singh JT 2012 (1) SC 43. (Para 14)

In Alister Anthony Pereira v. State of Maharashtra JT 2012 (1) SC 100 and State v. Sanjeev Nanda. JT 2012 (7) SC 251. This Court found that a case of culpable homicide not amounting to murder (within Section 299 read with Section 304 of the IPC) was made out and a conviction handed down accordingly. (Para 14.1.)

Sections 302, 304, 325, 326, 304A, 72 - Punishment under - Murder - Culpable homicide not amounting to murder - Evidence. Cases, where accused were convicted only for causing grievous hurt ignoring or overlooking provisions of Sections 299 and 304, discussed and analysed.
HELD
In State of Punjab v. Surjan Singh 1976 (1) SCC 588, this Court held that the High Court did not commit any error of law in coming to the conclusion that it did, namely, that a common intention of causing the death of Labh Singh was absent. The applicability of Section 304 of the IPC was not adverted to by this Court despite a homicide. (Paras 17 & 18)

Sardul Singh v. State of Haryana JT 2002 (7) SC 496 was a case in which the Trial Court convicted Sardul Singh for the murder of Naresh Kumar while Jagtar Singh was acquitted. The High Court confirmed the conviction of Sardul Singh and also set aside the acquittal of Jagtar Singh. Both were held liable for an offence punishable under Section 302 of the IPC. (Para 19)

In appeal, this Court held that the assailants had a common intention to inflict injuries on the deceased and not cause his death, that being the unintended ultimate result. Based on this conclusion, it was held that Sardul Singh and Jagtar Singh could be convicted only for an offence punishable under Section 325/34 of the IPC 10*and must be acquitted of an offence punishable under Section 302 of the IPC. (Para 20)

In Rattan Singh v. State of Punjab this Court held that Ram Singh, Dan Singh and Rattan Singh had only caused grievous injuries to Gaje Singh and therefore their conviction under Section 302 of the IPC could not be sustained. Therefore, they were convicted for an offence punishable under Sections 325 and 326 of the IPC. This Court did not examine the applicability of Section 299 read with Section 304 of the IPC despite a homicide. (Paras 21 & 22)

In Ninaji Raoji Boudha v. State of Maharashtra it was held that accused had given several blows to Bhonaji and one of them was a forceful blow on the head which caused a depressed fracture and fissures all over resulting in his death. This Court noted that from the evidence on record: (a) it could not be established who had given that forceful blow; (b) the evidence established that Ninaji and Raoji did not have a common intention of causing the death of Bhonaji but there was a common intention of causing him grievous injury. Consequently, due to the lack of any conclusive or specific evidence of who was responsible for the homicide and the absence of a common intention, Ninaji and Raoji were acquitted of the offence of murder but were convicted of an offence punishable under Section 325/34 of the IPC. (Paras 23 & 24)

In Ram Lal v. Delhi Administration it was held (by a three-Judge Bench) that the High Court had erroneously concluded that the deceased received only one injury on the head. In fact, he had suffered two injuries on the head. Additionally, it was found that the High Court also held that Ram Lal had given only one blow with a stick to Har Lal on the head. On these facts, it could not be said with any degree of certainty whether the blow delivered by Ram Lal proved fatal or the blow given by him did not prove fatal. In the absence of any clear identification of the blow given by Ram Lal, he was entitled to a benefit of doubt. However, since the common intention of the three assailants was to cause a grievous injury to Har Lal, therefore Ram Lal was liable for conviction under Section 325/34 of the IPC apparently applying the principle laid down in Section 72 of the IPC. (Paras 25 & 26)

Sections 302, 304, 325, 326, 304A, 72 - Punishment under - Murder - Culpable homicide not amounting to murder - Evidence. Cases, where homicide took place and at least one person was convicted for homicide, referred and analysed viz. Radhey Shyam JT 1998 (7) SC 197, Jarnail Singh, Sk. Karimullah JT 2009 (2) SC 263, but held that these decisions are not very relevant in present case. (Paras 28-35)

Sections 302, 304, 325, 326, 304A, 72 - Punishment under - Murder - Culpable homicide not amounting to murder - Evidence - Cases, where homicide took place, but conviction only for voluntarily causing grievous hurt, which could fall within Section 300, thirdly and requiring reconsideration, stated. Abdul Waheed Khan JT 2002 (6) SC 274, Rajwant Singh, Virsa Singh, Thangaiya, Raj Pal JT 2006 (11) SC 124, referred. (Paras 36-41)

Sections 302, 304, 325, 326, 304A, 72 - Punishment under - Murder - Culpable homicide not amounting to murder - Evidence - Homicidal death of a person - Finding the act to be that of causing voluntarily grievous hurt - While returning said finding, non-consideration of provisions of Sections 299 and 304 IPC - Jurisprudential point of view and sentencing point of view. Held that in such cases, where homicide has taken place but culprit is convicted and sentenced for voluntarily causing grievous hurt, consideration of provisions of Sections 299 and 304 IPC is important from jurisprudential as well as sentencing point of view because, a homicide either would fall under Section 300 or under Section 304. Offences affecting life are distinct from offences of causing hurt. Where hurt results in death, either intended or unintended, it would fall in offences affecting life. This distinction has been overlooked in cases where homicide took place, but conviction is for causing grievous hurt, though all such cases are decided on their own facts. Hence, a five step enquiry is must, but earlier decisions do not require any reconsideration.
HELD
When an act or omission of an accused causes the death of any person, he or she is either guilty of culpable homicide or guilty of not-culpable homicide. It is for the Court to determine on the evidence whether, if it is culpable homicide, it amounts to murder as explained in Section 300 of the IPC (along with all its clauses) or not as explained in Section 304 of the IPC. If culpable homicide cannot be proved, then it would fall in the category of not-culpable homicide. (Para 43)

Section 320 of the IPC eighthly relates to any hurt which endangers life, but does not extinguish it. In fact, as pointed out by learned amicus, the arrangement of sections in the IPC makes it clear that offences affecting life are quite distinct from offences of hurt. If hurt results in death, intended or unintended, the offence would fall in the category of an offence affecting life, else not. It is this distinction that has apparently been ignored or overlooked in the first category of cases, but as mentioned above, those cases were decided on their particular facts. (Para 44)

If an accused is guilty of murder, say under Section 300 (thirdly) he or she would be liable for a minimum of life imprisonment; if an accused is guilty of culpable homicide not amounting to murder under Section 304 he or she would be liable for a maximum of ten years imprisonment; if an accused is guilty of not-culpable homicide under Section 304-A of the IPC the punishment would not exceed two years imprisonment. On the other hand, if the court ignores or overlooks the question whether the homicide is culpable or not but merely treats the case as one of voluntarily causing grievous hurt punishable under Section 325 or Section 326 of the IPC for which the maximum punishment is seven years imprisonment or ten years/life imprisonment (as the case may be). (Para 45)

In our opinion, a five-step inquiry is necessary: (i) Is there a homicide? (ii) If yes, is it a culpable homicide or a not-culpable homicide? (iii) If it is a culpable homicide, is the offence one of culpable homicide amounting to murder (Section 300 of the IPC) or is it a culpable homicide not amounting to murder (Section 304 of the IPC)? (iv) If it is a not-culpable homicide then a case under Section 304-A of the IPC is made out. (v) If it is not possible to identify the person who has committed the homicide, the provisions of Section 72 of the IPC may be invoked. (Para 46)

None of the decisions require any reconsideration. The position in law is as we have culled out from the cases cited before us making it clear that in most cases the person who has committed homicide (culpable or not culpable) can be identified. But it is quite possible in some cases, such as in Ninaji Raoji Boudha and Ram Lal that conclusive or specific evidence is lacking to actually pin down the person who has committed homicide (culpable or not culpable). In such cases, the accused would have to be given the benefit of Section 72 of the IPC. (Para 47)

Sections 302, 304, 325, 326, 304A, 72 - Conviction/ Punishment under - Homicide of deceased - Assailants gave two lathi blows - Blows resulting in fracture of ribs and piercing of lungs - Injuries not accidental or unintentional - Assailants having common intention to cause grievous injuries - Nothing to show if they intended to cause some other injuries than those inflicted by them - Medical opinion showing injuries sufficient to cause death in normal course. Held that this homicide was culpable homicide (amounting to murder) and accused persons being guilty under Section 300, clause thirdly, were punishable under Section 302. Virsa Singh relied and followed. High Court judgement, convicting and sentencing accused under Section 325/34, set aside. (Paras 48, 49)

Ed.: The Bench in this case has adversely commented upon reporting of too many judgements, including record of proceedings, due to overweening judicial vanity and competing law reporting agencies while making reference to text of Indias Legal System by Mr. Fali S. Nariman.

CASES REFERRED
1.State v. Sanjeev Nanda JT 2012 (7) SC 251 (Para 14.1.)

2.Alister Anthony Pereira v. State of Maharashtra JT 2012 (1) SC 100 (Para 14.1.)

3.State of Punjab v. Balwinder Singh JT 2012 (1) SC 43 (Para 14)

4.Sk. Karimullah v. State of A.P. JT 2009 (2) SC 263 (Para 34)

5.Naresh Giri v. State of M.P. JT 2007 (12) SC 433 (Para 14)

6.Raj Pal v. State of Haryana JT 2006 (11) SC 124 (Para 41)

7.Thangaiya v. State of Tamil Nadu 2005 (9) SCC 650 (Para 41)

8.Sardul Singh v. State of Haryana JT 2002 (7) SC 496 (Para 19)

9.Abdul Waheed Khan v. State of A.P. JT 2002 (6) SC 274 (Para 36)

10.Radhey Shyam v. State of U.P. JT 1998 (7) SC 197 (Para 29)

11.Rattan Singh v. State of Punjab JT 1988 (1) SC 676 (Para 21)

12.Jarnail Singh v. State of Punjab 1982 (3) SCC 221 (Para 32)

13.Ninaji Raoji Boudha v. State of Maharashtra 1976 (2) SCC 117 (Para 23)

14.State of Punjab v. Surjan Singh 1976 (1) SCC 588 (Para 17)

15.Rajwant Singh v. State of Kerala 1966 (Suppl.) SCR 230 (Para 36)

16.Virsa Singh v. State of Punjab. AIR 1958 SC 465 (Para 36)

Foreign Case Referred
:

1.William Jack Pike v. The Indian Hotels Company Ltd. 2013 EWHC 4096 (QB) (Para 51)


MADAN B. LOKUR, J.

1. The question agitating us relates to the circumstances (if any) under which a conviction for murder under Section 300/302 of the Indian Penal Code, 1860 (IPC) could be altered into a conviction under Section 322/325 of the IPC (voluntarily causing grievous hurt) or under Section 326 of the IPC (voluntarily causing grievous hurt by dangerous weapons or means), ignoring or overlooking the intermediate possibility of a conviction under Section 304 of the IPC.

2. The question has arisen since in this appeal, despite a death having resulted in an incident involving the respondents, their conviction for murder by the High Court has been altered to a conviction for voluntarily causing grievous hurt, ignoring or overlooking a homicide.

The facts

3. On 14th December, 1996 the appellant (Richhpal Singh Meena) and a few others were sitting beside a well near the agricultural fields. Richhpals father Sunderlal Meena (deceased) had gone to inspect the fields. While he was there, Sunderlal met Kailash, Ghasi, Lala and their respective wives and their mother. Soon thereafter, there was a hot exchange of words between them regarding damage to the embankment in the agricultural fields.

4. Kailash, Ghasi and Lala told Sunderlal that they were looking for him and he had now walked into the trap. Saying this, Kailash caught hold of Sunderlal while Ghasi gave him a blow with a shovel and Lala gave him a blow with a lathi on his back. On receiving the blows Sunderlal fell down and on hearing noises, Richhpal and others ran towards the spot and found that Sunderlal was being beaten up by the ladies. With the assistance of those who were with him, Richhpal managed to take Sunderlal to a hospital in Alwar but he succumbed to the injuries.

5. A post-mortem examination was carried out by Dr. Amar Singh Rathore and he gave a report that 
the two injuries given to Sunderlal were sufficient to cause death in the normal course. The injuries were:

External injuries-

1. Contusion abrasion measuring 8 x 10 cm reddish, located on left side of the rear side of the back.

2. Contusion abrasion measuring 8 x 8 cm located on right side of chest.

Internal injuries-

Fracture on the 4th and 5th ribs located on right side of the chest. Right lung crushed measuring 4 x 3 x 1 cm. Blood clotting in lung. Fracture in 7th and 8th rib on left side. Lung crushed. Plurae and sic(?) of either side of the lungs torn.

5.1. Dr. Rathore deposed that shock, haemorrhage and lung injuries resulted in his death. The injuries were sufficient to cause death in the normal course.

6. On these broad facts, a charge sheet was filed against Ghasi and Lala for an offence punishable under Sections 302, 302/34 and 447 of the IPC.

7. On the evidence adduced before him, the Additional District and Sessions Judge-III, Alwar convicted Ghasi and Lala for an offence punishable under Section 302 of the IPC as well as for an offence punishable under Section 447 of the IPC. However, they were acquitted of the charge framed under Section 302/34 of the IPC.

8. Feeling aggrieved, the convicts preferred D.B. Criminal Appeal No. 403/1997 in the Jaipur Bench of the Rajasthan High Court. By a judgment and order dated 16 th April, 2003 the High Court concluded that Ghasi and Lala could be convicted only under Section 325/34 of the IPC and not under Section 302/34 of the IPC. The High Court also held that they could not be convicted under Section 447 read with Section 302 of the IPC. The sentence awarded to them was imprisonment for the period undergone, that is, about 18 months imprisonment.

9. It will be noticed that Ghasi and Lala were not convicted by the Trial Judge under Section 302/34 of the IPC but were convicted only under Section 302 and Section 447 of the IPC. Clearly, therefore, the High Court did not correctly record the final conclusion of the Trial Judge. However, this is a minor matter.

Our initial doubts

10. While hearing this appeal filed by the victims son, we were a little surprised that the fact of Sunderlals homicide was not taken into consideration by the High Court while convicting Ghasi and Lala and also that no attempt was made to ascertain from the evidence on record (if at all it was possible) to fix responsibility for his death either on Ghasi or on Lala or both. While we were ably assisted in the hearing by Ms. Sumita Hazarika, learned amicus curiae, we nevertheless felt that the issue required some greater experience. Accordingly Mr. Uday U. Lalit, Senior Advocate was requested to assist us in the matter, and he willingly agreed.

11. Mr. Lalit cited several decisions of this Court involving the death of a human being but in which the only punishment awarded to the accused was for voluntarily causing grievous hurt and not any punishment for homicide. Learned amicus expressed the view that the fact that a human being had died could not and should not have been ignored or overlooked in any of the cited decisions. Learned amicus was also of opinion that all these decisions were rendered by two Judge Benches of this Court and they needed reconsideration since they did not lay down the correct law.

12. We propose to deal with all the judgments cited by learned amicus as well as by learned counsel appearing for the convicts and then determine whether they need reconsideration. Homicide and the IPC

13. The IPC recognizes two kinds of homicide: (1) Culpable homicide, dealt with between Sections 299 and 304 of the IPC1* and (2) Not-culpable homicide, dealt with by Section 304-A of the IPC. 2* For the present discussion we are not concerned with Section 304-B of the IPC.

14. There are two kinds of culpable homicide: (i) Culpable homicide amounting to murder (Section 300/302 of the IPC), and (ii) Culpable homicide not amounting to murder (Section 304 of the IPC). A rash or negligent act that results in the death of a person may not amount to culpable homicide in view of Section 304-A of the IPC. In other words, such a rash or negligent act would be not-culpable homicide. But, there could be a rash or negligent act that results in the death of a person and yet amount to a culpable homicide falling within the scope and ambit of Section 299 of the IPC. This distinction was clearly brought out (following Naresh Giri v. State of M.P. JT 2007 (12) SC 433 : 2008 (1) SCC 791 which contains a very useful discussion) in State of Punjab v. Balwinder Singh JT 2012 (1) SC 43 : 2012 (2) SCC 182 in the following words:

Section 304-A was inserted in the Penal Code by Penal Code (Amendment) Act 27 of 1870 to cover those cases wherein a person causes the death of another by such acts as are rash or negligent but there is no intention to cause death and no knowledge that the act will cause death. The case should not be covered by Sections 299 and 300 only then it will come under this section. The section provides punishment of either description for a term which may extend to two years or fine or both in case of homicide by rash or negligent act. To bring a case of homicide under Section 304-A IPC, the following conditions must exist, namely,

(1) there must be death of the person in question;

(2) the accused must have caused such death; and

(3) that such act of the accused was rash or negligent and that it did not amount to culpable homicide.

14.1. The distinction brought out in both the judgments has been accepted and followed, amongst others, in Alister Anthony Pereira v. State of Maharashtra JT 2012 (1) SC 100 : 2012 (2) SCC 648 and State v. Sanjeev Nanda. JT 2012 (7) SC 251 : 2012 (8) SCC 450. In these two cases, this Court found that a case of culpable homicide not amounting to murder (within Section 299 read with Section 304 of the IPC) was made out and a conviction handed down accordingly.

15. Therefore, it is quite clear that when there is a death of a human being, it may either be culpable homicide (amounting to murder or not amounting to murder) or not-culpable homicide, but it is a homicide nevertheless. Keeping this distinction in mind, the decisions cited by learned amicus may be considered.

Relevant decisions

16. This category consists of five cases in which despite a homicide, this Court convicted the accused only for voluntarily causing grievous hurt, apparently ignoring or overlooking the provisions of Section 299 and Section 304 of the IPC.

17. In State of Punjab v. Surjan Singh 1976 (1) SCC 588 the Trial Court convicted Surjan Singh and Charan Singh for the murder of Labh Singh and thereby having committed an offence punishable under Section 302/34 of the IPC. On appeal, the High Court altered the conviction to an offence punishable under Section 326/34 of the IPC 3* even though one of the injuries was sufficient in the ordinary course of nature to cause death. This was on the ground that they had, on the spur of the moment, formed a common intention to cause only grievous injury to Labh Singh. In other words, it was held that a common intention to cause the death of Labh Singh was lacking.

18. In an appeal filed by the State, this Court held that the High Court did not commit any error of law in coming to the conclusion that it did, namely, that a common intention of causing the death of Labh Singh was absent. The applicability of Section 304 of the IPC was not adverted to by this Court despite a homicide. The quantum of sentence awarded is unfortunately not mentioned in the Report.

19. Sardul Singh v. State of Haryana JT 2002 (7) SC 496 : 2002 (8) SCC 372 was a case in which the Trial Court convicted Sardul Singh for the murder of Naresh Kumar while Jagtar Singh was acquitted. The High Court confirmed the conviction of Sardul Singh and also set aside the acquittal of Jagtar Singh. Both were held liable for an offence punishable under Section 302 of the IPC.

20. In appeal, this Court held that the assailants had a common intention to inflict injuries on the deceased and not cause his death, that being the unintended ultimate result. Based on this conclusion, it was held that Sardul Singh and Jagtar Singh could be convicted only for an offence punishable under Section 325/34 of the IPC 4* and must be acquitted of an offence punishable under Section 302 of the IPC. The sentence awarded was of two years imprisonment. Again, the applicability of Section 299 read with Section 304 of the IPC was not considered despite a homicide.

21. Rattan Singh v. State of Punjab JT 1988 (1) SC 676 : 1988 (Suppl.) SCC 456 is a Record of Proceedings, two steps lower in the ladder than a judgment and one step below an order, and yet it has been found worthy of being reported. In this case, Gaje Singh was attacked by number of persons and he ultimately succumbed to the injuries received. Of the assailants, some were convicted for an offence punishable, inter alia, under Section 302/149 of the IPC. In appeal, the High Court upheld the conviction of three assailants, that is, Ram Singh, Dan Singh and Rattan Singh and acquitted the others. These three assailants were not only convicted for an offence punishable under Section 302/149 of the IPC but also for an offence punishable under Section 325/149 of the IPC and under Section 324 of the IPC.

22. This Court held that Ram Singh, Dan Singh and Rattan Singh had only caused grievous injuries to Gaje Singh and therefore their conviction under Section 302 of the IPC could not be sustained. Therefore, they were convicted for an offence punishable under Sections 325 and 326 of the IPC, as the case may be, and sentenced to five years imprisonment. Again, this Court did not examine the applicability of Section 299 read with Section 304 of the IPC despite a homicide.

23. In Ninaji Raoji Boudha v. State of Maharashtra 1976 (2) SCC 117 two persons (Ninaji and Raoji) were convicted by the Trial Court for an offence punishable under Sections 325 and 147 of the IPC and sentenced to five years imprisonment. This was despite the fact that the injuries caused by them on Bhonaji had resulted in his death. In an appeal filed by the State, the High Court convicted them for offences punishable under Section 302/34 of the IPC for causing the death of Bhonaji.

24. Ninaji and Raoji appealed to this Court and it was held that they had given several blows to 
Bhonaji and one of them was a forceful blow on the head which caused a depressed fracture and 
fissures all over resulting in his death. This Court noted that from the evidence on record: (a) it could not be established who had given that forceful blow; (b) the evidence established that Ninaji and Raoji did not have a common intention of causing the death of Bhonaji but there was a common intention of causing him grievous injury. Consequently, due to the lack of any conclusive or specific evidence of who was responsible for the homicide and the absence of a common intention, Ninaji and Raoji were acquitted of the offence of murder but were convicted of an offence punishable under Section 325/34 of the IPC and sentenced to five years imprisonment. It appears to us that the principle applied by this Court, though not so stated, is to be found in Section 72 of the IPC which reads as follows:

72. Punishment of person guilty of one of several offences, the judgment stating that it is doubtful of which.--In all cases in which judgment is given that a person is guilty of one of several offences specified in the judgment, but that it is doubtful of which of these offences he is guilty, the offender shall be punished for the offence for which the lowest punishment is provided if the same punishment is not provided for all.

25. Similarly, the principle laid down in Section 72 of the IPC appears to have been invoked in Ram Lal v. Delhi Administration in which four persons (including Ram Lal) were accused of having murdered Har Lal. The Trial Court acquitted one of them but convicted the others, including Ram Lal for an offence punishable under Section 302/34 of the IPC. In appeal, the High Court upheld the conviction of Ram Lal for an offence punishable under Section 302 of the IPC, while the other two were convicted under Section 325/34 of the IPC.

26. In appeal before this Court, the question was whether Ram Lal could have been convicted for an offence punishable under Section 302 of the IPC. It was held (by a three-Judge Bench) that the High Court had erroneously concluded that the deceased received only one injury on the head. In fact, he had suffered two injuries on the head. Additionally, it was found that the High Court also held that Ram Lal had given only one blow with a stick to Har Lal on the head. On these facts, it could not be said with any degree of certainty whether the blow delivered by Ram Lal proved fatal or the blow given by him did not prove fatal. In the absence of any clear identification of the blow given by Ram Lal, he was entitled to a benefit of doubt. However, since the common intention of the three assailants was to cause a grievous injury to Har Lal, therefore Ram Lal was liable for conviction under Section 325/34 of the IPC apparently applying the principle laid down in Section 72 of the IPC. Accordingly, he was sentenced to five years imprisonment.

27. It will be seen that these decisions were decided on their own particular facts. This Court did not lay down any law that if there is only a common intention to cause a grievous injury without any intention to kill, an accused cannot be convicted of murder. This is quite obvious since it would result in an absurd situation in cases where a person smashes the head of another and pleads that he had no intention to kill the victim but only cause a grievous injury. The accused must be deemed to know the consequences of his act, unless it was accidental or unintentional.

Partially relevant decisions

28. The second category of decisions cited by learned amicus, though relevant, do not greatly 
advance our discourse any further since, in these cases a homicide had taken place and at least one 
of the accused was convicted for that homicide.

29. In Radhey Shyam v. State of U.P. JT 1998 (7) SC 197 : 1999 (1) SCC 168 three persons were convicted by the Trial Court for the murder of Ram Saran. On appeal, the High Court set aside their conviction for an offence punishable under Section 302 of the IPC but convicted them for an offence punishable under Part I of Section 304 of the IPC and sentenced them to imprisonment for seven years.

30. Of the three persons so convicted only Radhey Shyam approached this Court and his contention was that he had not inflicted any blow on the deceased. On a consideration of the evidence, this Court concluded that there was nothing to show that Radhey Shyam had given the fatal blow, or for that matter any blow, that was likely to cause the death of Ram Saran. Accordingly, his conviction under Part I of Section 304 of the IPC was altered to a conviction under Section 325 of the IPC and the sentence reduced to two years imprisonment.

31. This decision is not so relevant since two of the assailants were convicted for causing the death of a human being and were not let off only for an offence punishable for having caused grievous injuries.

32. Jarnail Singh v. State of Punjab 1982 (3) SCC 221 is a short order and by no stretch of imagination can it be considered to be a judgment and certainly not a reportable judgment - it is merely the disposal of a case. The order does not indicate the facts of the case and there is no discussion of the law. In any event, a reading of the order indicates that since there was no pre-concert between Jarnail Singh and Sarwan Singh to cause the death of the victim, their conviction under Section 302/34 of the IPC could not be upheld by this Court. The order does not indicate the nature of the injuries on the deceased or who inflicted them. All that can be deciphered from the order is that Jarnail Singh gave a simple injury to the deceased. Since that is so, he obviously could not have been punished for the offence of murder. However, it is not clear what injuries were given to the deceased by Sarwan Singh and whether he was convicted for the homicide or not.

33. We shall have occasion a little later to deal with the reporting of orders passed by this Court and the reporting of a Record of Proceedings.

34. In Sk. Karimullah v. State of A.P. JT 2009 (2) SC 263 : 2009 (11) SCC 371 accused no.1 (not identified in the judgment) and Karimullah were convicted by the Trial Court for an offence punishable under Section 302/34 of the IPC. Their conviction was upheld by the High Court.

35. Only Karimullah approached this Court and it was found, on facts, that no charge was framed against him under Section 34 of the IPC. Additionally, there was a discrepancy in the eye witness account with regard to his role in the attack on the deceased. One witness stated that he had assaulted the deceased with a stick while another stated that he had given him a fist blow. Under the circumstances, on the basis of the evidence on record, this Court held that Karimullah was liable to be punished for an offence punishable under Section 325 of the IPC and not under Section 302 of the IPC. In this case also, at least one of the assailants was convicted for a homicide.

Earlier decisions of this Court

36. Learned amicus submitted that the cases falling in the first category above, in which there is a homicide but a conviction only for voluntarily causing grievous hurt, may even fall within Section 300 (thirdly) of the IPC and, therefore, require reconsideration. To illustrate his point, learned amicus referred to three decisions, the first being Abdul Waheed Khan v. State of A.P. JT 2002 (6) SC 274 : 2002 (7) SCC 175 which decision in turn refers to Rajwant Singh v. State of Kerala 1966 Supp SCR 230 and Virsa Singh v. State of Punjab. AIR 1958 SC 465.

37. It must be made clear that learned amicus did not cite these decisions with a view to establish that the first category of decisions mentioned above were either incorrectly decided or that Section 300 (thirdly) of the IPC was attracted. That was mentioned by him only by the way. The principal reason for citing these decisions was to highlight the view taken by this Court that where violence is deliberately inflicted and it results in the death of a human being, culpable homicide is made out - the only question being whether it is murder or culpable homicide not amounting to murder.

38. In Rajwant Singh this Court held (and it is futile to try and paraphrase the view lucidly expressed):

In addition to the other evidence establishing the connection of Unni and Rajwant Singh with this crime there is a confession by Rajwant Singh before the Sub-Magistrate, Cochin in which he graphically describes the part played by him and Unni. Rajwant Singh also stated that they only wanted the Lt. Commander and the sentry to remain unconscious while they rifled the safe and took away the money. It is contended that we must accept the confession as a whole and must hold on its basis that the intention was not to kill, and that the offence of murder is therefore not established. As this is the most important point in the case we shall consider it first.

This point was argued by Mr. J.G. Sethi on behalf of Rajwant Singh and his arguments were adopted by Mr. Harbans Singh on behalf of Unni. Mr. Sethi argued that the offence was one of causing grievous hurt or at the worst of culpable homicide not amounting to murder and punishable under Section 304 (second part) of the Indian Penal Code. It is quite plain that the acts of the appellants resulted in the death of the victim and the offence cannot be placed lower than culpable homicide because the appellants must have known that what they were doing was likely to kill. The short question, therefore, is whether the offence was murder or culpable homicide. (emphasis given by us)

38.1. On facts, it was held that a case of murder falling within Section 300 (thirdly) of the IPC was made out.

39. Rajwant Singh followed Virsa Singh (a three-Judge Bench) which conclusively lays down the requirements of Section 300 (thirdly) of the IPC in the following manner (again it is difficult to paraphrase the clearly articulated conclusions):-

To put it shortly, the prosecution must prove the following facts before it can bring a case under Section 300 thirdly;

First, it must establish, quite objectively, that a bodily injury is present;

Secondly, the nature of the injury must be proved; These are purely objective investigations.

Thirdly, it must be proved that there was an intention to inflict that particular bodily injury, that is to 
say, that it was not accidental or unintentional, or that some other kind of injury was intended.

Once these three elements are proved to be present, the enquiry proceeds further and,

Fourthly, it must be proved that the injury of the type just described made up of the three elements set out above is sufficient to cause death in the ordinary course of nature. This part of the enquiry is purely objective and inferential and has nothing to do with the intention of the offender.

Once these four elements are established by the prosecution (and, of course, the burden is on the prosecution throughout) the offence is murder under Section 300 thirdly. It does not matter that there was no intention to cause death. It does not matter that there was no intention even to cause an injury of a kind that is sufficient to cause death in the ordinary course of nature (not that there is any real distinction between the two). It does not even matter that there is no knowledge that an act of that kind will be likely to cause death. Once the intention to cause the bodily injury actually found to be present is proved, the rest of the enquiry is purely objective and the only question is whether, as a matter of purely objective inference, the injury is sufficient in the ordinary course of nature to cause death. No one has a licence to run around inflicting injuries that are sufficient to cause death in the ordinary course of nature and claim that they are not guilty of murder. If they inflict injuries of that kind, they must face the consequences; and they can only escape if it can be shown, or reasonably deduced, that the injury was accidental or otherwise unintentional. (emphasis given by us)

40. In Abdul Waheed Khan the Trial Court convicted three accused under Part I of Section 304 of the IPC. The High Court, on an appeal by the State, convicted them for an offence punishable under Section 302 of the IPC. This Court discussed Section 300 (thirdly) of the IPC, the object of the accused being to rob the deceased, the grievous injuries voluntarily inflicted on the deceased, the nature of injuries and then upheld the view taken by the High Court. The case did not directly concern Section 325 or Section 326 of the IPC but was cited, firstly, to explain the analysis undertaken by this Court in its earlier decisions and secondly, to highlight that Section 299 of the IPC takes care of every situation of culpable homicide and thirdly and most importantly, to illustrate that voluntarily causing grievous hurt resulting in death cannot be simply relegated to an offence punishable under Section 325 or Section 326 of the IPC.

41. Reference was also made by learned amicus to Thangaiya v. State of Tamil Nadu 2005 (9) SCC 650 and Raj Pal v. State of Haryana JT 2006 (11) SC 124 : 2006 (9) SCC 678 which reiterate the view expressed in Abdul Waheed Khan.

The jurisprudence

42. A review of the decisions in the first category of cases, indicates that in spite of the death of a person, and a finding in some of them of an act of voluntarily causing grievous hurt, this Court has not considered the provisions of Section 299 read with Section 304 of the IPC. In our opinion, such a consideration is important not only from the jurisprudential point of view but also from the sentencing point of view.

43. From the jurisprudential point of view it is important because when an act or omission of an accused causes the death of any person, he or she is either guilty of culpable homicide or guilty of not-culpable homicide. It is for the Court to determine on the evidence whether, if it is culpable homicide, it amounts to murder as explained in Section 300 of the IPC (along with all its clauses) or not as explained in Section 304 of the IPC. If culpable homicide cannot be proved, then it would fall in the category of not-culpable homicide.

44. We agree with learned amicus that the sections in the IPC relating to hurt (from Section 319 onwards) do not postulate death as the end result. In this regard, our attention was drawn to Section 320 of the IPC which designates various kinds of hurt as grievous and particularly to eighthly which relates to any hurt which endangers life, but does not extinguish it. In fact, as pointed out by learned amicus, the arrangement of sections in the IPC makes it clear that offences affecting life are quite distinct from offences of hurt. If hurt results in death, intended or unintended, the offence would fall in the category of an offence affecting life, else not. It is this distinction that has apparently been ignored or overlooked in the first category of cases, but as mentioned above, those cases were decided on their particular facts.

Sentencing

45. The issue of sentencing is also of utmost importance in cases such as the ones that we have referred to. The reason is the quantum of punishment to be imposed in a given situation. If an accused is guilty of murder, say under Section 300 (thirdly) he or she would be liable for a minimum of life imprisonment; if an accused is guilty of culpable homicide not amounting to murder under Section 304 he or she would be liable for a maximum of ten years imprisonment; if an accused is guilty of not-culpable homicide under Section 304-A of the IPC the punishment would not exceed two years imprisonment. On the other hand, if the court ignores or overlooks the question whether the homicide is culpable or not but merely treats the case as one of voluntarily causing grievous hurt punishable under Section 325 or Section 326 of the IPC for which the maximum punishment is seven years imprisonment or ten years/life imprisonment (as the case may be), then there is a real danger in a given case of an accused either getting a lighter sentence than deserved or a heavier sentence (depending on the offence made out) than warranted by law. It is for this reason that not only a precise formulation of charges by the Trial Court (if necessary multiple charges) is essential but also a correct identification by the court of the offence committed.

Position in law

46. Having considered all the decisions cited before us (and perhaps there are many more on the subject but not cited), in our opinion, a five-step inquiry is necessary: (i) Is there a homicide? (ii) If yes, is it a culpable homicide or a not-culpable homicide? (iii) If it is a culpable homicide, is the offence one of culpable homicide amounting to murder (Section 300 of the IPC) or is it a culpable homicide not amounting to murder (Section 304 of the IPC)? (iv) If it is a not-culpable homicide then a case under Section 304-A of the IPC is made out. (v) If it is not possible to identify the person who has committed the homicide, the provisions of Section 72 of the IPC may be invoked. Since this five-pronged exercise has apparently been missed out in the first category of decisions, learned amicus was of the opinion that those decisions require reconsideration.

47. In our view none of the decisions require any reconsideration. The position in law is as we have culled out from the cases cited before us making it clear that in most cases the person who has committed homicide (culpable or not culpable) can be identified. But it is quite possible in some cases, such as in Ninaji Raoji Boudha and Ram Lal that conclusive or specific evidence is lacking to actually pin down the person who has committed homicide (culpable or not culpable). In such cases, the accused would have to be given the benefit of Section 72 of the IPC. Such cases arise if the investigation is defective or if the evidence is insufficient. But where it is possible to ascertain who is responsible for the homicide, the five-step inquiry can easily be carried out.

Conclusion on facts

48. Applying the five-step inquiry, it is clear that: (i) there was a homicide, namely the death of Sunderlal; (ii) the assailants gave two lathi blows to Sunderlal which resulted in the fracture of his ribs and piercing of his lungs. The injuries were not accidental or unintentional - the assailants had a common intention of grievously injuring Sunderlal and it is not as if they intended to cause some injury to him other that the ones inflicted. (iii) the opinion of Dr. Amar Singh Rathore confirmed that the injuries caused to Sunderlal were sufficient to cause death in the normal course. Consequently, the homicide was a culpable homicide. Applying the law laid down in Virsa Singh it is clear that Ghasi and Lala are guilty of the murder of Sunderlal, the offence falling under Section 300 (thirdly) of the IPC and punishable under Section 302 of the IPC.

49. Under the circumstances, we set aside the decision of the High Court and restore the decision of the Trial Court and convict Ghasi and Lala of the offence of murdering Sunderlal. The State will take necessary steps to apprehend the convicts so that they undergo life imprisonment as required by law.

Orders and Record of Proceedings

50. It may be mentioned, en passant, that the excessive reporting of judgments (including orders and Record of Proceedings) has been described by Mr. Fali S. Nariman, an eminent jurist, in Indias Legal System as judgments factory and case law diarrhoea. He says that there are just too many judgments reported which have to be cited, which have to be looked into, followed or distinguished, all of which take up a vast amount of judicial time. The blame for this lies partially on overweening judicial vanity, partially on the lawyers who perceive that everything that is said in each and every judgment or order of the highest court in any particular case has to be presented as binding law and partially on competing law reporting agencies who want their law reports to sell as widely as possible. One of his conclusions is that the Laws proverbial delays are not because there are too many laws but because there are just too many judgments and orders concerning them.

51. If all of us in the fraternity of law desire to bring about some judicial reforms to ensure 
expeditious delivery of justice, we need to put our heads together and follow some sage advice and 
take remedial action before justice delivery gets timed out. Delays in our justice delivery have already been adversely commented upon William Jack Pike v. The Indian Hotels Company Ltd. 2013 EWHC 4096 (QB) and it is now time for us to find viable and realistic solutions.

52. The appeal is allowed.

**********', 2] , 
[ 'CROSS CITATION
1973 SCC (1) 20
1973 SCR (2) 541

CRIMINAL APPELLATE JURISDICTION : Criminal Appeal No. 173 of 1971. Appeal, by special leave from the judgment and order dated February 26, 1971 of the Allahabad High Court at Allahabad in Criminal Appeal No. 1229 of 1970 and Reference No. 96 of 1970. R. K. Garg, A. K. Gupta, Indira Jai Singh, V. J. Francis and R. S. Sharma for the appellant.

O. P. Rana for the respondent.

A. V. Rangam and A. Subhashini for the State of Tamil Nadu.

R. N. Bagra and M. Veerappa for the State of Mysore., 543 F. S. Nariman, Additional Solicitor General of India, P. Parameshwara Rao and B. D. Sharma for the Attorney General. Bakshi Sita Ram and R. N. Sachthey for the Advocate General, Himachal Pradesh.

A. K. Gupta for intervener (Shyam Narain).

R. K. Jain and R. K. Garg for Interveners (Duraipandi Thevar and Krishna Thevar).

The Judgment of the Court was delivered by

PALEKAR, J. The appellant Jagmohan Singh has been convinced under section 302-IPC for the murder of one Chhotey Singh and sentencedto death by the learned Sessions Judge, Shahjahanpur. The conviction and the sentence are confirmed by the Allahabad High Court. on the appellant coming to this Court by special leave, special leave was granted limited to the question of sentence only.

The short facts of the case are that some six or seven years beforethe present offence, one Shivraj Singh, father of Jagbir Singh, a cousin of the appellant, was murdered. The deceased Chhotey Singh was charged for that murder but was eventually acquitted by the High Court. As a result of that murder, there was ill-feeling between Chhotey Singh, on the one hand, and the appellant and Jagbir Singh, on the other. Both of themwere minors at the time of the murder of Shivraj Singh.But by now they had grown up and it is plain from the evidence that Chhotey Singhs murder was the result of this ill-feeling. Chhotey Singh was murdered on September 10, 1969 at about 5.00 P.M. A day earlier, there was a quarrel between Jagmohan Singh and Jagbir Singh, on the one hand, and Chhotey Singh, onthe other, on the question of a right to irrigate their fields. However, the dispute was settled by persons who reached the spot at the time and nothing untoward happened. Next day, however, the appellant armed with a country made pistol and Jagbir Singh armed with a lathi concealed themselves in a bajra field and emerged from the same as Chhotey Singh passed by to go to his field for fetching fodder.The appellant asked Chhotey Singh to stop so that the matter between them could be settled once for all. Naturally Chhotey Singh tried to run away but he was chased by the appellant and shot in the back.Chhotey Singh fell down after running some distance and died. That is how the murder was committed. On the facts and circumstances of the case, the learned Sessions Judge held that the appellant deservedthe extreme penalty. TheHigh Court, while confirming the death sentence, observed 544 that there were no extenuating circumstances and the sentence of death awarded to the appellant was just and proper. The question is whether this Court should interfere with the sentence.

Under section 367(5) of the Criminal Procedure Code as it stood before its amendment by Act 26 of 1955 the normal rule was to sentence the accused to death on a conviction for murder and to impose the lesser sentence of imprisonment for life for reasons to be recorded in writing. That provision is now deleted and it is left to the judicial discretion of the court whether the death sentence or the lesser sentence shouldbe imposed. That discretionhas been exercised concurrently by the Trial Court and the High Court and the question is whether there are sufficient reasons forthis court to interfere with that discretion. As pointed out by this Court in Ram Narain and others v. The State of U.P.(1) this Court normally does not interfere with the discretion exercised by the High Court on the question of sentence unless the High Court has disregarded recognised principles in imposing the sentence and there hasbeen a failure of justice. It. cannot be said on the facts of this casethat there has been any breach of the principles governing the matter of sentence. The appellant had armed himself with a gun and was lying in wait for the victim to pass. There was no immediate cause. The murder was entirely motivated by ill-feelings nurturedfor years. The offence waspremeditated. On seeing the appellant, Chhotey Singh started running away, but he was chased and done to death. In these circumstances, it can hardly be said that the High Court did not exercise its discretion properly.We are, therefore, not inclined to interfere with the sentence imposed by the High Court.

Mr. Garg appearing on behalf of the appellant however, raisedthe question of constitutionalimpermissibility of the death sentence for murder, and we have to deal with the question at some length. In the first place he contended, the death sentence puts an end to all fundamental rights guaranteed under clauses (a) to (g) of sub-clause (1) of Article 19 and, therefore, the law with regard to capital sentence is unreasonable and not in the interest of the general public. Secondly,, he contended, the discretion invested in the Judges to impose capital punishment is not based on any standards or policy required by the Legislature for imposing capital punishmentin preference to imprisonment for, life. In his submission, this was a stark abdication of essentials legislative function,and, therefore, section 302-IPC is vitiated by the vice of excessive delegation of essential legislative function. Thirdly, he contended, theuncontrolled and unguided discretion inthe Judges to impose capital punishment or imprisonment for life is hit by Article14 of the Constitution. because two persons 545 found guilty of murder on similar facts are liable to be treated differently--one forfeiting his life and the other suffering merely a sentence of life imprisonment. Lastly it was contended that the provisions of the law do not provide a procedure for trial of factors and circumstances crucial for making the choice between the capitalpenalty and imprisonment for life. Thetrial under the Criminal Procedure Code is limited to the question of guilt. In the absence of any procedure established by law in the matter of sentence, theprotection given by Article21 of the Constitution was violated and hence for that reason also the sentence of death is unconstitutional.

The first submission is based on the provisions of Article 19 of the Constitution. That Article does not directly deal with the freedom to live. It deals with 7 freedomslike freedom of speech ,and expression, freedomto assemble peaceably and without arms etc., but not directly with the freedom to live. It is, however, contended that freedom to live is basic to all the several freedoms and since the enjoyment of those seven freedoms is impossible without conceding freedom to live, the latter cannot be denied by any land unless such law is reasonable and isrequired in general public interest. It was, therefore, contended that, unlessit was shown that the sentence of death for murder passedthe test of reasonableness and general public interest, it would not be a valid law.

We will assume for the purposes of the present argument that the right to live is basic to the freedoms mentioned in Article 19 and that no law can deprive the life of a citizen unlessit is reasonable and in the public interest. The question, therefore, for our consideration iswhether the law, namely, section 302-IPC which prescribes the sentence of death for murder passes the above test.

In this connection it would be proper to recall the observations of Patanjali Sastri, CJ in State of Madras v. V. G. Row(1) at page 607 : It is important in this context to bear in mind that the test of reasonableness, wherever prescribed, should be applied to each individual statute impugned, and no abstract standard. or- general pattern, of reasonableness can be laid down as applicable to all cases. The nature of the right alleged to have been infringed the underlying purpose of the restrictions imposed. the extent and urgency of the evil sought to be remedied thereby. the disproportion of the imposition, the prevailing conditions at the time. should all enter into the judicial verdict. In evaluating such elusive factors and forming their own conception of what is reasonable, in all the circumstances of a given case, it

(1) 1952 S.C.R. 597. 546 is inevitable that the social philosophy and the scale of valuesof the judges participating in the decision should play an important part, and the limit to theirinterference with legislative judgment in such cases can only be dictated by their sense of responsibility and self-restraint and the sobering reflection that the Constitution is meant notonly for people of their way of thinking but for all, andthat the majority of the elected representatives of the people have, in authorising the imposition of the restrictions, considered them to be reasonable. The responsibility of Judges in that reject is the greater, since the question as to whether capital sentence for murder is appropriate in modern times has raised serious controversy the world over, sometimes, with emotional overtones. It is, therefore, essential that we approach this constitutional question with objectivity and a proper measure of self restraint. The arguments advanced by Mr. Garg against death penalty per se were practically similar to those which were addressed recently to the Supreme Court of America in the case of Furmanv. State of Georgia (Nos. 69-5003, 619-5030 and 69-5031 decided on June 29, 1972) and obtained the assent of two Judges, Mr. Justice Brennan and Mr. Justice Marshall. In that casethe Judges were invited to reject capital punishment onthe ground that it violated the Eighth Amendment which forbade cruel and unusual punishments. Brennan, J. accepted the validity of the challenge in these words :

If a punishment is unusually severe, if there

is a strong probability that it is inflicted

arbitrarily, if it is substantially rejected

by contemporaryjustice and if there is no

reason to believe that it serves any judicial

purpose more effectively than some less severe

punishment, then the due infliction ofthat

punishment violates the command of the clause

that the State may not inflictinhuman and

uncivilized punishments upon those convicted

of crimes.

Marshall, J. observed as follows

There is but one conclusion that can be drawn

from all of this-i.e., the death penalty is an

excessive and unnecessary, punishment which

violates theEighth Amendment. The

statistical evidence is not convincing beyond

all doubt, but, it is persuasive. It is not

improper at this point to take judicial notice

of the fact that for more than 200 years men

have labored to demonstrate that capital

punishment serves no purpose thatlife

imprisonment could not serve equally as well.

And they have done so with great success.

Little if

547

any evidence had been adduced to prove the

contrary. The point has now been reached at

which deference to the legislatures is

tantamount to abdication of our judicial roles

as factfinders, judges, and ultimate arbiters

of the constitution. We know that atsome

point the presumption of constitutionality

accordedlegislative acts gives way to a

realistic assessment of thoseacts.This

point comes when there is sufficient evidence

available so that Judges can determine not

whether the legislature actedwisely, but

whether it had any rational basis whatsoever

for acting. We have this evidence before us

now. There is no rational basis for

concluding thatcapital punishment is not

excessive. It therefore violates the Eighth

Amendment.

In another place he observed

I believe that the great massof citizens

would conclude on the basis of the material

already considered that the death penalty is

immoral and therefore unconstitutional. The arguments advanced by Mr. Garg were intended to persuade us to come to the above conclusion on the abstract question as to whether death penalty for murder was constitutionally permissible.

It is, however, to be noted in the above case of Furman v. State of Georgia that though the learned Judges by a majority of 5 to 4 set aside the sentences of deathwith which they were concerned, it was only Brennan and Marshall, JJ. who were prepared to outlaw capital punishment on the groundthat it was an anachronism,degrading to human dignity and unnecessary in modern life. Theother three Judgesnamely Mr. Justice Douglas, Mr. Justice Stewart and Mr. Justice White who formed the majority along with Brennan and Marshall,JJ. did not take the view that the Eighth Amendment prohibited capital punishment for all crimes and under all circumstances. Mr. Justice Douglas, indeed held, that the death penalty contravened the Eighth Amendment. But his judgment is not capable of being read as requiring the final abolition of capital punishment.Mr. Justice Stewart and Mr. Justice White merelyconcluded that the death sentence before them must be set aside because prevailing sentencingpractices did not comply with the Eighth Amendment. The minority of four Judges (Burger, CJ, Blackmun, Powell and Rehnquist JJs) held that death penalty did not contravene the Eighth Amendment.Mr. Justice Douglas in reversing the death sentence was of the view that the Eighth Amendment required legislatures to write penal laws that are even handed, nonselective, and nonarbitrary, and to require judges to see to it that gene-548 ral laws are not applied sparsely, selectively, and spottily to unpopular groups. As is clear from his judgment Douglas, J wasvery much exercised by the fact that the lawwith regard to death penalty was being enforced in a discriminatorymanner the victim being mostly the poor and the despised, especially, if he was a member of a suspect or unpopular minority-obviously meaning the Negros. At the end of the judgment, however, he made it clear that he was not considering in that case whether mandatory death penalty would be constitutional if it was enforced evenhandedly and in nondiscriminatory manner.Mr. Justice Stewart after notingthat at least two of his brothers (Brennan andMarshall,JJ) had concluded that the infliction of the death penalty isconstitutionally impermissible in all circumstances under the Eighth and Fourteenth Amendments statedtheircase is a strong one. But I find it unnecessary to reachthe ultimate question they would decide. At a later stage he made it clear thatthe constitutionality of capital punishment in the abstract is not, however, before us in these cases. Mr. Justice White started his opinion : In joining the courts judgment, therefore, I do not at all intimate that the death penalty is unconstitutional per se or that there is no system of capital punishment that would comport with the Eighth Amendment. That question, ably argued by several of my Brethren, is not presented by these cases and need not be decided. It will thus be seen thatalthough the death Sentences in that case were set aside by a majority, three out of five Judges who formed the majority did not consider it necessary to outlaw capital punishment on the social and moral considerations which prevailed upon the other two Judges namely Brerman and Marshall, JJ. In short, even when the court was presented with a wealth of evidence compiled by Sociologists and research workers in refutation of the necessity of retaining capital punishment, only two Judges out of nine could be persuaded to hold that capital punishment per se is constitutionally impermissible. So far as we are concerned in this country, we do not have, in our constitution any provision like the Eighth Amendment nor are we at liberty to apply the test of reasonableness with the freedom with which the Judges of the Supreme Court of America are accustomed to apply the due process clause. Indeedwhat is cruel and unusual may, in conceivable circumstances, be regarded as unreasonable. But when we are dealing with punishments for crimes as prescribed by law we are confronted with a serious problem.Not a few are found to hold thatlife imprisonment. especially., as it is understood in U.S.A. is cruel. On the other hand, capital punishment cannot be described as unusual because thatkind of punishment has been with us from ancient times right 549 upto the present day though the number of offences for which it can be imposed has continuously dwindled. The framers of our Constitution were well aware of the existence of capital punishment as a permissible punishment under the law. For example,. ,Article 72 (1) (c) provides that the President shall have power to rant pardons, reprieves,respites or remissions of punishment or to suspend, remit or commute the sentence of any person convicted of any offence in all cases where the sentence is a sentence of death. Article 72(3) furtherprovides that Nothing in subclause (c) of clause (1) shall affect the power to suspend, remind commute a sentence of death exercisable by the Governor of a State under any law for the time being in force.The obvious reference is to sections 401 and 402 of the Criminal Procedure Code. Then again entries 1 and 2 in List III of the Seventh Schedule refer to criminal law and criminal procedure. In entryno. 1 the entry Criminal Law is extended by specifically including therein all matters included in the Indian Penal Code at the commencement of this Constitution. All matters not onlyreferred to offences but also punishments--one of which is the death sentence. Article 134 gives a right of appeal to theSupreme Court where the High Court reverses an order of acquittal andsentences a person to death. All these provisions clearly go to show that the Constitution-makers had recognised the death sentenceas a permissible punishment and had made constitutional provisions for appeal, reprieve and the like. But more importantthan these provisions in the Constitution is Article 21 which provides that no person shall be deprived of his life except according to procedure established by law. The implication is very clear. Deprivation of lifeis constitutionally permissible if thatis done according to procedure established by law. In the face of these indications of constitutional postulates it will be very difficult tohold that capital sentence was regarded per se as unreasonable or not in the public interest.

Reference was made by Mr. Garg to several studies made by Western scholars to show theineffectiveness of capital punishment either as a deterrent or as appropriate retribution. There is large Volume of evidence compiled in the West by kindly social reformers and research workers to confound those who want to retain thecapital punishment. The controversy is not yet ended and experiments are made by suspending the death sentence where possible in order to see its affect. On the other hand most of these studies suffer from one grave defect namely that they consider all murders as stereotypes, the result of sudden passion or the like, disregarding motivation in each individual case. A large numberof murders is undoubtedly of the common type. But some at least are diabolical in conception and cruel in execution. In some others where the victim is a person of high 550 standing in the country Society is liable to be rocked to its very foundation. Such murders cannot be simply wished away by finding alibis in the social maladjustment of the murderer. Prevalence of such crimes speaks, in the opinion of many, for the inevitability of death penalty not only by way of deterrence but as a token of emphatic disapproval by the society.

We have grave doubts about the expediency of transplanting Western experience in our country. Social conditions are different and so also the general intellectual level In the context of our criminal law which punishesmurder, one cannotignore the fact that life imprisonment works out in most cases to a. dozen years of imprisonment and it may be seriously questioned whether that sole alternative will be an adequate substitute for the death penalty.We have not been referred to any large scale studies of crime statistics compiled in this country with the object of estimating the need of protection of the society against murders. The only authoritative study is that of the Law Commission of India published in 1967. It is its Thirty-Fifth Report. After collecting asmuch available material as possible and assessing the viewsexpressed in the West both by abolitionists and the retentionists the Law Commission has come to its conclusion at paras 262 to 264. These paragraphs are summarized by the Commission as follows at page 354 of the Report

The issue of abolition or retention has to be

decidedon a balancing of the various

arguments for and against retention. No

single argument for abolition or retention can

decide the issue. In arriving at any

conclusion on the subject, the need for

protecting society in general and individual

human beings must be borne in mind.

It is difficult to rule out the validity, of,

or the strength behind, many of the arguments

for abolition nor does, the Commission treat

lightly the argument based on the

irrevocability of the sentence of death, the

need for a modern approach, theseverity of

capital punishment, and the strong feeling

shown by certain sections of public opinion in

stressing deeper questions of human values.

Having regard, however, to the conditions in

India, to the variety of the social upbringing

of its inhabitants, to the disparity in the

level of morality and education in the

country,to the vastness of its area, to the

diversity of its population and to the

paramount need for maintaining law and order

in the country at the present juncture, India

cannot risk the experiment of abolition ;of

capital punishment.

551

Arguments which would be valid in respect of

one area of the world may not hold good in

respect of another area, in this context.

Similarly, even if abolition in some parts of

India may not make a material difference, it

may be fraught with serious consequences in

other parts.

On a consideration of all the issues involved,

the Commission is of the opinion, that capital

punishment should be retained in the present

state of the country.

A very responsible body has come to the above conclusion, afterconsidering all the relevant factors. On the conclusions. thus offered to us, it will be difficult to hold that capital punishment as such is unreasonable or not required in the public interest.

In dealing with the question of reasonableness, we cannot ignorethe procedural safeguards provided by the statute. An accused charged for murder is first put up before a Magistrate, who on an examination of the evidence commits him to the Court of Sessions for trial. The accused knows at this stage what is, the evidence against him. The trial is conducted before a Sessions Judge or an Additional Sessions Judge with considerable experience in the trial of criminal cases. if the Sessions Judge, after trial, comes to the conclusion that the accused is guilty of murder and deserves to be sentenced to death, he is required under section 374 of the Criminal Procedure Code to submit to, the High Court the proceedings before him and it is theHigh Court which has to review the whole evidence and consider whether the sentence of death passed by the Sessions Judge shouldbe confirmed.The rule under section 378 isthat this review of the evidence shall be made by a bench of not less than two Judges. If the sentence of death is confirmed, the accused can in appropriate cases appeal to the Supreme Court by special leave. In cases where the Sessions Judge acquits the accused of murder but theHigh Court in appeal sets aside the acquittal and sentences him to death, the accused is entitled under the Constitution to prefer an appeal as of right to this Court. It will be thus seen that there are inbuilt procedural safeguards against any hasty decision.

As iswell known, the subject of capital punishment is a difficult and controversal subject, long and hotly debated. It has evoked strong views. In that state of affairs if the Legislature decides to retain capital punishment for murder, it will be difficult for this Courtin the absence of objective evidence regarding its unreasonableness to question the wisdom and propriety ofthe Legislature in retaining it. A Bill for the abolition of capital 552 punishment was introduced in the Lok Sabha in 1956 but the same was rejected on November 23, 1956. Similarly a resolution for the abolition of capital punishment was introduced in the Rajya Sabha in 1958 but the same was withdrawn after debate. Later in 1961 a similar resolution was moved in the Rajya Sabha but thesame was negatived in 1962. A resolution for its abolition was discussed in the Lok Sabha but the same was withdrawn after discussion. All thisgoes to show thatthe representatives ofthe people do not welcome the prospect of abolishing capital punishment. In this state of affairs, we are not prepared to concludethat capital punishment, as such, is either unreasonable or not in the public interest.

The next contention of Mr. Garg was that by providing in section 302-IPC that one found guilty thereunder is liable to be punished either with death sentence orimprisonment for life, the legislature has abdicated its essential function is not providing by legislative standards inwhat cases the Judge should sentence the accused to death and in what cases he should sentence him only to life imprisonment. It may be noted here that prior to the Amending Act 26 of 1956, section 367(5) of the Criminal Procedure Code read as follows :

If the accused is convicted of an offence punishablewith death and the courts sentences him to any punishment other than death, the court shall in its judgment state the reason why sentence of death was not passed.

By the amendment this provision is deleted and, as theCode at present stands, punishment for murder isone of the two--namely death or imprisonment for life. Neither section 302-IPC nor any other provision in the Criminal Procedure Code says in what cases the capital punishment is to be imposed and in what others the lesser punishment. It is, therefore, argued by Mr. Garg that the Legislature hasleft this awful duty to the Judge or Judges concerned without layingdown any standards to guide them in their decision. In fact he says the Legislature has abdicated its legislative function and this delegation of its power to the Judges is vitiated by the vice of excessive delegation. We think there is no merit inthis submission. Inthis connection wehave to take note of the policy of the law with regard to crimes and their punishments. The position in England is stated by Halsbury in Laws of England, Third Edition, Volume 10 at page 486. The relevant portion of para 888 is as follows :

DISCRETION OF COURT AS TO PUNlSHMENT

In all crimes except those for which the

sentenceof death must be pronounced avery

wide discretion in the

553

matter of fixing the degree of punishment is

allowed to the Judge who tries the case.

The policy of the law is, as regardsmost

crimes, to fix a maximum penalty, which is

intendedonly for the worst cases, and to

leave to the discretion of the judge the

determination of the extent towhich in a

particular case the punishment awarded should

approach to or recede from the maximum limit.

The exercise of this discretion is a matter of

prudenceand not of law, but art appeallies

by the leave of the Court of Criminal Appeal

against an sentence not fixed by law, and if

leave is given, the sentence can be altered by

that court. Minimum penalties have insome

instances been prescribed by the enactment

creating the offence.

The position in India is practically thesame. The exception made in English Law with regard to the sentence of death does not hold good in India.The policy of our criminal law As regards all crimes, including the crime of murder, is to fix a maximum penalty-the same being intended for the worst cases, leaving a very wide discretion in the matterof punishment to the Judge. In England, murder and treason were offences for which thedeath sentence was mandatory. If after trial the accused was found guilty by the Jury, neither the Jury nor the Judge had any discretion in the matter of sentence. The Judge had to sentence the accused to death. The sentence may be reprieved by the Home Secretary after-taking all the circumstances of the case and other matters into consideration. But that was no part of the judicial process.

Absence of any discretion with regard to the sentence raised strongcriticism in England because it was recognised, as was done in many other countries, that death penalty was not the only appropriatepunishment for murder. A Royal Commission was thereupon appointed in 1949 to consider and reportwhether liability under the Criminal Law in Great Britain, to suffer capital punishment for murder should be limited or modified and if so to what extent and bywhat means.In its report published in 1953 the Commission found it impossible to improve the position either by redefining murderor by dividing murder into degrees. In para 535 of the Report it pointed out that the general liability under the existing law to suffer capital punishment for murder cannotbe satisfactorily limited by such means, (i.e. redefining murder or dividing murder into degrees) because no legaldefinition can cover all themultifarious considerations, relating to the offender as well as to his crime,which ought to be taken into accountin deciding whether the supreme penalty should be exacted ineach individual case. Ile Commission considered various 554 alternatives-one of them being a provision on the lines of section 302-IPC which was pressed with great force, by Sir John Beaumonta former Chief Justice of theBombayHigh Court,and later a Privy Councillor.He pressed on the Commission the advisability of leaving it to the Judge whether the death sentence should be imposed or the lesser sentence, adding further that this procedure had worked quite well in Indiafor generations and there was no reluctance onthe part of the Judges toassume the responsibilityto pass the death sentence. The Judges in England, however unanimouslyrefused to accept such a responsibility. Thequestion thenarose whether the responsibilityfor the death sentence may be given to the Jury as was done in some of the States in America. The Royal Commission fell in with this suggestion and ex pressed itself as follows (See para 595 of the Report).

It is not questioned that the liability to

suffer capital punishment under the existing

law is rigorous to excess. We cannot but

regard it as a reproach to our criminal law

that this excessive rigour should be tolerated

merely because it is corrected by executive

action.The law itself should mitigate it.

We havebeen forced to the conclusionthat

this cannot bedone by a redefinition of

murder or by dividing murder into degrees. No

formula is possible that would provide a

reasonable criterion for the infinite

variety of circumstances that may affect the

gravity of the crime of murder. Discretionary

judgment on the facts of each case is the only

way in which theycan be equitably

distinguished. This conclusion is borne out

by American experience : there the experiment

of degrees of murder, introduced long ago, has

had to be supplemented by giving to the courts

a discretion that in effect supersedes it.

Such a discretion, if it is to be part of the

legal process, and not an act of executive

clemency, must be given either to the Judge or

to the jury. We find that the Judges in this

country, for reasons we respect, would be most

reluctant to assume this duty. There remains

the method of entrusting it to the jury. We

are satisfied that as longas capital

punishment is retained this is the only prac-

ticable way ofcorrecting the outstanding

defects of the existing law.

In India the difficulty encountered by the Commission had been overcome long ago and it is accepted by the public that only the Judges shall decide the sentence. Where an error is committed in the matter of sentence the same is liable to be corrected by appeals and revisions to higher courts for which appropriate pro-555 visionwas made in the Criminal Procedure Code. The structure of our criminal law which is principally contained in the Indian Penal Code and the Criminal ProcedureCode underlines the policy that when the Legislature has defined an offence with sufficient clarityand prescribed the maximum punishment therefore, a wide discretion in the matter of fixing the degree of punishment should be allowed to the Judge. As pointed out by Ratanlal inhis Law of Crimes, Twenty-Second Edition page 93 The authors of the Code had,, in many cases not heinous, fixed a minimum as well as a maximum punishment. The Committee were of opinion that, considering the general terms in which offenceswere defined, it would be inexpedient, in most cases, to fix a minimum punishment; and they had accordingly so altered the Code as to leave the minimum punishment for all offences, except those of the gravest nature, to the discretion of the Judge who would have the means in each case of forming an opinion as to the character of the offender, and the circumstances,whether aggravating or mitigating, under which the offence had been committed.But with respect to some heinous offence-such as offences against the State, murder, attempt to commit murder, and the like-they had thought it right to fix a minimum punishment. In the whole code there is only one section (Section 303) where death is prescribed as the only punishment for murder by a person under sentence for imprisonment for life. There,are several other sections in which death sentence could be imposed, but that sentence is not mandatory. Under two sectionsnamelysection 302--murder, and section 121---waging-war against the Governmentof India, alternative punishments of death or imprisonment forlife are leviable. These are the two sections where the maximum punishment isdeath and the minimum is imprisonment for life. There are two other sections in the Indian Penal Code where the minimum punishment is prescribed-one is section 397 which provides that if at the time of committing robbery or dacoity, the offender uses any deadly weapon, or causes grievous hurt to any person, or attempts to cause death or grievous hurtto any person, the imprisonment with which such offender shall be punished shall not be less than seven years and (2) Section 396 which provides that at the time of attempting tocommit robbery or dacoity, theoffender is armed with any deadly weapon, the imprisonment with which such offendershall be published shall not be lessthan seven years.As regards the rest ofthe offences,even those cases where the maximum punishment is the death penalty, a wide discretion to punish is given to the Judge. The reasons are explained by Ratanlal on the page referred to above.

Circumstances which are properly and

expressly recognizedby the law as

aggravations calling for in

18-L498SupCI/73

556

creased severity of punishment are principally

such asconsist in the manner in which the

offence is perpetrated; whether it be by

forcibleor fraudulent means, or by aid of

accomplices or in the malicious motive by

which the offender was actuated, or the

consequences to the public or to individual

sufferers, or the special necessity which

exists in particular cases for counteracting

the temptation to offend, arising from the

degree of expected gratification, or the

facility of perpetration peculiar to the case.

These considerations naturally include a

number of particulars, as of time, place, per-

sons and things, varying according to the

nature of the case. Circumstances which are

to be considered in alleviation of punishment

are : (1) the minority of the offender; (2)

the old age of the offender; (3) the condition

of the offender e.g., wife, apprentice; (4)

the order of a superior military officer; (5)

provocation; (6) when offence was committed

under acombination of circumstances and

influence of motives which are not likely to

recur either with respect to the offender or

to any other; (7) the state of health and the

sex of the delinquent. Bentham mentions the

following circumstances in mitigation of

punishment which should be inflicted : (1)

absence of bad intention; (2) provocation; (3)

self preservation; (4) preservation ofsome

near friends; (5) transgression of the limit

of self-defence; (6) submission to the

menaces;(7) submission to authority; (8)

drunkenness; (9) childhood.

Indeedthese are not the only aggravating or mitigating circumstances which should be considered when sentencing an offender. The list is not intended to be exhaustive. In fact the Punjab High Court has held that considerable delay in the disposal of a case may be a factor in awarding lesser punishment. See Municipal Committee v. Baisakhi Ram(1). The policy of the law in giving a very wide discretion in the matter of punishment to the Judge has its origin in the impossibility of laying down standards. Take, for example, the offence of criminal breach of trust punishable under section 409--IPC, The maximum punishment prescribed for the offence is imprisonment for life. The minimum could be as low as one days imprisonment and fine. It is obviousthat if any standards were to be laid down with regard to several kinds of breaches of trust by the persons referred inthat section, that would be an impossible task. All that could be reasonably done by the Legislature is to tell the Judges that between the maximum and minimum Prescribed for an offence. they should, on balancing the aggravating and (1) Crl. Law journal 475. 557 mitigating circumstances as disclosed in the case, judicially decide what would be the appropriate sentence. Take the other caseof the offence of causing hurt. Broadly, that offence is divided into two categories-simple hurt and grievous hurt. Simple hurt is againsub-dividedsimple hurt caused by a lethal weapon is made punishable by a higher maximum sentence-section 324.Where grievoushurt is caused by a lethal weapon, it is punishable under section 326 and is a more aggravated form of causing grievoushurt than the one punishable under section 325. Under section 326 the maximum punishment is imprisonment for life and the minimum can be one days imprisonment and fine. Where a person by a lethal weapon causes a slight fracture of one of the unimportant bones of the human body, he would be as much punishable under section 326-IPC as a personwho with a knife scoops out the eyes of his victim. It will be absurd to say that both of them, because they are liable under the same section should be given the same punishment. Here too, any attempt to lay down standards why in one case there shouldbe more punishment and in the other less punishment would be an impossible task. What is thus true with regard to punishmentimposed for other offences of the code is equally true in the case of murder punishable under section 302-IPC. Two alternate sentences are provided one of which could be described as the maximum and the ether minimum. The choice is between these two punishments and as in other cases the discretion is left to the Judge to decide upon the punishment inthe same manner as it does in the case of other offences, namely, balancing the aggravating and mitigation- circumstances. The framers of theCode attempted to confine the offence of murder within as narrow limits as it was possiblefor them to do in the circumstances. All culpable homicides were notmade punishable under section 302-IPC. Culpable homicideswere divided broadly intotwo classes (1) culpable homicide amounting to murder and (2) culpable homicide not amounting to murder. Culpable homicide which fell in the one or the other of the four strictly limited categories described in section 300-IPC amounted to murder unless it fell in one of the five exceptions mentioned in that section, in which case the offence of murder was reduced to culpable homicide not amounting tomurder. Any furtherrefinement in the definition of murder was not practicable and, therefore, not attempted. The recent experience of the Royal Commission referred to above only emphasizes theextreme difficulty. The Commission frankly admitted that it was not possible to prescribe the lesser punishment of imprisonment for life by redefinition of murder or by dividing murder into degrees. It conceded that no formula was possible that would provide a reasonablecriterion forthe infinitevariety of circumstances,that may affect the gravity of the crime of murderthat conclusion forced the Commission to theview that discretionary judg-558 ment on the facts of each case is the only way in which they can be equitably distinguished. See : para595 of the Commissions Report.

American experience is not different. In some of the States murderand rape were punishable with death. But that was not the only punishment. The, Law gave the Jury discretion in capital sentencing, and the question arose recently before the Supreme Court of America in McGauthn v. California(1) whether in tile absence of any standards for deciding when the accused should be sentenced to death or to life imprisonment the provision of law which gives the discretion tothe Jury was constitutional.Mr. Justice Harlan delivered the opinion of five Judges and Mr. Justice Black substantially agreed with that opinion in a separate judgment. The majority held that the infinite variety of cases and facets to each case would make general standards eithermeaning less boiler plate or a statement of the obvious that no Jury would need. The majority agreewith the view of the Royal Commission already referred to and observed those who have come to grips with the hard task of actually attempting to draft means of channeling capital sentencing discretion have confirmed the lesson taught by the history recounted above. To identify before thefact those characteristicsof criminal homicides and their perpetrators which call for the death penalty, and to express thesecharacteristics in language which can be fairlyunderstood and applied by the sentencing authority, appear to be tasks which are beyond present human ability. The model Judicial (ode which was presented to the court as an attempt towards standardization was strongly criticised bythe majority who pointed out thattile Craftsmen of the Model Judicial Code had expressly agreed with ,he conclusion of the Royal Commission that the factors which determined whether the, sentence of death is the appropriate penalty in particular cases are too complex to be expressed within the limits of a simple formula. Some of the circumstances of aggravation and mitigationwere mentioned in the Appendix to, the Code. But it was pointed out that theDraftsmen of the Code did not restrict themselves tothe items referred to in the Appendix but expressly stated that besides the above circumstances the court was bound to take into consideration any other facts that the court deems relevant. This only meant that any exhaustive enumeration of aggravating or mitigating circumstancesis impossible-the admission of which emphasizes the view that standardisation is impossible. Finally the majority observed at page 726 : In light of history, experience, and the present limitations of human knowledge, wefind it quite impossible to say thatcommitting to the untrammeled discretion of the jury the power to pronounce life or death in capital, cases is offensive to anything in the Constitution.

(1) United States Supreme court report Lawyers Edition, 28, 713. 559 In India this onerous duty is cast upon Judges and formore than a century the judges are carrying out this duty under the Indian Penal Code. The impossibility oflayingdown standards is at thevery core of the criminal law as administered in India which invests the Judges with avery wide discretion in the matter of fixing the degree of punishment. That discretion in the matter sentences as a already pointed out, liable to be correctedby superior courts. Laying down of standards tothe limited extent possible as was done in the Model Judicial Code would not serve the purpose. The exercise of judicial discretion on well-recognised principles is, in the final analysis, the safest possible safeguard for the accused.

It was next contended by Mr. Garg that uncontrolled and unguided discretion in thejudgesto impose capital punishment or imprisonment for life was hit by Article 14 of the Constitution. wedo not find any merit inthis contention also. If the Law has given to the Judge awide discretion in the matter of sentence to be exercised by him afterbalancing all the aggravating and mitigating circumstances of the crime, it will be impossible to say that there would be at all any discrimination, since facts and Circumstances of one case can hardly be the same as the facts and circumstances of another. It has been pointed out by this Court in Budhan Choudhry and others v. The State of Bihar() Art.14 can hardly be invoked in matters of judicial, discretion. This Court observed at page 1054 It has, however, to be remembered that, in the language of F ankurter, J. in Snowden v. Hughes, the Constitutiondoes not assure uniformity of decisions or immunity from merely erroneous action, whether by the Courts or the executive agencies of a State. Thejudicial decision must of necessity depend on the facts and circumstances ofeach particular case and what may superficially appear to be an unequal application of the law may not necessarily amount to a denial of equal protection unless there is shown to be present in it an element ofintentional and purposeful discrimination..... Further, the discretionof judicial officers is not arbitrary and the law provides for revision by superior courts of orders passedby the Subordinate courts. In such circumstances, there is hardly any ground for apprehending any capricious discrimination by judicial tribunals. Crime as crime may appear to be superficially the same but the, facts and circumstances of a crime are widelydifferent andsince a decision of the court as regards punishment is dependent upon a consideration of all the facts and circumstances, there is Hardly any ground for challenge under Article 14.

Lastly it was contended by Mr. Garg that under Article 21 of the Constitution no person shall be deprived of hislife except according to procedure established by law and, in his submission.

(1) 1955 S.C.R. 1045. 560 before the-sentence of death is passed there is, in fact, no procedure establishedby law. It is admitted that the Criminal Procedure Code lays down a detailed procedure but that procedure, according to Mr. Garg, is limited to the finding of guilt. After the accused is found guilty of the offence, there is no other procedure laid down by the law for determining whether the sentence of death or something less is appropriate in the case. Therefore, he contended, death sentence is unconstitutional. We are not impressed by this argument also. The accused who is charged for murder knows that he is liable to be sentenced to death in the Committing Court itself. He knows what the evidence is. He further knows that if after trial in the Sessions Court he is found guilty of murder, he is liable to be sentenced to the extreme penalty. Experience of trials shows that where the accused knows that the facts of the caseare against him. the whole attempt on the part of his counsel is to fill the record with as many circumstances in his favour as possible which would tend to show that he is either guilty of a lesser crime or, in any event, there are mitigating and extenuating circumstances. The court is primarily concerned with all the facts and circumstances in so far as theyare, relevant to the crime and how it was committed and since at the end of the trial he is liable to be sentenced, all the factsand circumstances bearing upon the crime are legitimately brought to the notice of the court. Apart from the cross-examination of the witnesses, the Criminal Procedure Code requires that the accused must be questioned with regard to the circumstances appearing against him in the evidence.He is also questioned generally on thecase and there is an opportunity for him to say whatever he wants to say. He has a right to examine himself as a witness, thereafter, and give evidence on the material facts. Again he and his counsel are at liberty to address the court not merely on the question of guilt but also on the question of sentence. In important cases like murder the court always gives a chance to the accused to address the court on the question of sentence. Under the Criminal ProcedureCode after convicting the accused the court has to pronounce the sentence according to law. In a Jury trial if the accused is convicted the Judge shall (unless he proceeds in accordance with the provisions of section 562) pass sentence on him according to law. See section 306 (2). Similarly, where the case is tried by the Judge himself sub-section (2) of section 309 says that if the accused is convicted, the Judge.shall,unless he proceeds in accordance with the provisions of section 562, pass sentence on him according to law. The sentence follows the conviction, and it istrue that no formal procedure for producing evidencewith reference to the sentence is specifically provided. The reasonis, that relevant facts and circumstances impinging on the nature and circumstances of the crimeare already before the court. Where counsel addresses the court with 561 regardto the character and standing of the accused,they are duly considered by the court unless there is something in the evidence itself which belieshim or the Public Prosecutor for the State challenges the facts. If the matter is relevant and essential to be considered, there is nothing in the Criminal Procedure Code which prevents additional evidence being taken. It must,however, be statedthat it is not the experience of criminal courts in India that the accused with a view to obtaining a reduced sentence ever offers to call additional evidence. However, it is necessary to emphasize that the court is principally concernedwith the facts and circumstances, whether aggravating or mitigating, which are connectedwith the particular crime under inquiry. All such facts and circumstances are capable of being proved in accordance with the provisions of the Indian Evidence Actin a trial regulated by the Cr. P.C. The trial does not come to an end until all the relevant facts are proved and the counsel on both sides have an opportunity to address thecourt. The only thing that remains is for the Judge to decide on the guilt and punishment and that is what section 306(2) and 309(2)Cr. P.C. purport to provide for. These provisions are part of the procedure established by law and, unless it is shown that they are invalid for any other reasons,they must be regarded as valid. No reasons are offered toshow that they are constitutionally invalid, and, hence, the death sentence imposed after trial in accordance with the procedure established by law is not unconstitutional under Article 21.

In the result, the appeal fails and is dismissed. G.C. Appeal dismissed. 562
**********', 2] , 
[ 'HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAW
Indian Penal Code, 1860:
Section  302 - Murder of wife - Accused produced in the  police  station  alongwith  blood stained clothes and the  weapon  with  which  he killed his wife - Clear clinching evidence  establish  that it was appellant and no one else had committed the  murder  - Conviction and sentence upheld.
HELD
... (I)t appears to us that the factum of lodging the F.I.R. by PW.1 Bishan Dial and also the factum of producing the  accused  with  blood  stained  clothes and the said toka  with  which  the murder had been committed by Bishan Dial have been clearly established  by  the deposition of investigating officer.  We  do  not find  any  reason to discard the evidence  of  the  investigating officer to the above effect.  No suggestion was given to the said investigating  officer on behalf of the accused that he  had  any occasion  to have animus against the accused for which there  was likelihood of fabricating false evidence by the said  investigating officer against the accused.  PW.1 Bishan Dial has deposed to the effect that he along with his brother had been to the  police  station.  Although he has stated in his deposition that his thumb impression  was  taken on a paper in the police  station  but  no attempt was made to support such contention by examining his  own brother  as  a defence witness. It has also been  clearly  established  from  the evidence of the son of the  deceased  that  the  accused  used  to live with the deceased in the  said  house  and nobody else used to live there.  Shortly after the incident,  the appellant  was  produced  in the police station  with  his  blood stained clothes and the toka.  From the report of the serologist, it  has been established that the said clothes and the toka  contained human blood.  No explanation has been giving as to how and under  what circumstances, the clothes of the  accused  contained blood stains when he was apprehended shortly after the  incident.  The  circumstances  established by clear and  clinching  evidence only  indicate  that  it was the appellant and no  one  else  had committed  the said murder.  It will be appropriate  to  indicate here that corroboration is a rule of prudence.  Evidentiary value of  a deposition which is otherwise admissible is not just  wiped out  in  the absence of corroboration.  Even in  the  absence  of corroboration, a deposition for its quality may be safely accepted  to be correct.  It will be unfortunate if on account of  over emphasis for corroboration, a crime goes unpunished by not giving due  weight on our uncorroborated evidence when such evidence  is otherwise reliable.  We, therefore, find no reason to  interfere with conviction and sentence passed against the appellant and the appeal is accordingly dismissed. Para 6

Evidence
Evidence - Evidentiary value of deposition - Absence of corroboration  -  Corroboration is a rule of prudence -  However  the  evidentiary value of a deposition which is otherwise admissible  is  not  just wiped out in the absence of corroboration  -  It  will be unfortunate if on account of over emphasis for corroboration, a crime goes unpunished by not giving due weight on our  uncorroborated  evidence when such evidence is otherwise  reliable. Para 6


G.N. RAY, J. :

1.  This  is  an appeal under Section 14 (1) of  the  Terrorists Affected  Areas (Special Courts) Act, 1984.  This appeal  is  directed  against the order dated November 28, 1984 passed  by  the learned  Judge, Special Court, Ferozpur, in Trial No.27  of  1984 arising  out of F.I.R.No.141 of 1984 of the Police Station,  Abohar, under Section 302 of the Indian Penal Code and was sentenced to suffer imprisonment for life.

2.  The  prosecution case in short is that the appellant  had  a strained  relation with his wife Chameli Devi, the  deceased,  on account  of Chameli Devi having illicit relation with one  Kirpal Singh.  On May 8, 1984, P.W.1-Bishan Dial, his brother  Tej  Ram and  the wife of Bishan Dial, Dropati, went to the house  of  the appellant  Pattu Lal to get the dispute between the deceased  and Pattu  Lal settled.  The deceased threatened to get  divorce  and marry Kirpal Singh.  On the night of May 24 and 25 of 1984,  PW.1 Bishan Dial, said Tej Ram and Dropati slept at the house of Pattu Lal and at about 6.00 a.m. on May 28, 1984, Bishan Dial got up on hearing  alarm and saw Pattu Lal giving injuries to Chameli  Devi with toka and Chameli Devi died at the spot.  PW.1 Bishan  Dial took his father with his blood stained clothes and the said  toka Ex.M/G/1  to  the  police station, Abohar, where  he  lodged  the F.I.R.  Ex.P.1  at  about 7.00 a.m.  On the  basis  of  the  said F.I.R.,  a  case under Section 302 of the Indian Penal  Code  was registered.  PW.3  Shri Thakur Singh, Additional  Station  House Officer,  took  up the investigation who placed Pattu  Lal  under arrest and the blood stained toka and also blood stained  clothes produced  before him were seized.  Thereafter, the said  Investigating  Officer (PW.3) proceeded to the spot and collected  blood stained  earth under memo of seizure Ex.P.7 and also  seized  the blanket  and  chadar  of the deceased  by  seizure  Memo  effects Ex.P.8.  Autopsy of the dead body of Chameli Devi was  performed by  Dr.Dalip  Kumar on May 25, 1984 at about 3.30  p.m.  In  the opinion  of  the doctor, the death was caused due  to  shock  and haemorrhage due to injury No.1 which was sufficient in the  ordinary  course of nature to cause death.  The prosecution  examined Bishan  Dial  PW.1, the son of the accused and  also  the  doctor holding  the post mortem examination (PW.2 Dr.Dalip  Kumar),  the said Investigating Officer PW.3 and other formal witnesses.  PW.1 Bishan  Dial  was, however, declared hostile and  he  was  cross-examined  by the learned Public Prosecutor.  It appears from  the deposition  of  PW.1 that his father and the mother  were  living together  and Bishan with his wife and brother Tej Ram  had  been living  separately in a different house.  The said  witness  also admitted  that  at the police station he had given a  thumb  mark under the F.I.R.  He also admitted that his brother Tej Ram  also accompanied  him to the police station.  No plausible reason  has been indicated by the said witness which might have prompted  the said Investigating Officer to fabricate the said F.I.R. on making false allegations.  The investigating officer specifically stated in  his  deposition that the accused was produced at  about  7.00 a.m.  at the police station by PW.1 Bishan Dial himself  and  the blood  stained clothes and the toka with which murder had  been committed were also produced by the said Bishan Dial.  It may  be stated  here  that the blood stained clothes and  the  toka  with which the murder is alleged to have been committed had been  sent for  forensic test and the report is to the effect that the  said clothes and the toka contained human blood.

3.  The  learned  counsel for the appellant  has  very  strongly contended  before  us at the hearing of this appeal that  in  the instant  case,  the  prosecution wanted to prove  the  charge  of murder  by  examining  Bishan Dial who was stated to  be  an  eye witness.  But the said Bishan Dial has denied in his  deposition that  he had seen the occurrence and he has also denied  that  he lodged  the F.I.R. with the police station.  He has  specifically stated  that in the police station, a thumb impression was  taken from  him.  The learned counsel has submitted  that  such  thumb impression  has  since been utilised in F.I.R.  and  no  reliance should  be  placed on such F.I.R.  The learned  counsel  for  the appellant has also contended that the prosecution has not come up with  a case of murder to be established by  circumstantial  evidences.  On the contrary, the positive case of  the  prosecution was  that  the  case of murder was witnessed by the  son  of  the deceased.  But the prosecution has failed to establish such  case because  of the denial about the said case of murder by the  son, Bishan Dial.  The learned counsel for the appellant has submitted that simply on the basis  of the deposition of the  Investigating Officer, the case against the appellant cannot be accepted in the absence  of any convincing evidence by way of corroboration.  He has, therefore, submitted that the prosecution case must fail  by holding  that  it was a case of blind murder not  proved  by  any convincing and clinching evidence.

4.  Mr.Ranbir Yadav, learned counsel for the State, has,  however, submitted before us that in the instant case, the police  did not  arrest the accused on the basis of any information  received from  any other source.  The accused was arrested at the time  of lodging  the F.I.R. by Bishan Dial because the accused  was  produced  by  his son Bishan at the police station, at the  time  of lodging the F.I.R. with the blood stained clothes of the  appellant  and  the  toka, the weapon with which the  murder  had  been committed.  The investigating officer has clearly deposed in this case that the said Bishan Dial lodged  the said F.I.R. and handed over his father along with blood stained clothes and the  weapon.  In  view of such evidence, there is no difficulty  in  convicting the appellant for the said offence of murder and in the facts  of the case, no interference by this Court is called for.

5.  We  requested Mr.Natarajan, the learned Senior Advocate,  to assist the Court as amicus curaie and we place on record our deep appreciation  for the valuable assistance given by  Mr.Natarajan.  Mr.Natarajan  has submitted before us that although  PW.1  Bishan Dial  has denied the factum of lodging the F.I.R. and making  the statement  recorded  in F.I.R. and has also denied  that  he  had witnessed the said occurrence of murder, but the contradiction in his deposition with the statement recorded in the F.I.R. and also in the statements made by him under Section 161 of  Crl.Procedure Code  have been clearly established by the investigating  officer PW.3  in  his  deposition.  The statement of  Bishambher  to  the extent  of  contradiction in his statement in F.I.R. and  in  the statement  made  before the police became  substantive  evidence.  Mr.Natarajan  has also submitted that apart from  such  evidence, the investigating officer has also deposed in this case by  stating  that the son of the deceased Bishan Dial lodged  the  F.I.R. and  also produced the accused at the time of lodging the  F.I.R. and  blood  stained clothes of the accused and  the  weapon  with which the murder had been committed, had also deposited with  the police  by the said Bishan Dial.  There is no suggestion  to  the said investigating officer in cross examination that  he had  any reason to depose falsely against the accused in this case.  From the deposition of the son of the deceased it has been established that  the  accused used to stay with the deceased  in  the  house where  murder had been committed and no one else used to stay  in the said house.  It has come out in the evidence of the  investigating  officer that shortly after the said incident of  murder, the  accused  was  presented in the  police  station  with  blood stained clothes and the toka, by the son of the deceased.  It has been  established  from  the serological  report  that  the  said clothes  and the weapon contained human blood.  Such  evidences, even in the absence of direct evidence of murder, clearly  establish the prosecution case beyond doubt.  Accordingly, the conviction of the appellant for murder of his wife cannot be held to be bad or illegal.

6.  After  giving  our anxious consideration to  the  facts  and circumstances  of the case and the evidences adduced in the  case and  submissions made by the learned counsel for the parties  and also  by  Mr.Natarajan, learned amicus curaie, it appears  to  us that  the  factum of lodging the F.I.R. by PW.1 Bishan  Dial  and also  the  factum of producing the accused  with  blood  stained clothes and the said toka with which the murder had been  committed  by Bishan Dial have been clearly established by the  deposition  of  investigating officer.  We do not find  any  reason  to discard  the evidence of the investigating officer to  the  above effect.  No suggestion was given to the said investigating officer  on  behalf of the accused that he had any  occasion  to  have animus  against  the accused for which there  was  likelihood  of fabricating  false  evidence by the  said  investigating  officer against the accused.  PW.1 Bishan Dial has deposed to the  effect that  he along with his brother had been to the police  station.  Although  he has stated in his deposition that his thumb  impression  was taken on a paper in the police station but  no  attempt was made to support such contention by examining his own  brother as  a defence witness. It has also been clearly established  from the evidence of the son of the deceased that the  accused used to live with the deceased in the said house and nobody else used  to live  there.  Shortly after the incident, the appellant was  produced  in the police station with his blood stained  clothes  and the toka.  From the report of the serologist, it has been  established that the said clothes and the toka contained human  blood.  No  explanation has been giving as to how and under what  circumstances,  the clothes of the accused contained blood stains  when he was apprehended shortly after the incident.  The circumstances established by clear and clinching evidence only indicate that it was the appellant and no one else had committed the said  murder.  It  will be appropriate to indicate here that corroboration is  a rule  of  prudence.  Evidentiary value of a deposition  which  is otherwise  admissible  is not just wiped out in  the  absence  of corroboration.  Even in the absence of corroboration, a  deposition  for its quality may be safely accepted to be  correct.  It will be unfortunate if on account of over emphasis for corroboration,  a  crime goes unpunished by not giving due weight  on  our uncorroborated evidence when such evidence is otherwise reliable.  We,  therefore, find no reason to interfere with  conviction  and sentence  passed against the appellant and the appeal is  accordingly dismissed.  The appellant has been released on bail  during the pendency of this appeal.  He should be arrested forthwith  to serve out the sentence.

**********', 2] , 
[ 'CROSS CITATION
1973 SC 337 (24,27)
1967 SCR (3) 256

CRIMINAL APPELLATE JURISDICTION Criminal Appeal No. 210 of 1966. Appealby special leave from the judgment andorder dated March 22, 1966 of the Punjab High Court in Criminal Appeal No. 26 of 1966 and Murder Reference No. 2 of 1966. Jai Gopal Sethi, C. L. Sareen and R. L. Kohli, for theappelants.

Hans Rai Khanna and R. N. Sachthey, for the respondent. The Judgment of the Court was delivered by

Bachawat, J. Six persons including, the two appellantswere tried for offences under s. 148, S. 302 read with s.1.49 and s. 201 257 read with S. 149 of the Indian Penal Code in connection with the murder of Tarlok Singh son of Amar Singh of Purana Pind. The six accused were (1) Jagir Singh of Purana Pind, (2) Tarlok Singh of Udhoke, (3) Wassan Singh of Purana Pind, (4) Jagir Singh of Bhumbli, (5) Dyal Singh of Dalla and (6) PritamSingh of Dalla. Tarlok Singh deceased was brutally attacked on the threshing floor of Amar Singh at a distance of eighty feet from his Haveli near the outskirt of village PuranaPind on April 27, 1965 atabout 4 p.m. The prosecution case was that all the six accused came to the spot with the object of killing Tarlok Singh, accused 5 was riding a white mare and carrying a spear, and the remaining five accused were on foot and were armed with kirpans or swords. Accused 5 shouted a challenge sayingthat Tarlok Singh must not be spared, accused 4 gave two kirpan blows on his feet, accused I gave a sword blow on his neck and the other accusedcaused injuries to himwith their swords. When the victim was almost dead, he was placed on themare in front of accused 5 and all the six accused proceeded towards village Manobarpura. At a distance of about amile near the canal minor, the body of the victim was thrown on the ground and accused 2 chopped the head from his body. Accused 2 and 5 rode away on the mare with the severedhead wrapped in the chaddar and turban of the victim and the other accused followed on foot. The motive for the attack was that Munsha Singh father of accused I wasmurdered in July, 1964. Amar Singh, Tarlok Singh deceased and one Sawan Singh were tried for the murder but they were convicted of a lesser offence for which they were sentenced to three months rigorous imprisonment.They served out their sentences and returned to village Purana Pind about two months before April 27, 1965. The first information report of the murder of Tarlok Singh was lodged on April 27, 1965 at 5.30p.m. The investigating officer reached the spot at about6.30 p.m. The trunk of the dead body was recovered at a place about a mile distant from village Purana Pind near the canal minor. The head was never recovered.The identity of the trunkwas satisfactorily established. The postmortem examination revealed six injuries. In the opinion of the medical witness, the death resulted from the cutting of the neck, caused with some, sharp-edged heavy weapon. The first information report stated that the assailants of Tarlok Singh were accused 1, 3, 5, 6, one Harbans Singh and one Jarnail Singh who were then said to have played the parts later ascribed to accused 2 and 4. All the six accused and Harbans Singh and Jarnail Singh were charge-sheeted. The committing magistrate discharged Harbans Singh and. Jarnail Singh and committed the six accused to the Sessions Court for trial. The four eyewitnesses examined at the trial were Amar Singh, father of the victim, Joginder Singh son of Amar- Singh, Bachan Singh, son-in-law of Amar Singh and Chhinda whose maternal uncles daughter was betrothed to the victim. Amar Singh was injured 258 by one of the culprits when he tried to intervene in the attackon his son. He made contradictory statementswith regardto the identity of the culprit who had (injured him and the six culprits who had participated in the attack on his son. The Sessions Judge acquitted accused 2, 3, 4 and 6. Hewas not satisfied that the witnesses had correctly identified accused 2, 4 and 6. He gave accused 3 the benefit of doubt as the evidence of the witnesses regarding his presence not corroborated by other evidence. The courts below found that there could be no-mistake about the identity of accused 1 and 5. With regard to their identity, the veracity of Amar Singh was not shaken and the evidence of the three other eyewitnesses was consistent positive and unimpeachable. Accused I made a disclosure statement and pointed out a place near the bank of the canal about amile or a mile and a half from the place where the trunk of the dead body had been found. Four pieces of teeth, one piece of skull bone and hair recovered from the place pointed out by accused I were found to be of human origin. There is reasonto believe that the severed head of the victim was cut to pieces at the spot. A kirpan was also recovered in consequence of the disclosure statement made by accused 1, but the High Court placed no reliance on this discovery as it was not known to whom the place of recovery belonged. A chaddar was recovered from accused 1 at the time of his arrest. The chaddar had been washed but on examination by the chemical examiner and seriologist it was found that it had stains of human blood. Both accused 1 and 5 had a strongmotivefor the murder. Though the courts below discarded a part of the prosecution story and gave the benefit of doubt to four accused, they were justified in accepting the prosecution case regarding the participation of accused 1 and 5 in the attack on the victim. The Sessions Judge convicted accused 1 and 5 of the offences under ss. 302 and 201 read with s. 149 of the Indian Penal Code and sentenced them to death and five years rigorous imprisonment.The High Court altered the convictions to those under ss. 302 and 20 read with s. 34 of the Indian Penal Code and confirmed the sentences. Accused 1 and 5 have now filed this appeal to this Court.

The High Court recorded the following finding: ,lm15

The finding, therefore, in concurrencewith

that of the learned trial Judge, is that six

persons, of whom appellant Dyal Singh of Dalla

was armed with a spear and was riding on a

mare and the five others were armedwith

Kirpans,including appellant Jagir Singh of

Purana Pind, arrived at the threshing floor of

Amar Singh P.W. 1, that there Tarlok Singh

deceased received injuries at their 259

hands, a particular injury in the head region

having been caused by appellant Jagir Singh of

Purana Pind, that when Tarlok Singh deceased

was almost dead or near death, his deadbody

was placed on the mare in front of appellant

Dyal Singh of Dalla, and six culprits, includ-

ing the two appellants, then left the

threshing floortowards the nearby canal

minor, and that at a distance of about one

mile from the village on the bank of the canal

minor the body of Tarlok Singh deceased was

thrown on the ground, the head was cutoff,

and while appellant Dyal Singh of Dalla and

another culprit carried the head on the mare,

the remaining four culprits accompanied them,

and thus all the six culprits, including the

two appellants, escaped.So the six culprits,

including the two appellants came together

armed, committed the murder of Tarlok Singh

deceased, were together when his head was cut

off and then departed together with thehead

of Tarlok Singh deceased being carried by

appellant Dyal Singh of Dalla and another on a

mare. It is obvious that what was done by all

the six persons, including the two appellants,

was done in furtherance of their common

intention to murder Tarlok Singh deceased,

which common intention was carried outwith

determination and it is a caseof gruesome

murder.It is a clear case to which sec. 34

applied...... Taking into consideration the

manner and method of murder of Tarlok Singh

deceasedby the appellants and theirfour

companions as a whole from start to theend,

the appellants, about whose identity there is

no manner of doubt whatsoever, cannot escape

the consequences of the act of all the six

persons merely because in the case of three of

those who have been acquittedthe learned

Judge has not been satisfied as to their

identity and the fourth he has acquitted on a

consideration that as no corroboration is

available as to him of the witnesses he may be

given the benefit of doubt. The matter might

have been different if the learned Judge had

disbelieved the witnesses with regard to those

four persons, but this he has not done. The charge against the six accusedincluding the two appellants was that they were members ofan unlawful assembly whose common object was to commit the murder of TarlokSingh deceased and that they in prosecution ofthis commonobject committed the murder. The materials on the recordshow clearly that the murder was committed by six culprits including the two appellants in furtherance of the commonintention of all. In the circumstances, though the appellants were charged of an offence under ss. 302/149, they could be convicted under ss. 302/34. No prejudice was L5Sup.CI/67-4 260 causedto the appellants by the alteration of the charge from an offence under ss. 302/149 to one under s. 302/34. The contention of the appellants is that in a case where six named accused persons, A, B, C, D, E and F are charged under s. 302 read with s. 34 of the Indian Penal Code for committing the murder of G and the evidence is directed to establish that the said six persons have taken part in the murderand it is not known who gave the fatal blow, on the acquittal of C, D, E and F the remaining two accused A and B cannot be convicted of the offence under s. 302 read with s. 34. We are unable to agree with this contention. As it is not known that A or B gave the fatal blow they cannot be convicted under s. 302. Nor is it possible to find that A and Btogether with C, D, E and F jointly committed the murder. Since C, D, E and F have been acquitted of the chargethey could not have participated inthe murder. Unless the court can find that other unidentified assailants together with A and B took part in the murder, A and Bmust be acquitted of the offence under s. 302 read with s. 34. But if the court can, on a proper appraisal of the evidence find that there were six assailants,the witnesseswere mistaken as to the identity of C, D, E and F, andfour unknown culprits together with A and B took part in the murderin furtherance of the common intention of all, the court can convict A and B of the offence under s. 302read with s. 34. Though it is not known who gave the fatal blow, each of the assailants including A and B is responsible for the murder as if it was committed by him alone. In Bharwad Mepa Dana and another v. State of Bombay(1) 12 named persons including the two appellants were charged with offences under s. 302 read with ss. 149 and 34 of the Indian Penal Code. The Sessions Judge acquitted seven of the accused but convicted five under s. 302 read with s. 149 and s. 302 read with s. 34. On appeal, the High Court acquitted one of the five convicted personsbut maintained the conviction and sentence of the appellants and the two others. The High Court held that there were ten to thirteen persons in the unlawful assembly though the identity of all the persons except four had not been established, all these persons had the common object and the common intention ,of killing the victims and the killing was done in prosecution of the common object of the unlawful assembly and in furtherance of the common intention of all. This Court affirmed the convictions and sentences. It held that there was no difficulty in the application of s. 34 of the Indian Penal Code as the number of the convicted persons wasfour and there was a clear finding that they shared the common intention with some others whoseidentity was not established. Even if it was not known which parti(1) 49602 S.C.R. 172 261 cular person or persons gave the fatal blows, owe itwar. found that the murders were committed in furtherance of the commonintention of all, each one of all suchpersons was liableas though the murders had been committed by him alone.Section 34 is intended to meet a case where members of a party acted in furtherance of the common intention of all but it was difficult to prove exactly the part played by each of them.The principle which the section embodies is the participation insome action with the intention of committing a crime; once such participation isestablished, s. 34 is at once attracted.

The case of Prabhu Babaji Navle v. State of Bombay(1) is distinguishable. There the appellant Was charged under S. 302 read with s. 34 with four named persons. The,four otherswere acquitted. This Court held that the appellant alone could not be convicted of the offence under s. 302 read with S. 34. On the facts of that case,it was not possible to reach a conclusion that the appellant shared a common intention with other unknown person or persons. The case of Krishna Govind Patil v. State of Maharashtra(2) is also distinguishable. Them,four accused personswere charged unders. 302 read with S. 34. The High Court acquitted accused 1,3 and 4 on the ground that it was doubtful whether anyone of them participated in the commission of the offence and yet convicted accused 2 on the groundthat one or more of them might have participated in the offence.The finding recorded by the High Court was legally impossible. Having found that accused 1, 3 and 4 did not take part in the offence, the High Court could not find that one or more of them might have participated in the offence with accused 2. There was not a single observation in the judgment of the High Court to indicate that any person or persons other than the named accusedparticipated in the offence. In these circumstances, this Court set aside the conviction of accused 2.

In the present case, the Courts below have recorded the clear findingthat accused 1 and 5 participated in the offence with four other unknown culprits. Though six named persons were charged with the offence, there was a mistake in the identity of three of the accused and with regard to another accused, thebenefit of doubt was given as no independent corroboration was available. But it admits of no doubt that Tarlok Singhwas attacked and brutally -murdered on April 27, 1965 by six culprits. Accused 1 and 5 were two of the six culprits who participated in the attack. The murder was committed by six culprits including accused 1 and 5 in furtherance of the common intention of all. Accused 1 and 5 shared the common intention with the four other culprits whose identity has not been established. Though it is not known which

(1) A.I.R. 1956 S.C. 51.

(2) 1964 1 S.C.R. 678. 262 particular person or persons gave the fatal blow it is clear that the murder was committed by six culprits including accused 1 and 5 in furtherance of the common intention of all and each of them is liable for the murder as though it had been committed by him alone.

Accused 1 and 5 were rightly convicted of the offence under s. 302 read with S. 34 of the Indian Penal Code. The murder was ruthless and cold-blooded. There are no extenuating circumstances.They were rightly sentenced to death.They were also rightly convicted and sentenced forthe offence under s. 201 read with s. 34 of the Indian Penal Code. The appeal is dismissed.

Y.P. Appeal

dismissed. 263
**********', 2] , 
[ 'CROSS CITATION
1968 SC 832 (9)
1959 SCR 1210

CRIMINAL APPELLATE JURISDICTION: Criminal

Appeal No. 77 of 1958.

Appealby special leave from the judgment andorder dated February 26, 1958, of the Punjab High Courtin Criminal Appeal No. 860 of 1957, arising out 155 1220 of the judgment and order dated December 23, 1957, of the Additional Sessions Judge at Ambala in Sessions No. 20 of 1957 and Trial No. 32 of 1957.

Harnam Singh and Sadhu Singh, for the appellant. Har Parshad and T. M. Sen, for the respondent. 1958. September 2. The Judgment of the Court was delivered by

IMAM J.-The appellant and one Prem were tried for the murder of Nirmala Devi, wife of Banwari Lal, a Practising lawyer at Rupar.The appellant was sentenced to death while Prem was sentenced to imprisonment for life. The appellant andPrem appealed against their conviction and sentence to theHigh Court of Punjab. Their appeals were dismissed and their conviction and sentence were affirmed by theHigh Court. The appellantobtained from this Court special leave to appealand in the present appeal the only question for consideration is whether the appellant was rightly convicted and sentenced for the murder of Nirmala Devi.The case of Prem is not before us.

At Rupar, Banwari Lal practised as a lawyer. His wife, the deceased Nirmala Devi lived with him there with their child, eight months old. With them also lived --Banwari Lals sister Vina, a girl of about 16 to 17 years of age. Banwari Lal had employed Prem as a servant about four months before the murder of Nirmala Devi on February 12, 1957. ThisPrem was a youngster of about fourteen years of age at that time. According to the prosecution, lie was an associate of the appellant who was posted at Rupar in the capacity of a footconstable in the police force. Theappellant andPrem became friendly and it is said that the appellant had an eye on the ornaments of the deceased Nirmala Devi, which she was in the habit of wearing when she went out. The deceased was a young person in her twenties and of good character. She used to be left alone in the house with herchild,when Banwari Lal went to court and Vina went to school. Prem, however, used to remain at the house. It is the case of the prosecution that the appellant in 1221 conspiracy with Prem took advantage of the deceased being alone in the house, when the appellant went upstairs and killedNirmala Devi and stole her ornaments, whilePrem remained down-stairs with her child. Vina had returned from schoolround about, 12-30 in the afternoon as it was the recesstime. At that time Nirmala Devi was in the drawing room feeding her child. Prem was also at the house atthat time.Vina again returned to the house at about 3-45p.m. She enquired from Prem as to where Nirmala Devi was and was told by him that he did not know as he himself hadbeen absentfrom the house. Vina, thereafter, went upstairs to the kitchen to take her food. Banwari Lal had returned from court at about 3-15 p.m., earlier than usual, as he had to attend an election meeting at the Municipal Office. He was accompanied by a pleader Sudarshan Kumar Jain who was going to Chandigarh. He had intended to give him a cup oftea, but finding the door leading through the staircase to the residential portion looked and thinking that his wife was not at home, lie and his friend left for the Municipal Hall. Banwari Lal returned to his house at about 4-45 p.m. He enquired from Prem as to where his wife was and was informed by him that she had gone out. He went upstairs and saw his sisterVina eating her food. On opening the drawing room, however, Banwari Lal was stunned to find his wife lying dead on the floorin a pool of blood. lie noticed several injuries on her and that some of her jewellery was missing. He proceeded to the police station almost opposite to his house and lodged a First Information Report about the murder at 5 p.m.

There can be no manner of doubt that an audacious and a brutal murder of a young and a defenceless person had taken place with the intention of robbing her of her ornaments. The fact of murder has been apply proved and has notbeen seriously questioned. The only matter for consideration is Whether the evidence established that the deceased Nirmala Devi was murdered by the appellant with the assistance of Prem.

The evidence upon which the prosecution relied for 1222 conviction is the confession of Prem, the statement of the appellant which led to therecovery of the ornaments belonging to Nirmala Devi from the possession of one Raj Rani a mistress of the appellant, the recovery of a bloodstained dagger from his belongings at the police station and his conduct after the murder.

So far as the confession of Prem was concerned, it was retracted by him in the Court of Session. Prems statement under s. 342 to the Committing Magistrate, however, which had been brought on to the record under s. 287 of theCode of Criminal Procedure, clearly stated that the confession was a voluntary one. Indeed, his statement to the Committing Magistrate showed that the crime was committed by the appellantand that Prem had assistedhim in the commission of that crime. Although in the Court of Session Prem had retracted his confession, his memorandum of appeal in the High Court would indirectly suggest that theconfession made by him was voluntary and true. Before we consider whether the confession was a voluntary and atrue one, it is necessary to deal with the submission on behalf of the appellant that the confession, having been retracted by Prem, is irrelevant so far as the appellant is concerned as the retracted confession of an accused cannot beused against his co-accused.

Although on behalf of the appellant it had not been argued that the retracted confession of Prem was inadmissible, we regardthe submission that it was irrelevant and cannot be used against the appellant as tantamount to saying thesame thing.Section 30 of the Indian Evidence Act states:  When more persons than one are being tried jointly for the same offence, and a confession made by one of such persons affecting himself and some other of such persons is proved, the Court may take into consideration such confession as against such other person as well as against the person who makes such confession.

It will be clear from the terms of this section that where more persons than one are being tried jointly for thesame offence, a confession made by any one of them affecting himself and any one of his co-accused 1223 can be takeninto consideration by the court notonly against the maker of the confession but also against his coaccused. TheEvidence Act nowhere provides that if the confession is retracted, it cannot betakeninto consideration againstthe co-accused or the confessing accused. Accordingly, the provisions of the Evidence Act do not prevent the Court from taking into consideration a retracted confession against the confessing accused and his co-accused. Not a single decision of any of the courts in India was placed before usto show thata retracted confession was not admissible in evidence or that it was irrelevant as against a co-accused. An examination of the reported decisions of the various High Courts in India indicates that the preponderance of opinion is in favour of the view that although it may be taken into consideration against a co-accused by virtue of the provisions of s. 30 of the Indian Evidence Act, its value was extremely weak and there could be no conviction with out thefullest and strongest corroboration on material particulars. The corroboration in the full sense implies corroboration not only as to the factum of the crime but also as to the connection ofthe (co-accused with that crime. In our opinion, there appears to be considerable justification for this view. The amount of credibility to be attached to a retracted confession, however, would depend upon the circumstances of each particular case.Although a retracted confession is admissible against a co-accused by virtue of s. 30 of the Indian Evidence Act, as a matterof prudence and practice a court would not ordinarily act upon it to convict a co-accused without corroboration. On this basis it is now to be seen whether the confession was voluntary and true. It will then be necessary to consider whether the confession has received full and strong corroboration in material particularsboth as to the crime and the appellants connection with that crime.

It was strongly urged that the police had adopted a device to get the accused Prem into their custody again on a charge of theft as lie had already been placed in the judicial lock-up after his arrest in 1224 connection with the murder of the deceased Nirmala Devi. He was arrested on June 25, 1957, in connection with a burglary which had taken place on December 5, 1956, and he hadbeen since then in police custody in connection with the investigation of that case until July 10, 1957, the last day of remand to police custody. On July 10, 1957, Prem made a confession before a Magistrate concerning the murder of Nirmala Devi.Prem was discharged in the burglary case on July 20, 1957. Having adopted this device of gettingPrem into police custody the police were in aposition to exercise great influence upon Prem, a, young lad of about 14 years of age. When lie made his confession on July 10, 1957, he must have been still labouring under the influence of the police and sufficient time was not given by the Magistrate to remove that influence. The Magistrate ought not to have recorded his confession on July 10, 1957. He ought to have remanded Prem to jail custody for a fewdays in order that the police influence may be removed from his mind. We have examined the record and find no justification for the suggestion made that the police adopted a device to got the accused Prem in to their custody again by arresting him in the burglary case of December 5, 1956.It istrue that the accused Prem was discharged from the burglarycase on July 20, 1957, but there is nothing on the present record to suggest that his arrest in the burglary case of December 5, 1956, was without justification and that it wasdone purelyfor the purpose of getting him backinto police custody. It is true that Prem had been in police custody from June 25, 1957 to July 10, 1957,and the Magistrate might as well have refrained from recording his confession on July 10, 1957. It is clear, however, from the record of the Magistrate that at 1 p.m. the accused Prem was produced before him by the police for the recording of his confession. The Magistrate told him that lie was not a policeofficer but a Magistrate and that he was at liberty to think over the matter whether he would volunteer tomake a confession and gave him time, until 2 p.m. forthis purpose. He further explained to Prem that he should 1225 consider himself quite free and not make a statement under the influenceor temptation of anybody. At2 p.m. the Magistrate took various precautions. All the doors and the windows of his room were closed. Everyone, except Prem, was turned out. The police were asked to stand in the verandah from where they could not see Prem. Prem was againtold that he must regard himself as quite free and should not be under the influence of the police oranybody else. The Magistrate then put a series of questions which havebeen recorded in the form of questions and answers.By question 7, the Magistrate enquired how long Prem had been in police custody and from where he bad been brought that day, to which,the answer was that some 5 months back he hadbeen arrested since then sometimes he had been sent to jail and sometimes had been kept in police custody. Byquestion 8, the Magistrate asked whether he was kept awake duringthat period or had been given greased diet (Mnaggan giza, etc.), which we understand to mean whether he had been given greasy food which would induce a sleepy condition in persons eating such food, to which question he replied that he had enjoyed regular sleepand had been taking common diet. At the beginning, of course, the police had kept himawake. The Magistrate also enquired whether the police or any other person had made any promise or had given any undertaking to help Prem orhad given alltemptation tohim or had influenced or frightened him. If so, he should statethis fully from his heart, to which Prem replied that he had not been given any promise, temptation or inducement, nor was he subjected to fear or exhortation. He had been merely asked to make a true statement. Prem then said that he would make his statement of his own free will and the Magistrate could believe him or not. The Magistrate also asked Prem whether any one had beaten him or if there was any mark of injury on his body, to which, the answer was no. The Magistrate then examined the body of Prem and found that there was no mark of injury on his person. The Magistrate then asked as to why he was making a confession, to which, Prem answered 1226 that he was doing so of his own free will and to lessen the burdenof his heart. The nature of the questions put and the manner in which the Magistrate examined Prem clearly showedthat the Magistrate took every precaution to be satisfied whether Prem was going to makea voluntary statement. We are satisfied that during the period of policecustody between the 25th of June and July 10, 1957, Prem was not induced to make a confession. He made the confession voluntarily. That the confession was voluntary finds supportfrom Prems statement to the Committing Magistrate under s. 342 of the Code of Criminal Procedure. In that statement Prem told the Magistrate in answer to various questions the following story: He had been employed as a domestic servant by the lawyer Banwari Lal. He had developed during this period friendship with the appellant. The appellanthad told him that he would commit rape on Nirmala Devi and would rob her of her ornaments and, if she resisted, he would murder her.He informed the appellant on February 11, 1957, that Nirmala -Devi would be alone in her house at about mid -day on February12, 1957. He had received on February 11, 1957, a dagger wrapped in a pajama from the appellant and bad kept it in the store behind the office of Banwari Lal On February 12, 1957, he informed the appellant that Nirmala Devi was alone in the house. He had handedover the dagger and the pajama to the appellant on February 12, after taking it out of the store room. The appellant hadsought his assistance in the commission of rape, robberyand murder of Nirmala Devi and he hadbeen promised a half share in the booty. To the question whether he had kept watch over the house of Banwari Lal when the appellant entered it for committing rape, robbery and murder of Nirmala Devi, Prem answered that he was made to stand near the stair-case by the appellant and that he kept watch while the appellant committed the crime.He finally admitted to the Committing Magistrate that the confession which had been recorded on July 10, 1957, wasa voluntary confession. When asked whether he had to say anything else, Prem told the Committing 1227 Magistrate that he had made a true statement before him and also in the Court of the Magistrate who had recorded his confession. Shorn of details the substance of the story told by Prem to the Committing Magistrate is in keeping with the substance of his confession recorded on July 10, 1957. It is to be further remembered that the statement of Prem to the Committing Magistrate was brought on to the record of the Court of Session under s. 287 of the Codeof Criminal Procedure which directs that the statement should be read as evidence. Although Prem retracted the confession in the Court of Session, his memorandum of appeal filed in the High Court showed that he had acted under the influence of the appellant and had been allured by him to achieve his object. He, however, pleaded that be should not have receivedsuch severepunishment. On the contrary, lie should havebeen acquitted. These circumstances clearly indicate that the confession recorded on July 10, 1957, wasa voluntary confession. It remains now to be seen whether it was a truthful confession.

Prem assertedin his confession that he hadacquaintance with the appellant previous to the appellants posting to Rupar and their association continued at Rupar. There is nothing inherently improbable in this story of Prem. It is true that there is not much evidence to corroborate Prem. that lie andthe appellant were acquainted and used to associate. Banwari Lal had seen them talking to each other once or twice before the murder. The police station at which the appellant was posted was almost opposite to the house of Banwari Lal where Prem was employed as a servant and there was every probability of the appellant andPrem meeting. It is significant that on the day of murder of Nirmala Devi,in the afternoon, Prem was present in the compound of the police station with a child in a perambulator.Foot-constableGurbachan Singh, P.W. 4, enquired from Prem as to why he had gone inside the police station. On this the appellant asked Gurbachan Singh not to remonstrate with Prem as he was a mere, boy. Gurbachan 156 1228 Singh had stated that previously he had never seenPrem going inside the police station with a perambulater. The intervention of the appellant suggests that he knew Prem and was friendly towards him. Prems story that he was employed as a servant by Banwari Lal is corroborated by the evidence of Banwari Lal himself, his sister Vina and his clerk Naranjan Das. In the nature of things there could be no corroboration of Prems story about the appellants proposal to rape and rob Nirmala Devi and, if necessary, to murder her. According to Prems confession a day before the murder he had been given a dagger by the appellant along with a _pajama and that Prem took the pajama and the dagger to the upper storey of Banwari Lals house having concealed it in the kothri of firewood which was near the office room of Banwari Lal. This part of his story receives corroboration from the evidence of Banwari Lal that after the murder he had found a blood-stained pajama, Exbt. P. 14, banging on the door of the store room which is at the back of the residential portion of the house. Banwari Lal is supported by Nand Lal, P.W. 34, Motor Mobile Patrol Sub-Inspector, who recorded the First Information of Banwari Lal.According to him, he found the pajama hanging on one of the shutters of an almirah fixed in the wall in the fuel room situate at the back of the room where Nirmala Devi was foundlying dead. It was bloodstained. Banwari Lal had clearlystatedthat this pajama did not belong to him or any one in his house. The existenceof the pajama in Banwari Lalshouse lends corroboration to the story of Prem that he had been given this pajama and that he had concealed it in the kothri of fire-wood near the office of Banwari Lal. The statement of Prem that hehad asked Raj sabziwala to bring down the perambulator of the child and that he did so, finds corroboration from the evidence of Gurbachan Singh that in the afternoon he found Prem accused in the police station with a child in a perambulator.

The presence of the accused Prem at Banwari Lals house near about the time of the murder appears to 1229 be clear. When Vina had left for herschool at 9-45 a.m., Prem was in the house. Vina returned to the house from her school at about 12-30 noon. At that time Prem was present in the verandah in front of the office. When she finally returned from the school at about 3-45 p.m., apparently Prem was not in the house but arrived shortly thereafter. The murder was committed at any time between 12-30 p.m. and 2-15 p.m. if the appellant was the murderer, because Gurbachan Singhs evidence showed that the appellant was at the thana at 2-15 p.m. Apparently, the appellant went out with Gurbachan Singh and returned to the thana with him in time for Gurbachan Singh to be on duty from 3 p.m. If the appellant was the murderer he must have committed the murder before2-15 p.m. Nirmala Devi was alive at 12-30 p.m.when Vina saw her feeding her child. Assuming that Vina did not stay long, as she had come to get some money to purchase a copy-book, itwould not be unreasonable toassumethat Nirmala Devi was alive up to 12-40or 12-45 p.m. The interval of time between that and 2-15 p.m., when the appellant wasseen at the police station, is about 1 1/2 hours.It would be probable that during this time Prem was present in the house and when he says that lie was present there there is no inherent improbability in his statement. At 3-45 p.m., when Vina arrived, no doubt Prem was not in the house, but he came shortly thereafter and Vina took from him the child of Nirmala Devi.This clearly shows that Prem had gone out of the house with the child of NirmalaDevi which one would not normally expect him to do at thattime of the day, if Nirmala Devi had left the house to do shopping or to visit anyone.If Nirmala Devi was in the house and alive it was most unlikely that Prem accused would have taken her child out of the house. Prems statement that he was amusing the child while the appellant was doing his nefarious work appears to be true, because the child was with him and he had been seen at the police station with a child in a perambulator. If the circumstances tend toshow that in all probability Prem was in the house from 12-30 p.m. to 2-15 p.m. then his 1230 story that he was present at the house when the appellant came there appears to be a truthful statement. It is significant that when Vina arrived at the house at 3-45 p.m. she found the door of the stair-caselocked. WhenPrem arrived she saw the key in his hand, although Prem hadsaid it was lying on the floor. He opened the lock of thedoor of the stair-case with that key and Vinia went upstairs to the second floor where she went to the kitchen and took her food.When Banwari Lal arrived at his house at about3-15 p.m. he found his office room locked from outside. He wanted to go to the residential portion for taking tea, but found the door of the stair-case locked from outside. Finding the door of the stair-case leading to the residential portion of his house locked, he came down and went away in connection with the election work. On his returnhe enquired from Prem about the whereabouts of his wife and Prem told him that she had gone out. He wished to go upstairs to the residential portion of the house and Prem at his request opened the lock of the stair-case, the key being with him. According to Banwari Lal, the usual practice was to lock the door of the office which adjoins the stair-case and to bolt the other door from inside, but on the day of the murder the door adjoining the stair-case was looked while the other door was lying open. Banwari Lals clerk, Naranjan Das, came to the house at 4-15 or 4-30 p.m. He went up to the verandah in front of the office and found both the doors of the office locked from outside. He asked Prem to open the office, but Prem told him that the key of one of the locks which wasfixed on thedoor adjoining the stair-case, had been lost. He gave the key of the other lock and then Prem took out a key from his pocket and opened the lock fixed on the other door of the office. There is no reason to distrust all this evidence which would indicate thatafter Vina had left the house on her first visit at about 12-30 p.m. the two doors werelockedfrom outside which was something unusual and that the keys of the looks of these doors were with Prem. He had given evasive answers about the keys to Vinia and Naranjan Das 1231 while the key was in his pocket. These circumstancesalso indicate the truthfulness of Prems statement that he was present in the house during the period in which Nirmala Devi was murdered. His statement in the confession that the appellant had locked the door and had thrown the key in tile officeverandah and that while he sat there, the child, while playing, picked up the key and that he said to the girl (presumably Vina) there was the key and then he unlockedthe door appears to be true. Reference insome detailto the various statements of Prem in the confession and the circumstances proved by the evidence of various witnesses became necessary in order to ascertain whether Prem had made a truthful statement about his presence at the house during the period in which Nirmala Devi was murdered and also as to the part he had played in assisting the appellant to commit the murder. While it is true that in the confession Prem does not attribute tohimself any participation in the murder itself, it is not to beforgotten that the murder of Nirmala Devi could not have taken place without his aid.Whoever entered the house of Banwari Lal in broad day light could not have gone upstairs without the knowledgeand cooperation of Prem. According to his statement lie knew what was the intention of the appellant and to assist him in the accomplishment of his purpose he had concealedin his masters house the pajama and the daggergiven to himby the appellant. Ifhe did not actually participate in the murder he would be equally guiltyof the murder if that murder was committed with his aid and his connivance. The confession, as a whole, concerning the murder of the deceased appears to us to be true and we have no hesitation, after a very careful consideration of all the circumstances appearing in the case, in saying so. In our opinion, Prems confession was not only voluntary and true but it had been corroborated in material particulars regarding the general story told by him in his confession. The other question which now remains for consideration is whether the confession received material corroboration connecting the appellant with the murder of Nirmala Devi. 1232 Amongst the appellants possessions a dagger was recovered which appeared to be blood-stained but owing to thelong delay in sending it to the Chemical Examiner its origin could not bedetermined. From the medicalevidence it appears that the dagger in question could have inflicted the kind of injuries suffered by Nirmala Devi. Themost important corroboration, however, is the recovery of the ornaments of the deceased. These ornaments, according to Banwari Lal, she had been wearing on the day of the murder when he leftfor court. On some statement made by the appellant his mistress RajRani was visited by the authorities and in the presence of respectable witnesses some ornaments were recovered and they were identified as the ornamentsof the deceased. The evidence of RajRani also showed that these ornaments were given to her by the appellant. She apparently had no reason to depose against the appellant, because she had said in her evidence that she wishedto meet the appellant before giving clue to the ornaments and that she wished to give the ornaments to the police in his presence. The defence case was not that these ornaments did not belong to the deceased but that, on the contrary, they were hers but had been produced by Banwari Lal during the police investigation and that it was falsely alleged that they had been recovered from Raj Rani. The evidence of Charan Dass, P. W. 24, President of the Municipal Committee of Rupar, however, clearly shows that in his presence the appellant made a statement to the police to the effect that one gold kara and seven goldbangles had been given by him to Raj Rani. This statement was made on August3, 1957. His evidence also shows that on August 9, 1957, he accompanied the police party from Rupar to Jangpura and that Raj Rani took them to her sistershouse. She brought out a trunk from inside the room. She opened the lock of the trunk and produced from it a tin box which contained a gold kara and seven gold bangles. The evidence of GoriShanker, a Municipal Commissioner of Rupar is to the same effect and corroborated Charan Dass. The courts below believed these two witnesses. We have examined 1233 their evidence with some care in view of the submission on behalf of the appellant that they should not be relied upon. There is nothing in their evidence to show that they were in any way hostile to the appellant or had any motive to depose against him.The courts below having believed these witnesses, we would not ordinarily go behind their view on a question of fact. Having regard, however, to theconsequences which arise as a result of the acceptance of their evidence in this particular case, we have examined their evidence in the light of the submission made on behalf of the appellant. It was suggested that at the earlier stage the police investigation was not properly conducted and the publicwere dissatisfied. A deputation of influential persons met the Chief Minister as a result of which amore activeand thorough investigation took place. It may be that influential persons of Rupar interviewed the Chief Minister, being dissatisfied with the manner in which the investigation was taking place. There is, however, nothing to show that Charan Dass or Gori Shanker were amongst those who had interviewed the Chief Minister or that they had taken part in any agitation against the police concerning the manner of the investigation. It is difficult to believe that two responsible persons such as the President of the Municipal Committee and one of its members would go out of their way to depose to certain events which would provide very strong evidence against the appellant and lead to his conviction on a capital charge, unless they had really heard the statement of the appellant and witnessed the recovery as deposed to by them. It was then suggested that, apparently, CharanDass had no real reason to go to the police station on August 3, 1957, and, therefore, his story that he heard the appellant make the statement which led to the recovery of the ornaments was false.CharanDass, however, had statedthe reason for his visiting the police station. He went there to complain to the policethat people parked their push-carts in the bazar and thus obstructed the passage. In our opinion, as the President of the Municipal Committee of Rupar, if a nuisance was 1234 being createdby people parking their push-carts in the bazar,it was a natural thing for him to go to the police station in order to get such obstruction removed and for the policeto see that the nuisance did not continue. We can find nothing strange in the conduct of Charan Dass orGori Shanker in having gone to the police station in the circumstances deposed to by them. We have no hesitation in believing the evidence of Charan Dass and Gori Shankerthat the appellantmade a statement to the effect that he had given one gold kara and seven gold bangles to Raj Rani and that the same were recovered fromRaj Rani in their presence. It would appear, therefore, on theevidence of Raj Rani and these witnesses, that not long after the murder of Nirmala Devi the appellant was in possession of her ornaments andthat he had given them to Raj Rani. The ornaments being in possession of the appellant soon after the murder would show that he either stole the ornaments or was in possession of them knowing or having reason to believe that they were stolen properties. Nirmala Devi had been murderedby someone who had stolen her ornaments. According to the confession of Prem it was the appellant who had gone up-stairs where Nirmala Devi was Sometime after the departure of Vina. He had given the appellant the pajama and the dagger. Thereafter, the appellant left the house leaving the pajama behind. After the departure of the appellant no outsider entered the house. It is clear, therefore, that in order to steal the ornaments the thief killedNirmala Devi.The circumstances clearly indicate that the thief was no other than the appellant. It seems to us, therefore, that the confession of Prem receives strong and substantial corroboration connecting the appellantwith the crime of the murder of the deceased Nirmala Devi. The conduct of the appellant from 2-15 p.m. onwards clearly shows that he was in a disturbed state of mind which is consistent with his having committed the crime, It is curious that lie was uttering the word I Nirmala. It had been suggested to Gurbachan Singh that the AssistantSubInspector Rikhi Ram had a 1235 daughter with whom the appellant had illicit connection and that her name was Nirmala, but the witness stated that he had no knowledge about it. The appellant in his statement under s. 342 of the Code of Criminal Procedure before the Sessions Judge admitted that he was shouting out the name of Nirmala but he had a love affair with a girl named Nirmala, daughter of Rikhi Ram. We are not prepared to accept the explanation of the appellant as to how he wascalling out the name of Nirmala so soon after the murder of Nirmala Devi. This conduct of the appellant may not by itselfhave been corroboration of sufficient importance to enable a court to convict the appellant on the retracted confession of Prem. No stronger and no better corroboration, however, of the confession of Prem could be had than the evidence which showed that the appellant had been in possession of Nirmala Devis ornaments soon after her murder. There were several comments made on the evidence by the learned Advocate for the appellant, but those commentswere with reference to unimportant matters and were not at all relevant. Inan appeal byspecial leaveit is not ordinarily permissible to make submissions on questions of fact.The principalmatterwith which we havebeen concerned in this appeal was whether the confession ofPrem had been corroborated in material particulars regarding the general storytold by him and in material particulars tending to connect the appellant with the murder of the deceased. Wehave no hesitation in saying that the confession ofPrem has been amply corroborated inboth respects. Recovery of the ornaments of the deceased at the instance of the appellant incriminated him tothe fullest extentand lent the strongest corroboration to theconfession of Prem from which it was apparent that no other person than the appellant could have murdered Nirmala Devi. The appeal is accordingly dismissed.

Appealdismissed. 157 1236
**********', 2] , 
[ 'HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAWS
Penal Code, 1860
Section 396/34 - Robbery and murder at PW.1s pawn shop - On basis of confessional statements of accused R and N, jewels recovered - Said jewels identified by PW.1 as also by PW7 to PW14 who had pledged jewels with PW1 - Evidence of PW-1 corroborated by registers maintained in his Pawn shop to show that those jewels were pledged with him - Involvement of accused R and N  in commission of dacoity proved by evidence of PW-15 who recorded Rs confessional statement and PW-17.  Held, since commission of offence under Section 396 is proved against R and N, their conviction recorded by courts below under Section 396 is unassailable.
HELD
There is clear and cogent evidence against accused Raja Mohammad and Babu @ Nawab Sahib as to their involvement in the commission of dacoity by the evidence of PW-15 and PW-17 and by recovery of various items of jewels. The jewels so recovered from the accused were identified by the owner of the Pawn shop (PW-1) and PWs 7 to 14 who pledged the jewels with PW-1. Evidence of PW-1 is further corroborated by the registers maintained in his Pawn shop to show that those items of jewels were pledged in his Pawn shop. The conviction of the appellants Raja Mohammad and Babu @ Nawab Sahib under Section 396 IPC is unassailable. (Para 8)
Section 396/34 - Hostile witness - Case of murder and dacoity - Accused B and S arrested in presence of PWs.21 and 22 - These two witnesses partially turned hostile - They admitted that two accused were on bike, when intercepted by police and jewels were recovered from said bike, but failed to identify B and S. Held, as rightly held by Trial Court turning hostile of witnesses will not affect prosecutions case. Their evidence has to be read alongwith I.O. (PW37)s evidence who spoke of arrest of accused and recovery of articles. The recovered jewels were identification by PW.1, the owner of pawn shop where dacoity took place.
Section 396/34 - Murder and dacoity - Imposition of punishment - Whether companions of a dacoit who committed murder are also liable for punishment under Section 396, even though they participated only in dacoity - Section 396 prescribes punishment for both dacoity and murder. Held, all companions will be liable to be convicted, irrespective of their participation in murder. (Para 9)
Section 396 - Dacoity and murder - Sentencing under Section 302 vis-a-vis sentencing under Section 396. Held, obligation of court in the matter of imposing sentence “death or imprisonment for life” is in the same sequence both for Sections 302 and 396. Though offence under Section 396 is to be viewed with seriousness, larger discretion is vested with the court insofar as there is possibility of imposing a penalty lesser than death or imprisonment for life for conviction under Section 396. (Para 9)
Section 396/34 - Murder and dacoity - Sentencing - Sentence of 10 years RI enhanced to life imprisonment by High Court - Justification - Accused were not armed  - Accused N had sat on deceased and pressed nose and mouth and tightened his neck with rope - Incident took place in 2002. Held, on facts sentence of imprisonment for life is modified to ten years RI.
HELD
In the case, the accused were not armed. Accused Babu @ Nawab Sahib is alleged to have sat on deceased Muthukrishnan and pressed his nose and mouth and is alleged to have tightened his neck with the rope. The occurrence was of the year 2002. Considering the long lapse of time and the facts and circumstances of the case, the sentence of imprisonment for life is modified as ten years as directed by the trial court. (Para 10)
While maintaining the conviction under Section 396 IPC, the sentence of imprisonment imposed upon the appellants-Basheer, Shajahan and Babu @ Nawab Sahib is modified as ten years of imprisonment and the appeals are partly allowed. Since the appellants are stated to be in custody for more than ten years, the appellants are ordered to be released forthwith, if not required in any other case. (Para 11)

CASES REFERRED
1.  Dinesh alias Buddha v. State of Rajasthan JT 2006 (3) SC 66 (Para 10)


R. BANUMATHI, J.
1. These appeals arise out of the common judgment passed by the High Court of Madras in Criminal Appeal Nos. 69, 1096 and 1097 of 2006 allowing the appeal preferred by the State thereby enhancing the sentence of imprisonment from ten years to imprisonment for life for the conviction under Section 396 IPC.
2. Briefly stated case of the prosecution is that on the intervening night of 13/14.11.2002 at about 01.30 a.m., the appellants accused Basheer (A1), Shajahan (A2) and Babu @ Nawab Sahib (A4) along with two other accused Raja Mohammad (A3) and Balu @ Balasubramanian (A5) with common intention to commit robbery in a Pawn Broking shop under the name of Peri owned by PW-1 Muthaiyah. In the course of committing robbery, Shajahan (A2) is alleged to have tightly held the legs of deceased Muthukrishnan who was sleeping inside the shop and Babu @ Nawab Sahib (A4) is alleged to have sat on his chest and constricted his neck and tied the jute rope around the neck of Muthukrishnan and strangled him to death. Other accused robbed jewellery about 4.788 kg. of gold and 5.595 kg. of silver total worth about Rs.12,00,000/-. On 13.11.2002 at about 05.30 a.m., Chellam-PW-4 employed as the sweeper at the Pawn shop came to the house of PW-1 and informed him that Muthukrishnan was found dead in his shop. PW-1 lodged the complaint in Mandharakuppam Police Station, based on which, police had registered a case in Crime No.257 of 2002 under Sections 457, 380 and 302 IPC. PW-37-SHO had taken up the investigation. On 06.02.2003 at about 11.00 p.m. Raja Mohammad (A3) was arrested near Panrutti bus stand and his confession statement was recorded in the presence of Vasan-PW-15, based on which, a sum of Rs.46,000/- was recovered from Raja Mohammad (A3). Confession statement of accused Raja Mohammad led to recovery of thirty pair of silver anklets, golden necklace and chain from Noorudheen who was identified by accused Raja Mohammad under Ex.P21. Confession statement of accused Raja Mohammad led to further recovery of silver anklets, golden rings, necklace and totally twelve items of jewels from KVM Jewellery at Kallakurichi under Ex.P23. Confession statement of accused Raja Mohammad also led to recovery of seventeen pair of silver anklets, twenty pair of silver pattadai anklets and a golden chain from his house at Pudupet in Vridhachalam.
3. Accused Raja Mohammad took the police and PW-15 to Alichakudi village and on being identified by him, Babu @ Nawab Sahib (A4) was arrested. Based on the confession statement of accused Babu @ Nawab Sahib, seventeen items of jewels were recovered from the house of his mother’s sister under Ex.P28. Based on the confession statement of Babu @ Nawab Sahib (A4), the police went to Mumbai where numbers of items of jewels were recovered from the house of his uncle and also from a jewellery shop named Panchaseel Jewellery.
4. On 06.02.2003 at wee hours at about 01.30 a.m. appellants Basheer (A1) and Shajahan (A2) were proceeding on a TVS-50 motor cycle and on being intercepted by the police, the appellants started running and the police caught hold of them. Based on the confession statements of accused Basheer and Shajahan, jewels kept in the cover on the petrol tank of the said TVS-50 vehicle, were recovered by the police. On the basis of the information from the informers, PW-37 arrested Balu @ Balasubramanian (A5) in front of his house at Meyapalayur village on 08.02.2003 at about 04.00 a.m. His confession statement led to recovery of golden jewels from a jewellery shop at Chidambaram. Confession statement of accused Balu @ Balasubramanian further led to recovery of gold jewels from his house (Ex.P33). On completion of investigation, chargesheet was filed against the accused under Sections 457, 395, 396 and 302 read with 34 IPC.
5. In the trial court, prosecution has examined thirty seven witnesses, including PW-1-owner of the Pawn shop, PW-2 and PW-3 working under PW-1 and other witnesses. Upon consideration of evidence, the trial court convicted all the five accused inter alia under Section 396 IPC read with Section 34 IPC and sentenced them to undergo rigorous imprisonment for ten years. The trial court held that in view of the conviction of the accused under Section 396 IPC, conviction of the accused under Section 302 IPC was not necessary.
6. Being aggrieved by the conviction, accused Shajahan and Raja Mohammad filed appeals before the High Court which came to be dismissed. In the appeal filed by the State, for conviction under Section 396 IPC, the High Court enhanced the sentence of imprisonment from ten years to imprisonment for life. The High Court did not go into the question of conviction of the accused under Section 302 IPC.
7. We have heard the learned counsel for both the parties and perused the materials on record.
8. There is clear and cogent evidence against accused Raja Mohammad and Babu @ Nawab Sahib as to their involvement in the commission of dacoity by the evidence of PW-15 and PW-17 and by recovery of various items of jewels. The jewels so recovered from the accused were identified by the owner of the Pawn shop (PW-1) and PWs 7 to 14 who pledged the jewels with PW-1. Evidence of PW-1 is further corroborated by the registers maintained in his Pawn shop to show that those items of jewels were pledged in his Pawn shop. The conviction of the appellants Raja Mohammad and Babu @ Nawab Sahib under Section 396 IPC is unassailable.
9. Accused Basheer and Shajahan were arrested in the presence of PW-21-Anbalagan and PW-22-Vijayarangan who partially turned hostile. In his evidence, PW-21 stated that two persons were coming on the TVS-50 and on being intercepted by the police, they started running and those persons were chased and were caught by the police and the police recovered jewels from the cover kept on the petrol tank of the said vehicle. Though PWs 21 and 22 have spoken about the two persons and recovery of jewels from the said two wheeler, they have not identified accused Basheer and Shajahan. As observed by the trial court, case of the prosecution is not discredited, merely because PWs 21 and 22 have turned hostile so far as identification of accused. As pointed out by the trial court, evidence of PWs 21 and 22 is to be read along with the evidence of Investigating Officer (PW-37) who has clearly spoken about Basheer and Shajahan were proceeding on the two wheeler TVS-50 and also spoken about the arrest and recovery of jewels. The jewels recovered from Basheer and Shajahan were also identified by PW-1-owner of the Pawn shop. The fact that PWs 21 and 22 turned hostile does not affect the prosecution case as to the involvement of Basheer and Shajahan in the commission of the offence of dacoity. Section 396 IPC prescribes punishment for dacoity with murder. In the course of commission of dacoity, if a dacoit commits murder, all his companions who are conjointly committing dacoity, are liable to be convicted under Section 396 IPC, although they may have no participation in the murder beyond the fact of participation in the dacoity. The obligation of the court in the matter of imposing the sentence - “death or imprisonment for life” is in the same sequence both for Sections 302 IPC and 396 IPC. Though the offence under Section 396 IPC is to be viewed with seriousness, for the conviction under Section 396 IPC, larger discretion is vested with the court insofar as there is possibility of imposing a penalty lesser than death or imprisonment for life for the conviction under Section 396 IPC.
10. Placing reliance upon Dinesh alias Buddha v. State of Rajasthan JT 2006 (3) SC 66, the High Court took the view that commission of murder in the course of dacoity is to be viewed with seriousness. We are also of the view that the offence under Section 396 IPC is to be viewed with seriousness, especially, when the dacoits are armed. But in the case in hand, the accused were not armed. Accused Babu @ Nawab Sahib is alleged to have sat on deceased Muthukrishnan and pressed his nose and mouth and is alleged to have tightened his neck with the rope. The occurrence was of the year 2002. Considering the long lapse of time and the facts and circumstances of the case, the sentence of imprisonment for life is modified as ten years as directed by the trial court.
11. While maintaining the conviction under Section 396 IPC, the sentence of imprisonment imposed upon the appellants-Basheer, Shajahan and Babu @ Nawab Sahib is modified as ten years of imprisonment and the appeals are partly allowed. Since the appellants are stated to be in custody for more than ten years, the appellants are ordered to be released forthwith, if not required in any other case.
**********', 2] , 
[ 'CROSS CITATION
1963 SCR (3) 331

CRIMINAL APPElLATE JURISDICTION : Criminal Appeal No. 76 of 1962. Appeal from the judgment and order dated December 22, 1961, of the Patna High Court in Criminal Appeal No. 118 of1961 and death Reference No. 2 of 1961.

M. S. K. Sastri for the appellant,

D. P. Singh and D. Gupta, for the respondent. 1962. May 4. The judgment of the Court was delivered by GAJENDRAGADKAR, J.-The appellant Mahabir Gope alongwith eleven other persons was charged before the First Additional Sessions Judge, Bhagalpur with having committed offences under ss.147 333 and 302 readwith a. 34 of the Indian Penal Code. The prosecution case was that on or about the 12th day of June, 1959, the appellant and the other accused persons formed themselves into an unlawful assembly at Bhagalpur Special Central Jail and in prosecution of the common object of the said assembly, Rambilash Singh, the ChiefHead Warder Mohammed Ilyas and Panchand Panjiare, the night Watchmen, were assaulted. That is how an offence under s.147 was committed by the members of the said unlawful assembly. The prosecution case further was that on or about thesaid date and at the same place, in prosecution of the common object of the said assembly, the members of the assembly had committed an offence of rioting with deadly weapons while the Chief Head Warder and the two night Watchmenwere assaulted, and thereby all the members of the assembly rendered themselves liable to be punished under s. 148 of the Indian Penal Code.

The third charge- framed against the members of the unlawful assembly was that in furtherance of the common object of the said assembly, Rambilash Singh was intentionally assaulted by some of the members of the assembly with a view to cause his death and that made all the members of the assembly liable under s.302/34 I.P.C.

Against the appellant, an additional charge was framed under s.303,I.P.C. Under this charge, the prosecution case was that since the appallent had committed an offence punishable unders.302/34 whilst he was undergoing sentence of imprisonment for life, he rendered himself liable to be punished only with death under s. 303.

The learned trial Judge has convicted the appellant of the offences charged and acting under s.303, has sentenced him to death. For the purpose 334 of this appeal, it is unnecessary to refer to the findings made by the learned trial Judge in regard to the prosecution case against the other members of the unlawful assembly. The appellantchallenged the correctness of the order of conviction and sentence thus passed against him by preferring anappealin the High Court atPatna. The sentence of death imposed on him was also referred to the High Court for confirmation. The High Court has confirmed the sentence of death and dismissed the appeal preferred by the appellant.It is against this order that the appellant has come to this Court by special leave; and the only point on which special leave has been granted is in regard to the scope and effect of the provisions of s.303 of the Indian Penal Code. That is how the narrow point which arises for our decision is whether the case of the appellant who has been convicted under s.302/34 in thepresent case falls under s. 303.

Mr. M.S.K. Sastri for the appellant contends that s. 303 can apply only to a case where an accused person who is already undergoing a sentence of imprisonment for life commits murder and is convicted of it.He emphasises the factthat s.303 can be applied only where at the subsequent trial, the prisoner is found to have committed another murder. The expression commits murder used in s. 303 implies that the prisoner musthave himself committed the murder andthus becameliable to be convicted under s.302 without recourse to s.34; and since in the present case, the appellant has been convicted not because it is found that be himself committed themurder of Rambilash Singh, but he hasbeen found constructively guilty of murder and is convicted under s. 302/34 onthe ground that the said murder hadbeen committed in furtherance of the common intention of all the accused persons. 335 It istrue that the courts belowhave convicted the appellant under s.302/34 and it is in the light of thesaid conviction that the point raised by Mr. Sastri has to be considered.

For the purpose of s. 303, when can it be said that a person has committed a murder? Is it necessary that a personmust be proved to have himself committed the murder before s. 303 can be invoked against him, or would it be enough if it is shown that the person is constructively guilty of murder under s.302/34 ? The appellants argument seeks to derive support from the fact that both ss. 299 and 300 refer to a specific act. Section 299, for instance, providesthat whoever causes death by doing an act with the intention or knowledge therein specified, commits the offence of culpable homicide. Inother words, it is the act done with the requisite intention or knowledge that constitutes the offence of culpable homicide. Similarly, s.300 provides that if the act by which the death is caused is donewith the intentionof causing death or with the intention or knowledge as specified in the three clausesof s.300, culpable homicide is murder. That again shows that it is the specified act which amounts to murder, and so, unless the act which amounts to murder has been committed by a personhimself, it cannot be said that he has committed murderunder s. 303. That, in substance, is the argument urged before us by the appellant.

In appreciating the validity of this argument, it is necessary to bear in mind the effect of the provisions of s. 34. Section 34 provides that when a criminal act is done by several persons in furtherance of the common intention of all, each of such persons is liable for that act in the same manneras if it were done by him alone. It is thus clear that as a result of the application of the principle 336 enunciated in s. 31, when the appellant was convicted under 302/34, in law it really meant that the appellant was liable for the act which caused the death of Rambilash Singh in the same manner as if it had been done by him alone, That if; the effect of the constructive liability which followsfrom the application of the principle laid down in s. 34. Section 34 embodies the ordinary commonsense principle that if two or more persons intentionally commit an offence jointly, in substance, it is just the same as if each one of them bad committed that offence. Common intention which is the basis of the principle laid down by s. 34 implies action-inconcert and that in its turn, postulates the existence of a prearranged plan. Therefore, if two or more persons acting in concert in pursuance of a pre-arranged plan proceed to commit an offence, s. 34 steps in and provides that for the act committed by one the other is liable in the same manner as if it had been done by him alone. That being the effect of the rule prescribed by s. 34, it is difficult to accept the argument that where a person has been convicted under s. 302/34, it cannot be said that he has committed the offence of murder. The act which caused the death of the victim may have been committed by another person, but since thesaid act had been done by the other person in furtherance of the common intention shared by that person and the appellant, in law, the act must be deemed to have been committed by the appellant alone. Therefore, where a person is convicted under s. 302/34, it must be held that he has committed the murderas much as the person by whose act the victim was killed.

The position would not be any different even if the appellant bad been convicted under s.302/149.Section 149 provides that if an offence is committed by any member of an unlawful assembly in prosecution of the common object of that assembly, or such as the members of that assembly 337 knew to be likely to be committed in prosecution ofthat object, every person who, at the time of the committing of that offence, is a member of the same assembly. is guilty of that offence. It is true that the basis ofconstructive liability imposed bys. 149 is mere membership of the unlawful assembly, whereas the basis of theconstructive liability contemplated by s. 34 is participation in the same actionwith the common intention of committing a crime. .that, however, does not make any difference in the legal position that if a murder is committed by one member of an unlawful assembly in prosecution of the common object of that assembly, all members of the unlawful assembly who at the time of the commission of that offence were members of such assembly would be guilty of the offence of murder. In such a case,again, where apersonis convicted under s.302/149, the true legal position is that, in law, hemust be deemed to have committed the murder as much as the actual murderer has.Therefore, in our opinion, s. 303 cannot be confined only to cases where a person undergoing sentence of imprisonment for life actually and in fact himself commits an act which results in the death of the victim. Thesaid section would apply oven in oases where a person undergoing sentence of imprisonment for life is convicted either under a. 302 read with s. 34 or under s. 302 read with a.149. That being our view, we must held that the courts below were right in sentencing the appellant to death under s. 303. The result is, the appeal fails and is dismissed.

Appeal dismissed, 338
**********', 2] , 
[ 'HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAWS
Penal Code, 1860
Section 149 – Ingredients of - Invocation of vicarious liability – Requirement for. Held, Section 149 consists of two parts. Where there is existence of common object and offence is done in prosecution thereof, offence falls under the first part. Where offence is not done in direct  prosecution of the common object, but all members of unlawful assembly know that offence is likely to be committed, it falls under the second part. Court has to see that all ingredients are fulfilled to hold each member of the assembly guilty. Once such a finding is reached, court would not enquire as to who actually did the offensive act or which of the members did which of the above two ingredients. Before recording conviction under Section 149 IPC, essential ingredients of Section 141 must be proved.
HELD
Let us consider the requirements for invoking the vicarious liability under Section 149 IPC. Section 149 IPC consists of two parts:  The first part of the section means that there exists common object and that the offence has been committed in prosecution of the common object. In order that the offence may fall within the first part, the offence must be connected immediately with the common object of the unlawful assembly of which the accused was member. The second part of the section means that even if the offence committed is not in direct prosecution of the common object of the assembly, it may yet fall under Section 149, if it can be shown that the offence was such as the members knew was likely to be committed. (Para 9)
Once the court finds that the ingredients of Section 149 IPC are fulfilled, every person who at the time of committing that offence was a member of the assembly has to be held guilty of that offence. After such a finding, it would not be open to the court to see as to who actually did the offensive act nor would it be open to the court to require the prosecution to prove which of the members did which of the above two ingredients. Before recording the conviction under Section 149 IPC, the essential ingredients of Section 141 IPC must be established. (Para 9.1)
Whether the members of the unlawful assembly really had the common object to cause the murder of the deceased has to be decided in the facts and circumstances of each case, nature of weapons used by such members, the manner and sequence of attack made by those members on the deceased and the circumstances under which the occurrence took place. It is an inference to be deduced from the facts and circumstances of each case. (Para 12)
Section 302/ 149, 3232/149, 324 - Common object to kill - A1, A2, A3 hurled bomb, killing deceased and injuring one - A4 to A10 attacked complainant party with sticks and sickles – No evidence to prove common object between members of unlawful assembly to murder - Whether members of the assembly knew that offence of murder is likely to be committed and thus, their acts fall under the second part of Section 149 IPC. Held, two factions had assembled to attend a funeral. A11 had enmity with PW2’s family. At his exhortation, accused reacted individually. A4 to A10 might not have been aware that A1 to A3 were armed with bomb and murder would be committed. They had no intention to kill as they were carrying sickles and sticks and they did not cause injuries on any vital parts of body. No definite finding if there was common object to murder or members knew that murder was likely to be committed. Hence A4 to A10 cannot be convicted under Section 302/149. Since A4 and A5 had attacked PWs. on their left shoulders with sickles, they are convicted under Section 324. Sentence of A6 to A10 under Section 323/149 is modified to one under Section 323 IPC.
HELD
Let us consider whether the act of the accused falls under the second part of Section 149 IPC. As members of the unlawful assembly, whether the accused knew that the offence of murder is likely to be committed. It is a matter of evidence that Sahayams house is situated next to the house of Jesu, for whose funeral, the two factions have assembled. Accused Nos. 4 to 10 may not have had the knowledge that Jesu Adimai (A1), Selvaraj (A2) and Sahayam (A3) were armed with bombs and that the murder of Kennedy was likely to be committed. On the exhortation of Joseph (A11), the accused seem to have individually reacted. There is no definite finding of the High Court that the common object of the assembly was to commit the murder or that the accused persons had knowledge that the offence of murder was likely to be committed and hence, the conviction of the accused Nos. 4 to 10 under Section 302 IPC with the aid of Section 149 IPC cannot be sustained. (Para 16)
Since the prosecution has not succeeded in establishing and proving that there was an unlawful assembly with a common object to commit the offence, conviction of the accused Nos. 3 to 5 (under Section 148 IPC) and accused Nos. 6 to 11 (under Section 147 IPC) are set aside. (Para 21)
Murder case – Evaluation of material on record by Apex Court. Held, Apex Court does not, by special leave convert itself into an appellate court to appreciate evidence for third time, unless serious infirmity or perversity is shown. (Para 17)
Section 302 – Hurling of bomb by A1, A2 and A3, killing deceased and injuring others - Whether A3 cannot be convicted under Section 302 as other co-accused, A1 and A2 were acquitted under Section 27(2) and 27(3) of Arms Act. Held, sole reason of acquittal was non-obtaining of prior sanction from district Magistrate to prosecute them. Hence their acquittal is of no help to A3. (Para 18)
Section 302/ 34 - Murder – Common intention - Role of A3 - On exhortation of A11, A1 to A3 hurled bombs, killing deceased and injuring ‘R’ – Bomb hurled by A1 hit deceased and that hurled by A2 hit R on the ankle - However, bomb hurled by A3 fell on the ground. Held, fact that A3 was carrying bomb, shows sharing of common intention to kill. He is convicted under Section 302/34 and sentenced to life imprisonment.
HELD
On the exhortation of Joseph (A11), Jesu Adimai (A1) hurled the bomb which hit the forehead of deceased Kennedy. Selvam (A2) hurled the bomb which hit the right ankle of Raja. Bomb hurled by Sahayam (A3) fell on the floor and exploded. The bomb hurled by Selvaraj (A2) and Sahayam (A3), though, had not hit the deceased, the fact remains that they carried the bomb which clearly indicates that Sahayam (A3) was sharing the intention with Jesu Adimai (A1) and Selvaraj (A2) in committing the murder. Conviction of Sahayam (A3) under Section 302 IPC read with Section 149 IPC is modified as conviction under Section 302 IPC read with Section 34 IPC. (Para 20)
Section 302/149, 302/109 - Murder – Role of A11 - Apart from exhortation to hurl bombs and kill, no other overt act attributed – As per PW3 there was some dispute between family of PW2 and A11. Held, though no overt act was attributed to A11, yet words used by him to instigate clearly show that only after his exhortation all accused acted and mounted attack. His conviction under Section 302/149 cannot be sustained but same is modified to one under Section 302/109 IPC. Sentence of life imprisonment is confirmed. (Para 19)

CASES REFERRED
1.  Kuldip Yadav and Ors. v. State of Bihar JT 2011 (4) SC 436 (Para 11.1)
2.  Daya Kishan v. State of Haryana JT 2010 (4) SC 325 (Para 11.1)
3.  State of Punjab v. Sanjiv Kumar alias Sanju and Ors. JT 2007 (9) SC 274 (Para 10.1)
4.  Rajendra Shantaram Todankar v. State of Maharashtra and Ors. JT 2003 (2) SC 95 (Para 10)
5.  Ramanbhai Naranbhai Patel and others v. State of Gujarat JT 1999 (9) SC 319 (Para 17)
6.  Rachamreddy Chenna Reddy and Ors. v. State of A.P. JT 1999 (1) SC 412 (Para 12)
7.  Ranbir Yadav v. State of Bihar JT 1995 (3) SC 228 (Para 12)
8.  Allauddin Mian and Others, Sharif Mian and Anr. v. State of Bihar JT 1989 (2) SC 171 (Para 11)
9.  Lalji and Ors. v. State of U.P. JT 1989 (1) SC 109 (Para 12)
10. Ramaniklal Gokaldas and Others v. State of Gujarat 1976 (1) SCC 6 (Para 17)


R. BANUMATHI, J.
1. These appeals arise out of the judgment dated 10.02.2011 passed by Madras High Court at Madurai Bench dismissing Criminal Appeal No.519 of 2002 thereby affirming the conviction of the appellants under Section 302 read with Section 149 IPC, Sections 341, 324, 148, 147, 323 read with Section 149 IPC and Section 326 IPC and also the sentence of imprisonment imposed upon each of them.
2. Briefly stated case of prosecution is that on 12.01.1994, PW2-Anthony Mududhagam, deceased Luis John Kennedy and Raja came to attend funeral of one Jesu (PW2s cousin). While they were standing near Sahayams (A3) house at about 3.05 p.m., Jesu Adimai (A1) (since dead), Selvaraj (A2) and Sahayam (A3) armed with country made bombs in their hands, Selvam (A4) and Antony Innasi (A5) armed with sickles, Charles (A6), Jerone (A7), Edwinson (A8), Raj (A9) and Elizabethan (A10) with sticks and Joseph (A11) came there and confronted the deceased Kennedy, PW2 and Suresh (PW1) who just came there to see his father PW2. Joseph (A11) instigated all the accused to attack on them. Selvam (A4) attacked PW1 with sickle on the left shoulder. Jesu Adimai (A1) threw one country bomb which hit the forehead of the deceased and the deceased fell down. Selvaraj (A2) threw the bomb which hit the right leg of Raja. Sahayam (A3) also threw a bomb which has fallen on the ground. Antony Innasi (A5) attacked PW2 on his left shoulder. Accused Nos.6 to 10 attacked Raja and PW2 indiscriminately causing injuries to them. On seeing the by-standers coming towards the spot, the accused ran away from the scene. Thereafter Johnson (PW-3) hired a tempo and took the injured to Nagercoil Kottar Government Hospital. On the way to hospital, Kennedy succumbed to injuries.
3. Based on the statement of Raja (Ex.P-16), FIR (Ex.P-9) was registered in Crime No.23/94 under Sections 147, 148, 326, 307 and 302 IPC as well as under the Indian Explosives Act. PW9-Krishnan Nair, Inspector in Charge had taken up the initial investigation and prepared rough sketch (Ex.P-10) of the place of occurrence and seized articles viz., blood stained earth (M.O.6) and sample earth (M.O.7) from the scene of crime and conducted the inquest (Ex.P11). PW6-Dr. Kutralingam conducted autopsy on the body of the deceased and noted lacerated injury with burnt out black skin margins over the head both ocular areas; both eyes found to be missing; Face and forehead was seen seriously disfigured. PW6-Dr. Kutralingam opined that the death was due to head injuries and the same could have been caused by explosion of bomb and issued post-mortem certificate (Ex.P-6). On 15.01.1994, PW12-Ganesan Inspector of Police, took up further investigation and arrested the accused Nos. 2 to 10 on 25.01.1994 at about 04:45 a.m. Confession statement (Ex.P3) recorded from Selvam (A4) which led to recovery of sickle with wooden handle (M.O.2) and sickle with iron handle (M.O.3). On completion of investigation and submission of final report on 08.11.1995, all the accused were remanded to judicial custody.
4. To bring home the guilt of the accused, prosecution has examined witnesses (PWs 1 to 12) and marked nineteen exhibits (Ex.P-1 to Ex.P-19) and seven material objects (M.O.1 to M.O.7). The accused were questioned under Section 313 Cr. P.C. about the incriminating evidence and circumstances and the accused denied all of them. Upon consideration of evidence adduced by the prosecution, the trial court held that the prosecution has proved the existence of common object of the unlawful assembly and that the accused acted in furtherance of the common object and convicted all the eleven accused under Section 302 IPC with the aid of constructive liability under Section 149 IPC and sentenced all of them to undergo life imprisonment. The accused were also convicted for various other offences and were sentenced to undergo various imprisonment. Being aggrieved by the verdict of conviction and sentence imposed upon them, the accused preferred appeal before the High Court which came to be dismissed by the High Court by the impugned judgment.
5. Taking us through the evidence and the impugned judgment, learned counsel for the appellants submitted that the prosecution has failed to prove the common object of the unlawful assembly to cause the death of deceased Kennedy that the accused acted in furtherance of the common object. It was contended that the appellants should not have been convicted for causing murder of Kennedy with the aid of Section 149 IPC. The learned counsel emphasized that the prosecution has failed to prove existence of common object of the unlawful assembly and that the appellants knew that death of Kennedy was likely to be caused by the unlawful assembly and therefore, the conviction of the appellants under Section 302 IPC with the aid of Section 149 IPC cannot be sustained.
6. Per contra, learned counsel appearing for the State submitted that from the evidence adduced by the prosecution and the attending circumstances of the case, prosecution has clearly proved the existence of common object and the courts below rightly convicted the accused under Section 302 IPC with the aid of Section 149 IPC.
7. We have considered the rival contentions and perused the impugned judgment and materials on record.
8. The question falling for consideration is whether the prosecution succeeded in proving the existence of common object amongst the accused persons and whether the accused persons acted in prosecution of the common object and that the accused persons knew that the death was likely to be committed, to convict the accused under Section 302 IPC with the aid of Section 149 IPC.
9. Before we consider the testimony of the witnesses, let us consider the requirements for invoking the vicarious liability under Section 149 IPC. Section 149 IPC consists of two parts:
     l The first part of the section means that there exists common object and that the offence has been committed in prosecution of the common object. In order that the offence may fall within the first part, the offence must be connected immediately with the common object of the unlawful assembly of which the accused was member.
     l The second part of the section means that even if the offence committed is not in direct prosecution of the common object of the assembly, it may yet fall under Section 149, if it can be shown that the offence was such as the members knew was likely to be committed.
9.1. What is important in each case is to find out if the offence was committed to accomplish the common object of the assembly or was the one which the members knew to be likely to be committed. Once the court finds that the ingredients of Section 149 IPC are fulfilled, every person who at the time of committing that offence was a member of the assembly has to be held guilty of that offence. After such a finding, it would not be open to the court to see as to who actually did the offensive act nor would it be open to the court to require the prosecution to prove which of the members did which of the above two ingredients. Before recording the conviction under Section 149 IPC, the essential ingredients of Section 141 IPC must be established.
10. Scope of two parts of Section 149 IPC has been explained in Rajendra Shantaram Todankar v. State of Maharashtra and Ors. JT 2003 (2) SC 95, this Court has explained Section 149 and held as under:
     14. Section 149 of the Indian Penal Code provides that if an offence is committed by any member of an unlawful assembly in prosecution of the common object of that assembly, or such as the members of that assembly knew to be likely to be committed in prosecution of that object, every person who at the time of the committing of that offence, is a member of the same assembly is guilty of that offence. The two clauses of Section 149 vary in degree of certainty. The first clause contemplates the commission of an offence by any member of an unlawful assembly which can be held to have been committed in prosecution of the common object of the assembly. The second clause embraces within its fold the commission of an act which may not necessarily be the common object of the assembly, nevertheless, the members of the assembly had knowledge of likelihood of the commission of that offence in prosecution of the common object. The common object may be commission of one offence while there may be likelihood of the commission of yet another offence, the knowledge whereof is capable of being safely attributable to the members of the unlawful assembly. In either case, every member of the assembly would be vicariously liable for the offence actually committed by any other member of the assembly. A mere possibility of the commission of the offence would not necessarily enable the court to draw an inference that the likelihood of commission of such offence was within the knowledge of every member of the unlawful assembly. It is difficult indeed, though not impossible, to collect direct evidence of such knowledge. An inference may be drawn from circumstances such as the background of the incident, the motive, the nature of the assembly, the nature of the arms carried by the members of the assembly, their common object and the behaviour of the members soon before, at or after the actual commission of the crime. Unless the applicability of Section 149 — either clause — is attracted and the court is convinced, on facts and in law, both, of liability capable of being fastened vicariously by reference to either clause of Section 149 IPC, merely because a criminal act was committed by a member of the assembly every other member thereof would not necessarily become liable for such criminal act. The inference as to likelihood of the commission of the given criminal act must be capable of being held to be within the knowledge of another member of the assembly who is sought to be held vicariously liable for the said criminal act......  underlining added
10.1. The same principles have been reiterated in State of Punjab v. Sanjiv Kumar alias Sanju and Ors. JT 2007 (9) SC 274.
11. Creation of vicarious liability under Section 149 IPC is well elucidated in Allauddin Mian and Others, Sharif Mian and Anr. v. State of Bihar JT 1989 (2) SC 171, this Court held:
     8. ........Therefore, in order to fasten vicarious responsibility on any member of an unlawful assembly the prosecution must prove that the act constituting an offence was done in prosecution of the common object of that assembly or the act done is such as the members of that assembly knew to be likely to be committed in prosecution of the common object of that assembly. Under this section, therefore, every member of an unlawful assembly renders himself liable for the criminal act or acts of any other member or members of that assembly provided the same is/are done in prosecution of the common object or is/are such as every member of that assembly knew to be likely to be committed. This section creates a specific offence and makes every member of the unlawful assembly liable for the offence or offences committed in the course of the occurrence provided the same was/were committed in prosecution of the common object or was/were such as the members of that assembly knew to be likely to be committed. Since this section imposes a constructive penal liability, it must be strictly construed as it seeks to punish members of an unlawful assembly for the offence or offences committed by their associate or associates in carrying out the common object of the assembly...... underlining added
11.1. The same principles were reiterated in paras (26) and (27) in Daya Kishan v. State of Haryana JT 2010 (4) SC 325 and also in Kuldip Yadav and Ors. v. State of Bihar JT 2011 (4) SC 436.
12. Whether the members of the unlawful assembly really had the common object to cause the murder of the deceased has to be decided in the facts and circumstances of each case, nature of weapons used by such members, the manner and sequence of attack made by those members on the deceased and the circumstances under which the occurrence took place. It is an inference to be deduced from the facts and circumstances of each case (vide Lalji and Ors. v. State of U.P. JT 1989 (1) SC 109; Ranbir Yadav v. State of Bihar JT 1995 (3) SC 228; Rachamreddy Chenna Reddy and Ors. v. State of A.P. JT 1999 (1) SC 412).
13. PW-1-Suresh and deceased Kennedy are the sons of PW-2 Anthony Muduthagam. There is a family dispute between PW-2s family and Jesu Adimai (A1) in respect of laying the fishing net in the sea. On 12.01.1994, at about 03.00 p.m., PW-2-Anthony Muduthagam, deceased Kennedy and injured person Raja went to attend the funeral of PW-2s cousin Jesu. While they were talking to one another, on the exhortation of Joseph (A11), the accused party attacked the complainant party. The occurrence started on the eastern side of the church and in front of the house of Sahayam (A3).
14. There are only about 350 houses in Perumanal village and most of them are fishermen. In the village, there were two factions who assembled to attend the funeral of Jesu. There was no common object among the accused as only Joseph (A11) had enmity with PW-2s family. Jesu Adimai (A1), Selvaraj (A2) and Sahayam (A3) were armed with bombs; Selvam (A4) and Antony Innasi (A5) were armed with sickles; and A6 to A10 were armed with sticks. On the exhortation of Joseph (A11), Jesu Adimai (A1) hurled the bomb which hit the forehead of deceased Kennedy and he fell down. Selvam (A2) threw the country bomb which hit the right ankle of Raja causing injuries to him. The bomb hurled by Sahayam (A3) fell on the ground and exploded. The deceased died of head injuries, fracture of frontal neck and both eyes found missing. PW-6-Dr. Kutralingam opined that the injuries on the deceased could have been caused by hurling of bombs. The fact that accused Nos. 1 to 3 carrying the bombs, gives indication that they had the common intention to cause the death of the complainant party. Selvam (A4) attacked PW-1-Suresh with aruval on the left shoulder and Antony Innasi (A5) attacked PW-2-Anthony Muduthagam on the left shoulder and accused Nos. 6 to 10 attacked the complainant party with sticks. There is no evidence to prove that the accused Nos. 1 to 11 had any common object to commit the murder of Kennedy which activated all of them to join in furtherance of the common object.
15. As noted earlier, first part of Section 149 IPC states about the commission of an offence in prosecution of the common object of the assembly whereas the second part takes within its fold knowledge of likelihood of the commission of that offence in prosecution of the common object. In the facts and circums-tances of the case, we are of the view that the prosecution has not proved the existence of the common object amongst the accused and that all of them acted in furtherance of the common object to invoke the first part of Section 149 IPC.
16. Let us consider whether the act of the accused falls under the second part of Section 149 IPC. As members of the unlawful assembly, whether the accused knew that the offence of murder is likely to be committed. It is a matter of evidence that Sahayams house is situated next to the house of Jesu, for whose funeral, the two factions have assembled. Accused Nos. 4 to 10 may not have had the knowledge that Jesu Adimai (A1), Selvaraj (A2) and Sahayam (A3) were armed with bombs and that the murder of Kennedy was likely to be committed. On the exhortation of Joseph (A11), the accused seem to have individually reacted. There is no definite finding of the High Court that the common object of the assembly was to commit the murder or that the accused persons had knowledge that the offence of murder was likely to be committed and hence, the conviction of the accused Nos. 4 to 10 under Section 302 IPC with the aid of Section 149 IPC cannot be sustained.
17. It is now well established that this Court does not, by special leave convert itself into an appellate court to appreciate evidence for third time. As has been consistently held by this Court in Ramaniklal Gokaldas and Others v. State of Gujarat 1976 (1) SCC 6 and Ramanbhai Naranbhai Patel and others v. State of Gujarat JT 1999 (9) SC 319 and other cases, unless some serious infirmity or perversity is shown, this Court normally refrains from reappreciating the matter on appeal by special leave. In the case at hand, hurling of bombs is attributed only to accused Nos. 1 to 3. Had the other accused intended to kill Kennedy and the witnesses, they would have inflicted injuries on the vital organs or used the surest weapon of committing murder and not mere sickles/sticks. Conviction of accused Nos. 4 to 10 under Section 302 IPC with the aid of Section 149 IPC, in our view, suffers from serious infirmity and liable to be set aside.
18. Insofar as the conviction of the Sahayam (A3), an attempt was made that he cannot be convicted under Section 302 IPC as Selvaraj (A2) and Sahayam (A3) were acquitted under Section 27(2) and Section 27(3) of the Arms Act, 1959. As rightly contended by the learned counsel for the State, the sole reason for acquittal under Section 27(2) and Section 27(3) of the Arms Act is non-obtaining of prior sanction from District Magistrate to prosecute the accused under the Arms Act. Hence, the acquittal of the accused Nos. 2 and 3 under Section 27(2) and Section 27(3) of the Arms Act is of no avail to accused No. 3.
19. Joseph A11: On behalf of Joseph (A11), it was submitted that there is nothing on record to show the involvement of Joseph in the occurrence and no overt act is attributed to him and hence, no liability could be fastened upon him. PWs 1 to 3 have consistently stated that Joseph (A11) asked them to ...hack and hurl bomb.... The words uttered by accused Joseph is the starting point for all the troubles and all the accused acted only on such instigation of accused Joseph (A11). In his evidence, Johnson (PW3) had stated that there had been dispute between the families of Jesu Adimai (A1) and Joseph (A11) and the family of Anthony Muduthagam (PW2) with regard to fishing at sea. Though no overt act is attributed to the accused Joseph, the words uttered by him ...hack, throw bomb and kill... clearly shows that only on the exhortation of the accused Joseph, other accused acted and attacked the complainant party. Joseph (A11) was convicted under Section 302 IPC read with Section 149 IPC even though he was charged under Section 302 IPC read with Section 109 IPC (fourth charge). Though the conviction of the accused Joseph under Section 302 IPC read with Section 149 IPC cannot be sustained, the same is modified as conviction under Section 302 IPC read with Section 109 IPC.
20. As discussed above, on the exhortation of Joseph (A11), Jesu Adimai (A1) hurled the bomb which hit the forehead of deceased Kennedy. Selvam (A2) hurled the bomb which hit the right ankle of Raja. Bomb hurled by Sahayam (A3) fell on the floor and exploded. The bomb hurled by Selvaraj (A2) and Sahayam (A3), though, had not hit the deceased, the fact remains that they carried the bomb which clearly indicates that Sahayam (A3) was sharing the intention with Jesu Adimai (A1) and Selvaraj (A2) in committing the murder. Conviction of Sahayam (A3) under Section 302 IPC read with Section 149 IPC is modified as conviction under Section 302 IPC read with Section 34 IPC.
21. Conviction of accused Nos. 4 to 10 under Section 302 IPC with the aid of Section 149 IPC suffers from serious infirmity and the same cannot be sustained. Since the prosecution has not succeeded in establishing and proving that there was an unlawful assembly with a common object to commit the offence, conviction of the accused Nos. 3 to 5 (under Section 148 IPC) and accused Nos. 6 to 11 (under Section 147 IPC) are set aside.
22. Considering the individual acts of the appellants, Selvam (A4) and Antony Innasi (A5) attacked PW1 and PW2 on their left shoulders respectively with sickles, conviction of Antony Innasi (A5) is modified as conviction under Section 324 IPC and the sentence of rigorous imprisonment of one year is maintained. Conviction of Selvam (A4) under Section 324 is affirmed and the sentence of imprisonment of one year imposed upon him is affirmed. Considering the acts of accused Nos.6 to 10 that they attacked Raja and PW-2 with sticks, conviction of accused Nos.6 to 10 under Section 323 read with Section 149 is modified as conviction under Section 323 IPC maintaining their sentence of imprisonment of six months.
23. Conviction of Sahayam (A3) and Joseph (A11) under Section 302 IPC read with Section 149 IPC is modified as Section 302 IPC read with Section 34 IPC and under Section 302 IPC read with Section 109 IPC respectively and the sentence of life imprisonment awarded to each of them is confirmed. Criminal Appeal No.413 of 2012 preferred by Joseph (A11) is dismissed. Sahayam (A3) and Joseph (A11) are directed to surrender to serve their remaining sentence.
24. Conviction of accused Nos. 4 to 10 Selvam (A4), Antony Innasi (A5), Charles (A6), Jerone (A7), Edwinson (A8), Raj (A9) and Elizabethan (A10) under Section 302 IPC read with Section 149 IPC is set aside and they are acquitted of the same. So far as conviction of Accused Nos. 4 to 10 for other offences and the sentence imposed upon each of them, the same is modified as indicated above and accordingly, appeals are partly allowed. Accused Nos. 4 to 10 have already undergone the sentence for more than six years, they need not surrender. Their bail bonds stand discharged.
**********', 2] , 
[ 'HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAW
Indian Penal Code
Sections 32, 364, 363 - Held prosecution has failed to prove by evidence, motive or recovery and evidence led about last seen together is not consistent with guilt of appellants re offence of murder - Evidence is conclusive only about kidnapping of deceased but not for murder - As prosecution failed to prove, offence of murder conviction under Section 302 is set aside - Further kidï¿½napping is not with intention to commit murder - So conviction under Section 364 set aside but convicted them of offence of kidnapping under Section 363 IPC and sentenced to under go rigorous imprisonment for five years.
HELD
The evidence led by the prosecution about last seen together cannot be said to be consistent only with the hypotheï¿½sis of the guilt of the appellants as regards the offence of murder and incapable of being explained on any other hypothesis. In our opinion the evidence led by the prosecution is of a conï¿½clusive nature so far as kidnapping of the deceased is concerned but is inconclusive so far as the offence of murder is concerned. The chain of evidence is not so complete as to leave no doubt about the conclusion that the appellants also committed the murder of Avadhesh. May be, they did but that is not enough. The prosecution is obliged to establish that in all human probability the accused alone had committed the murder. This the prosecution has failed to prove in this case. The conviction of the appellï¿½ants for the offence under Section 302 IPC, therefore, cannot be sustained and is hereby set aside. So far as the conviction of the appellants for offence under Section 364 IPC is concerned, that too cannot be sustained because the kidnapping of the deï¿½ceased by the appellants cannot said to be with the intention to commit his murder. However, since we have accepted the evidence of PW.1, PW.5 and PW.7 and partly the statement of PW.9 and PW. 10, the prosecution can be said to have successfully established beyond a reasonable doubt that the appellants committed an ofï¿½fence under Section 363 IPC.Para 10


ORDER


1.These appeals are directed against the judgment of the High Court of Madhya Pradesh dated 8th April, 1994 dismissing the appeals filed by the appellants against their conviction and sentence as recorded by the learned Session Judge on 18th Januï¿½ary, 1991. The appellants were convicted of offences under secï¿½tions 364 and 302 IPC and were sentenced to five years rigorous imprisonment and to pay a fine of Rs. 500/- and in default two months simple imprisonment on the first count and to life imprisï¿½onment and a fine of Rs. 1,000/- and in default three months simple imprisonment on the second count.

2.The prosecution case in brief is that on 2nd September, 1987 at about 9.15 p.m., Ramgovind Sharma, PW. 9 lodged a report at P.S. Jhansi Road regarding the missing of his son Avadhesh Sharma who had gone to the school but had not returned. He gave the descripï¿½tion and identification of his son in the report. After registraï¿½tion of the missing person report, Ext. P-3, an intimation was sent to the Control Room. During the investigation statements of various prosecution witnesses including Ram Bharose Bajpayee, PW. 1 and Rati Ram, PW. 7 were recorded. According to their stateï¿½ments, they had seen Avadhesh along with the appellants near Ravi Shankar Hostel, Medical Tiraha. On the basis of this information, a search was made for the appellants. They were not found at their houses. A case under Section 364/34 IPC was registered on 3rd September, 1987 at 1 O clock at night. A search was started and ultimately the dead body of Avadhesh was found between the bushes and trees in the Chattri. A panchnama of the dead body was prepared and the dead body was sent for post-mortem examination. Dr. V.K. Deewan, P.W., conducted the post-mortem examination and found a number of injuries on his person. According to his opinï¿½ion death of the deceased had occurred on account of strangulaï¿½tion and the injuries on his chest, which had led to failure of respiratory system. The appellants came to be arrested during the investigation on 6th September, 1987. Gauri Shankar, appellant, is alleged to have made a disclosure statement which is admissiï¿½ble under Section 27 of the Evidence Act leading to the recovery of a watch which, according to the prosecution, was on the person of the deceased when he left for school in the morning of 2nd September, 1987. Mohan, appellant, allegedly made a statement admissible under Section 27 of the Evidence Act leading to the recovery of a pen while Veerandra, appellant, allegedly made a statement admissible under Section 27 of the Evidence Act leading to the recovery of a dot pen. No recovery was effected from Ashok, appellant.

3.The recovered articles were sent to the police station for identification and Shri B.K. Agrawal, Naib Tehsildar, PW. 11, conducted an identification parade in the Tehsil Office of Gwaï¿½lior on 18th September, 1987. Ramgovind Sharma, PW. 9 and his wife Saroj, PW. 10 identified the seized articles as the ones which the deceased was carrying with him on the day of the occurï¿½rence. After completion of the investigation the appellants were sent up for trial and convicted and sentenced as already noticed.

4.There is no eye witness in the case. Both the trial court and the High Court have relied upon the following circumstances to connect the appellants with the crime :-

(i) motive;

(ii) the deceased having been last seen in the company of the accused;

(iii) recoveries of articles belonging to the deceased;

(iv) factum of absconding on the part of the deceased.

5.Both the courts found all the circumstances to have been estabï¿½lished from the evidence on the record and hold that the circumï¿½stances conclusively established that the appellants were guilty of the offences with which they had been charged.

6.We have heard learned counsel for the parties and examined the record.

MOTIVE

7.According to the prosecution case the motive for murder of Avadhesh is stated to be that the brother of Ashok Kumar, appellï¿½ant, was involved in a hurt case by Khemraj Varun and Ramgovind Sharma, PW.9 was a witness in that case. It is alleged that on 1st September, 1987 i.e. a day before the occurrence, the appellï¿½ants warned PW.9 that he should not appear as a witness in Khemï¿½raj Varuns case, but since PW.9 declined to oblige the appellï¿½ants, they kidnapped Avadhesh and committed his murder. This motive to our minds is much too feeble. The prosecution had not led any evidence to show as to how the other appellants were connected with Ashok appellant. In the report Ext. P-3, there is no mention of the alleged motive. It is not even mentioned in the FIR. At the trial also, PW.10 Saroj, mother of the deceased, improved upon her earlier version to support the statement of PW. 9 in this behalf. There is no other evidence on the record to prove the existence of motive. This circumstance, has in our opinion, not been proved and even otherwise, it does not appear that there was any sufficient motive for the appellants to commit the murder of the only son of PW. 9, only because PW. 9 had to appear as a witness against the brother of Ashok, appellant.

RECOVERIES

8.The prosecution has relied upon the recovery of watch, Ext. P-8, Pen, Ext. P-9, and a dot pen Ext. P-12 allegedly on the disï¿½closure statements made by Gauri Shankar, Mohan and Veerandra, which are admissible under Section 27 of the Evidence Act. The only witness for the recovery examined at the trial, apart from Mahender Partap Singh, PW. 12, the Investigating Officer, is Parmal Singh, PW. 6 who does not belong to the locality and who could give no satisfactory explanation for his presence at the relevant time at the police station, where the disclosure stateï¿½ments were allegedly made. The prosecution has attempted to connect the pen, Ext. P - 9 and the dot pen, Ext. P-12, which are of a common make, with the deceased on the strength of the inï¿½scription of his name on the same. The investigating officer admitted in his cross-examination that the price of the pen and the dot pen was about Rs. 1/- or Rs. 2/- in the market and the same were easily available. Parmal Singh PW. 6, did not depose at the trial that when the pers were recovered allegedly on the pointing out of th appellants Mohan and Veerendra, they contained the name of Avadhesh inscribed on them . That the pen and the dot pen contained the inscription of the name of Avadhesh is a later improvement, introduced at the trial. This renders the story of recovery of the pen and dot pen doubtful. So far as the recovery of the watch is concerned, there is no mention about the watch in the FIR. Watch P. 8 is a ladies writ watch. At the trial PW. 9 tried to explain that the said watch had been purchased by him for his wife Saroj, PW. 10 and the deceased was wearing that watch on his writs when he went to school. It appears to be also an after thought because if that was so there was no reason for PW. 9 not to have disclosed in the FIR that the deceased was wearing the watch. It appears to us that the recoveries are not free from doubt and the same appear to have been pressed into aid to buttress the prosecutions case. The evidence of Parmal Singh, PW. 6, when considered in the established facts and circumstances of the case, creates a doubt about his creditworthiness and consequently about the genuineness of the recoveries. We are, therefore, unable to place any reliance on the recoveries and hold that the recoveries do not connect the appellants with the crime.

ABSCONDING

9.So far as the evidence of absconding is concerned this again is wholly discrepant and fragile. According to the prosecution case, the occurrence took place on 2nd September, 1987. The appellants were arrested, according to the prosecution, on 6th September, 1987, although the defence has led evidence to show that on 3rd September, 1987, one of the appellants was already in custody of the police. Be that as it may, the arrest of the appellants on 6th September, 1987 when the case was registered under section 364/34 IPC only during the night intervening 3rd/4th September, 1987, cannot be considered to be such a circumstance which conï¿½nects the appellants with the murder of the deceased and is consistent only with the hypothesis of the guilt of the appellï¿½ants. This circumstance also, therefore, has to be ruled out of consideration to connect the appellants with the offence of murder.

LAST SEEN TOGETHER

10.Ram Bharose Vajpayee, PW.1, deposed that he saw the appellants alongwith the deceased on cycle near Katora Tal. Rati Ram PW. 7, also deposed to having seen the deceased with the appellants near Katora Tal. Both the courts have relied upon the statements of P.W.1 and PW.7 in that behalf after giving cogent reasons. So far as PW.5 is concerned, he did not depose that he had seen the deceased with the appellant but, according to him, he had seen the appellants outside the Chhatri on the fateful day. The eviï¿½dence of PW.1, PW.5 and PW.7 has been rightly relied upon by the courts below but the same can only go to show that the appellants had kidnapped the deceased on the fateful day and nothing more than that. The evidence of these witnesses even if accepted in their totality does not go to connect the appellants with the crime of murder. Indeed Avdhesh Kumars death was homicidal in nature but unless the prosecution can establish beyond a reasonï¿½able doubt that the appellants and the appellants alone had committed the murder, their conviction for an offence under section 302 IPC cannot be sustained. The evidence led by the prosecution about last seen together cannot be said to be consistent only with the hypothesis of the guilt of the appellï¿½ants as regards the offence of murder and incapable of being explained on any other hypothesis. In our opinion the evidence led by the prosecution is of a conclusive nature so far as kidï¿½napping of the deceased is concerned but is inconclusive so far as the offence of murder is concerned. The chain of evidence is not so complete as to leave no doubt about the conclusion that the appellants also committed the murder of Avadhesh. May be, they did but that is not enough. The prosecution is obliged to establish that in all human probability the accused alone had committed the murder. This the prosecution has failed to prove in this case. The conviction of the appellants for the offence under section 302 IPC, therefore, cannot be sustained and is hereby set aside. So far as the conviction of the appellants for offence under section 364 IPC is concerned, that too cannot be sustained because the kidnapping of the deceased by the appellants cannot said to be with the intention to commit his murder. However, since we have accepted the evidence of PW.1, PW. 5 and PW. 7 and partly the statement of PW. 9 and PW. 10, the prosecution can be said to have successfully established beyond a reasonable doubt that the appellants committed an offence under section 363 IPC.

11.We accordingly, while setting aside the conviction and senï¿½tence of the appellants for the offence under sections 312 and 364 IPC, convict them of the offence under section 363 IPC and sentence them to undergo rigorous imprisonment for five years. In case the appellants have undergone the sentence as imposed by us, they shall be released from custody forthwith if not required in any other case.

**********', 2] , 
[ 'HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAW
Evidence in poison murder cases - Murder by poisoning is run like any other murder. Burden of proof in poison-murder cases - Whether the prosecution must prove that the accused had the poison in his possession? - Whether failure to establish that factor should entail the acquittal of the accused? - Murder by poison is invariably committed under the cover and cloak of secrecy - It would be impossible for the prosecution to prove possession of poison with the accused - The insistence on proof of possession of poison with the accused invariably in every case is niether desirable nor practicable - It would mean to introduce an extraneous ingredient to the offence of murder by poisoning - In cases where dependence is wholly on circumstantial evidence, and direct evidence not being available, the Court can legitimately draw from the circumstances an inference on any matter one way or the other. 

CODE OF CRIMINAL PROCEDURE, 1973:
Section 293 - Report of chemical examiner - Murder by poisoning - Value to be attached to the report of the chemical examiner - The report by itself is not crucial - It is a piece of evidence - The report should normally be forwarded to the Doctor who conducted the autopsy - Held that the report of the chemical examiner coupled with the opinion of the doctor is sufficient to hold that it was a death by poisoning.

Appeal dismissed.

CASES REFERRED
1. Chandra Kant Myalchand Seths., Criminal Appeal No. 120 of 1957 decided on 19.2.1958.(SC)

2. Mt. Gajrani and Anr. v. Emperor, A.I.R. 1933 Allahabad 394

3. State v. Fateh Bahadur and Ors., A.I.R. 1958, Allahabad

4. Dharambir singh v. The State of Punjab Criminal Appeal No. 98 of 1958 decided on 4.11.1958 (SC) 

5. Anant Chantman Lagu v. The State of Bombay, A.I.R. 1960 S.C. 500

6. Mohan v. State of Uttar Pradesh., A.I.R. 1960 S.C. 669

7. Ram Gopal v. State of Maharashtra., A.I.R. 1972 S.C. 656

8. Sharda B.Chand Sarda v. State of Maharashtra., 1985 (1) SCR 88 = A.I.R. 1984 S.C. 1622

JAGANNATHA SHETTY, J.

1.  One may ask the question whether murder by poisoning is  not run  like  any  other  murder ?  The  learned  counsel  for  the appellant  purports to state that it is not. He relies  upon  the judicial  prescriptions  as to the burden of  proof  in  poison-murder cases. He contends that the prosecution must prove  that the  accused had the poison in his possession. He  asserts  that failure  to establish that factor should entail the acquittal  of the  accused. This is a vital question which goes far beyond  the case and it, therefore, requires careful consideration.

2.  Bhupinder Singh - Appellant was prosecuted for the murder of his wife by poisoning. He was sentenced for life imprisonment  by the Additional Sessions Judge, Faridkot in Session case No. 86 of 1983.  His  conviction  and sentence have been  affirmed  by  the Punjab  and  Haryana High Court in criminal appeal No.  82-DB  of 1984. He has  preferred this appeal by special leave  challenging the conviction and sentence.

3.  We may first advert to the prosecution case. It  reveals  a sad story. It runs like this: Gian Kaur, the victim in this  case is  the  only daughter of Baltej Singh. Baltej  Singh  like  many other  parents thought that his problems would be solved  by  the marriage  of his daughter. He got her married to Bhupinder  Singh by spending all his saving . His relatives also  contributed  for the  marriage. But ill-luck would have it, his  problems  started immediately  after the marriage. Bhupinder Singh and his  parents wanted  Gian Kaur to bring Rs. 10,000/- from her father.  It  was nothing but a demand for dowry. They stepped up their demand with harassment  to  Gian  Kaur. Gian Kaur informed  her  father.  The father  could  not arrange that much of amount.  He  had  already spent  all  that he had in connection with her marriage.  He  had also then given presents in cash and kind  to Bhupinder Singh. So he felt helpless. Unmerciful, Bhupinder Singh asked his wife  to go  back to her parents house. So she left to seek  shelter  with her  parents. She remained with them for about eight months.  But how long the father could keep his married daughter away from her husband.  Some parents think that it is a reflection  upon  them. Baltej  Singh  also  must  have thought  like  that.  He  somehow arranged  Rs. 6,000/- and sent Gian Kaur to her husbands  house. Gian  Kaur  rejoined her husband upon making the payment  of  Rs. 6,000/-. That appears to have satisfied Bhupinder Singh for about one year. In the meantime, Gian Kaur had a male child.  Naturally there was jubilation for Baltej Singh. He performed the customary Chuchhak  ceremony  and  again gave  Rs.  4,000/-and  buffalo  as presents  to Bhupinder singh. Bhupinder Singh ought to have  been happy  and  satisfied.  But he was not. It  was  alleged  by  the prosecution that this time he demanded a motorcycle. Baltej Singh could not give it. Gian Kaur, as usual, was again the target.  It was  further  alleged  by the prosecution  that  Bhupinder  Singh threatened  to kill his wife if motorcycle was not given to  him. Gian Kaur had kept her father informed about the said demand  and the threat.

4.  On  July  13,  1983,  Gian  Kaur  died  under  mysterious circumstances. Upon receiving that information, Baltej Singh with his brother Baldev Singh reached the place in the evening of that day,. They saw Gian Kaur, lying dead on a charpai. They suspected foul  play.  Baltej  Singh gave the  information  to  the  police narrating  all the above events. He informed the police that  his daughter  was  killed  by  Bhupinder Singh  and  his  parents  by administering something to her. On the basis of that information, the  F.I.R. was  issued. The investigation of the case was  taken by  A.S.I.  (PW 4). The body of Gian Kaur was sent  to  Dr.  Sant Prakash  Singh (PW 6)for post-morterm. The doctor  Prakash  Singh noticed  five  minor injuries on the body of  the  deceased.  The brain  and other vital organs were also found  to  be  congested. The  Doctor sent stomach contents, portions of  small  intestine, liver, spleen and kidney to the chemical examiner for the purpose of analysis.

5.  The chemical examiner in his report dated September 14, 1983 has  stated that an Organo phosphorus compound was found  in  the substance  sent  to him for analysis. The  investigating  officer sent  that report for opinion of the Doctor Prakash Singh  as  to the cause of death of Gian Kaur. The Doctor gave his opinion that the  death  of Gian Kaur was due to  organo  phosphorus  compound poisoning.

6.  Bhupinder  Singh,  his father Sher  Singh  and  his  mother Mukhtiar  Kaur were tried for committing the murder of Gian  Kaur by administering poison.

7.  The prosecution examined six witnesses and the  accused  in turn examined one. The trial court after considering the evidence and other material on record held as follows:

The  accused  had  strong  motive to  get  rid  of  Gian  Kaur.  Apparently motive for the murder was the inability of Gian Kaur  to satisfy the demand for dowry. The death of Gian Kaur was not  accidental  or suicidal. There was no reason for her to  commit  suicide.  It was also not a death by food poisoning  since  the  accused  and deceased shared common food on the fateful  night.  There was none else in the house on that night except Gian Kaur  and  the accused. The accused had an opportunity to  accomplish  their design. The accused must have administered the poison  to  the  victim.  The injuries found on the body  of  the  deceased  indicated the resistance she must have offered when the  poison  was administered to her. With these and other conclusions,  the  trial court finally said:

In the background of the circumstances and evidence  discussed  above, the only conclusion possible is that Bhupinder Singh and  Mukhtiar Kaur did administer poison organo phosphorus  compound  to  gian  Kaur and did cause her death with  common  intention,  which  was  to  get  rid of her as she had  not  been  able  to  persuade  his father to meet their demand for motorcycle so  as  to  clear  way for another marriage of Bhupinder Singh  in  his  youthful years in order to get more and more of dowry. 

8.  Accordingly, the trial court found all the  three  accused guilty  of  the offence under Section 302 read  with  Section  34 I.P.C. They were sentenced to imprisonment for life.

9.  Challenging the legality of the conviction and sentence  the accused appealed to the High Court. It was urged before the  High Court  that  the death of Gian Kaur was not homicidal.  She  must have in all probability committed suicide since she was suffering from  tuberculosis.  It was also urged that the  prosecution  has failed to establish by evidence the necessary conditions for  the proof of murder by poisoning. The High Court did not  agree  with those  contentions.  The  High  Court ruled  out  the  theory  of suicide. It was observed that there was no evidence to show  that Gian  Kaur  was suffering from tuberculosis or ever  treated  for that disease. The High Court observed:

Case  of murder by poisoning is always one  of  secrecy.  Almost  in every such case one has to depend on  circumstances.  Doubtless, before a person can be convicted on the strength  of  circumstantial evidence, the circumstances in question must  be  satisfactorily  established and the proved circumstances  must  bring home  the offence to the accused beyond reasonable doubt.  If those circumstances or some of them can be explained by  any  reasonably hypothesis then the accused must have the benefit of  that  hypothesis.  But  in  assessing  the  evidence  imaginary  possibility  has  no  place.  What has  to  be  considered  are  ordinary human probabilities. We have already referred to  some  important  circumstances which in our opinion point out to  the  guilt  of  Bhupinder Singh and Sher Singh  appellants.  In  the  well-known  case  of  ANANT  CHANTMAN  LAGU  V.  THE  STATE  OF  BOMBAYA.I.R.  1960  S.C. 500 their Lordships held that  in  a  cause  of poisoning, the prosecution must establish:  (a)  that  the death took place by poisoning; (b) that the accused had the  poison  in  his  possession; and (c) that the  accused  had  an  opportunity  to administer the poison to the deceased. All  the  three  requirements  are satisfied in this case.  There  is  no  dispute that the death of the deceased was caused by poisoning.  It has been established by the chemical examiners report, that  the  viscera contained organo phosphorus compound  poison.  The  evidence of the prosecution witnesses has established that  the  aforesaid  two  appellants had the  opportunity  to  administer  poison  to the deceased and that they had the motive to  commit  the  crime. Their running away from the house at the time  when  the  Investigating  Officer  visited  their  house  is  also  consistent with their guilt and not with their innocence.

10.  With  these  observations, the  High  Court  confirmed  the conviction  and sentence on Sher Singh and Bhupinder Singh  while acquitting Mukhtiar Kaur.

11.  The present appeal is only by Bhupinder Singh.

12.  Before  embarking on the validity of the  main  submission made in this appeal, we may first dispose of one other contention urged  for the appellant. Mr. R.N.Kohli, learned counsel for  the appellant  submitted  that  it is not  enough  for  the  chemical examiner merely to state in his report that the organo phosphorus compound  was  present  in  the  substance  sent  to  him  for examination.  He should have also stated that a lethal  dose  of the organo phosphorus compound was detected in the substance sent to him. His report should be full and complete to take the  place of evidence which he would have given if he were called to  Court as  witness.  In the absence of such particulars,  the  death  by poisoning  cannot  be inferred. In support  of  this  contention, learned  counsel relied upon two decision of the  Allahabad  High Court  viz.(i)MT.  GAJRANI  AND  ANR.  V.  EMPEROR  A.I.R.  1933 Allahabad  394  and (ii) STATE V. FATEH BAHADUR &  ORS.  A.I.R. 1958,  Allahabad 1. In the first case, it was observed  that  it was  not  enough for the chemical examiner merely  to  state  his opinion. He must also state the grounds which formed the basis of his  opinion.  The  second case was a case of  death  by  arsenic poisoning.  The chemical examiner did not state the  quantity  of arsenic  poison found in the viscera of the deceased. He did  not state whether it was a fatal dose or not. The High Court  pointed out  that  it would be of the utmost importance  before  a  Court could find any individual guilty of murder by arsenic poison that its  complete analysis should be made. It is not enough to  state that arsenic was detected in the body of the deceased.

13.  In  our opinion, these observations cannot be  taken  as  a rigid statement of law. No hard and fast rule can be laid down as regards  the value to be attached to the report of  the  chemical examiner. Section 293 of the Code of Criminal Procedure  provides that the report of scientific experts may be used as evidence  in any  inquiry,  trial  or other  proceedings  of  the  court.  The chemical examiner does not, as a rule, give an opinion as to  the cause  of  death  but  merely  gives  report  of  the  chemical examination of the substance sent to him. The report by itself is not crucial. It is a piece of evidence. The only protection to it is  that  it does not require any formal proof. It  is,  however, open to the Court if it thinks fit to call the chemical  examiner and  examine  him  as to the subject matter of  the  report.  The report  should normally be forwarded to the Doctor who  conducted the  autopsy. In the instant case, that was done. The Doctor  who conducted  the  autopsy  was given a copy of the  report  of  the chemical examiner. The Doctor in the light of the report gave his opinion that the death of Gian Kaur was by poisoning i.e.  organo phosphorus compound. The report of the chemical examiner  coupled with the opinion of the Doctor is, therefore, sufficient to  hold that it was a death by poisoning. 

14.  This  takes  us  to  the  main  contention  urged  for  the appellant. It was urged that in a case of murder by poison  there are three main points to be proved: firstly, did the deceased die of  the  poison in question, secondly, had the  accused  got  the poison in question in his or her possession; and thirdly, had the accused  an opportunity to administer the poison in  question  to the deceased. It was also urged that if the prosecution fails  to prove  these factors, then the accused cannot be  convicted.  The evidence  in the case, according to learned counsel  falls  short  of  these requirements and, in particular, as to the question  of proof of possession of the poison with the accused and  therefore the accused is entitled to acquittal.

15.  We  have been referred to some decisions of this  Court  in support of the contention urged. We have also examined some other cases  bearing  on the question raised. A brief survey  of  these cases would be useful to appreciate the contention urged for  the appellant.  There are two unreported decisions of this  Court  of the year 1958. The first one is in CHANDRA KANT MYALCHAND  SETHS CASE  Criminal  Appeal No. 120 of 1957  decided  on  19.2.1958. There a woman died of alkali cyanide. The husband of the deceased was  tried and convicted by the trial court  for the  offence  of murder. The conviction was set aside by this Court. In the course of the judgment, it was observed:

Before a person can be convicted of murder by poisoning, it is  necessary to prove that the death of the deceased was caused by  poison,  that the poison in question was in possession  of  the  accused and that poison was administered by the accused to  the  deceased.

16.  The acquittal, however, was based on the  consideration  of the entire facts and circumstances of the case. It was found that there  was  a greater motive to the deceased  to  commit  suicide that to the  accused to commit murder. This  court also took note of the concern and conduct of the accused when he found  his wife lying unconscious. The accused ran to the house of his friend and returned  with a Doctor to render assistance to the  victim.  The accused  called another Doctor for the same purpose. He was  also found  weeping  all the while. Taking into consideration  of  all these factors, this Court found no  justification to sustain  the conviction of the accused.

17.  DHARAMBIR SINGH V. THE STATE OF PUNJAB (Criminal Appeal  No. 98  of 1958 decided on 4.11.1958) is another  case  of  homicidal action  by  cyanide poisoning. It was perhaps in this  case,  the guidelines  as to the proof of certain facts  in  poison  murder cases, were laid down by this  Court. It was observed:

Where  the evidence is circumstantial the fact that  the  accused  had  motive  to cause death of  the  deceased,  though  relevant,  is not enough to dispense with the proof of  certain  facts  which are essential to be proved in such  cases,  namely  (firstly)  did  the  deceased  die of  poison  in  question  ?  (secondly)  had the accused the poison in his  possession?  and  (thirdly)  had  the accused an opportunity  to  administer  the  poison in question to the deceased ? It is only when the motive  is  there and these facts are all proved that the court may  be  able to draw the inference, that the poison was administered by  the accused to the deceased resulting in his death.

18.  After laying down these principles, the court considered the entire  evidence on record which indicated the likelihood of  the deceased  committing  suicide  or  another  person  to  have administered the poison to the  deceased. This Court  accordingly acquitted the accused by extending the benefit of doubt.

19.  If one prefers to go yet further back we find a decision  of the Allahabad High Court which is exactly on the principles  laid down  in Dharambir singh case. In MT. GAJRANI V. EMPEROR  A.I.R. 1933 All. 394 Benett, J. speaking for the Court observed (at  p. 394.)

In  a case of murder by poison there are three main points  to  be  proved:  firstly,  did the deceased die of  the  poison  in  question; secondly, had the accused got the poison in  question  in  his  or  her possession; and thirdly, had  the  accused  an  opportunity  to  administer  the  poison  in  question  to  the  deceased.  If these three points are proved, a presumption  may  under  certain  circumstances be drawn by the Court  that  the  accused did administer poison to the deceased and did cause the  death  of  the deceased. It is not usual that  reliable  direct  evidence  is available to prove that the accused  did  actually  administer poison to the deceased. The evidence of motive which  is frequently given in these cases is of subsidiary importance,  and  the mere fact that the accused had a motive to  cause  the  death  of the deceased is not a fact which will  dispense  with  the  proof of the second and third points that the accused  had  the  poison in his or her possession, and that the accused  had  an opportunity to administer the poison.

20.  The above proposition found its way into MOHAN V. STATE  OF UTTAR  PRADESH A.I.R. 1960 S.C. 669 and RAM GOPAL V.  STATE  OF MAHARASHTRA A.I.R. 1972 S.C. 656. In Mohans case, the death in question was by arsenic poisoning. In that case, the  prosecution was able to prove that the accused gave peras to the victim  as pershad  and  the  victim  died  after  eating  the  pershad. Pershad contained arsenic. There was thus direct evidence as to the  possession  of  the poison with  the  accused.  This  Court, therefore,  had  no  difficulty to  sustain  the  conviction  and sentence awarded to the accused.

21.  Ram  Gopals case was concerned with  homicidal  action  by administering  a  compound called kerosene  and  organo  choloro compound.  The  High Court, relying upon the  motive  and  other circumstantial evidence convicted the accused for the offence  of murder  although  there was no evidence that the accused  was  in possession  of poison. This Court could not agree with  the  view taken by the High Court. The analysis of the evidence produced by the  prosecution  revealed that the motive  alleged  against  the accused  was  not  fully  established.  The  incriminating circumstantial evidence against the accused was also found to  be insufficient. So the conviction of the accused was set aside  and the acquittal was recorded.

22.  SHARDA B.CHAND SARDA V. STATE OF MAHARASHTRA 1985 (1)  SCR 88  =  A.I.R.  1984 S.C. 1622 is yet another case  of  death  by cyanide poisoning for which the husband of the deceased was tried for  murder. there was no direct evidence to establish  that  the accused  was  in  possession  of that  poison.  The  High  Court, however,  relied upon the circumstantial evidence  and  convicted the  accused. In the appeal preferred by the accused, this  Court did  not  agree  with the  reasoning of  the  High  Court.  After referring  to  Ram  Gopals case, Fazal  Ali,  J.,  focussed  the attention  on  the  following four  factors:  The  learned  Judge observed (at p. 167).

So  far as this  matter is concerned, in such cases the  court  must  carefully  scan  the evidence  and  determine  the  four  important circumstances which alone can justify a conviction:

(1) there  is a clear motive for an accused to administer  poison  to the deceased,

(2) that  the  deceased  died  of  poison  said  to  have  been  administered,

(3) that the  accused had the poison in his possession,
(4) that  he had an opportunity to administer the poison to  the  deceased.

The learned Judge went on to state:

In  the instant case, while two ingredients have  been  proved  but  two  have not. In the first place, it has  no  doubt  been  proved  that Manju died of potassium cyanide and  secondly,  it  has  also  been  proved  that  there  was  an  opportunity  to  administer the poison. It has, however, not been proved by  any  evidence that the appellant had the  poison in his  possession.  On the other hand, as indicated above, there is clear  evidence  of  PW  2 that potassium cyanide could have been  available  to  Manju  from the plastic factory of her mother, but there is  no  evidence to show that the accused could have procured potassium  cyanide from any available source. We might here extract a most  unintelligible and extra-ordinary finding of the High Court:

It is true that there is no direct evidence on these two points, because the prosecution is not able to lead evidence that the accused had secured potassium cyanide poison from a particular source. Similarly there is no direct evidence to prove that he had administered poison to Manju. However, it is not necessary to prove each and every fact by a direct evidence. Circumstantial evidence can be a basis for proving this fact.

The comment by the High Court appears to be frightfully vague and absolutely unintelligible. While holding in the clearest possible terms  that  there is no evidence in this case to show  that  the appellant  was in possession of poison, the High  Court  observes that  this  fact  may  prove  either  by  direct  or  indirect (circumstantial) evidence. But it fails to indicate the nature of the  circumstantial  or  indirect  evidence  to  show  that  the appellant  was  in possession of poison. If the  Court  seems  to suggest that merely because the appellant had the opportunity  to administer  poison  and  the same was found in the  body  of  the deceased,  it  should  be  presumed that  the  appellant  was  in possession  of poison, then it has committed a serious and  gross error of law and has  blatantly violated the principles laid down by  this Court. The High Court has not indicated as to  what  was the  basis  for  coming to finding that the  accused  could  have procured the cyanide. On the other hand, in view of the  decision in  Ram Gopals case failure to prove possession of  the  cyanide poison with the accused by itself would result in failure of  the prosecution to prove its case.

23. This Court then went into the merits of the prosecution case. It was observed that the deceased was of sensitive mind. She  had  occasionally  suffered mental depression due to her inability  to adjust herself to her husbands family. It was also observed that the deceased had access to the poison in question. She could have secured  the poison from the factory of her  mother.  Considering these  and other circumstances, it was held that it might  be  a case of suicide or murder and both were equally probable. So the accused was given the benefit of doubt and he was acquitted.

24.  From  the foregoing cases, it will be seen that  in  poison murder cases, the accused was not acquitted solely on the failure of  the  prosecution to establish one or  the  other  requirement which this Court has laid down in Dharambir Singh case. We do not also find any case where the accused was acquitted solely on  the ground that the prosecution has failed to prove that the  accused had  the  poison in his possession. The accused in all  the  said cases  came  to  be acquitted by taking  into  consideration  the totality  of  the circumstances  including  insufficient  motive, weakness  in the chain of circumstantial evidence and  likelihood of the deceased committing suicide.

25. We do consider that there should be acquittal on the  failure of  the  prosecution to prove the possession of poison  with  the accused. Murder by poison is invariably committed under the cover and  cloak of secrecy. Nobody will administer poison  another  in the  presence  of others. The person who  administers  poison  to another  in  secrecy  will  not keep a  portion  of  it  for  the investigating  office  to  come and collect it.  The  person  who commits  such murder would naturally take care to  eliminate  and destroy  the  evidence against him. In such cases,  it  would  be impossible for the prosecution to prove possession of poison with the  accused.  The  prosecution  may,  however,  establish  other circumstances consistent only with the hypothesis of the guilt of the accused. The court then would not be justified in  acquitting the  accused  on the ground that the prosecution  has  failed  to prove possession of the poison with the accused.

26.  The poison murder cases are not to be put outside the  rule of circumstantial evidence. There may be obvious very many  facts and  circumstances  out of which the Court may  be  justified  in drawing permissible inference that the accused was in  possession of  the  poison  in question. There may be very  many  facts  and circumstances proved against the accused which may call for tacit assumption  of  the  factum  of possession  of  poison  with  the accused. The insistence on proof of possession of poison with the accused  invariably  in  every  case  is  neither  desirable  nor practicable. It would mean to introduce an extraneous  ingredient to  the  offence of murder by poisoning.  We  cannot,  therefore, accept  the  contention  urged by the  learned  counsel  for  the appellant.  The accused in a case of murder by  poisoning  cannot have  a  better chance of being exempted from sanctions  than  in other kinds of murders. Murder by poisoning is run like any other murder.  IN  cases where dependence is wholly  on  circumstantial evidence, and direct evidence not being available, the Court  can legitimately  draw  from the circumstances an  inference  on  any matter one way or the other.

27.  The view that we have taken gets support from the  decision of  this Court in ANANTH CHINTAMAN LAGUY V. THE STATE  OF  BOMBAY (AIR  1960 SC 500) where Hidayatullah, J., has given  an  anxious consideration  to the three propositions laid down  in  Dharambir Singh case. The learned Judge did not consider them as invariable criteria  of proof to be established by the prosecution in  every case  of murder by poisoning. The learned Judge said (at p.  519-520):

It is now necessary to consider the arguments which have  been  advanced  on behalf of the appellant. The first  contention  is  that  the  essential ingredients required to be proved  in  all  cases of murder by poisoning were not proved by the prosecution  in  this  case.  Reference  in this connection  is  made  to  a  decision of the Allahabad High Court in Mt. Gajrani v. Emperor,  AIR 1933 All 394 and to two unreported decisions of this  Court  in Chandrakant Nyalchand Seth v. The State of Bombay,  Criminal  Appeal  No.  120  of  1957 decided of  February  19,  1958  and  Dharambir Singh v. The State of Punjab, Criminal Appeal No,  98   of  1958,  decided  on 4.11.1958. In  these  cases,  the  Court  referred  to  three  propositions which  the  prosecution  must  establish in a case of poisoning; (a) that death took place  by  poisoning;  (b)  that  the  accused  had  the  poison  in  his  possession;  and  (c) that the accused had  an  opportunity  to  administer  the poison to the deceased. The case in Cr. A.  No.  98  of  1958  D/-  4.11.1958  (SC)  turned  upon  these  three  propositions.  There,  the  deceased had died as  a  result  of  poisoning by potassium cyanide, which poison was also found  in  the autopsy. The High Court had disbelieved the evidence  which  sought  to  establish that the accused had  obtained  potassium  cyanide,  but  held,  nevertheless  that  the  circumstantial  evidence  was sufficient to convict the accused in  that  case.  This Court, did not however, accept the circumstantial evidence  as  complete. It is to be observed that the three  propositions  were  laid  down  not as the invariable criteria  of  proof  by  direct  evidence  in  a case of murder  by  poisoning,  because  evidently if after poisoning the victim, the accused  destroyed  all  traces  of  the  body,  the  first  proposition  would  be  incapable  of being proved except by  circumstantial  evidence.  Similarly,  if the accused gave a victim something to  eat  and  the victim died immediately on the ingestion of that food  with  symptoms  of  poisoning and poison, in fact, was found  in  the  viscera,  the  requirement  of proving  that  the  accused  was  possessed  of  the poison would follow from  the  circumstances  that the accused gave the victim something to eat and need  not  be separately proved.

The leaned Judge continued:

The  cases  of this Court which were  decided  proceeded  upon  their own facts, and though the three propositions must be kept  in  mind  always, the sufficiency of the  evidence,  direct  or  circumstantial, to establish murder by poisoning will depend on  the  facts of each case. It the evidence in a  particular  case  does  not  justify the inference that death is  the  result  of  poisoning  because of the failure of the prosecution  to  prove  the fact satisfactorily, either directly or  by  circumstantial  evidence,  then the benefit of the doubt will have to be  given  to  the accused person. But if circumstantial evidence, in  the  absence  of direct proof of the three elements, is so  decisive  that  the  Court can unhesitatingly hold that the death  was  a  result  of administration of poison (though not  detected)  and  that  the  poison must have been administered  by  the  accused  person, then the conviction can be rested on it.

28. So much for the principles for which the learned counsel  for the  appellant fought for. On the facts there is  concurrence  of opinion  between  the  two courts below. This  Court  seldom  re-examines the findings of fact reached by the High Court. We  may, however,  out  of deference to the counsel briefly refer  to  the evidence.  The  prosecution has established the  motive  for  the murder.  The  proof of motive goes a long way to tilt  the  scale against  the  accused which provides a foundational  material  to connect  the  chain  of circumstances. The facts  which  bear  on motive  are  distressing.  After  the  marriage,  Gian  Kaur  was subjected  to repeated harassment for not satisfying  the  demand for dowry made by Bhupinder Singh. Baltej Singh (PW2) has  stated that  Bhupinder Singh asked Gian Kaur to bring  Rs.  10,000/-.The parents  of  Bhupinder Singh were also parties  to  that  demand. Baltej Singh with all difficulties satisfied that demand in  part by  payment of Rs. 6,000/-. Bhupinder Singh  thereafter  demanded motorcycle.  When that was not immediately given Bhupinder  Singh held out a threat to his wife that she would be killed. This  was conveyed to Baltej Singh. Before he could take a decision in this regard he was shocked to receive the news of death of Gian  Kaur. This  has been proved by the testimony of Baltej Singh (PW2)  and Nazir Singh (PW3). The demand for dowry followed by harassment to the deceased has been thus satisfactorily proved.

29.  The evidence of the Doctor and the report of  the  chemical examiner  has  established beyond doubt that Gian  Kaur  died  of organo  phosphorus  compound poisoning. Bhupinder  Singh  had  an opportunity  to administer that poison. There was nobody else  in the  house. All the inmates had their common food in  the  night. All  of them slept in he same place. Both the Courts  have  ruled out  the theory of suicide by Gian Kaur. We entirely  agree  with that finding. She could not have thrown her child to the mercy of others  by committing suicide and indeed no mother would  venture to  do  that. The post-mortem report giving  the  description  of injuries  found on the body of the deceased would also  defy  all doubts  about  the theory of suicide. She had  contusion  on  the front  of right leg. Abrasion on the front of the left  leg  just below  the knee joint. Linear abrasion on the back of  the  right hand.  Linear abrasion on the antro-lateral aspect of left  fore-arm  in  its  middle. And contusion on the back  of  right  elbow joint.  These injuries, as the Courts below have  observed  could have  been  caused  while Gian Kaur  resisted  the  poison  being administered to her.

30.  The behaviour of Bhupinder Singh in the early hours of  that fateful  day by going to his field as if nothing had happened  to his  wife  is  apparently  inconsistent  with  the  normal  human behaviour.  There was no attempt made by him or other inmates  of the house to look out for any Doctor to give medical attention to the  victim.  The  movement and disposition  of  Bhupinder  Singh towards  the  victim  and situations are  incompatible  with  his innocence. On the contrary, it gives sustenance to his guilt.

31.  The  Courts  below having considered all  these  facts  and circumstances had no difficulty to convict the accused for murder and we see no good reason to interfere with that conclusion. 

32.  In the result, the appeal fails and is dismissed.

**********', 2] , 
[ 'HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAW
Indian Penal Code
Section 302, 300 -Thirdly whether offence was of murder or culpable homicide not amounting to murder - Facts on record held to show that appellant inflicted injury by piercing sharp edged weapon into the heart of deceased and it cause death instantly - Held injury with intention to murder - Section 302 correctly applied - Conviction upheld.
HELD
As per the evidence of PW-15, the injury to the heart was caused with a sharp object and the injury was sufficient to cause death in the ordinary course of nature which would come under clause thirdly of Section 300 IPC. The question, therefore, is: whether the offence is one of murder or culpable homicide not amounting to murder? Ms. K. Sharada Devi, learned counsel appearing for the appellant, contends that the appellant was not in know whether the deceased would be coming there as an informer to the police; the deceased had several enemies and that they were in search of him. As a consequence, it was not known that he would meet the deceased and in consequence, he had no intention to kill the deceased. We cannot appreciate the argument of the learned counsel. Notice is confined only to the nature of the offence committed by the appellant and, therefore, we have to proceed on the basis of the evidence on record as accepted by the courts below and then to consider whether the facts bring out the offence of murder punishable under section 302 I.P.C.

In the light of the aforestated facts and in view of the nature of injury inflicted upon the deceased, it is axiomatic that when the appellant had inflicted injury by piercing sharp edged weapon into the heart of the deceased as consequence of which the deceased died instantly, the necessary inference would be that he inflicted the injury with intention to do away with the deceased. In the light of the PW-15, doctors evidence and material prosecution evidence spoken to by the witnesses and the words of doing away with the deceased as uttered before the commission of the crime, the offence is clearly one of the murder. Accordingly, we do not think that the High Court has committed any error in confirming the conviction of the appellant for the offence of murder under Section 302 I.P.C. and sentencing him to undergo imprisonment for life. Para 4 & 5


ORDER


1. Leave granted.

2. This appeal by special leave arises from the judgment and order dated 18.10.1995 passed by the Division Bench of the High Court of Andhra Pradesh in Criminal Appeal No.32/95.

3. The appellant-accused, according to the prosecution, is the uncle of accused No.2. They were residents of Velleturu Village of Krishna District of Andhra Pradesh. One V. Nageswara Rao alias Naguru, (hereinafter called the deceased), was a resident of Sattupalli in Khammam District. PW-9 is the widow of the deceased. PW-1 is the native of Veeramallu village in Khammam District. It is the prosecution case that all of them are Yerukala by caste. The deceased and PW-6 used to commit thefts and they were ex-convicts. A-1 along with the deceased, also used to commit the offences. While the investigation in Crime No.110 of 1991, for an offence under section 395, was in progress, PW-16, the Sub-Inspector of Police had sent for PW-1 through the deceased and two constables. At about 11 a.m. on January 17, 1992, they reached Bhimavarppadu village and went into a Hotel at Junction. While P-Ws.6 and 10 stayed back, the deceased went to the house of PW-1. The deceased informed PW-1 that he was called by the Sub-Inspector of Police. PW-1 then told him that he could not walk because he was having pain in the legs. They proceeded towards the coffee hotel at the Junction. It is the prosecution case that when PW-1, the deceased and PW-3, who joined them on the way reached the Bhimvarappadu junction, the appellant and A-2 came on two cycles from behind and cought hold of the deceased. It is the further case of the prosecution that A-1 came near the deceased put a towel around the neck of the deceased and pulled him. It is also said to have been uttered by the appellant that the deceased should be done to death on that date. Thereafter, A-2 caught hold of the deceased after twisting his hands towards back. Thereupon, A-1, the appellant took out a knife from his waist and stabbed the deceased. According to the evidence of PW-15, the doctor, who conducted autopsy, the deceased had three injuries of which Injury No.3 is an eliptical oblique injury of 2-1/2 X 1 penetrating through chest wall tapering towards lower and exposing cut muscles and cut ribs 2 medial to left nipple. Clotted blood present. Sharp edge weapon. Internal Injuries: On opening the skin over the chest wall 7th and 8th ribs completely cut and 6th rib partially found cut just lateral to left margin of sternum corresponding to external injury No.3. On opening the chest wall, an oblique injury of 1-1/2 through and through present over the right verticle. Pericardium is found torn. Extravasation of blood into surrounding tissues in respect of all the injuries mentioned noticed. All the injuries are ante-mortem.

4. As per the evidence of PW-15, the injury to the heart was caused with a sharp object and the injury was sufficient to cause death in the ordinary course of nature which would come under clause thirdly of Section 300 IPC. The question, therefore, is: whether the offence is one of murder or culpable homicide not amounting to murder? Ms. K. Sharada Devi, learned counsel appearing for the appellant, contends that the appellant was not in know whether the deceased would be coming there as an informer to the police; the deceased had several enemies and that they were in search of him. As a consequence, it was not known that he would meet the deceased and in consequence, he had no intention to kill the deceased. We cannot appreciate the argument of the learned counsel. Notice is confined only to the nature of the offence committed by the appellant and, therefore, we have to proceed on the basis of the evidence on record as accepted by the courts below and then to consider whether the facts bring out the offence of murder punishable under section 302 I.P.C.

5. In the light of the aforestated facts and in view of the nature of injury inflicted upon the deceased, it is axiomatic that when the appellant had inflicted injury by piercing sharp edged weapon into the heart of the deceased as consequence of which the deceased died instantly, the necessary inference would be that he inflicted the injury with intention to do away with the deceased. In the light of the PW-15, doctors evidence and material prosecution evidence spoken to by the witnesses and the words of doing away with the deceased as uttered before the commission of the crime, the offence is clearly one of the murder. Accordingly, we do not think that the High Court has committed any error in confirming the conviction of the appellant for the offence of murder under Section 302 I.P.C. and sentencing him to undergo imprisonment for life.

6. The appeal is accordingly dismissed.

**********', 2] , 
[ 'HEADNOTE
MOTOAR VEHICLE 
Motor Vehicles Act, 1988 
Sections 163A, 167, 170 and 173 - Payment of compensation for death or injury suffered in motor vehicle accident - Liability of insurer - Rights of heirs of victim - Whether it is necessary to prove wrongful act or neglect or default - Deceased employed as driver of an autorickshaw owned by another person - Vehicle insured with respondent insurers - Rickshaw hired by unknown persons - Vehicle not traceable thereafter - Recovery of the body of the vehicle driver by police - For loss of the auto rickshaw owner get-ting compensation from insurers - Heirs of deceased autodriver filing claim petition for damages - Tribunal holding that the incident was an accident falling within the purview of MV Act and holding owner liable for compensation and in view of agreement between the owner and Insurance Company the statutory liability stood fastened on the insurers - High Court on appeal by insurers holding that there was no accident and that the death of the driver was caused by murder and hence claim petitions not main-tainable - Whether High Court correct in holding so. Held death of driver was accidental in the felonious act of theft of the auto. Such death could not be considered to be murder. Sim-plicitor. Accident claims Tribunal therefore justified in award-ing com- pensation. Reversal of such decision 
by High Court not correct. Principles laid down in (1910) 1KB 689 and (1914) AC 667 applied.

Workmens Compensation Act, 1923 
Death - Meaning - Whether the definition under the Act could be applied to a claim for damages preferred under the Motor Vehicles Act. Held there being no difference in the objects of both enact-ments reliance upon the legal interpretations under the Compensa-tion Act in a claim under MV Act not misplaced more so when the claimants were entitled to proceed under either of the Acts.
HELD
Murder, as it is understood, in the common parlance is a felo-nious act where death is caused with intent and the perpetrators of that act normally have a motive against the victim for such killing. But there are also instances where murder can be by accident on a given set of facts . The difference between a murder which is not an accident and a murder which is an accident, depends on the proximity of the cause of such murder. In our opinion, if the dominant intention of the Act of felony is to kill any particular person then such killing is not an acci-dental murder but is a murder simplicitor, while if the cause of murder or act of murder was originally not intended and the same was caused in furtherance of any other felonious act then such murder is an accidental murder.(Para 10)
The deceased, a driver of the auto rickshaw, was duty bound to have accepted the demand of fare paying passengers to transport them to the place of their destination. During the course of this duty, if the passengers had decided to commit an act of felony of stealing the auto rickshaw and in the course of achieving the said object of stealing the auto rickshaw, they had to eliminate the driver of the auto rickshaw then it cannot but be said that the death so caused to the driver of the auto rickshaw was an accidental murder. The stealing of the auto rickshaw was the object of the felony and the murder that was caused in the said process of stealing the auto rickshaw is only incidental to the act of stealing of the auto rickshaw. Therefore, it has to be said that on the facts and circumstances of this case the death of the deceased (Dasarath Singh) was caused accidentally in the process of committing the theft of the auto rickshaw.(Para 14)
We have no hesitation in coming to the conclusion that the murder of the deceased (Dasarath Singh) was due to an accident arising out of the use of motor vehicle. Therefore, the trial court rightly came to the conclusion that the claimants were entitled for compensation as claimed by them and the High Court was wrong in coming to the conclusion that the death of Dasarath Singh was not caused by an accident involving the use of motor vehicle.(Para 18)

We do not see how the object of the two Acts, namely, the Motor Vehicles Act and the Workmens Compensation Act are in any way different. In our opinion, the relevant object of both the Acts are to provide compensation to the victims of accidents. The only difference between the two enactments is that so far as the Workmens Compensation Act is concerned, it is confined to workmen as defined under that Act while the relief provided under Chapter X to XII of the Motor Vehicles Act is available to all the victims of accidents involving a motor vehicle. In this conclusion of ours we are supported by Section 167 of the Motor Vehicles Act as per which provision, it is open to the claimants either to proceed to claim compensation under the Workmens Compensation Act or under the Motor Vehicles Act. A perusal of the objects of the two enactments clearly establishes that both the enactments are beneficial enactments operating in the same field, hence judicially accepted interpretation of the word death in Workmens Compensation Act is, in our opinion, appli-cable to the interpretation of the word death in the Motor Vehi-cles Act also.
(Para 15)

CASES REFERRED
1. Shankarayya and Anr. v. United India Insurance Co. Ltd. and Anr. (JT 1998 (4) SC 300)
2. Shivaji Dayanu Patil and Anr. v. Vatschala Uttam More, (JT 1991 (3) SC 133)
Foreign Cases Referred
:
1. Board of Management of Trim Joint District School v. Kelly (1914 AC 667)
2. Nisbet v. Rayne and Burn ((1910) 1 KB 689)
3. Challis v. London and South Western Railway Company, (1905 2 Kings Bench 154)

SANTOSH HEGDE, J.
1. One Dasarath Singh was a driver of an auto rickshaw owned by Lalit Singh. The vehicle in question was registered as a public carrier vehicle used for hire by the passengers. This vehicle was insured with the respondent-Insurance Company. On 22nd of March, 1995, it is stated that some unknown passengers hired the above auto rickshaw from rickshaw stand at Dimapur between 5 to 6 p.m. It is also not in dispute that the said auto rickshaw was report-ed stolen and the dead body of driver Dasarath Singh was recov-ered by the police on the next day, the auto rickshaw was never recovered and the claim of the owner for the loss of auto rick-shaw was accepted by the respondent-Insurance Company and a sum of Rs. 47,220/- was settled by the said company towards the loss suffered by the owner.
2. One Darshan Singh claiming to be a Power of Attorney holder of the present appellants filed a claim petition along with the present appellants under Section 163 A of the Motor Vehicles Act, 1988 (for short the Act) claiming damages for the death caused to the deceased Dasarath Singh during the course of his employ-ment under Lalit Singh as a death caused in an accident arising out of the use of vehicle. The Motor Accidents Claims Tribunal, Nagaland as per its judgment dated 24th of June, 1996 came to the conclusion that the death of the driver of the auto rickshaw (Dasarath Singh) was caused by an accident coming within the purview of the Motor Vehicles Act, therefore, held that the owner of the vehicle was liable to compensate the death of the driver in money value. Since there was an agreement between the vehicle owner and the respondent-Insurance Company to compensate the employer of the vehicle, said legal and statutory liability stood fastened on the respondent-Insurance Company. The Tribunal also held that the quantum of claim of the claimants stood established and consequently it awarded a sum of Rs.2,81,500/- against the Insurance Company with interest @ 12% on the amount awarded from the date of application till payment.
3. The Insurance Company preferred an appeal by itself before the Gauhati High Court (Kohima Bench) in M.A. (F) No. 8 (K) 96. The High Court by its judgment dated 9.3.1998 came to the conclusion that there was no motor accident as contemplated under the Act. The High Court further held that the case in hand was a case of murder and not of an accident, hence a petition for claim under the provisions of the Act did not arise. The High Court, accord-ingly, allowed the appeal and set aside the judgment and the award made by the Tribunal.
4. Originally, the above mentioned Power of Attorney holder had preferred the above appeal making the wife and children of the deceased as proforma respondents along with the other respondent. By an Order of this Court dated 18th of February, 2000, this Court felt that to protect the interest of the heirs of the deceased the wife and children of the deceased should be first impleaded as appellants to this appeal and the cause-title be amended, which having been done and notice being issued, the respondent-Insurance Company is represented before us.
5. We have heard the parties. Leave granted.
6. On behalf of the appellants, Shri Anurabh Chowdhury contends that the deceased was employed to drive the auto rickshaw for ferrying passengers on hire and on the fateful day the auto rickshaw was parked at the rickshaw stand at Dimapur and at about 5 to 6 p.m. some unknown passengers had engaged the said auto rickshaw for their journey towards Singrijan area and thereafter nothing was known of the driver or rickshaw. It is only on the next day that the authorities were able to recover the body of the deceased and the auto rickshaw in question was never traced till date. The owner of the auto rickshaw has, therefore, been compensated by the Insurance Company for the loss of the said auto rickshaw, therefore, the murder of the deceased Dasarath Singh squarely comes within the word death due to accident arising out of the use of motor vehicle found in Section 163A (1) of the Act. Consequently the Tribunal was justified in awarding the compensation claimed by the appellants. He contended the word accident has not been defined under the Motor Vehicles Act and the said Act being a beneficial legislation, a liberal interpre-tation should be given so as to achieve the objects of the Act. He contended that the deceased being an employee was entitled for compensation both under the Motor Vehicles Act and also under the Workmens Compensation Act, 1923. However, under Section 167 of the Motor Vehicles Act, the heirs of the deceased had a choice either to claim compensation under that Act or under the Work-mens Compensation Act. The appellants having chosen to invoke the provisions of the Motor Vehicles Act, the Tribunal was wholly justified in awarding the compensation, while the High Court, according to him, without properly appreciating the reasonings adopted by the Tribunal has interfered with the just order of the Tribunal. He also contends that the appeal filed by the Insurance Company was not maintainable for not having obtained the leave of the Tribunal as required under Section 170 of the Act. He relies on a judgment of this Court in the case of Shankarayya and Anr. v. United India Insurance Co. Ltd. and Anr. (JT 1998 (4) SC 300 = 1998 (3) SCC 140). Ms. Pankaj Bala Verma, appearing for the respondent-Insurance Company does not in fact dispute the maintainability of the petition filed by the appellants under Section 163A of the Motor Vehicles Act but contends that the meaning ascribed to the word accident in the Workmens Compensation Act by judicial pronouncements cannot be applied to the word accident in the Motor Vehicles Act because the object of the two Acts are differ-ent. She supported the judgment of the High Court by contending that on the facts of the present appeal, the death of the driver of the auto rickshaw was caused by felonious acts of certain unknown persons and the same is not caused by an accident arising out of the use of the vehicle. Regarding the maintainability of the appeal, she submits the judgment of this Court was reported subsequent to the High Court Judgment, hence no fault could be found with the impugned judgment on that score and no such objec-tion was taken in regard to the maintainability before the High Court.
7. As pointed out by the learned counsel for the appellants, the Motor Vehicles Act does not define the word accident. However, Section 163A of the Motor Vehicles Act provides for payment of compensation for the death or injury suffered in a motor vehicle accident on a structured formula basis in Section 163 A of the Act. Sub-clause (I) of the said Section says that notwithstanding anything contained in this Act or in any other law for the time being in force or instrument having the force of law, the owner of the motor vehicle or the authorised insurer shall be liable to pay in the case of death or permanent disablement due to accident arising out of the use of motor vehicle, compensation, as indi-cated in the Second Schedule, to the legal heirs or the victim, as the case may be.
8. Sub-section (2) of the said Section also provides, in any claim for compensation under that Sub-section, the claimant shall not be required to plead or establish that the death or permanent disablement in respect of which the claim has been made was due to any wrongful act or neglect or default of the owner of the vehicle or vehicles concerned or of any other person. (emphasis supplied)
9. A conjoint reading of the above two sub-clauses of Section 163A shows that a victim or his heirs are entitled to claim from the owner/Insurance Company a compensation for death or permanent disablement suffered due to accident arising out of the use of the motor vehicle (emphasis supplied), without having to prove wrongful act or neglect or default of any one. Thus it is clear, if it is established by the claimants that the death or disable-ment was caused due to an accident arising out of the use of motor vehicle then they will be entitled for payment of compensa-tion. In the present case, the contention of the Insurance Compa-ny which was accepted by the High Court is that the death of the deceased (Dasarath Singh) was not caused by an accident arising out of the use of motor vehicle. Therefore, we will have to examine the actual legal import of the words death due to accid-ent arising out of the use of motor vehicle. 
10. The question, therefore, is can a murder be an accident in any given case? There is no doubt that murder, as it is understood, in the common parlance is a felonious act where death is caused with intent and the perpetrators of that act normally have a motive against the victim for such killing. But there are also instances where murder can be by accident on a given set of facts . The difference between a murder which is not an accid-ent and a murder which is an accident, depends on the proximity of the cause of such murder. In our opinion, if the dominant intention of the Act of felony is to kill any particular person then such killing is not an accidental murder but is a murder simplicitor, while if the cause of murder or act of murder was originally not intended and the same was caused in furtherance of any other felonious act then such murder is an accidental murder. 
11. In Challis v. London and South Western Railway Company ((1905 2 Kings Bench 154)), the Court of Appeal held where an engine driver while driving a train under a bridge was killed by a stone willfully dropped on the train by a boy from the bridge, that his injuries were caused by an accident. In the said case, the Court rejecting an argument that the said incident cannot be treated as an accident held:
The accident which befell the deceased was, as it appears to me, one which was incidental to his employment as an engine driver; in other words it arose out of his employment. The argument for the respondents really involves the reading into the Act of a proviso to the effect that an accident shall not be deemed to be within the Act, if it arose from the mischievous act of a person not in the service of the employer. I see no reason to suppose that the Legislature intended so to limit the operation of the Act. The result is the same to the engine driver, from whatever cause the accident happened; and it does not appear to me to be any answer to the claim for indemnification under the Act to say that the accident was caused by some person who acted mis-chievously. 
12. In the case of Nisbet v. Rayne and Burn (1910) 1 KB 689, where a cashier, while travelling in a railway to a colliery with a large sum of money for the payment of his employers workmen, was robbed and murdered. The Court of Appeal held:
That the murder was an accident from the standpoint of the person who suffered from it and that it arose out of an employ-ment which involved more than the ordinary risk, and consequently that the widow was entitled to compensation under the Workmens Compensation Act 1906. In this case the Court followed its earlier judgment in the case of Challis (supra). In the case of Nisbet, the Court also observed that it is contended by the employer that this was not an accident within the meaning of the Act, because it was an intentional felonious act which caused the death, and that the word accident negatives the idea of intention. In my opinion, this contention ought not to prevail. I think it was an accident from the point of view of Nisbet, and that it makes no difference whether the pistol shot was delib-erately fired at Nisbet or whether it was intended for somebody else and not for Nisbet. 
13. The judgment of the Court of Appeal in Nisbets case was followed by the majority judgment by the House of Lords in the case of Board of Management of Trim Joint District School v. Kelly (1914 AC 667).
14. Applying the principles laid down in the above cases to the facts of the case in hand, we find that the deceased, a driver of the auto rickshaw, was duty bound to have accepted the demand of fare paying passengers to transport them to the place of their destination. During the course of this duty, if the passengers had decided to commit an act of felony of stealing the auto rickshaw and in the course of achieving the said object of steal-ing the auto rickshaw, they had to eliminate the driver of the auto rickshaw then it cannot but be said that the death so caused to the driver of the auto rickshaw was an accidental murder. The stealing of the auto rickshaw was the object of the felony and the murder that was caused in the said process of stealing the auto rickshaw is only incidental to the act of stealing of the auto rickshaw. Therefore, it has to be said that on the facts and circumstances of this case the death of the deceased (Dasarath Singh) was caused accidentally in the process of committing the theft of the auto rickshaw.
15. Learned counsel for the respondents contended before us that since the Motor Vehicles Act has not defined the word death and the legal interpretations relied upon by us are with reference to definition of the word death in Workmens Compensation Act the same will not be applicable while interpreting the word death in Motor Vehicles Act because according to her, the objects of the two Acts are entirely different. She also contends on the facts of this case no proximity could be presumed between the murder of the driver and the stealing of the auto rickshaw. We are unable to accept this contention advanced on behalf of the respondents. We do not see how the object of the two Acts, name-ly, the Motor Vehicles Act and the Workmens Compensation Act are in any way different. In our opinion, the relevant object of both the Acts are to provide compensation to the victims of accidents. The only difference between the two enactments is that so far as the Workmens Compensation Act is concerned, it is confined to workmen as defined under that Act while the relief provided under Chapter X to XII of the Motor Vehicles Act is available to all the victims of accidents involving a motor vehicle. In this conclusion of ours we are supported by Section 167 of the Motor Vehicles Act as per which provision, it is open to the claimants either to proceed to claim compensation under the Workmens Compensation Act or under the Motor Vehicles Act. A perusal of the objects of the two enactments clearly establishes that both the enactments are beneficial enactments operating in the same field, hence judicially accepted interpretation of the word death in Workmens Compensation Act is, in our opinion, appli-cable to the interpretation of the word death in the Motor Vehi-cles Act also.
16. In the case of Shivaji Dayanu Patil and Anr. v. Vatschala Uttam More (JT 1991 (3) SC 133 = 1991 (3) SCC 530) this Court while pronouncing on the interpretation of Section 92 A of the Motor Vehicles Act, 1939 held as follows :
Section 92-A was in the nature of a beneficial legislation enacted with a view to confer the benefit of expeditious payment of a limited amount by way of compensation to the victims of an accident arising out of the use of a motor vehicle on the basis of no fault liability. In the matter of interpretation of a beneficial legislation the approach of the courts is to adopt a construction which advances the beneficent purpose underlying the enactment in preference to a construction which tends to defeat that purpose. 
17. In that case in regard to the contention of proximity between the accident and the explosion that took place this Court held :
This would show that as compared to the expression caused by, the expression arising out of has a wider connotation. The expression caused by was used in Sections 95(1)(b)(i) and (ii) and 96(2)(b)(ii) of the Act. In Section 92-A, Parliament, howev-er, chose to use the expression arising out of which indicates that for the purpose of awarding compensation under Section 92-A, the casual relationship between the use of the motor vehicle and the accident resulting in death or permanent disablement is not required to be direct and proximate and it can be less immediate. This would imply that accident should be connected with the use of the motor vehicle but the said connection need not be direct and immediate. This construction of the expression arising out of the use of a motor vehicle in Section 92-A enlarges the field of protection made available to the victims of an accident and is in consonance with the beneficial object underlying the enact-ment. 
18. In the instant case, as we have noticed the facts, we have no hesitation in coming to the conclusion that the murder of the deceased (Dasarath Singh) was due to an accident arising out of the use of motor vehicle. Therefore, the trial court rightly came to the conclusion that the claimants were entitled for compensa-tion as claimed by them and the High Court was wrong in coming to the conclusion that the death of Dasarath Singh was not caused by an accident involving the use of motor vehicle.
19. This leaves us to consider the second point raised before us by the counsel for the appellant. It is argued on behalf of the appellants that the appeal preferred by the Insurance Company purported to be under Section 173 of the Motor Vehicles Act was not maintainable because prior permission of the Court as re-quired was not obtained by the appellants. In support of this contention of the appellants, reliance is placed on a judgments of this Court in the case of Shankarayya and Anr. v. United India Insurance Co. Ltd. and Anr. (JT 1998 (4) SC 300 = 1998 3 SCC 140). In the said 
judgment a Division Bench of this Court held :
The Insurance Company when impleaded as a party by the Court can be permitted to contest the proceedings on merits only if the conditions precedent mentioned in Section 170 are found to be satisfied and for that purpose the Insurance Company has to obtain an order in writing from the Tribunal and which should be a reasoned order by the Tribunal. Unless that procedure is fol-lowed, the Insurance Company cannot have a wider defence on merits than what is available to it by way of statutory defence. It is true that the claimants themselves had joined Respondent 1 Insurance Company in the claim petition but that was done with a view to thrust the statutory liability on the Insurance Company on account of the contract of the insurance. That was not an order of the Court itself permitting the Insurance Company which was impleaded to avail of a larger defence on merits on being satisfied on the aforesaid two conditions mentioned in Section 170. Consequently, it must be held that on the facts of the present case, Respondent 1 Insurance Company was not entitled to file an appeal on merits of the claim which was awarded by the Tribunal. 
20. We respectfully agree with the ratio laid down in the above case and in view of the fact admittedly the Insurance Company had not obtained leave from the Tribunal before filing the above appeal. We are of the opinion that the appeal filed by the In-surance Company before the High Court was not maintainable in law. 
21. For the reasons mentioned above, this appeal succeeds, the judgment and order of the High Court dated 9.3.1998 is set aside and that of the Tribunal dated 24.6.1996 is restored. The appell-ants are entitled to costs in all the counts.
**********', 2] , 
[ 'HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAW
Indian Penal Code, 1860:
Section 149 - Free fight - Murder - Assailants should be liable for their individual acts - It is unsafe to convict all of them applying section 149 for the offence of murder.
Indian Penal Code, 1860:
Sections 302/34, 307, 324 and 326 - Free fight between two groups - Murder - Assailants should be liable for their individual acts - It is unsafe to convict all of them applying section 149 for the offence of murder - Conviction and sentenc- es modified.
HELD


K. JAYACHANDRA REDDY, J. :
1. Both these appeals are directed against the judgment of the Patna High Court confirming the convictions and sentences awarded by the trial court against the appellants. In the trial court as many as 13 accused were tried for offences punishable under Sections 148, 307, 326, 302/34 and 302/149 I.P.C. The trial court convicted all of them under Sections 148 and sentenced each of them to undergo R.I. for two years. Indradeo Rai, A-1, Doman Rai, A-9 and Raj Ballav Rai, A-10 were also convicted under Sections 302/34 I.P.C. and sentenced to imprisonment for life. Upendra Rai, A-5 and Chandradip Rai, A-6 were also convicted under Sections 307 and 324 I.P.C. and were sentenced to undergo R.I. for seven years and two years respectively. Basantlal Rai, A-11 and Anuplal Rai, A-13 were also convicted under Sections 307 and 326 I.P.C. and were sentenced to undergo R.I. for seven years on each count. The sentences were directed to run concurrently. The appeal filed by them was dismissed by the High Court. During the pendency of the appeal, Chhotan Rai, A-7 died. Out of the remaining 12 convicted accused, Kashi Rai, A-2, Satrughan Rai, A-3, Sukhdeo Rai, A-4 and Gopal Rai, A-8 have preferred Criminal Appeal No. 115/84. The remaining accused have preferred Criminal Appeal No. 164/84. 
2. The prosecution case is as follows:
The accused, the main prosecution witnesses and the deceased Maksudan belong to Rasalpur Village. On 23.5.68 P.W.6, brother of P.W.15, went to see his sweet potato field in the morning and he found A-11 with his men taking out sweet potato from his field to which he objected. A-11 and his men assaulted P.W.6 and took away sweet potato. P.W.6 went to Samastipur to lodge a complaint on the same day. On 24.5.68 in the morning P.W.15 had gone to river to take his bath. He found a mob consisting of about 200 to 250 persons collected at Bariyapur Ghat and some of them were crossing the river on boat. P.W.15 became suspicious and went to P.W.11 and informed him about the same. Subsequently he learnt that the mob was collecting near Kali Asthan with an intention to loot the shops of villagers of Rasalpur. P.W.11 called P.Ws 3, 7 and 9 and the deceased and they all started for Kali Asthan. There they found a mob of about 200 to 250 persons and they tried to persuade the mob to go away but the mob started pelting brickbats on them due to which P.W.15 and others tried to move back but P.W.15 and the deceased were surrounded by the mob. A-11 assaulted P.W.15 with a Bhala on his chest. A-5 assaulted him with a Bhala on the lower portion of his leg. A-6 assaulted him on his right knee with Gupti. A-13 assaulted him with a Bhala on his head and also hit him with his gun. Meanwhile the deceased was also assaulted and he fell down. Thereafter the mob went away. P.W.15 could not say as to which of the assailants assaulted the deceased. After the mob left, the deceased was removed from the place of assault to the Pipal tree. P.W.17, the Officer-in-charge of the Mohiuddin Nagar Police Station received information at about 8.15 A.M. through a Constable P.W.5. P.W.17 went to Rasalpur Village and he also saw some persons running away. P.W.17 found P.W.15 and the deceased lying under the Pipal tree and the deceased was unconscious. He recorded the statement of P.W.15 which is the first report. In the meantime, the deceased died. P.W.17 inspected the seen of occurrence and there he found marks of trampling and foot prints and also fresh copious blood in the field. Within a short distance of 50 to 60 yards from the place of occurrence, there are other houses. In the house of Shri Sah the dead body of Ram Baran Rai belonging to the accused party was found. One Mishri Thakur, also belonging the accused party, died during the same occurrence and his dead body was found in his house and Indradeo Rai, A-1 also received injuries. P.W.17 sent the dead body of the deceased Maksudan for post-mortem and P.W.15 for treatment. P.W.18, the Doctor examined P.W.15 and found two penetrating wounds, one incised wound and two fire-arm injuries on him. P.W.19 conducted the post-mortem on the dead body of Maksudan and he found five incised wounds and one lacerated wound which was on the head and which resulted in the fracture of the skull and proved fatal. The prosecution examined 19 witnesses. Out of them P.W. 15 is the main injured witness and informant in the case and others are P.Ws 1, 3, 7, 9 and 11. The accused denied the offence and they stated that the entire occurrence took place at Village Mohanpur and not at the place as alleged by the prosecution. A-1 lodged a case against the prosecution party stating that the prosecution party caused the death of Mishri Thakur and Ram Baran Rai and also caused injuries to him. P.W.17 registered a case on the basis of the report given by A-1. He also held inquest on the dead bodies of Mishri Thakur and Ram Baran Rai and also got A-1 examined. Two defence witnesses were examined on behalf of the accused to prove their case.
3. The Sessions Court, however, accepted the prosecution case and held that the accused were the aggressors and accordingly held them guilty and the same has been upheld by the High Court.
4. From the above stated facts, it can be seen that the occurrence did take place on 24.5.68 at about 9 A.M. during which the deceased Maksudan on the side of the prosecution party died and P.W.15 received several injuries and on the accused side, Mishri Thakur and Ram Baran Rai died and A-1 also sustained injuries. The main question that arose for consideration before the trial court as well as the High Court was as to who were the aggressors.
5. P.W.15 is the main witness who was injured and who gave the report. In the FIR, though he mentioned the names of some of the accused, he did not mention as to who attacked the deceased and he mentioned only the names of his assailants. The other main eye-witnesses admittedly were examined a week after the occurrence. Each party tried to throw the blame on the other. The High Court relying on the evidence of P.Ws 1, 3, 7, 9 and 15 held that the accused persons collected themselves into a mob and they commenced the fight. Shri Justice Uday Sinha, one of the members of the Division Bench of the High Court, however, wrote a separate but concurring judgment. He gave a finding that the parties fought and the crucial matter to be found out is as to who started the fight.
6. It must be noted that the prosecution did not explain as to how the two persons on the side of the accused died and how A-1 received injuries. The learned Judges of the High Court proceeded on the footing that though there was a fight between the two groups, it was accused party who started the fight and therefore it alone must be treated as the aggressors and consequently must be held guilty. But taking into consideration all the facts and surrounding circumstances of the case to us it looks as though it was a free fight where both the parties collected into groups with the determination to fight. In such a situation as to who started fight is not very material.
7. In such a situation though it can be held that there was an unlawful assembly to the extent of committing a rioting but the common object of the every member of the unlawful assembly cannot be said to commit murder. In a case of free fight of such nature, the assailants should be liable for their individual acts and it may be unsafe to convict all of them by applying Section 149 for the offence of murder. In the instance case, P.W.15 who gave the first information report has not mentioned any of the accused as having attacked the deceased. It is only one week later, the other interested witnesses have come forward with the version that A-1, A-9 and A-10 attacked the deceased Maksudan. But it is highly unsafe to accept this version. A-1 also gave a report almost immediately naming some of the prosecution witnesses as the assailants of the two deceased persons Mishri Thakur and Ram Baran Rai and in the version given by the prosecution, in the instant case, A-1 is named as the principal assailant as far as attack on the deceased Maksudan is concerned. We think it is highly unsafe to convict A-1, A-9 and A-10 for the offence of murder of deceased Maksudan under Sections 302/34 I.P.C. However, their presence in the unlawful assembly cannot be doubted. Now, coming to the attack on P.W.15, both the courts below have held A-5, A-6, A-11 and A-13 guilty under Sections 307, 324 and 326 I.P.C. Learned counsel appearing for the appellants could not persuade us as to why the same can not be accepted. P.W.15s evidence is corroborated by the medical evidence and he has also mentioned the names of these accused in the FIR which was promptly given. P.W.15 will be the last person to leave out his own assailants and implicate others falsely.
8. Accordingly we set aside the conviction of Indradeo Rai, A-1, Doman Rai, A-9 and Raj Ballav Rai, A-10 under Sections 302/34 I.P.C. and sentence of imprisonment of life awarded thereunder. Their conviction under Section 148 I.P.C. and the sentence of two years R.I. is, however, confirmed. All the other convictions and sentences awarded against the other appellants are also confirmed. But the sentence of sevens years R.I. awarded against A-5 and A-6 under Section 307 I.P.C. is reduced to five years R.I. Likewise the sentence of seven years R.I. each under Sections 307 and 326 I.P.C. awarded against A-11 and A-13 is reduced to five years R.I. under each count. All the sentences shall run concurrently. Subject to the above modification of sentences, both the appeals are disposed of.
**********', 2] , 
[ 'HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAWS
Evidence Act, 1872
Section 27 - Recovery of bloodstained clothes - Murder case -  As per prosecution, blood group on the clothes matched with blood on the bed sheet on which one of the dead bodies was found - Though blood of both deceased sent for examination, no blood report produced - Neither blood group of deceased nor that of accused persons ascertained. Held, mere matching of the blood group, did not prove culpability of appellant. (Para 8)
Sections 25, 27 - Recovery of deceaseds sisters laptop from appellants house - Murder case. Held, mere recovery of laptop does not indicate that appellant is responsible for murder. Under Section 27 only so much of recovery, as a result of the disclosure statement, which directly pertains to the commission of crime is relevant. Otherwise, such an evidence is barred under Section 25. Laptop is neither weapon of crime nor has any cause of connection with the commission of crime. Jaffar Hussain Dastagirs case. 1969 (2) SCC 872, referred.
Murder case - Fingerprints of appellant on cello tape found in deceaseds house - Print marked D on cello tape matched with specimen of the appellant - However,  in the court it was found that print D was missing on the cello tape roll.  Held, print D could not be relied upon. Print marks A to C were unfit for comparison. Therefore, the circumstance was not proved. (Paras 9-10)
Murder case - Absence of motive - Allegedly accused, a jilted lover, had killed his girlfriend and mother with the help of appellant. Held, in absence of motive and incriminating circumstance and weak linkage of appellants alleged friendship with A1, he is to be given benefit of doubt. (Para 10)

CASES REFERRED
1.  Jaffar Hussain Dastagir v. State of Maharashtra 1969 (2) SCC 872 (Para 8)


A.K. SIKRI, J.
1. We have heard learned counsel for the parties at length.
2. For the purpose of this appeal, it is not necessary to state the facts of the matter in detail. Suffice it to state that the appellant was charged under Section 302 read with Section 34 of the Indian Penal Code, 1860 (hereinafter referred to as ‘IPC’) for committing the murder of Anusha Sarkar and her mother Maya Sarkar.
3. As per the prosecution, there was love affair between Subhankar Sarkar (hereinafter referred to as ‘A1’) and Anusha Sarkar. However, this relationship was not acceptable to the mother of Anusha Sarkar who advised Anusha to sever her relation from A1. A1 did not like this move on the part of Anusha Sarkar and this became the motive for A1 to finish Anusha Sarkar as well as her mother. Insofar as the incident of murder is concerned, it came to light in the following manner:
4. As Anusha Sarkar did not respond to A1, A1 along with his friend Debapriya Pal (appellant herein) on the fateful day when Anusha’s mother, i.e. Maya Sarkar, was alone in the house – ‘Kalamban’ in Air View Complex, P.S. English Bazar, Malda, committed her murder and then waited for Anusha Sarkar to come and after she arrived, she was also brutally murdered by them. On the next day, i.e. 27.09.07, in the morning when their maid servant Saraswati Sarkar came to the house she saw the dead bodies of Smt. Maya Sarkar and Anusha Sarkar in their bedroom with bleeding injuries and raised an alarm. On hearing her cry, Nabarun Paul, their driver came into the house and saw the dead bodies. These two servants informed the police, neighbours and relations of Smt. Maya Sarkar. In the meantime, Ananya Sarkar, elder daughter of deceased Maya Sarkar who was prosecuting her studies outside Malda was informed. Sujit Sarkar, brother-in-law of Smt. Maya Sarkar, lodged a written complaint of the incident to the English Bazar Police Station. The police registered a case on the basis of the aforesaid information.
5. As per the prosecution, during investigation the aforesaid facts of love affair between Anusha Sarkar and A1 surfaced because of which A1 became a suspect. He was arrested. The appellant was also roped in on the ground that he was a friend of A1 and has helped A1 to commit the said double murder. Both the accused persons denied the charge which led to the trial against them. As many as, 38 witnesses were examined. We may also record at this stage that after their arrest, both the accused had made disclosure statements which led to certain recoveries. After analyzing the depositions of these witnesses as well as recoveries, the Trial Court came to a conclusion that the prosecution was able to prove its case beyond reasonable doubt against both the accused persons under Sections 302/201/380/411 of the IPC and awarded the sentence of death to both of them. Death reference was made to the High Court for confirmation of the sentence. Both the accused persons filed appeals in the High Court. The High Court vide the impugned judgment has confirmed the conviction of A1 as well as the appellant. However, insofar as award of death sentence by the Trial Court is concerned, the same is modified to that of rigorous imprisonment for life. The appellant as well as A1 had challenged the judgment of the High Court by filing special leave petitions. The special leave petition of A1 was dismissed by this Court. In this manner, as far as conviction and sentence awarded to A1 is concerned, that has attained finality. In the Special Leave Petition filed by the appellant, leave was granted. That is how the present appeal comes up for final hearing.
6. It is clear from the aforesaid that there is no eye witness to the crime and the conviction is based on circumstantial evidence. It also becomes clear that no direct motive is attributed to the appellant herein. As per the prosecution, the motive to commit the crime was with A1 who could not digest the stand of Anusha Sarkar’s mother because of which Anusha Sarkar parted the company of A1. We need not to discuss the evidence that was led and proved against A1 since his special leave petition has already been dismissed. Insofar as the appellant is concerned, the only reason given is that he was a friend of A1 and that is why he joined A1 in commission of the said crime. We may state at the outset that after examining the testimonies of the witnesses on this particular aspect, we find that it is not very strong inasmuch as the nature of friendship and the thickness of such friendship has not come on record. One of the witnesses has stated in a cursory manner that he had seen the appellant in the company of A1 on certain occasions.
7. Insofar as other material/evidence, which is led against the appellant and can become the basis of his conviction is concerned, we find that there are three circumstances which weighed with the Trial Court to convict the appellant. These are:
     1. Recovery of blood stained clothes of the appellant from his house on his disclosure statement.
     2. Recovery of laptop belonging to the sister (PW 23) of the deceased Anusha Sarkar from the house of the appellant with cushion cover.
     3. Finger prints of the appellant on the cello tape which was found in the house of the deceased.
8. As far as recovery of blood stained clothes is concerned, two public witnesses are examined who, purportedly, were the witnesses to the seizure list of wearing apparels of the appellant. These are PW-12 and PW13. According to their deposition, they saw the policemen along with the accused person going to the house of the appellant and they also joined the police party. It is how they became the witnesses and were associated with the recovery. For the sake of argument, we are presuming that they were present at the time when the appellant brought blood stained clothes from his house and gave the same to the police. What is material is the reliance on these blood stained clothes for the culpability of the appellant herein. As per the prosecution, the blood group on these blood stained clothes matched with the blood on the bed sheet on which the body of one of the deceased person is found. The record reveals that though blood of both the deceased persons was drawn and sent for examination, it is not known as to what was the report thereupon and what was the blood group of the deceased persons. No such blood report has been produced. So much so, blood group of the accused persons was also not ascertained. Even if we presume that the blood on the bed sheet was that of the deceased, the possibility cannot be ruled out that the same blood group as of the accused appellant thereof. Therefore, mere matching of the blood group on the blood stained clothes, which was even on the bed sheet, would not lead to the conclusion that it is the appellant who had committed the crime. Same reasoning goes with the recovery of laptop as well. Merely because laptop belonging to the sister of the deceased Anusha Sarkar is not indicative that the appellant is responsible for the commission of the crime. Under Section 27 of the Evidence Act only so much of recovery, as a result of the disclosure statement, which directly pertains to the commission of crime is relevant. Otherwise, such an evidence is barred under Section 25 of the Evidence Act. Recovery of laptop does not have any bearing. It is neither the weapon of crime nor it has any cause of connection with the commission of crime. The law on this aspect is succinctly said in the case Jaffar Hussain Dastagir v. State of Maharashtra 1969 (2) SCC 872 in the following manner:
     “5. Under Section 25 of the Evidence Act no confession made by an accused to a police officer can be admitted in evidence against him. An exception to this is however provided by Section 26 which makes a confessional statement made before a Magistrate admissible in evidence against an accused notwithstanding the fact that he was in the custody of the police when he made the incriminating statement. Section 27 is a proviso to Section 26 and makes admissible so much of the statement of the accused which leads to the discovery of a fact deposed to by him and connected with the crime, irrespective of the question whether it is confessional or otherwise. The essential ingredient of the section is that the information given by the accused must lead to the discovery of the fact which is the direct outcome of such information. Secondly, only such portion of the information given as is distinctly connected with the said recovery is admissible against the accused. Thirdly, the discovery of the fact must relate to the commission of some offence.“
9. Third ingredient does not seem to have been satisfied. As far as finger prints on the cello tape are concerned, the report is that print marked D on cello tape matched with specimen of the appellant and prints marked A to C were unfit for comparison and print B did not match with either of the accused.
10. From the aforesaid, it is clear that only on print mark D, the finger prints were found to be matching with the specimen of the appellant. However, what is significant is that in the court it was found that print D was missing on the cello tape roll. In view thereof, print D could not be relied upon. Insofar as print marks A to C are concerned, the report of the expert is that they were unfit for comparison. Therefore, this circumstance has also not been satisfactorily proved. In the absence of any motive on the part of the appellant, weak linkage of his alleged friendship with A1 and hardly any circumstance clinching to point accusing finger on the appellant, we are of the opinion that the appellant should have been given the benefit of doubt as his culpability has not been proved by the prosecution beyond reasonable doubt.
11. For these reasons, we allow this appeal and set aside the conviction. Since the appellant is in jail he shall be released forthwith.
**********', 2] , 
[ 'CROSS CITATION
1997 (9) SCC 119
1996 (9) (Suppl) SCR 537
APPEARANCES
N.N.Keshwani and Mr. R.N.Keshwani, Advocates for the Appellants.
Mr. U.N.Bachawat, Senior Advocate, (Mr. Prashant Kumar) Advocate for Uma Nath Singh, Advocate with him for the Respondent
HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAW
Indian Penal Code - Sections 302/149, 141 - unlawful assembly formed by appellants with other unknown persons with common intention of murder - Held appreciation of evidenced PW9, the mother by both courts below is proper - PW9 an interested witness has her evidence corroborated by PW8 & PW10, the doctor performï¿½ing autopsy - No error committed by High Court in relying on evidence of sole eye witness - All three appellants were together at scene of the crime and did share the common intention of committing murder - Intention was established from record and so the a distinct charge was framed with the aid of Section 34 - Whether there was evidence of unlawful assembly of three - Folï¿½lowing Dhanna etc. v. State of M.P. (JT 1996 (6) SC 652 convicï¿½tion altered from Section 302/149 to Section 302/34 and convicï¿½tion under Section 148 set aside - Sentence of life imprisonment maintained.
HELD
The opinion of the High Court that these three appellants formed an unlawful assembly with some other unknown persons, is based on no evidence as it is not the prosecution case that besides the 13 named persons, there was any other unknown persons also who had shared the common object with the appellants for committing the murder of Mohan Lal. The High Court was, therefore, not legally justified in convicting the appellants under sections 148 and 302 /149 I.P.C. However, we find that the manner in which the incident took place clearly indicates that the appellants had shared the common intention of committing the murder of Mohan Lal. They would therefore be liable for the said murder with the aid of Section 34 I.P.C. We may notice here that these three appellants are the ones who had been specifically named by P.W.9 to have assaulted deceased Mohan Lal. All the three were together at the scene of the crime as deposed to by P.W.8 also. The evidence of P.W.9 that Jiwan Lal and Halkoi had fired upon the deceased while Dashrath had caused an injury on him with a farsa, has been found established from the medical evidence of P.W.10. Thus, there is no manner of doubt that the three appellants did share the common intention of committing murder of Mohan Lal. The appellants along with other as already noticed, had been charged for the said murder of sharing the common object with the aid of section 149 I.P.C. No prejudice has been shown to have been caused to the appellants for not framing a distinct charge with the aid of section 34 I.P.C., as intention which is a question of fact, has to be gathered from the evidence and the evidence on the record clearly establishes that the appellants did share the common intention of committing the murder of Mohan Lal. In Dhanna etc. v. State of Madhya Pradesh (JT 1996(6) SC 652),Para 5

CASES REFERRED
Dhanna etc. v. State of Madhya Pradesh JT 1996(6) SC 652 (Para 5)


ORDER


1. The appellants along with 10 others were tried for various offences including offences under sections 148 and 302/149 I.P.C. in respect of an occurrence dated 11th June, 1984 in which deï¿½ceased Mohan Lal received fatal injuries. The Trial Court vide judgment of 1st June, 1985, acquitted two co-accused but convictï¿½ed 11 for various offences including offences under sections 148 and 302/149 I.P.C. They were sentenced to undergo life imprisonï¿½ment. All the 11 convicts filed appeal in the High Court against their conviction and sentence. On 9th December, 1989, Division Bench of the High Court allowed the appeal of 8 convicts and acquitted them by giving them the benefit of doubt. So far as the three appellants herein are concerned, their conviction was maintained for the offences under section 302/149 I.P.C. The High Court opined that these three appellants had formed an unlawful assembly with other unknown persons with the common object of committing murder of Mohan Lal as alleged by the prosecution. By special leave, the appellants have filed this appeal.

2. We have heard Mr. Keshwani, learned counsel appearing for the appellants and Mr. U.N.Bachawat, learned senior counsel appearing for the respondent and examined the record.

3. The Trial Court as well as the High Court relied upon the testimony of Swami P.W.8, brother of Mohan Lal and Saraswati, P.W.9, the mother of the deceased. It was found by the Courts below that on the fateful day of 11th June, 1984 at about 8.00 a.m., the appellants armed with guns and a farsa attacked the deceased while he was proceeding with his brother Swami P.W.8 towards the betel grove. The Trial Court as well as the High Court found that P.W.8 and P.W.9 had given a correct account relating to the assault and while P.W.9 had specifically stated that appellants Jiwan Lal and Holkoi fired upon the deceased, Dashrath hit him with a farsa. P.W.8 Swami has corroborated P.W.9 by deposing that he had seen these accused along with others variously armed by the side of his brother who was lying on the ground. The submission of Mr. Keshwani that the courts below committed an error in relying upon the testimony of P.W.9, the solitary eye witness, as according to him, she was an interested witness and since she had implicated 10 other accused also, her testimony could not be relied upon, does not appeal to us. He referred to certain judgments of this Court to urge that convicï¿½tion could not be based on the testimony of sole eye witness, who has been disbelieved in respect of a part of the occurrence or who has been found to be otherwise interested in the prosecution.

4. It is found from a perusal of the record that the evidence of Saraswati P.W.9 in so far as the part attributed to the apï¿½pellants is concerned, is cogent and consistent and is also corroborated by P.W.8 as well as by the medical evidence. The names of 3 appellants were also clearly disclosed in the promptly lodged F.I.R., Ex.P-16. It is settled law that conviction can be based on the sole testimony of an eye witness provided that testimony is found to be wholly reliable. Where the testimony of such a witness is partly reliable, prudence requires that corrobï¿½oration of the testimony of that witness should be sought for from independent sources to base the conviction. Indeed, P.W.9 is the mother of the deceased. She is, therefore, an interested witness. Prudence, as such, requires that we look for corroboraï¿½tion of her testimony. We find that such corroboration is amply provided for both by P.W.8 and Dr. Ramesh Kumar P.W.10 who had performed the Autopsy on the dead body. Both the Trial Court and the High Court committed no error in relying upon her testimony which has been corroborated by other evidence on the record to convict the appellants. The appreciation of evidence by both the courts below is proper and we have not been persuaded to take a different view. Merely because, 10 other persons named by her as accused were acquitted, would not render her testimony as wholly suspect because falsus in uno falsus in omnibus is not rule of law accepted by the courts in this country. That apart, we find that the High Court has opined that since the testimony of P.W.9 had not been supported by the medical evidence in so far as the injuries attributed to the other 10 accused is concerned, thereï¿½fore, the benefit of doubt was required to be given to them and they were acquitted.

5. Learned counsel for the appellants then submitted that the conviction of the appellants by the courts below for offences under sections 148 and 302/149 I.P.C, cannot be sustained. Indeed, according to the positive case of the prosecution, all the 13 arraigned accused were the miscreants. With the acquittal of 10 of them (two by the Trial Court and eight by the High Court), the conviction of the remaining three under sections 148 and 302/149 I.P.C. is not permissible as the assembly of three only would not be an unlawful assembly within the meaning of section 141 I.P.C. The opinion of the High Court that these three appellants formed an unlawful assembly with some other unknown persons, is based on no evidence as it is not the prosecution case that besides the 13 named persons, there was any other unknown persons also who had shared the common object with the appellants for committing the murder of Mohan Lal. The High Court was, therefore, not legally justified in convicting the appellï¿½ants under sections 148 and 302 /149 I.P.C. However, we find that the manner in which the incident took place clearly indicates that the appellants had shared the common intention of committing the murder of Mohan Lal. They would therefore be liable for the said murder with the aid of Section 34 I.P.C. We may notice here that these three appellants are the ones who had been specificalï¿½ly named by P.W.9 to have assaulted deceased Mohan Lal. All the three were together at the scene of the crime as deposed to by P.W.8 also. The evidence of P.W.9 that Jiwan Lal and Halkoi had fired upon the deceased while Dashrath had caused an injury on him with a farsa, has been found established from the medical evidence of P.W.10. Thus, there is no manner of doubt that the three appellants did share the common intention of committing murder of Mohan Lal. The appellants along with other as already noticed, had been charged for the said murder of sharing the common object with the aid of section 149 I.P.C. No prejudice has been shown to have been caused to the appellants for not framing a distinct charge with the aid of section 34 I.P.C., as intention which is a question of fact, has to be gathered from the evidence and the evidence on the record clearly establishes that the appellants did share the common intention of committing the murder of Mohan Lal. In Dhanna etc. v. State of Madhya Pradesh (JT 1996(6) SC 652), Thomas, J speaking for the bench, while dealing with a similar aspect, after referring to a catena of authorities observed:

Legal position on this aspect remained uncertain for a time after this court rendered a decision in Nanak Chand v. The State of Punjab, 1995 (1) SCR 1201. But the doubt was cleared by a constitution bench of this Court in Willie Slaney v. State of M.P., AIR 1956 SC 116, where this Court observed at para 86, thus:

Sections 34, 114 and 149 of the Indian Penal Code provide for criminal liability viewed from different angles as regards actual participants, accessories and men actuated by a common object or a common intention; and the charge is a rolled-up one involving the direct liability and the constructive liability without specifying who are directly liable and who are sought to be made constructively liable.

In such a situation, the absence of a charge under one or other of the various heads of criminal liability for the offence cannot be said to be fatal by itself, and before a conviction for the substantive offence, without a charge, can be set aside, prejudice will have to be made out. In most of the cases of this kind, evidence is normally given from the outset as to who was primarily responsible for the act which brought about the offence and such evidence is of course relevant.

6.It is therefore, open to the court to take recourse to section 34 I.P.C. even if the said section was not specifically mentioned in the charge and instead section 149 I.P.C. has been included. Of course a finding that the assailant concerned had a common intention with the other accused is necessary for resorting to such a course. This view was followed by this court in later decisions also. (Amar Singh v. State of Haryana, AIR 1973 SC 2221, Bhoor Singh and Anr. v. State of Punjab, AIR 1974 SC 1256). The first submission of the learned counsel for the appellant has no merit.

7.The view expressed above lends support to the view taken by us. Under the circumstances, the conviction of the appellants is altered from under Section 302/149 I.P.C. to the one under Secï¿½tion 302/34 I.P.C. while maintaining the sentence of life imprisï¿½onment. The conviction and sentence of the appellants for the offence under Section 148 IPC is however set aside, but in all other respects, their conviction and sentence is maintained. As a result of the above discussion, except for the alternation made above, this appeal fails and is hereby dismissed.

8.The appellants are on bail. Their bail bonds shall stand canï¿½celled. They shall be taken into custody to undergo the remaining part of the sentence.

**********', 2] , 
[ 'HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAW
Criminal Procedure Code, 1973
Section 31 - Conviction under Section 381 IPC and Section 52, Post Office Act, 1898 - Theft of a registered insured parcel containing Gold Chain - Chief Judicial magistrate, while awarding sentences under the two Acts, not mentioning whether they were to run concurrently or consecutively - Revision dismissed by High Court - Plea that court should invoke the power under Section 31 CrPC and allow sentences to run concurrently as both the offences were tried in one trial and arose out of one act, theft - Appellant 61 years old, suffering from heart ailment - Lost job - Incident of year 1993 - Gold chain recovered and handed out to owner. Held, on facts, sentences to run concurrently. Sawal Dass case relied upon.
HELD
This is a fit case where we can direct the sentences awarded to the appellant to run concurrently for the reasons that firstly, the case out of which this appeal arises relates to the year 1993 and is pending for a long period of 21 years; secondly, the two sentences, which were imposed on the appellant, arose out of one offence of theft punishable under Section 381 IPC tried in one trial; thirdly, the provisions of Section 52 of the IPO Act were required to be invoked against the appellant because he was the postal employee; fourthly, the Gold Chain was long recovered and also handed over to the person concerned; fifthly, the appellant has already been dismissed from services due to impugned conviction; and lastly, the appellant has been suffering from heart ailment since long, as is proved by documents filed along with the appellants affidavit 03.11.2014. (Para 21)

CASES REFERRED
1.Manoj @ Panu v. State of Haryana JT 2013 (15) SC 384 (Para 19)

2.State of Punjab v. Madan Lal JT 2009 (3) SC 326 (Para 19)

3.Chatar Singh v. State of M.P. 2006 12 SCC 37 (Para 19)

4.State of Maharashtra & Anr. v. Najakat Alia Mubarak Ali JT 2001 (Suppl.1) SC 279 (Para 18)

5.Mohd. Akhtar Hussain @ Ibrahim Ahmed Bhatti v. Assistant Collector of Customs (Prevention), Ahmedabad & Anr. JT 1988 (3) SC 586 (Para 17)

ABHAY MANOHAR SAPRE, J.

1. Leave granted.

2. This appeal is filed by the accused against the judgment and final order dated 25.04.2014 passed by the High Court of Karnataka at Bangalore in Criminal Revision Petition No. 924 of 2009 whereby the learned single Judge of the High Court dismissed the revision petition and upheld the order dated 23.09.2008/01.10.2008 passed by the XVII Additional Chief Metropolitan Magistrate, Bangalore in CC No. 2408 of 1995 convicting and sentencing the appellant-accused for the offences punishable under Section 381 of the Indian Penal

3. Facts of the case lie in a narrow compass.

4. The appellant-accused, at the relevant time, (1.3.1992 to 11.3.1993) was working as Sorting Assistant in Bangalore Packet Sorting Office, Head Record Office (Main Unit) at Bangalore. On the intervening night between 05.03.1993 and 06.03.1993, the appellant-accused while on duty committed theft of a registered insured parcel bearing receipt No. 0127 dated 03.03.1993 containing Gold Chain (V shape) weighing 173.650 Grams worth Rs. 70,410/- which was sent by its owner from Ramavadi Post Office, Bombay for being delivered to the consignee - Gulab Jewellery Shop at K.H.B. Road Post Office, Bangalore. The parcel thus could not be delivered to the party concerned though reached to Bangalore post office.

5. Mr. M.N. Narasimha Murthy-Assistant Superintendent of Bags (PW-1) in the office of Chief Post Master General of Karnataka, on coming to know of the missing of parcel and commission of the theft of the parcel, immediately lodged a complaint (Ex-P-1) in the High Grounds Police Station. The complaint was accordingly investigated which revealed complicity of the appellant in commission of its theft which led to registration of Crime Case No. 115/1993 against the appellant for the offences punishable under Sections 381 and 419 of IPC read with Section 52 of the IPO Act. The case was then handed over to the CBI. The CBI registered the case being RC No. 14(S)/93-BLR, which eventually led to filing of the charge-sheet against the appellant in the Court of XVII Additional Chief Metropolitan Magistrate, Bangalore for appellants prosecution for commission of aforementioned offences.

6. The appellant abjured the guilt and claimed the trial. The Chief Metropolitan Magistrate, by his order dated 23.09.2008/01.10.2008 passed in CC No 2408 of 1995 convicted the appellant for the offences punishable under Section 381 IPC and Section 52 of the IPO Act and sentenced him to undergo simple imprisonment for 6 months and to pay a fine of Rs. 2000/- under Section 381 IPC and in default of payment of fine amount to undergo further simple imprisonment for 3 months. Similarly, the appellant was also sentenced to undergo simple imprisonment for 6 months and to pay a fine of Rs. 2000/- for the offence punishable under Section 52 of the IPO Act and in default of payment of fine amount, to undergo further simple imprisonment of 3 months. So far as the offence punishable under Section 419 IPC was concerned, the appellant was acquitted of the charge.

7. It may be pertinent to mention that the Chief Judicial Magistrate while awarding the punishment for commission of two offences as mentioned above did not mention as to whether both the punishments will run concurrently or consecutively. In other words, the order of the Chief Judicial Magistrate in so far as it relates to the award of punishment was concerned it was silent, on this issue.

8. Feeling aggrieved by the order of conviction and sentence, the appellant filed an appeal being Criminal Appeal No. 845 of 2008 before the XXI Additional City Civil and Sessions Judge and Special Judge for CBI Cases, Bangalore. The appellate Judge, by his order dated 08.10.2009, confirmed the conviction and sentences awarded to the appellant and dismissed his appeal. Against the said order, the appellant preferred a revision being Criminal Revision Petition No. 924 of 2009 in the High Court. The High Court, by impugned order, dismissed the revision and in consequence upheld the conviction and sentences awarded to the appellant. It is against this order, the appellant- accused has filed this appeal by way of special leave.

9. While assailing the legality and correctness of the impugned order, learned Counsel for the appellant urged only one point. Learned Counsel, however, did not question the legality and correctness of the conviction on its merit and confined his challenge only to the sentences awarded to the appellant. According to him, the Courts below erred in not directing both the sentences awarded to the appellant, i.e., the one awarded under Section 381 IPC and the other awarded under Section 52 of the IPO Act to run concurrently. It was his submission that since both the offences which resulted in appellants conviction under two different Acts (IPC and IPO Act) were tried in one trial and arose out of one act namely- theft, this was a fit case where the Courts below should have directed both the sentences to run concurrently. Learned Counsel pointed out that in every case of this nature, it is the duty of the Court to specifically mention in the order of conviction as to whether the sentences awarded for the offences under the different sections would run concurrently or consecutively by taking recourse to the provisions of Section 31 of the Code of Criminal Procedure, 1973 (hereinafter referred to as the Code). Learned Counsel contended that in any event, having regard to the nature of offence committed by the appellant, his advanced age (61 years), the serious heart ailment suffered by him while undergoing the sentence duly proved by documents and the fact that he has already been dismissed from service due to his conviction, this Court should invoke the power under Section 31 of the Code and direct both the sentences, i.e., the one awarded under IPC and other awarded under IPO Act to run concurrently instead of to run consecutively.

10. In contra, learned counsel for the respondent- State supported the impugned judgment and submitted that no interference is called for in the impugned judgment.

11. Having heard the learned counsel for the parties and on perusal of the record of the case, we find force in the submissions made by the learned counsel for the appellant.

12. The question, which arises for consideration in this appeal, is whether the sentences awarded to the appellant under IPC and the IPO Act should run concurrently or consecutively?

13. The expressions concurrently and consecutively mentioned in the Code are of immense significance while

awarding punishment to the accused once he is found guilty of any offence punishable under IPC or/and of an offence punishable under any other Special Act arising out of one trial or more. It is for the reason that award of former enure to the benefit of accused whereas award of latter is detrimental to the accuseds interest. It is, therefore, legally obligatory upon the Court of first instance while awarding sentence to specify in clear terms in the order of conviction as to whether sentence awarded to the accused would run concurrently or they would run consecutively

14. Section 31 of the Code deals with power of the Court to award sentence in cases where the accused is convicted of several offences at one trial. It reads as under :

31. Sentence in cases of conviction of several offences at one trial.-

(1) When a person is convicted at one trial of two or more offences, the Court may, subject to the provisions of section 71 of the Indian Penal Code (45 of 1860), sentence him for such offences, to the several punishments prescribed therefor which such Court is competent to inflict; such punishments when consisting of imprisonment to commence the one after the expiration of the other in such order as the Court may direct, unless the Court directs that such punishments shall run concurrently.

(2) In the case of consecutive sentences, it shall not be necessary for the Court by reason only of the aggregate punishment for the several offences being in excess of the punishment which it is competent to inflict on conviction of a single offence, to send the offender for trial before a higher Court:

Provided that-

(a) in no case shall such person be sentenced to imprisonment for a longer period than fourteen years;

(b) the aggregate punishment shall not exceed twice the amount of punishment which the Court is competent to inflict for a single offence.

(3) For the purpose of appeal by a convicted person, the aggregate of the consecutive sentences passed against him under this section shall be deemed to be a single sentence.

15. The issue as to in which circumstances the Court should direct the sentences to run concurrently or consecutively after the accused is convicted of more than one offence in one trial or more has been the subject matter of several cases in this Court and thus remains no more res integra. This issue was considered by this Court while considering the scope of Sections 31, 427 and 428 of the Code and Section 71 of IPC.

16. We consider it apposite to refer to some of the decisions.

17. In Mohd. Akhtar Hussain @ Ibrahim Ahmed Bhatti v. Assistant Collector of Customs (Prevention), Ahmedabad & Anr. JT 1988 (3) SC 586 : 1988 (4) SCC 183, the accused was sentenced to undergo 7 years imprisonment and a fine of Rs. 10 lakhs was imposed for having found to be in possession of primary gold worth Rs.1.4 crores which was in violation of the Gold (Control) Act. He was subsequently indicted for infringing the provisions of Customs Act by smuggling gold valued at Rs. 12.5 Crores and exporting silver worth Rs. 11.5 Crores. The accused pleading guilty in commission of the offences was awarded 4 years imprisonment and also a fine. Both the sentences were directed to run consecutively. However, the State contended that the offence under the Customs Act merited the maximum sentence, while the accused contended that sentences should run concurrently. The High Court, however, enhanced the sentence as contended by the State and rejected the plea of the accused in regard to the award of sentences. This Court in an appeal filed by the accused accepted the plea raised by him and while allowing his appeal directed both the sentences to run concurrently by referring to Section 427 of the Code. The following observations made by this Court in paras 9 and 10 are apposite:

9. The section relates to administration of criminal justice and provides procedure for sentencing. The sentencing court is, therefore, required to consider and make an appropriate order as to how the sentence passed in the subsequent case is to run. Whether it should be concurrent or consecutive?

10. The basic rule of thumb over the years has been the so-called single transaction rule for concurrent sentences. If a given transaction constitutes two offences under two enactments generally, it is wrong to have consecutive sentences. It is proper and legitimate to have concurrent sentences. But this rule has no application if the transaction relating to offences is not the same or the facts constituting the two offences are quite different.

18. Likewise, a question arose before the three-judge Bench in State of Maharashtra & Anr. v. Najakat Alia Mubarak Ali JT 2001 (Suppl-1) SC 279 : 2001 (6) SCC 311, as to whether the accused convicted in two cases one after another was entitled to claim set off the period of detention during investigation, inquiry or trial from the sentence imposed on conviction in both the cases. While interpreting Section 428 of the Code, the majority of the judges answered the question in affirmative. While answering the question, Justice Thomas, speaking for majority of the Judges, made the following observations, which are pertinent.

17. In the above context, it is apposite to point out that very often it happens, when an accused is convicted in one case under different counts of offences and sentenced to different terms of imprisonment under each such count, all such sentences are directed to run concurrently. The idea behind it is that the imprisonment to be suffered by him for one count of offence will, in fact and in effect be imprisonment for other counts as well.

19. The aforesaid principle of law was relied upon by this Court in Chatar Singh v. State of M.P., 2006 (12) SCC 37 and State of Punjab v. Madan Lal JT 2009 (3) SC 326 : 2009 (5) SCC 238, and lastly recently in Manoj @ Panu v. State of Haryana JT 2013 (15) SC 384 : 2014 (2) SCC 153, wherein this Court taking recourse to Section 31 of the Code directed in somewhat similar facts that the sentences awarded to the accused to run concurrently in place of consecutively.

20. Keeping the aforesaid principle of law in mind and applying the same to the facts of this case in the light of powers available under Section 31 of the Code, we are of the considered opinion that both the sentences awarded to the appellant in the case at hand should run concurrently and this we do by invoking Section 31 which enables the Court to so direct.

21. In our considered opinion, this is a fit case where we can direct the sentences awarded to the appellant to run concurrently for the reasons that firstly, the case out of which this appeal arises relates to the year 1993 and is pending for a long period of 21 years; secondly, the two sentences, which were imposed on the appellant, arose out of one offence of theft punishable under Section 381 IPC tried in one trial; thirdly, the provisions of Section 52 of the IPO Act were required to be invoked against the appellant because he was the postal employee; fourthly, the Gold Chain was long recovered and also handed over to the person concerned; fifthly, the appellant has already been dismissed from services due to impugned conviction; and lastly, the appellant has been suffering from heart ailment since long, as is proved by documents filed along with the appellants affidavit 03.11.2014.

22. It is for all these reasons, in our considered opinion, the interest of justice would be sub-served by directing both the sentences awarded to the appellant to run concurrently. Since we have upheld the conviction, which was not challenged by the appellant in this appeal, the directions to run both the sentences concurrently can always be passed by the appellate Court because such directions are in the nature of consequential on and incidental to the affirmance of the conviction as held by this Court in the case reported in Sawal Das v. State of Bihar, 1975 3 SCC 156.

23. In the light of foregoing discussion, the appeal succeeds and is allowed in part. The conviction and sentences awarded to the appellant by the courts below for the offences punishable under Section 381 of IPC and Section 52 of the IPO Act are upheld. However, it is directed that both the sentences awarded to the appellant under IPC and IPO Act would run concurrently.

24. As a consequence, if the appellant has already undergone the period of sentence imposed on him he shall be released forthwith if not required in connection with any other case.

**********', 3] , 
[ 'CROSS CITATION
1965 SCR (1) 293

CRIMINAL APPELLATE JURISDICTION : Criminal Appeal No. 29 of 1963.

Appealby special leave from the judgment andorder dated December 13, 1962, of the Patna High Court in Government Appeal No. 24 of 1960.

Nuruddin Ahmed, B. P. Singh and U. P. Singh, for the appellants.

B. P. Jha, for respondent No. 1.

The Judgment of the Court was delivered by

Raghubar Dayal J. This appeal, by special leave, raises the question whether a person who seizes cattle illegally, purporting to act under S. 10 of the Cattle TrespassAct, 1871, hereinafter the Act, commits the offence of theft or robbery or not. The question arises in this way.

On the morning of November 28, 1957, a number of cattle belonging to several persons, including Shamnarain Singh, were observed by a number of persons,including Ramnandan Singh and Ram Rattan alias Ratan Ahir, grazing in a kurthi fieldabout which there was a dispute between the authorities of the Basic School and Shamnarain Singh each of them claiming the field. Ramnandan Singh and others seized those cattle and proceeded to take them to the pound at village Tilauthu. These persons were armed with sharp-edged weapons and lathis.

The report of the seizure of the cattle reached Shamnarain Singh and other people in the village.A number of people, variously armed, started from the village to rescue the cattle. They were joined by others on the way. This party, including Sukhari Mahto, Deocharan, Sheodutt, Hari Mahto and Ramdeo, caught up with the other party a short distance from the cattle pound and asked that party to release the cattle. Altercation took place between the parties and thenthey fought together. According to the prosecution case, members of the appellants 295 party attacked Shamnarain Singh and his companions. According to the appellants it was the other party which attacked them. As a result of the fight five persons got injured on the side of Shamnarain Singh. Of them, Ramdeo got one gaping punctured wound in the right thigh with a spear. He died as a result of the injury received. Sukhari Mahto received 16 injuries including 4 incised wounds. The other three injured persons received ordinary injuries. Deocharan had an abrasion, Sheodutt Singh got a lacerated wound, a swelling and an abrasion and Hari Mahto hada lacerated wound. On the side of the appellants, fourpersons got injured. Ramnandan Singh received 12 injuries, including 4 incised wounds and 3 punctured wounds.Ratan Ahir got three injuries including 2 punctured wounds. Sheorattan got 5 injuries including 2 punctured wounds.Rajkumar Singh got 2 injuries including one punctured wound.

Reports were made at the police station on behalf of the two parties. Hari Mahto lodged a report on behalf of the complainantparty against 20 persons. Ratan Ahir lodged a reportagainst 26 persons. The police, as a result of investigation, sent up 28 persons for trial. The Additional Sessions Judge, Arrah, acquitted all of them. He found that (1) Shamnarain Singh was in, lawful possession of the kurthi field in question on the date of occurrence and that the supposed claim thereto raised on behalf of the defence was not in good faith; (2) the cattle were seized in the presence of the charwahas in spite of their protest; (3) even though the seizure of the cattle from the kurthi field by the accused party in these circumstances was an unlawful act, the conduct of the complainant-party, who were fully armed, in following them in order to release the cattle, was not justified as it showed a determination on their part to get their cattle released by use of force and that therefore there did not exist any right on the part of the owners of the cattle to the extent of securing the release of their cattlefrom the hands of those who had seized them earlier by use of force; (4) there was strong Probability in favour of the view that it was the prosecution-party which created the crisis and took the aggression to initiate the assault and that the prosecution narration as to the manner in which the assault commenced at the scene of occurrence where the assault took place, did not commend itself to him andthat part of the prosecution story appeared tosufferfrom material Suppression, and that, in these circumstances, the accused party had the reasonable apprehension of suffering grievous hurt or death at the hands of the prosecution party and they were justified in the exercise of their right of private defence of their bodies in 296 causing such injuries to the men on the prosecution side as might cause death, the death so caused being justifiable homicide.

The State of Bihar appealed against the acquittal of the 28 accused. The High Court allowed the appeal against 13 respondents and convicted Ratan Ahir under S. 302 I.P.C. and the others under s. 326 read with s. 149 I.P.C. and ofsome other offences. It may be mentioned thatone of the respondents had died and 14 others were acquitted. The High Court agreed with the Sessions Judge that the plot insuit was in the possession of Shamnarain Singh and that the seizure of the cattle by the accused-party was illegal. The learned Judges, however, were of opinion that the Sessions Judge had taken a wrong view of the law in thinking that the members of the prosecution party were not entitled to rescue the cattle by gleans of force only because the respondents had succeeded in taking away the cattle for some distance. They held that once the seizure of cattle was found to be illegal, members of the accused party were in the position of thieves-rather dacoits-when they had seized the cattle by show of force to the cowherd boys, and that therefore the members of the prosecution party had the right of private defence of property and could recover their cattle by use of force,subject to the limitation that force in excess of what was necessary be not used. It also found that the prosecution party, in their attempt to rescuethe cattle. had been violently attacked by the party of the accused. The learned Judges probably did not agree with the view of the Sessions Judge that the attackwas opened by the prosecution party as there was no material in support of the view on the record, but held that even the opening of the attack by the prosecution party would not give any justification to thedefence party for it was bound to defend itself in the act of rescuing the cattle.

To consider the question of law raised in this appeal, we accept the findings of the High Court to the effect that the plot in suit was in the possession of Shamnarain Singh, that the appellants and others seized the cattle grazing inthat plot alleging that they were damaging their crops andthat they would take them to the pound, that Shamnarain Singh and othersarmed, went to rescue the cattle and on meeting the accused partyasked them to release the cattle andthat after some altercation the accused party opened the attack.

It is not disputed-and it has been alleged from thevery beginning in the reports lodged by both the parties-that the appellants and others had seized the cattle allegingthat they 297 were damaging their crops. It follows that they purported to seize the cattle in pursuance of the provisions of s. 10 of the Act. In view of the finding that the plot was in possession of Shamnarain Singh and that he had raised the crop, such seizure was illegal. It is thus that the question arises whether by so seizing the cattle the appellants committed the offence of theft. It is necessary to determine this point as it is only when the appellants and others had committed the offence of theft in so seizing the cattle that any right of private defenceof property arises in favour of Shamnarain Singh and his party whowent to rescue the cattle. If the act ofthe appellants and othersdid not amount to theft, they committed no offence and therefore no right of private defence of property arose in favour of Shamnarain Singh and others as such a right arises against the commission of an offence as defined in s. 40I.P.C. i.e., an act which amounts to a thingmade punishable by the Code. It may be mentioned that no other offence is alleged to have been committed by the appellants and others which would have given the right of private defence of property to Shamnarain Singh and others.

To determine the question raised, it is desirable to refer to the provisions of the Act in order to findwhat actions of the appellants would be in accordance with its provisions, what would be against them and to whatthey would be liable if they acted against such provisions. Section 10 authorizes certain persons having interest in the crops grown on any land to seize or cause to be seized cattle trespassing on it and doing damage thereto or to any crop or produce thereon. It requires them to send the cattle so seized, within 24 hours, to the pound established for the village in which the land is situate. It further provides that all officers of police shall, when required, aid in preventing resistance to such seizuresand rescues from persons making such seizures.

Section 11authorises certain persons to seize cattle which damage public roads, canals, embankments and other thingsmentioned in that section. Section 12 provides for the levy of fine for every head of cattle impounded.

Chapter V deals with complaints of illegal seizure or detention, and has four sections, ss. 20 to 23. Section 20 reads:

Power to make complaints. Any person whose

cattle have been seized under this Act, or,

having been so

298

seized, have been detained in contravention of

this Act, may, at any time within tendays

from the date of the seizure, make a complaint

to the Magistrate of the District or any

Magistrate authorized to receive and try

charges without reference by the Magistrate of

the district.

Section 21 deals with the procedure onsuch

complaint and S. 22 reads:

Compensation for illegal seizure or

detention. If the seizure or detention be

adjudgedillegal, the Magistrate shall award

to the complainant, for the loss caused by the

seizure or detention, reasonable compensation,

not exceeding one hundred rupees, to be paid,

by the person who made the seizure or detained

the cattle, together with all fines paid and

expenses incurred by the complai

nant in

procuring the release of the cattle.

Release of cattle. And, if thecattlehave

not been released, the Magistrate shall,

besides awarding such compensation, order

their release, and direct that the fines and

expenses leviable under this Act shall be paid

by the person who made the seizure or detained

the cattle.

Section 23 provides that the compensation and expensesmentionedin s.22 maybe recovered as if they were fines imposed by the Magistrate.

Section 24 provides penaltyfor forcibly opposing the seizure of cattle liable to be seized under the Act or for rescuing such cattle after seizure, either from a pound or from any person taking or about to take them to a pound. The punishment on conviction is not to exceedsix months imprisonment or a fine of five hundred rupees.

TheAct does not make the illegal seizure of cattle punishable asan offence. The person seizing cattle illegally is made liable to pay compensation for theloss caused to the owner of the cattle on account of the illegal seizure of cattle or of detaining the cattle in contravention of the Act. He is also liableto pay the fine-, and expenses paid in procuring release of the cattle. The expression under this Act in S. 20 does not mean in accordance with the provisions of the Act but means purporting to be in accordance with the provisions of the Act as seizure under the Act i.e., seizure in accordance with the provisions of the 299 Act could never be illegal, and S. 20 deals with complaints of illegal seizure or detention. The expression used in S. 24 isdifferent and makes the forcible opposition of the seizure of cattle punishable when the cattleseizedwere liableto be seized under the Act. If the cattle were not liableto be seized, forcible opposition to their seizure would not be punishable under s. 24.

Section 25 of the Act provides a mode for the recovery of penalty for mischief committed bycausing cattle to trespass. Itthus takes notice of the offence under the Penal Code committed by the person who causes cattle to trespass on others land, and provides that any fine imposed for the commission of that offence can be recovered bysale of all or any of the cattle by which trespass was committed, whether those cattle were seized in the act of trespassing or not and whether they were the property of the person convicted of the offence or were only in his charge when the trespass was committed.

Section 26, inter alia, provides for penalty for damage causedby pigs through neglect or otherwise to crops etc., or public roads or damage by cattle generally if the State Government so notifies.

Section 29 expressly provides that nothingin the Act prohibits any person whose crops or other produce ofland have been damaged by trespass of cattle from suing for compensation in any competent Court, and S. 30 provides that any compensation paid to such person under the Act by order of the convicting Magistrate shall be set off and deducted from any sum claimed by or awarded to him as compensation in such suit. There is no provision in the Act for the award of compensation to the person whose crops or other produce of land had been damaged by trespass of cattle. Section 30, therefore, appears to refer to the award of compensation to such person under S. 545 Cr. P.C. by the Magistrate convicting the person, whose cattle had caused damage, of the offence of mischief under the Penal Code or of the offences under ss. 24 and 26 of the Act.

TheAct has not any provision,comparable to the provisions ofss. 29 and 30, stating that a person whose cattlehad been illegally seized or detained may sue for compensation in a competent Court and thatcompensation awarded by the Magistrate under s. 22 of the Act be deducted from any sum awarded to him in such proceedings. The Act does not make the illegal seizure or detention of cattle an offence.

It appearsthat the legislatureintended that the provisions of Chapter V of the Actwoulddeal comprehensively with the 300 case of illegal seizures or detentions of cattle andthat the remedy available to a person whose cattle had been so seized or detained would be the one provided by S. 22 of the Act and no other and that illegal seizure or detention of cattlewould amount to no offence under thePenal Code. There appears to be good reason for this as the object of the Act was the protection of crops and other produce of land from the damage by cattle trespassing on the land and of the cultivators and occupiers of land from consequent loss and injury.

The Cattle Trespass Act of 1871 was enacted to consolidate and amend the law relating to trespass by cattle. The first CattleTrespass Act was Act ITT of 1857 and its preamble reads:

Whereasloss and injury aresuffered by

cultivators and occupiers of land from damage

done to crops and other produce of land by the

trespass of cattle; and whereas damage is done

to the sides and slopes of public roads and

embankments by cattle trespassing thereon; and

whereas it is expedient to authorize the

seizure and detention of cattle doing damage

as aforesaid and also to make provision for

the disposal of cattle found straying in any

public place : It is enacted as follows:

Section II of the 1857 Act empowered the cultivator or occupier of any land to seize or cause to be seized any cattle trespassing on his land and doing damage to anycrop or produce thereon. Section 10 of the Act gave such right to other persons is well. It did not however give the right to seize cattle damaging the crops to everyone who might noticethe cattle damaging the crops.Though the power to seize cattle trespassing on a persons land was givenonly when the cattle were damaging the land or the crop the,-eon, it should have been considered a difficult matter for the person authorized to seize cattle to determine first whether the cattle had caused damage to his land or crop and thereafter to seize them. The person so authorized would instinctively first seize the cattle on his land presuming that they must have damaged the crop or the land andthat any further presence of the cattle in the field without their being seized would lead to further damage. Further, s. 10of the Act directs all officers of police,when required to do so, to aid in preventing resistance tosuch seizures and rescues from persons making such seizures. The personseizing the cattle is thus given police protection. Me police officers required to aidwould not, in the circumstances, be 301 determining, before rendering aid, whether the seizure of cattle Was legal Or not. They haveto prevent resistance to seizures

and rescue of cattle from persons making seizures if they are called upon by the persons seizing the cattle to prevent

resistance, to the seizure or the rescue. This emphasizes the view that seizures of cattle whether legal or illegal are protected from interference. The remedy of the person whose cattle are illegally seized is contained in the provisions of Chapter V.

In view of these realisticconsiderations, the person happening to seize the cattle which had not actually caused damagewas considered to be acting underthe Act as expressed in S. 20, so that no action not authorized by the Act be taken against him for conduct which be not strictly legal. At the same time the interest of the person whose cattleare seized even when they had not caused damage to the crop had to be protected.It was also bound to happen at times that persons not authorized to seize cattle in the exercise of their larger duty to the people whose crops were being damaged,, may be inclined to take action against the cattlethey might notice damaging the crops. Such persons would be actuated by good intentions., but actuallythey would not be acting in accordance with the provisions of the Act and might be liable for damages in civil courts or possibly alsocriminally if the seizure of cattle could amountto an offence under the Penal. Code or any other law. It was on a balancing of the interest of the persons purporting toseize the cattle to protect crops and the interest of the owners of the cattle that these provisions of Chapter V seem to have been made.

In view of these considerations, we are of opinion that the provisions of Chapter V comprehensively deal with the cases of such seizure of cattle which had been seized in the exercise of the power conferred by the Act or in furtherance of its objects though not in full accordance with the provisions ofthe Act. In view of these considerations based on the provisions of the Act it does not appearthat illegal seizure of cattle by persons. purporting to act in accordance with the provisions of the Act could be an offence of theft under the Penal Code. We arrive at the same conclusion by a scrutiny of the provisions of the Penal Code.

We may now consider what acts constitute the offence of theft under the Penal Code. Theft is defined in s. 378 thus:

Whoever, intending to take dishonestly any

movable property out of the possession of any

person 302

without that persons consent, movesthat

property in.. order to such taking, is said to

commit theft.

This Court had occasion to consider at lengthwhat commission of theft consists of, in K. N. Mehra v. The State of Rajasthan(1). It said at p. 630:

Commission of theft, therefore, consists in

(1) moving a movable property of a person out

of his possession without his consent, (2) the

moving being in order to the taking of the

propertywith a dishonest intention. Thus,

(I) the absence of the persons consent at the

time ofmoving, and (2) thepresence of

dishonest intention in so taking and at the

time, are the essential ingredients of the

offence of theft.

At p. 631 it said :

It is rightly pointed out that since the

definition of theft requires that the moving

of the property is to be in order tosuch

taking, such meaningintending totake

dishonestly the very moving out must bewith

the dishonest intention.

After stating the provisions of ss. 23 and 24 of the Indian Penal Code, this Court said:

Taking these two definitionstogether, a

person can be said to have dishonest intention

if in taking the property it is his intention

to cause gain,by unlawful means, of the

property to which the person so gaining is not

legally entitled or to cause loss, by wrongful

means, of property to which the person so

losing is legally entitled. It is further

clear from the definition that the gain or

loss contemplated need not be a total

acquisition or a total deprivation but it is

enough if it is a temporary retention of

property by the person wrongfully gaining or a

temporary keeping out of property from the

person legally entitled. This is clearly

brought out in illustration (1) to s. 378 of

the Indian Penal Code.... 

The Court did not express an opinion with respect to the submission that the Penal Code makes a distinction between intention to cause a particular result and knowledge or likelihood of causing a particular result and that the maxim that every person must be taken tointendthe natural consequence of his act is a

(1) 1957 S.C.R. 623.

303 legal fiction which is not recognized for penal consequences in the Indian Penal Code.

Till the property is moved, no offence of theft can becommittedeven if the alleged offender had intended totake dishonestly the property out of the possession of any other personwithout his consent. Mere seizure of cattle found trespassing on land does not amount to movingthe cattle. The act Of moving the cattle would be subsequent to seizing them.It follows therefore that theseizure of cattle, though illegal, cannot amount to the offence of theft. It is after the seizure of cattle that the person seizing them moves them in order to take them to the pound.This act of taking them to the pound is what he is directed to do by the Act, Section 10 specifically directs so. Of course, the direction is in regard to the cattle seized for damaging the land or crop, but the same direction will be deemed to be operative when the cattle are seized in the purported exercise of the right to seize them under s. 10 of theAct, specially when s. 20 speaks of such seizure as being under the Act. An act done in accordance with the provisions of the Act cannot be considered, prima facie, to be a dishonest act, and would not justify the conclusion that the taking of the cattle to the pound amounted to the offence of theft. A person is said to do a thing dishonestly when hedoes anything with the intention of causing wrongful gain to one personor wrongful loss to another person. In the case of illegal seizures andimpounding ofcattle, the person seizing the cattle does not gain anything. He simply takes the cattle to the pound. He does not use them for his purpose. He, in fact, exercises no greater dominionover those cattle than that of being in their custody on their journey to the pound.It is said that it causes wrongful loss to the owner of the cattle inasmuch as he keeps the owner out of possession of the cattle as he was wrongfully deprived; of the property for the time being, it being not necessary that the deprivation of property be of a permanent character. We do not think that in such circumstances, the owner of thecattle can be said to be deprived of his property. The person seizing the cattle can act in either of these three ways. He can keep, them himself. Thismay, in certain circumstances, make him guilty of theft. He can let them loose after taking them out of the field.This action will not remove the danger of the cattle trespassing again on the land. He can take them to the pound.. 304 In so doing he not only acts as directed by the Act but also in the interests of both himself and the owner of the cattle. He avoids the risk of further harm to himself and protects the interest of the owner by having the cattle in safe custody and keeping them from doing any further damage to anyones land or crop. The owner can get back the cattle from the pound on payment of the fine andexpenses in accordance with the provisions of S. 15 of ,theAct. Whatever he would have to pay forgetting the cattle released, he can reimburse himself by suitable action under S. 20of the Act, as the Magistrate dealing with his complaint is empowered under S. 22 to order the payment of finesand expenses paid by him in addition to the compensation for any loss that he suffers. The owner of the cattle illegally seized is thus not only reimbursed for the fine and expenses which he paid but also for any lossthat he has suffered on account of illegal seizure. This means that in the ultimate analysis the owner ofthe cattle, seized illegally, suffers no loss and that therefore the act of illegal seizure of cattle does not cause any wrongful loss to the owner of the cattle. It follows that the person seizing cattle purporting to act under the provisions of the Act does not cause any wrongful loss to the owner of the cattle.

Even if it be assumed that some sort of loss which is wrongful in nature is caused to the owner of the cattle by illegal seizure and impounding them, the question arises whether the person seizing the cattle illegally from a field with the avowed object of taking them to the pound on the groundthat it was damaging the field or the crop can be imputed the intention to take the cattle dishonestly. The effect of his seizing the cattle illegally may be assumed to cause wrongful loss to the owner of the cattle, but did he so intend? We are of opinion that he did not so intend. His intention at the time, though based on his wrong notions that he was entitled to seize the cattle, was to takethem to the poundas required by the Act so that no further damagebe done to the land or property. It is truethat intention is mostly gathered from the consequences of the act committed by the accused but that is so because it is not often that the intention with which an act is committed can be definitely known from any previous fact. When a person does a certain act by openly expressing his intention in committingthe act there seemsno reason why his intention should be gathered by the consequences of his act exceptin those cases where it is found that the avowed intention was a mere cloak for some other real 305 intention which is then to be determined in the same way as it is determined in cases of non-expressed intention. In view of the various considerations mentioned above, we are of opinion that when a person seizes cattle on the groundthat they were trespassing on his landand causing damageto his crop or produce and gives out that he was takingthem to the pound, he commits no offence of theft however mistaken he may be about his right to that land or crop. The remedy of the owner of the cattle so seized is to take action under S. 20 of the Act. He has no right to use force to rescue the cattle so seized.

We may now briefly consider the cases referred to in support of the contention that illegal seizure of cattle amounts to theft. These cases were not of the seizure and impounding of cattle in, the purported exercise of the powers under s. 10 ofthe Act. They are: Queen v. PreonathBanerjee(1); Wazuddi v. Rahimuddi(2) ; Abdul Khaliq v. Emperor ( 3) ; ParyagRai v. Arju Mian(4); Queen Empress v. Sri Churn Chungo(5). In these cases seizure of cattle was notmade even ostensibly on account of their causing, damage to any land or crop. They were seized and taken away by persons in order to get their claims against the owners satisfied, or in order to cause them loss otherwise. Suchseizures of cattle, was rightly held to amount to theft.

On the other hand there are cases which held that no offence is committed by a person seizing cattle illegally. In Empress v. Ramjiawan(6) it was held that illegal seizure of cattleunder the Act was not an offence of mischief under the Penal Code and, that the, remedy of the owner of the cattlewas to be found in the provisions of ss. 20, 21 and 22. In Dayal v. Emperor(7) persons who had seized cattle from, a pound and impounded them in retaliation of the action of the owners of the cattle in justifiably impounding their cattle a day earlier, were held not to have committed the offence of mischief under s. 425 T.P.C. inasmuch asdriving the cattleto the pounddid not in any way lead to the diminution in the utility or value of the cattle and not to have committed the offence of theft as no wrongful loss was causedto the owners of cattle even though they wouldhave had to incur expenses in order to get them released. (1) 5 W.R. 68 (criminal).

(3) A.I.R. 1941 Lah. 221.

(5) I.L.R. 22 Cal. 1017.

(2) (1917) 18 Crl. L.J. 849.

(4) I.L.R. 22 Cal. 139.

(6) 1881 1 All. W.N. 158.

(7) A.I.R. 1943 Oudh. 280. 306 We therefore hold that in the circumstances of this case, Rattan and others, appellants, who had seized the cattle from the .disputed field committed no offence of thefteven if they had no right to that fieldand that therefore Shamnarain Singh and others who went armed with sharp-edged weapons and lathis to rescue the cattle had no right of defence of their property, against Rattan and others. The learned Sessions Judge was inclined to the viewthat Shamnarain Singhs party was the aggressor. The view cannot be said to be unreasonable even though the prosecution witnesses did not actually state so. The circumstances of the case, however, indicate that normally Shamnarain Singhs party would have been the aggressors.It is they whowere aggrieved atthe conduct of Rattan andothers and deliberately followed those persons in order to rescue their cattleand therefore would have, in that state of temper. started the attack.

The fact that four persons in Rattans party receivedmore injuries thanfive persons in Shamnarains party and the numberof serious injuries was also larger on theirside support this view. These four persons received 8 punctured wounds and 4 incised wounds out of the total of 26 injuries on them all. The five persons on Shamnarains side received 22 injuries which included only one punctured wound, the only one on Ramdeo deceased, and 4 incised wounds on Sukhari Mahto.

Even if Shamnarain Singhs party were not the aggressors and the attack was started by the party of Rattan, as appears to be the view of the High Court, that would not give any right of private defence of person to Shamnarains party as Rattan and others could have apprehended, in the circumstances, that Shamnarains party was not peacefully inclined and would use force against them in order to rescue the cattle and that the force likely to be used could cause grievous hurt. We are of opinion that Rattan and others, appellants, committed no offencein causing injuries to persons in Shamnarains party and in causing the death of Ramdeo who was in that party. We accordingly allow theappeal, set aside the conviction of Rattan Ahir under s. 302 I.P.C. and of others under s. 326 I.P.C. and also their conviction of the other offences they were convicted of. They will be released forthwith from custody.

Appeal allowed. 307
**********', 3] , 
[ 'HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAWS
Penal Code, 1860
Sections 302, 380 read with Section 34 - Murder of land-lady - Recovery of her husbands (PW1s) wrist watch pursuant to appellants disclosure statement - Appellant was the only inmate with deceased present when the incident took place - Both accused convicted under Section 302, 380/34 by trial court - Whether appellants conviction was justified in view of first accuseds acquittal by High Court when said first accused had allegedly strangulated deceased - No appeal by State against his acquittal. Held, merely because both accused were seen with deceased by PWs 3 & 4 in the morning of the date of incident and were not seen for two days thereafter, does not show that appellant authored the crime. As per prosecution first accused had strangulated deceased. First accused had left for village after receiving information about his mothers illness and appellant too had gone to his home from where he was arrested later. Thus they were not absconders as alleged. Sunil Kundus case referred.
HELD
None of the circumstances by itself would lead to the irresistible conclusion that the appellant herein is the author of the crimes under Sections 302 and 380 IPC. It is in evidence of PWs 3 and 4 -the key witnesses that apart from the appellant, one Ranjit Roy was also seen in the house of the deceased and, according to prosecution also, as noted in their report, it was Ranjit Roy-accused no.1 who quietly put a strip of cloth round the neck of the deceased and strangulated her. It is in evidence that both the accused belonged to New Jalpaiguri. It is the case of the prosecution itself that the first accused had received a message on the evening of 5.7.2001 that his mother was seriously ill and she was at home. PW-13 Kakulay does not support the case of the prosecution that she had seen the accused in the afternoon of 4th July, 2001 as proceeding to Siliguri. She is specific and categoric of that date because it was the first death anniversary of her father-in-law. The accused were in fact not absconding. They had gone to their native place New Jalpaiguri and they were arrested from their respective homes only. (Para 9)

On the only ground that the accused was seen with the deceased in the morning of the date of incident and that they were not seen in that place for another two days, cannot, by themselves, lead to the conclusion that it is the appellant who authored the crime. (Para 13)

To abscond means, go away secretly or illegally and hurriedly to escape from custody or avoid arrest. Accused had told others that they were from their place of work at Gangtok to their home at New Jalpaiguri. They were admittedly taken into custody from their respective houses only, at New Jalpaiguri on the third day of the incident. Therefore, it is difficult to hold that the accused had been absconding. (Para 14)

Evidence Act, 1872
Sections 8, 27 - Murder - Motive - Recovery of deceaseds husbands (PW1s) wrist watch pursuant to appellants disclosure statement - Whether could be a basis of conviction - Whether theft was the motive behind murder - Delay of 10 days in effecting recovery - Neither disclosure nor seizure supported by witnesses - As per recovery memo wrist watch handed over to police by appellants mother whereas as per disclosure statement appellant had concealed the same in his house - How mother was in possession of the watch and why it was recovered through her when appellant was available, not explained - His mother also not examined - Neither PW1 nor deceaseds sons, PWs 2 & 3 ever stated about theft of watch and cash - Jewelry worn by deceased was also not stolen. Held, recovery, on the basis of which conviction was recorded by High Court, was doubtful and hence conviction cannot be sustained. Motive also could not be proved. Madhu v. State of Kerala referred.
HELD
The conviction of the appellant is by placing reliance solely on the recovery of the wrist watch. It is faulty in procedure and, apart from that, the same does not infuse any confidence in the mind of the Court in the given circumstances, when pitted against the rest of the evidence, that the appellant committed the murder with the motive of theft. There is no explanation for the delay of about ten days in effecting recovery. The owner of the wrist watch-PW1 does not have a case that his wrist watch had been stolen by the appellant. That version is not also supported by the children of the deceased. They have no case of theft of wrist watch or cash. (Para 20)

Exhibit P5-recovery memo says that the wrist watch had been handed over to the investigating officer by the mother of the appellant. However, Exhibit P6-disclosure statement recorded on 12.07.2001 which has already been extracted above, though, not admissible as such, states that the appellant had kept the wrist watch in his house at New Jalpaiguri and that he could handover the same to the police. The investigating officer examined as PW16 states that the wrist watch was recovered from the house of the appellant. It is not explained as to how the mother of the appellant came into custody of the wrist watch which had been allegedly kept in concealment by the appellant in his house. She was not examined. Yet another significant aspect is that the disclosure statement-Exhibit P6 is made only on 12.07.2001, after five days of the incident and yet the recovery is effected only on 17.07.2001. The witnesses to the disclosure statement as well as seizure memo PWs 11 and 12 have very clearly stated in their evidence that their signatures were obtained on some papers which had already been filled up by the police and that no statement had been given by the appellant in their presence. (Para 11)

If the motive for the accused in committing the murder of Manorama Devi was theft, it is again difficult to understand why the accused did not remove any ornaments worn by the deceased. (Para 15).

Section 302, 380 read with section 34 - Conviction under - Acquittal of one of the accused, who allegedly strangulated deceased - Whether is a ground to acquit the other as ground of common intention disappears. Held, if there is independent evidence against other accused, he cannot be acquitted. Krishna Govind Patils case referred. (Para 17)

CASES REFERRED
1.Raja v. State JT 2013 (11) SC 439 (Para 19)

2.Sunil Kundu v. State of Jharkhand JT 2013 (6) SC 599 (Para 14)

3.Madhu v. State of Kerala JT 2012 (1) SC 181 (Para 15)

4.Amrita alias Amritlal v. State of M.P. JT 2004 (2) SC 295 (Para 18)

5.Krishna Govind Patil v. State of Maharashtra AIR 1963 SC 1413 (Para 17)

KURIAN, J.

1. Appellant is the second accused in Criminal Case No. 31 of 2001 on the file of the Sessions Judge, Sikkim at Gangtok. He was charged along with one Ranjit Roy under Sections 302, 380 read with Section 34 of the Indian Penal Code (45 of 1860) (hereinafter referred to as IPC). According to the prosecution:

These two accused persons were already in need of money for their expenses as Durga Roy (Burman) had already borrowed much cash from his master Sujit Basak before completing his works and he had nothing to get from his master for few days. The money problem became more serious when on 5.7.2001 the accused person received telephonic call from the father of Ranjit Roy stating that his mother is seriously ill at home and he should return home immediately. That night both the accused persons slept late discussing about their monetary problems. Next day (i.e. 6.7.2001) in the morning, Ranjit Roy went to the rented room. Shibu Barman had already left for his job. After some time Durga Roy (Barman) also arrived in the room. Both of them were under the strong impression that Lalan Prasad had enough money in his house as he was engaged in lottery business and both his sons were also working. Therefore, the two accused persons made a plan to steal money from Lalan Prasads house as he was already left for job.

The accused persons had hot discussion with Raju Kumar, elder son of deceased in connection with use of bathing soap for toilet purposes. By 0900 hrs, both the sons also left for their daily works. Then only the deceased Manorama Devi remained in the house besides the two accused persons. The two accused persons decided to kill the deceased Manorama Devi in order to steal money from her house as she was the only person present in the house. Deceased Manorama Devi was inside the room of her sons when accused Durga Roy (Barman) pretended to talk to her, thereby diverting her mind. At that moment, the other accused Ranjit Roy came from his room bringing a strip (sic) of cloth and quietly went behind the deceased Manorama Devi and on getting the opportunity, the accd. Ranjit Roy quietly put the strip round the neck of the deceased and strangulated her. As the victim became unconscious, he encircled the ligature twice on her neck and tightly made a knot on the back of the neck (sic) as a result she died on the spot due to strangulation by ligature. Then leaving the dead body on the floor, the accused persons searched the house and took away one wrist watch SITCO and cash Rs.2300/- and fled away from P.O. At about 1200 hrs, the accused persons were seen by one Mrs. Kakulay Biswas w/o. Parusotham Biswas, at Tenzing and Tenzing, Gangtok going towards Deorali side. Accused Durga Roy, who was known to her, told her that they were going home. Then they never came back to Gangtok.

(Emphasis supplied)

2. It is thus further case of the prosecution that the appellant herein made Exhibit P6-disclosure statement while in custody on 12.07.2001:

My true statement is that on 6/7/01 Friday that the Watch which I had stolen after murdering the Lottery Sellers wife, I have kept the same in NJP. I can hand over the said Watch to Police. I have kept the said Watch in homes at NJP.

Sd/-
(illegible)
Accused Durga Roy
Witness
1) BRIJ KISHORE PRASAD,
S/o. Ram Janam Prasad,
Basantpur Near Police Station,
Dist. Sewan, Bihar,
A/P. R.N. Chamling Building Sd/-
Brij Kishore Prasad
M.G. Marg, gangtok, Ext.P-6(a)
Occupation : Lottery Agent.
2) TASHI TSHERING BHUTIA
S/o. Tensang Bhutia Sd/-
Dalep Busty, Kewzing SJ (E/N)
South Sikkim Gangtok
A/P Rajya Sainik Board,
Palger Stadium Road, Sd/-
Gangtok Tashi
Occupation : Lottery Seller Ext.P6(b)
Sd/-
SJ (E/N)
Recorded by
Sd/- Ex.P6(c)
(P.M. Rai) Sd/-
Police Inspector SJ (E/N)
Sadar P.S.
Gangtok

3. On the basis of above disclosure made on 12.7.2001, recovery of the watch was made on 17.07.2001, as per Annexure-P5 memo. The two witnesses in Exhibit P6 are witnesses to the seizure also. The Sessions Court, as per judgment dated 31.12.2002, convicted both the accused under Section 302/380/34 IPC.

4. In appeal, the High Court of Sikkim, by judgment dated 15.12.2003, acquitted the first accused Ranjit Roy for the following reasons:

12. At this stage, it is relevant to state that the appellants were charged under section 302/34 IPC and have been found guilty thereunder. To invoke the aid of section 34 IPC, it is necessary that the criminal act complained against was done in furtherance of the common intention of all the accused persons. The common intention implies prior meeting of mind. It can also be formed suddenly at the spot. The prosecution has not laid any evidence on this score.

So far as appellant no.1 Ranjit Roy is concerned, there is no evidence against him except that in the morning on the date of occurrence he was present in the house of the deceased and remain absconded till he was arrested on 8th July, 2001 at New Jalpaiguri. An act of absconding is no doubt a relevant piece of evidence but the said act does not by itself lead to a conclusion that he is guilty. There is no other incriminating material against him to connect with the offence. The suspicion however strong be cannot take the place of proof. For reasons aforesaid, we are inclined to hold that the prosecution has not been able to prove its case against appellant no.1 Ranjit Roy beyond reasonable doubt. He is, therefore, entitled to be acquitted on the benefit of doubt.

(Emphasis supplied)

5. However, in the case of second accused-appellant herein, it was held by the court as follows:

13. In the present case, the charge against both the appellants is specific in the sense that in furtherance of their common intention they committed the murder of the deceased. With the acquittal of appellant no.1 Ranjit Roy the charge of sharing common intention fails. It does not however mean that appellant no. 2 Durga Roy can also secure acquittal. There is no legal bar to convict him under the substantive provision if on the basis of evidence it could be held that he was the author of the crime.

Let us, therefore, examine his case separately. As already stated, he was found in the house of deceased in the morning on the date of occurrence. In the said house, no other inmate was present except the deceased. He was a co-tenant along with Shibu PW4 in respect of one room belonging to the deceased. Shibu PW4 deposed that he had gone to the house of the deceased at 2.30 p.m. to 2.45 p.m. to find out if he was present in his room but he did not find him and his room was locked. He had not returned to his room since then and remained absconded till he was arrested on 8th July, 2001. He gave recovery to the Sitco wrist which was found missing on the date of occurrence. Having regard to the above circumstances, we have no hesitation to hold, that he (appellant no.2 Durga Roy) after committing murder of the deceased also committed the theft of the wrist watch exhibit IX. He is, therefore, clearly guilty of offences punishable under sections 302 and 380 IPC. The conviction recorded by the Sessions Judge under sections 302/380/34 IPC is hereby converted to one under sections 302 and 380 IPC.

(Emphasis supplied)

6. Heard learned counsel appearing for the appellant and learned counsel appearing for the State of Sikkim.

7. The basis of maintaining the conviction against the appellant herein who is the second accused is:

i. He was in the house of the deceased in the morning on the date of occurrence.

ii. No other inmate was present except thedeceased.

iii. The co-tenant had deposed that when he went to the house of the deceased between 2.30 - 2.45 p.m. on the same day, he could not find the appellant and room was locked.

iv. He had not returned to his room and remained absconded till he was arrested on 8th July, 2001.

v. He gave recovery of the wrist watch belonging to husband of the deceased which was allegedly found missing on the date of occurrence.

8. On these grounds, it was concluded that the appellant/accused after committing the murder of the deceased, also committed theft of the wrist watch and, hence, he was guilty of offence punishable under Sections 302 and 380 IPC.

9. We are afraid, none of the circumstances by itself would lead to the irresistible conclusion that the appellant herein is the author of the crimes under Sections 302 and 380 IPC. It is in evidence of PWs 3 and 4 -the key witnesses that apart from the appellant, one Ranjit Roy was also seen in the house of the deceased and, according to prosecution also, as noted in their report, it was Ranjit Roy-accused no.1 who quietly put a strip of cloth round the neck of the deceased and strangulated her. It is in evidence that both the accused belonged to New Jalpaiguri. It is the case of the prosecution itself that the first accused had received a message on the evening of 5.7.2001 that his mother was seriously ill and she was at home. PW-13 Kakulay does not support the case of the prosecution that she had seen the accused in the afternoon of 4th July, 2001 as proceeding to Siliguri. She is specific and categoric of that date because it was the first death anniversary of her father-in-law. The accused were in fact not absconding. They had gone to their native place New Jalpaiguri and they were arrested from their respective homes only.

10. The only other ground is that of recovery under Section 27 of the Indian Evidence Act, 1872 (hereinafter referred to as Evidence Act), recovery of the wrist watch which was alleged to have been stolen by the appellant. From the evidence available on record, we find it extremely difficult to place reliance on that recovery for many reasons. The wrist watch belongs to PW1, the husband of the deceased. PWs 2 and 3 are the sons of the deceased and were staying with PW1 and the deceased. PWs 1, 2 and 3 do not have a case that the wrist watch belonging to PW1 had been stolen by the appellant. They do not also have a case about the money that has been allegedly taken by the accused after committing murder. There is not even a whisper in the evidence of PWs 1, 2 and 3 regarding the theft of either the wrist watch or the cash except for the identification of the wrist watch by PW1 as belonging to him. There is not even a reference to the alleged missing of the wrist watch since 06.07.2001 or the loss of cash. It is only in the evidence of PW16-the investigating officer that the accused had a motive of committing theft after murdering Smt. Manorama Devi and that an amount of Rs.2,300/- and wrist watch belonging to PW1 had been taken by the accused.

11. Exhibit P5-recovery memo says that the wrist watch had been handed over to the investigating officer by the mother of the appellant. However, Exhibit P6-disclosure statement recorded on 12.07.2001 which has already been extracted above, though, not admissible as such, states that the appellant had kept the wrist watch in his house at New Jalpaiguri and that he could handover the same to the police. The investigating officer examined as PW16 states that the wrist watch was recovered from the house of the appellant. It is not explained as to how the mother of the appellant came into custody of the wrist watch which had been allegedly kept in concealment by the appellant in his house. She was not examined. Yet another significant aspect is that the disclosure statement-Exhibit P6 is made only on 12.07.2001, after five days of the incident and yet the recovery is effected only on 17.07.2001. The witnesses to the disclosure statement as well as seizure memo PWs 11 and 12 have very clearly stated in their evidence that their signatures were obtained on some papers which had already been filled up by the police and that no statement had been given by the appellant in their presence.

12. Another significant aspect in the case is that all ornaments worn by the deceased were on the body and nothing had been removed. If the accused had a motive to commit theft, it is only normal that they would lay their hands on the jewelry as well.

13. On the basis of the evidence we have discussed above, we find it extremely difficult to hold that the prosecution has laid a foundation for an effective prosecution and has proved beyond doubt that it is the appellant who committed the murder of Manorama Devi. It has to be noted that this case is set up only on circumstantial evidence. All the circumstances should lead to, without breaking the chain, the involvement of the accused and the accused only. On the only ground that the accused was seen with the deceased in the morning of the date of incident and that they were not seen in that place for another two days, cannot, by themselves, lead to the conclusion that it is the appellant who authored the crime.

14. To abscond means, go away secretly or illegally and hurriedly to escape from custody or avoid arrest. It has come in evidence that the accused had told others that they were from their place of work at Gangtok to their home at New Jalpaiguri. They were admittedly taken into custody from their respective houses only, at New Jalpaiguri on the third day of the incident. Therefore, it is difficult to hold that the accused had been absconding. Even assuming for argument sake that they were not seen at their work place after the alleged incident, it cannot be held that by itself an adverse inference is to be drawn against them as held by this Court in Sunil Kundu v. State of Jharkhand JT 2013 (6) SC 599. To quote paragraph-28:

28. It was argued that the accused were absconding and, therefore, adverse inference needs to be drawn against them. It is well settled that absconding by itself does not prove the guilt of a person. A person may run away due to fear of false implication or arrest. (See: SK. Yusuf v. State of W.B. JT 2011 (6) SC 640) It is also true that the plea of alibi taken by the accused has failed. The defence witnesses examined by them have been disbelieved. It was urged that adverse inference should be drawn from this. We reject this submission. When the prosecution is not able to prove its case beyond reasonable doubt it pic cannot take advantage of the fact that the accused have not been able to probabilise their defence. It is well settled that the prosecution must stand or fall on its own feet. It cannot draw support from the weakness of the case of the accused, if it has not proved its case beyond reasonable doubt.

15. If the motive for the accused in committing the murder of Manorama Devi was theft, it is again difficult to understand why the accused did not remove any ornaments worn by the deceased. Hence, the prosecution version regarding the motive also, is shaken. (Please see the decision of this Court in Madhu v. State of Kerala JT 2012 (1) SC 181).

16. The evidence available on record would on the contrary give an indication that theft is a story of the investigation officer only. Neither PW1 whose wrist watch is said to be stolen nor the sons of the deceased-PWs 2 and 3 have any case of the alleged theft of wrist watch or cash. The recovery is also doubtful. There is no consistent version of the recovery. The person from whom the recovery has been effected, viz., the mother of the appellant, has not been examined. Despite the availability of the appellant, the recovery is through his mother. There is no explanation as to how she got to watch. This could also be the reason why the trial court in the judgment dated 31.12.2012 held that Technically speaking there is no compliance of Section 27 Evidence Act. Though the wrist watch Ext. IX was recovered from the house of accused Durga Roy but the record reveals that the said wrist watch was handed over to the Police by the mother of the accused Durga Roy. It has to be noted that recovery of the wrist watch from the house of the appellant is the only ground on which the High Court has maintained the conviction of the appellant.

17. It has been argued by the learned counsel for the appellant that the accused no.1 Ranjit Roy on whom the overt act of strangulation is alleged, having been acquitted by the High Court, the conviction of the appellant cannot be maintained. It is further contended that by the acquittal of the main accused, the whole theory of common intention has been shattered and that the appellant is entitled to succeed on that ground. We are afraid, the contention cannot be appreciated. No doubt, there are only two accused and they have been charged under Sections 302/380/34 IPC and one of them has been acquitted. That by itself is not a ground to acquit the co-accused, in case there is independent evidence. Of course in the absence of such independent evidence, the accused could succeed on that ground as held by this Court in Krishna Govind Patil v. State of Maharashtra AIR 1963 SC 1413, which is a case of Section 302 read with Section 34 IPC. To quote,

8. ... While it acquitted Accused 1, 3 and 4 under Section 302, read with Section 34 of the Indian Penal Code, it convicted Accused 2 under Section 302, read with Section 34, of the said Code, for having committed the offence jointly with the acquitted persons. That is a legally impossible position. When accused were acquitted either on the ground that the evidence was not acceptable or by giving benefit of doubt to them, the result in law would be the same: it would mean that they did not take part in the offence. The effect of the acquittal of Accused 1, 3 and 4 is that they did not conjointly act with Accused 2 in committing the murder. If they did not act conjointly with Accused 2, Accused 2 could not have acted conjointly with them. ...

18. In the case before us, the allegation is that after committing the murder, the accused committed theft also. As held by this Court in Amrita alias Amritlal v. State of M.P. JT 2004 (2) SC 295 at paragraph-8 that:

8. ... Mere acquittal of some of the accused on the same evidence by itself does not lead to a conclusion that all deserve to be acquitted in case appropriate reasons have been given on appreciation of evidence both in regard to acquittal and conviction of the accused. ...

19. The same view was followed by this Court in Raja v. State JT 2013 (11) SC 439. To quote paragraph-12:

12. ... It is also relevant to point out that the High Court took note of the general principle that if the prosecution case is the same against all the accused or with regard to some of the accused on the same set of evidence available on record with reference to any of the accused, then the Court would not be committing any mistake in acquitting all the accused and conversely, if it is possible to do so, namely, to remove the chaff from the grain, the Court would not be committing any mistake in sustaining the prosecution case against whom the evidence is shown to be intact.

20. Thus, there should be independent evidence. The conviction of the appellant is by placing reliance solely on the recovery of the wrist watch. We have already held above that, it is faulty in procedure and, apart from that, the same does not infuse any confidence in the mind of the Court in the given circumstances, when pitted against the rest of the evidence, that the appellant committed the murder with the motive of theft. It is not enough that the circumstances lead to possibility or probability of the involvement of the accused; the circumstances should point all the fingers to the accused and the accused only. That is not the situation in this case. The circumstances can lead to many other inferences. The chain is also not complete. The first accused, who according to the prosecution is the perpetrator of the offence under Section 302 IPC, has been acquitted. The State has not filed an appeal against the acquittal. It is a case of Sections 302, 380 read with Section 34 IPC. The whole theory of the prosecution is that it is the first accused who has been acquitted by the High Court, who tied the piece of cloth on the neck of the deceased and strangulated her. The only piece of shaky evidence against the appellant is of recovery of the wrist watch of PW1 from and through the mother of the appellant. She was not examined. There is no explanation as to how despite the availability of the appellant, the recovery is effected through his mother. There is no explanation for the delay of about ten days in effecting recovery. The witnesses have not supported the disclosure statement or the seizure. The owner of the wrist watch-PW1 does not have a case that his wrist watch had been stolen by the appellant. That version is not also supported by the children of the deceased. They have no case of theft of wrist watch or cash.

21. In such circumstances, we have no hesitation in holding that the prosecution has miserably failed in proving the case against the appellant and the appellant is entitled to succeed. The appeal is allowed. The conviction of the appellant under Section 302/380 IPC is set aside. He shall be released forthwith in case he is not required to be detained in connection with any other case.

**********', 3] , 
[ 'CROSS CITATION
1967 SC 349 (11)
1963 SCR Supl. (1) 689

CRIMINAL APPELLATE, JURISDICTION: Criminal Appeal No. 2 of 1962. Appealby special leave from the judgment andorder dated April 25, 1953 of the Rajasthan High Court Jaipur Bench, Jaipur in Criminal Revision No. 237 of 1956.

S. P. Varma, for the appellant.

S. K. Kapur and P. D. Menon, for the respondent. 1962. October 22. The judgment of the Court was delivered by

SUBBA RAO, J. This appeal by specialleave is directed against the decisionof the High Court of Rajasthan in Criminal Revision No. 237 of 1956 confirming that of the Sessions judge, Alwar, convicting the appellant under s. 379 of the Indian Penal Code and sentencing him to a fine of Rs. 200/-.

To appreciatethe questions raised in this appeal the following facts, either admitted or found by the High Court, may be stated. On November 24, 1945, one Ram Kumar Ram obtained permission, Ex. PB, from the Government oftile former Alwar State to supply electricity at Rajgarh, Khertal and Kherli. Thereafter, he entered into partnership with 4 otherswith an understanding that the licence would be transferred to a company that would be floated by thesaid partnership. After the company was formed, it put in an application to the Government through 691 its managing agents for the issue of a licence in its favour. Ex. P. W. 15/B is that application. On the advice given by the Government Advocate, theGovernment required Ram Kumar Ram to file a declaration attested by a Magistrate with regard to the transfer of his rights and the licence to the company.On April 8, 1948, RamKumar Ram filed a declaration to that effect. The case of the prosecution is that Ram Kumar Ram was a friend of the appellant. Pyarelal Bhargava, who was a Superintendent in the Chief Engineers Office, Alwar. At the instance of Ram Kumar Ram, Pyarelal Bhargava got the file Ex. PA/ 1 from the Secretariat through Bishan Swarup, a clerk, before December 16, 1948, took the file to his house sometime between December 15 and 16,1948, made it available to Ram Kumar Ram for removing the affidavitfiled by him on April 9, 1948, and the application, Ex. P. W. 15/B from the file andsubstituting in their place another letter Ex. PC and another application Ex. PB. After replacing the said documents, Ram Kumar Ram made an application to the Chief Engineer on December 24, 1948, that the licence should not be issued in the name of the company. After the discovery of the tampering of the said documents, Pyarelal and Ram Kumar were prosecuted before the Sub-Divisional Magistrate, Alwar--the former for an offence under s. 379 and s. 465, read with s. 109, of the. Indian Penal Code, and the latter for an offence underss. 465 and 379, read with s.109 of the Indian Penal Code. The Sub-Divisional Magistrate convicted both the accused under the said sections and sentencedthem on both the counts. On appeal the Sessions judge set aside the Conviction under s. 465, but maintained the conviction and sentence of Pyarelal Bhargava under s. 379, and Ram Kumar Ram under s. 379, read with s. 109, of the Indian Penal Code. Ram Kumar Ram was sentenced to pay a fine of Rs. 500/- and Pyarelal Bhargava to pay a fine of Rs. 200/-. Against these convictions both the accused 692 filed revisions to the High Court and the High Court set aside the convictionand sentence of Ram Kumar Ram but confirmed those of Pyarelal Bhargava. Pyarelal Bhargava has preferred the present appeal.

Learned counsel for the appellant raised before us three points, namely, (1) the High Court has wrongly reliedupon the confession made by the accusedbeforeShri P. N. Singhal, Officiating ChiefSecretary tothe Matsya Government atthat time, as that confession was notmade voluntarily and, therefore, irrelevant under s. 24 of the Evidence Act; (2) the said confession having been retracted by the appellant, the High Court should not have relied upon it as it was not corroborated in material particulars; and (3) on the facts found the offence of theft has not been made out within the meaning of s. 379 of the Indian Penal Code. Another argument, namely, that the statement made by Pyarelal Bhargava before the Chief Secretary was not a confession inlaw, was suggested but not pursuedand, therefore, nothing need be said about it.

The first question turns upon the interpretation of the provisions of s. 24 of the Evidence Act and its application to the facts found in this case. Section 24 of the Evidence Act lays down that a confession caused by inducement, threat or promise is irrelevant incriminal proceedings under certain circumstances. Under that section a confession would be irrelevant if thefollowing conditionswere satisfied: (1) it should appear to the court to havebeen causedby any inducement, threat or promise; (2) thesaid threat, inducement or promise must have reference to the charge against the accused person; (3) it shall proceed from a personal authority; and (4) the court shall be of the opinion that the said inducement, threat or promise is sufficient to give the accused per-son grounds which would appear to him reasonable in supposing that he would gain an advantage or avoid any 693 evil of a temporal nature in reference to the proceedings against him. The crucial word in the first ingredient is the expression  appears. The appropriate meaning of the word appears is seems. It imports a lesser degree of probability than proof. Section 3 of the Evidence Act says:

A factis said to be proved when after

considering the matters before it, the Court

either believes it to exist, or considers its

existence so probable that aprudent man

ought, under the circumstances of the

particular case, to act upon the supposition

that it exists.

Therefore, the test of proof is that there is such ahigh degreeof probability that a prudent man would act on the assumption that the thing is true. But under s. 24 of the Evidence Act such a stringent rule is waived but a lesser degreeof assurance is laid down as the criterion. The standard of a prudent man is not completely displaced, but the stringent rule of proof is relaxed. Even so, the laxity of proof permitted does not warrant a courts opinion based on pure surmise. A prima facie opinion basedon evidence and circumstances may be adopted as the standard laid down. To put it in otherwords,on the evidence and the circumstances in a particular case it may appear to the court that there was a threat, inducement or promise, though the said fact is not strictly proved.This deviationfrom the strict standards ,of proof has been designedly accepted by the Legislature with a. view to exclude forced or induced confessions which sometimes are extorted and put inwhen there is a lack of direct evidence. It is not possible or advisable to lay down an, inflexible standard for guidance of courts, for in the ultimate analysis it is the court which is called upon to exclude a confession by holding in the circumstances of a particular case that the confession was not made voluntarily.

The threat, inducement or promise must proceed from a person in authority and it is a question 694 of fact in each case whether the person concerned is a man of authority or not.What is more important is that the mere existence of the threat, inducement or promise is not enough, but in the opinion of the court the said threat, inducement orpromise shallbe sufficientto cause a reasonable belief in the mind of accused that by confessing he would get an advantage or avoid any evil of a temporal naturein reference to the proceedings against him: while the opinion is that of the court, the criterion is the reasonable belief of the accused. The section, therefore, makes it clear that it is the duty of the court to place itself in the position of the accused and to form an opinion as to the state of his mind in the circumstances of a case. In the present case it was found that certain documents in the Chief Enginecrs Office were tampered with and certain papers weresubstituted.The appellant was the Superintendent in the Chief Engineers Office.On April 11, 1949, Shri P. N. Singhal, Officiating Chief Secretary to the MatsyaGovernment, was making a departmental inquiry in respect of the missing documents. The appellant, among others, was questioned about the said documents. The appellant first madea statement, Ex. PL, in which he stated that he neither asked Bishan Swarup to bring file No. 127, nor did he recollect any cause for calling forthat file on or about that date. As Shri Singhal was not able to find out the culprit, he expresser his opinion that if the whole truth did not come out, he would hand over the inquiry to the police.Thereafter, the appellant made a statement, Ex. P.L. 1, wherein, in clear terms, he admitted that about the middle of December 1948 Ram Kumar Ram took file No. 127P. W./48 regardingissue of licence tothe Bharat Electrical and Industrial Corporation Ltd., Alwar, from his residence to show it to his lawyers, and that he took the file more than once for that purpose.He also addedthat this was 695 a voluntary statement. Learned counsel for the appellant argued that the Chief Secretary gave the threat that, if the appellant didnot disclose the truth he would place the matterin the hands of the police and that the threat induced the appellant to make the disclosure in thehope that he would be excused by the authority concerned. There is no doubt that the Chief Secretary is an authority within the meaning of s. 24 of the Evidence Act, but the simple question is whether the alleged statement by thesaid authority reappears to the court to be athreatwith reference to the charge against the accused.As wehave said, under particular circumstances whethera statement appears to the court to be a threat or not is a question of fact. In this case the three lower courts concurrently held that in the circumstances of the case the statement did not appearto be a threat within the meaning of s. 24 of The Evidence Act., but that was only a general statement which any person who lost his property and was not able tofind out the culprit would make. It may be that such a statement under different circumstances may amount to a threat or it may also be that another court may take a differentview even in the present circumstances of the case, but in exercising the powers under Art. 136 of the Constitution we are not prepared to differ from the concurrent finding given by the three courts that in the circumstances of the present case that the said statement did not appear to them to be a threat.

The second argument also has no merits.A retracted confession may form the legal basis of a conviction if the court is satisfied that it was true and was voluntarily made But it has been held that a court shallnot base a conviction on such a confession without corroboration. It is not a rule of law, but is only rule of prudence. It cannoteven be laid down as an inflexible rule of practice or prudence that under no circumstances such a conviction can be 696 made without corroboration, for a court may, in a particular case, be convinced of the absolute truth of a confession and prepared to act upon it without corroboration; but it may be laid down as a general rule of practice that it is unsafe to rely upon a confession, much less on a retracted confession, unless the court is satisfied that the retracted confession is true and voluntarily made and has been corroborated in material particulars., The High Court having regard to the said principles looked for corroboration and found it in the evidence of Bishan Swaroop, P.W-7, and the entry in the Dak Book, Ex. PA. 4, and accepted the confession in view of the said pieces of corroboration.The finding is one offact and there is no permissible ground for disturbing it in this appeal.

The last point is that on the facts found no case of theft has been made out. The facts found were that the appellant got the filebetween December 15 and 16, 1948, to his house,made it available to Ram Kumar Ram andon December 16, 1948, returned it to the office. On these facts it is contended that the prosecution has not made out that the appellant dishonestly took any movable property within the meaning of s. 378 of the Indian Penal Code. Thesaid section reads :

Whoever, intending to take dishonestly any

movable property out of the possession of any

person without that persons consent, moves

that property in order to such taking, is said

to commit theft.

The section may be dissected into its component parts thus : a person will be guilty of the offence of theft, (1) if he.intends to cause a wrongful gain or a wrongful loss by unlawful means of Property to which the person gaming is not legally entitled or to which the person losing is legally entitled, as the case may be: 697 see ss.23 and 24 of the Indian Penal Code; (2) thesaid intention to act dishonestly is inrespect of movable property; (3) the said property shall be taken out of the possession of another person without his consent; and (4) he shall move that property in order to such taking. In the present case the record was in the possession of the Engineering Department underthe control of the Chief Engineer. The appellant was the Superintendent inthat office; he took the file out of the session of thesaid engineer. removed the file from office and handed it over to Ram Kumar Ram. But it is contended that the said facts do not constitute the offence of theft for three reasons, namely, (i) the Superintendent was in possession of the file and therefore he could not have taken the file from himself; (ii) there was no intention to take it dishonestly as he had taken it only for the purpose of showing the documents to Ram Kumar Ram and returned it the next day to the office and therefore he had not taken the said fileout of the possession ofany person; and (iii) he did not intend to take it dishonestly, as he did not receive any wrongful gain or cause any wrongful loss to any other per-son. We cannot agree that the appellant was in session of the file. The file was in the Secretariat of the Department concerned, which was in charge of the Chief Engineer. The appellant was only one of the officers working in that, department and it cannot, therefore, be said that he was in legal possession of the file. Nor can we accept the argument that on the assumption that the Chief Engineer was in possession of the said file, the accused had not taken itout of his possession. To commit theft one need not take movable property permanently out of the possession of anotherwith the intention not to return it to him.It would satisfy the definition ifhe took any movable propertyout of the possession of another person though he intended to return it later on. We cannot also agree with learned counselthat there is no wrongful loss in the present case. 698 Wrongful loss is loss by unlawful means of property to which the person losing it is legally entitled. It cannot be disputed thatthe appellant unauthorisedly took thefile from the office and handed it over to Ram Kumar Ram. He had, therefore, unlawfully taken the file from the department, and for a short time he deprived the Engineering Department ofthe possession of the said file. Theloss need not be caused by a permanent deprivationof property but may be caused even by temporary dispossession, though the per-son taking it intended to restore it sooner or later. A temporary period of deprivation or dispossession of the property of another causes loss to the other. That a person- will act dishonestly if he temporarilydispossesses another of his property is made clear by illustrations (b) and (1) of s.378 of the Indian penal code. They are:

(b) A puts a bait for dogs inhis pocket,

and thus induces zs dog to follow it. Here,

if As intention be dishonestly to take the

dog out of Zs possession without Zs consent,

A has committed theft as soon as Zs dog has

begun to follow A.

(1). A takes an article belonging to Z out of

Zs possession without Zs consent, with the

intention of keeping it until he obtains money

from Z as a reward for its restoration.Here

A takes dishonestly; A has therefore committed

theft.

It will be seen from the said illustrations that a temporary removal of a dog which might ultimately be returned to the owner or the temporary taking of an article with a view to returnit after receiving some reward constitutes theft, indicating thereby that temporary deprivation of another personof his property causes wrongful loss to him. We, therefore, hold that the facts found in this case clearly bring them within the four comers of s. 378 of the Indian 699 Penal Code and, therefore, the courts have rightly held that the appellant had committed the offence of theft. No other Point was pressed before us. In the result the appeal fails and is dismissed.

Appeal dismissed.
**********', 3] , 
[ 'HEADNOTE
ELECTRICITY LAWS
Indian Electricity Act, 1910
Section 26(6) - Scope - Dispute regarding fraud in tampering with meter or breaking body seal. Held to be outside the ambit of the provision. (Para 10)

Bihar State Electricity Tariff
Clause 16.9 - Applicability - Assessment made on the basis of theft, for 180 days - Justification. Held that the Board has rightly applied Clause 16.9 and there is no infirmity in the bill raised.
HELD
In the cases of theft of electricity or dishonest abstraction of electrical energy the assessment for compensation has to be done on the basis of a formula wherein D stands for number of days for which the pilferage took place and where there is no possible evidence to establish the period, this factor can be taken to be equivalent to 180 days. Similarly, in case where connected load is more than the sanctioned load, the assessment charge has to be done on the basis of a formula where C stands for six months or the number of months or part thereof elapsed from the date of connection/installation, whichever is less. Therefore under the tariff in both the cases the period can be taken as 180 days or six months. It is on the basis of this formula that the assessment for consumption of units has been done for 180 days. The electricity board rightly applied Clause 16.9 of the Tariff and there is no infirmity in the assessment made and the bill prepared in pursuance thereof. (Para 12)

Clause 16.9 with Electricity Act - Section 39/44 - Assessment as per tariff - Case of dishonest abstraction or theft - Trial of accused in criminal court. Held that it has no bearing on assessment made according to tariff. (Para 13)

Clause 16.9 and 16.10.3 - Fuel surcharge - Method of calculation - Dishonest abstraction - Assessment thereof - Fuel surcharge at thrice the rate per unit - Legality. Held that Clause 16.10.3 is separate from Clause 16.9 and it does not lay the fuel surcharge at thrice the rate of per unit. (Para 17)

CASES REFERRED
1.Apparel Export Promotion Council v. A.K. Chopra JT 1999 (1) SC 61 (Para 15)

2.Hyderabad Vanaspathi Ltd. v. A.P. State Electricity Board & Ors., JT 1998 (3) SC 84 (Para 12)

3.State of U.P. & Ors. v. Maharaja Dharmander Prasad Singh JT 1989 (1) SC 118 (Para 14)

4.Madhya Pradesh Electricity Board & Ors. v. Basantibai JT 1987 (4) SC 294 (Para 10)

FOREIGN CASES REFERRED
:

1.North Wales Police v. Evans (1982) 1 W.L.R. 1155 (Para 14)

G.P. MATHUR, J.

1. These appeals are directed against the judgment and order dated 18.4.2000 of a Division Bench of Patna High Court, by which the writ petition preferred by M/s J.M.D. Alloys Ltd. was partly allowed and the Bihar State Electricity Board was directed to serve a fresh bill as per the observations made in the judgment and to restore the electricity connection within two days of the payment of the said bill.

2. M/s J.M.D. Alloys Ltd. (hereinafter referred to as the petitioner) has a high tension industrial connection of electricity for running induction furnaces for manufacturing steel ingots. The officials of the Bihar State Electricity Board (hereinafter referred to as the electricity board) inspected the petitioners factory premises on 26th and 27th August, 1999 and found that the seal fixed on CT/PT box was tampered. An FIR was lodged at the concerned police station on 27.8.1999 alleging that the petitioner had committed theft of 6.96 lakh units and had thereby caused a loss of Rs. 2.58 crores to the electricity Board. The electricity board thereafter issued a bill dated 31.8.1999 for Rs. 8,85,77,131/-. This bill was challenged by the petitioner by filing CWJC no. 8939 of 1999 before the High Court. The learned single judge, who heard the writ petition vide his judgment/order dated 27.9.1999 directed that a show cause notice in the light of the observations made in the judgment be given to the petitioner within a week and it will be open to the petitioner to raise all its defences against the charge of committing theft of electrical energy and/or drawing electrical energy at a load higher than its contracted demand. It was further directed that the show notice shall be given by the general manager-cum-chief engineer, Central, Bihar Area, Electricity Board, Patna, or by any other officer of the electricity board of equal or higher rank and he shall pass final order after giving an opportunity of hearing to the petitioner. The liability of the petitioner was to be determined afresh on the basis of the final order passed by the chief engineer.

3. The chief engineer (Transmission) Bihar State Electricity Board thereafter issued a notice dated 13.10.1999 to which a reply was given by the petitioner on 20.10.1999. After affording an opportunity of personal hearing and considering the reply, the chief engineer passed an order on 27.10.1999 holding that clause 16.9 (b) and (c) of Tariff is attracted and the consumer M/s J.M.D. Alloys Ltd. is liable to pay compensatory bill in terms of the aforesaid clauses of the Tariff. In accordance with the decision of the Chief Engineer, a fresh bill dated 29.10.1999 for Rs. 8,85,77,131/- was issued. This bill was again challenged by the petitioner by fling a writ petition which was dismissed by a learned single judge on 13.12.1999. Against the said decision the petitioner preferred a letters patent appeal which was partly allowed by the Division Bench by the impugned judgment and order dated 18.4.2000. The Division Bench held that the petitioner is liable to pay electricity charges in accordance with Clause 16.9 of the Tariff. However with regard to fuel surcharge it was held that the same cannot be levied at thrice the rate in accordance with Clause 16.9 of the Tariff, which permits consumption of electricity to be assessed at thrice the rate per unit. Feeling aggrieved by the aforesaid decision, M/s J.M.D. Alloys Ltd. have preferred civil appeal no. 8394 of 2002 and the Bihar State Electricity Board has preferred civil appeal no. 8395 of 2002.

4. As stated earlier, the chief engineer (transmission), Bihar State Electricity Board, issued a notice dated 13.10.1999 to the petitioner. The notice was issued on the grounds, inter alia, that the inspection of the business premises of the petitioner was conducted from 14.15 hours to 20.30 hours on 26.8.1999 and thereafter on the following day; that on examination of CT/PT unit and its terminal box, the seal bearing no. 04566OP which was put on CT/PT terminal box on 14.5.1999, was found to be tampered with and the signature of the authority was also not found on the same; that a seizure memo of the tampered seal was prepared on the same day; that on account of the fact that the seal on the terminal box had been removed, it had become easily accessible to the consumer and by fiddling with the terminals, namely by removing the wires or putting wires of higher resistance, the flow of energy to the metering unit was manipulated to show a very low recording of both KVA and unit consumption; that the total capacity of induction furnaces on operation was 12 M.T. for which energy requirement was 7200 KVA but the petitioner had entered into a contract demand of 4850 KVA and, therefore, the consumer was engaged in theft of electricity and was consuming energy at a much higher load than the contracted demand; that the supplier of the furnaces to the petitioner, namely Megatherm Electronic Pvt. Ltd. had reported to the director general of police (vigilance), Bihar State Electricity Board consumption equivalent to approximately 3000 KVA for running the furnaces exclusive of auxiliary load like water supply, cooling systems, cranes, etc; that the feasibility report given to the electricity board by the petitioner showed that the minimum required energy for each MT furnace was 500 KVA for the furnace alone besides 100 KVA for auxiliary load and thus 600 KVA was required for each MT furnace; that the electronic meter showed that the power had been consumed by the factory on an average basis of 21.25 hours per day which runs into two shifts of 12 hours each having 40 workers in each shift and the load and the capacity of two furnaces showed production of 3000 MT ingots every month and, therefore, the minimum consumption of power was 16.20 lakh units per month whereas bills had been paid on an average of 9.24 lakh units per month; that the theft of power was further substantiated from the meter reading of J.D. Feeder at 3311 KV Air Force Sub-station Bihta and also the claim filed by the petitioner under Clause 13 of the agreement and on the basis of the aforesaid facts and material it was obvious that the petitioner had been committing theft of electricity on a massive scale by tampering with the seal of the CT/PT terminal cover. The petitioner was accordingly directed to show cause as to why a bill in terms of Clause 16.9 of the tariff notification be not raised. The petitioner give a reply to the show cause notice raising various pleas and denying that it had committed any theft of electricity. It was pleaded that the meter had been regularly inspected by different teams of the electricity board but no tampering of the seal of the CT/PT terminal cover had been found; that the furnaces can operate only to the extent of 80% of its rated capacity; that the electricity board itself had assessed the capacity of the connected load at 5100 KVA, which was very near to the contracted demand; that the meter installed in the factory premises never recorded a maximum demand of more than the contracted demand; that the assumption that 100 KVA per ton is required for auxiliary load was not based on facts and that in the case of a high tension industrial consumer the connected load is of no relevance because to constantly monitor the load availed of by a high tension consumer a trivector meter, containing the maximum demand indicator is compulsorily installed. It was further submitted that the seal in CT/PT unit had not been tampered with an the allegation regarding tampering of the seal was being investigated by the investigating officer of the criminal case registered against the petitioner and his report shall be considered by the court of law at the appropriate time.

5. The chief engineer after consideration of the material and the submissions made held that the theft of electricity cannot be found physically and this has to be worked out from evidences parameters and various circumstances under which the consumer is availing power. He passed a detailed order on 27.10.1999 and the relevant part of the findings recorded by him are being reproduced below:

It appears from annexure 1 of show-cause notice that two nos. of induction furnaces of six M.T. capacity each totalling 12 MT were in operation. This is supported by the facts with the inspection report that the total capacity of transformer was 7230 KVA. The CTPT cover terminal seal which was found tampered was unsigned. There were large number officials of the board including executive magistrates and therefore there is no reason to disbelieve that seal of terminal cover of CTPT was tampered. The capacity of the furnaces being 12 MT it is evidently clear that the power was used unauthorised by the consumer because the consumption recorded in the meter was much less than what it ought to have been on actual load i.e. 7200 KVA (600 x 12 T). In this connection the annexure-3 & 4 the vouchers of the purchase of induction furnace from Megatherm, show the capacity of induction furnace 6 MT as 2500 KW i.e. equivalent to 3000 KVA therefore the load of 12 M.T. Furnace besides @ KVA/MT as auxiliary load totalling to 7200 KVA as the actual load. It is not out of place to mention here that the induction furnace association of Bihar has proposed and agreed that the load of induction furnace could be 600 KVA per M.T.

This is also brought to my notice that on average basis the power was consumed at the average period of 21.25 hrs. per day. The factory runs into two shifts with 40 workers in each shift. So far as the nos of days of pilferage is concerned, it has been rightly interpreted and assessed the maximum period of six months for the assessment of compensatory amount under clause 16.9 of Tariff.

The variant factors of the consumption as per formula i.e. LEFXIIED have been thoroughly taken care of in the formula provided in the Tariff.

From the facts and circumstances as set forth above, it is absolutely clear that clause 16.9 (b) and (c) of Tariff is attracted and the consumer M/s JMD Alloys is liable to pay the compensatory bill in terms of Clause 16.9 of Tariff.

6. In accordance with the order of the chief engineer, a fresh electricity bill was prepared on 29.10.1999 for Rs. 4,09,32,925/- towards the cost of units of electricity and Rs. 3,90,73,217/- towards fuel surcharge. After adding the electricity duty and charges for rental of transformer and fuse replacement, etc. a bill was issued for Rs. 8,85,77,131/-.

7. Shri Gopal Subramanium, learned senior counsel for the petitioner, has submitted that the factory premises of the petitioner had been inspected on 14.5.1999 and then again on 20.7.1999 and no irregularity of any kind had been found on the said dates and, therefore, the allegation that the petitioner had tampered with the seal of CT/PT unit is wholly incorrect. There was no material or evidence to show that any effort had been made by the petitioner to interfere with the metering unit which may have the effect of showing lesser consumption of energy. learned counsel has also submitted that in absence of any evidence relating to presence of artificial means which would have rendered abstraction of electrical energy possible the provisions of Clause 16.9 of the tariff could not be made applicable and the electricity bill issued to the petitioner is incorrect It has also been urged that the last inspection of the petitioners premises having been done on 20.7.1999, there is no justification for counting the period of dishonest abstraction of energy as 180 days (six months) and, therefore, the bill issued to the petitioner is for much longer period which was not permissible in law. The learned counsel has further submitted that the findings recorded by the chief engineer are wholly incorrect as instead of basing his order on the actual production of steel, he has gone by the capacity of the furnaces. Shri Subramanium has also urged that the faulty recording of the meter has to be judged from the standpoint of section 26(6) of the Indian Electricity Act, 1910 and the matter should have been referred to electrical inspector.

8. Shri V.R. Reddy, learned senior counsel for the Electricity Board, has submitted that section 26(6) of the Indian Electricity Act has no application to a case where the seal fixed on CT/PT terminal box had been tampered with and the recording of consumption by the meter had been effected by recourse to artificial means. Learned counsel has laid stress on the fact that the chief engineer, after considering all the relevant material and circumstances has recorded a categorical finding that the seal of the CT/PT terminal box had been tampered with and the petitioner had exceeded the contracted load and had also dishonestly abstracted electrical energy to a very large extent. According to the learned counsel, the findings recorded by the Chief Engineer being based upon relevant material are not open to challenge in proceedings under Article 226 of the Constitution of India. In support of the appeal preferred by the Electricity Board, Shri Reddy has submitted that the surcharge being part of the electricity bill, the Division Bench of the High Court had erred in holding that the same was chargeable on per unit basis and not at thrice the value thereof. According to the learned counsel, in view of Clause 16.9 of the Tariff, the fuel surcharge has also to be levied at three times the units assessed.

9. It may be stated at the very outset that a detailed show cause notice dated 13.10.1999 mentioning all the relevant facts was served upon the petitioner to which the petitioner gave a reply on 20.10.1999. The order of the chief engineer mentions that the petitioner was afforded an opportunity of personal hearing and its counsel appeared before him and argued the matter on 25.10.1999 and 26.10.99. The chief engineer has recorded a clear finding that the seal on CT/PT terminal box was found to be tampered with. A seal bearing No. 045660P had been put on the CT/PT terminal box on 14.5.1999 and the authority fixing the seal had put his signatures thereon. At the time of the inspection on 27.8.1999, the seal was found to be tampered with, which was seized by the inspecting team. The seal did not contain the signature of the authority who had put the seal. The record shows that the inspection had been done by a high level team consisting of as many as 8 responsible officers, some of whom had come from the headquarters of the electricity board at Patna. An executive magistrate was also a member of the team. The manager of the petitioner himself lodged a report on 28.8.1999 with the deputy superintendent of police, Danapur (Patna), alleging that 8 officers of the Bihar State Electricity Board with armed force visited and tested the installation and the members of the team with the help of screw and plier themselves tampered with the cover of the LT terminal box of CT/PT and the plastic seal was removed and brought down by one of the executive engineers. However, in reply to the show cause notice filed by the petitioner, tampering of the seal was denied and it was pleaded that the matter was being investigated by the investigating officer of the criminal case registered against the petitioner and his report shall be considered by the court at the appropriate time. The chief engineer after considering the entire material and taking into consideration the fact that there were large number of officers of the board at the time of the inspection, has recorded a finding that the seal had been tampered with. It is an admitted position that in the factory of the petitioner there were two furnaces, each of 6 MT and thus the total capacity was 12 MT. The manufacturer of the induction furnaces namely, Megatherm Electronic Pvt. Ltd. had given in writing that the load of 6 MT induction furnace was 2500 KV which is equivalent to 3000 KVA and, therefore, the actual load of the furnaces installed at the petitioners factory, after taking into consideration the auxiliary load, came to 7200 KVA. The Induction Furnaces Association of Bihar of which the petitioner is also a member, had agreed and proposed that the load of an induction furnace could be taken to be 600 KVA per MT. On consideration of these factors the chief engineer came to a conclusion that the actual load of the petitioners factory was 7200 KVA. The other material which has been considered by the chief engineer is that on an average the power was consumed for 21.25 hours per day as the factory was running in two shifts with 40 workers in each shift and, therefore, the number of units being actually consumed were much higher than that recorded in the meter. On the basis of these findings, the assessment has been made of the compensatory amount under clause 16.9 of the tariff.

10. The contention that the dispute regarding tampering of the seal of CT/PT terminal unit should have been referred to the electrical inspector, has hardly any merit. In Madhya Pradesh Electricity Board & Ors. v. Basantibai1, it has been held that a dispute regarding the commission of fraud in tampering with the meter and breaking the body seal is one outside the ambit of section 26(6) of the Indian Electricity Act and the electrical inspector has no jurisdiction to decide such cases of fraud. It was further held that under section 26(6), the only dispute which can be decided by the electrical inspector is as to whether the meter is correct and is accurately recording the reading or there is some fault in the same. Since in the present case it has been found that the seal on the CT/PT terminal box had been tampered with and the natural working of the meter had been affected by taking recourse to external devices, a dispute of this kind cannot be referred to an electrical inspector.

11. The next contention raised is that the period of 180 days for which theft of electricity has been assessed is absolutely wrong and has no rational basis. The electricity board has proceeded on the footing that Clause 16.9 of the Tariff framed by the Bihar State Electricity Board with the approval of the State government is applicable. Clause 16.9 of the Tariff reads as under :

16.9 (A) Detection of unauthorised load:- If at any time the consumer is found exceeding the contracted load without specific permission of the board, the board may without prejudice to its other rights under the agreement or under the provisions of the Electricity Act, estimate the value of the electrical energy, so extracted, consumed or used shall be calculated as below and may also disconnect the supply without notice :-

I. Necessary assessment for compensation in the following malpractice and theft of energy cases shall be made as below:-

(a) ................
(b) In case of using energy by creating obstruction in running of meters or interfering with the system of supply or wires etc.
(c) ....................

Unit assessed - L x F x H x D

Where L = .....................
H = .....................

D = is the no. of days for which the pilferage took place which can be established from production of satisfactory evidence by the consumer. In case there is no possible evidence to establish the period, this factor be taken equivalent to 180 or the no. of days elapsed from the date of connection/installation of meter till the date of detection of the pilferage whichever is less.

F=................................

II. ..................

III Method of charging the assessed units as indicated in para I & II above.
(a) The consumption so assessed shall be charged at thrice the rate per unit of the tariff applicable to the consumer excluding the consumption recorded by the meter and the latter shall be charged at the appropriate tariff rates. The amount billed at this (thrice the tariff rate) shall not be taken into consideration for the purpose of computing consumers liability to pay monthly/minimum guarantee.

(b) ................

IV When connected load is more than the sanctioned load in case of all categories LT connection except domestic service.

Assessment charge:- Rs. C x M (LD-LS)x3
Where, M=Minimum consumption guarantee charge pet BHP per month as applicable in the tariff schedule.

LD - is the load detected in BHP at the time of inspection.

LS = is the load sanctioned to the consumer in BHP

C= This factor be taken equivalent to six months or no. of months or part thereof elapsed from the date of connection/installation whichever is less.

12. The relevant part of the tariff quoted above shows that in the cases of theft of electricity or dishonest abstraction of electrical energy the assessment for compensation has to be done on the basis of a formula wherein D stands for number of days for which the pilferage took place and where there is no possible evidence to establish the period, this factor can be taken to be equivalent to 180 days. Similarly, in case where connected load is more than the sanctioned load, the assessment charge has to be done on the basis of a formula where C stands for six months or the number of months or part thereof elapsed from the date of connection/installation, whichever is less. Therefore under the tariff in both the cases the period can be taken as 180 days or six months. It is on the basis of this formula that the assessment for consumption of units has been done for 180 days. In Hyderabad Vanaspathi Ltd. v. A.P. State Electricity Board & Ors.1, it has been held that the terms of conditions for supply of electricity to consumers notified by the board in exercise of power under section 49 of Electricity (Supply) Act, 1948 and made applicable to all consumers availing supply of electricity, are statutory in character. This being the legal position, the electricity board in our opinion rightly applied Clause 16.9 of the Tariff and there is no infirmity in the assessment made and the bill prepared in pursuance thereof.

13. Shri Gopal Subramanium has also submitted that after the inspection had been done on 27.8.1999, an FIR had been lodged against the petitioner on the same day by Shri Om Prakash, Assistant Executive Engineer at the police station and a criminal case was registered under section 39/44 of Indian Electricity Act. This case was investigated and thereafter a final repot was submitted, which was accepted by the concerned magistrate and as a result of this order, the petitioner stands exonerated from the charge of theft of electricity and no compensatory bill could be issued by taking recourse to Clause 16.9 of the tariff. Shri V.R. Reddy, learned senior counsel for the electricity board has submitted that before accepting the final report, the learned magistrate had issued notice to Shri Om Prakash, assistant executive engineer, but the said notice was not served upon him as he was transferred from Patna on account of his allocation to Jharkhand State and as such no representation could be made on behalf of the electricity board against the final report. Subsequently, an application has been moved on behalf of the electricity board before the concerned magistrate for recall of the order by which final report was accepted. In our opinion, the mere acceptance of final report by the magistrate cannot amount to a finding by the criminal court that theft of electricity was not committed. The accused was not even summoned, no charge was framed nor any evidence was recorded. In such a situation, it cannot be held that the criminal court has recorded any finding to the effect that the petitioner has not committed theft of electricity. That apart, the purpose of a trial under section 39/44 of the Indian Electricity Act is entirely different and the object is to punish and sentence the person who is alleged to have committed the offence. The trial of an accused in a criminal case can have no bearing in the matter of assessment made in accordance with the tariff of the value of electricity dishonestly abstracted or consumed. Therefore, the contention raised on the basis of alleged acceptance of the final report in the criminal case has absolutely no merit.

14. It is to be noted that in pursuance of the order passed on 27.9.1999 by the High Court in CWJC no 8939 of 1999, the chief engineer decided the matter holding that the petitioner had exceeded the contracted load and had also committed theft of electricity and consequently assessment of compensatory amount had to be done in accordance with clause 16.9 of the tariff. In terms of the order of the chief engineer the bill dated 29.10.1999 was prepared which was challenged by the petitioner by filing the writ petition before the High Court under Article 226 of the Constitution. The High Court was not hearing an appeal against the decision of the chief engineer. The scope of inquiry in such a matter is a limited one. We would like to quote here what was said by Venkatachaliah, J. in State of U.P. & Ors. v. Maharaja Dharmander Prasad Singh1, which reads as under :

However, Judicial review under Article 226 cannot be converted into appeal. Judicial review is directed, not against the decision, but is confined to the examination of the decision making process. In Chief Constable of the North Wales Police v. Evans, (1982) 1 W.L.R. 1155 refers to the merits-legality distinction in judicial review. Lord Hailsham said:

The purpose of judicial review is to ensure that the individual receives fair treatment, and not to ensure that the authority, after according fair treatment, reaches on a matter which it is authorised by law to decide for itself a conclusion which is correct in the eyes of the Court.

Lord Brightman observed:

 ..........Judicial review, as the words imply, is not an appeal from a decision, but a review of the manner in which the decision was made.....

And held that it would be an error to think:

..........that the Court sits in judgment not only on the correctness of the decision making process but also on the correctness of the decision itself.

When the issue raised in judicial review is whether a decision is vitiated by taking into account irrelevant, or neglecting to take into account of relevant factors or is so manifestly unreasonable that no reasonable authority entrusted with the power in question could reasonably have made such a decision, the judicial review of the decision-making process includes examination, as a matter of law, of the relevance of the factors............

15. In Apparel Export Promotion Council v. A.K. Chopra1, Chief Justice Anand held as under :

Judicial Review, not being an appeal from a decision, but a review of the manner in which the decision was arrived at, the court while exercising the power of judicial review must remain conscious of the fact that if the decision has been arrived at by the administrative authority after following the principles established by law and the rules of natural justice and the individual has received a fair treatment to meet the case against him, the court cannot substitute its judgment for that of the administrative authority on a matter which fell squarely within the sphere of jurisdiction of that authority.

16. There is not dispute that the chief engineer issued notice to the petitioner mentioning all the relevant facts to which the petitioner gave a reply. The petitioner was also afforded an opportunity of hearing and it appeared through a counsel, who made submissions on two days and thereafter the chief engineer passed the order. As discussed earlier, the chief engineer has taken into consideration relevant factors and the findings recorded by him are clearly borne out from the material available before him. It cannot be said that the order passed by him is unreasonable or perverse in any manner. The High Court therefore rightly took the view that the order passed by the chief engineer that the compensatory bill is to be prepared in accordance with Clause 16.9 of the tariff could not be interfered with in a writ petition under Article 226 of the Constitution.

17. The Bihar State Electricity Board feels aggrieved by that part of the judgment and order of the Division Bench of the High Court by which it has been held that the surcharge cannot be levied at thrice the rate per unit and has accordingly filed civil appeal no. 8395 of 2002. Shri V.R. Reddy, learned senior counsel for the electricity board has submitted that the cost of a unit of electricity is not fixed and on the contrary it is dependent upon the fuel surcharge. The formula for calculating the fuel surcharge is a long and complicated one and is given in Clause 16.10.3 of the tariff. A host of factors have to be taken into consideration in calculating the fuel surcharge and they depend upon many variables. Shri Reddy has submitted that since the surcharge has necessarily to be taken into consideration and has to be added in the cost of electricity and, therefore, in accordance with part (III) of clause 16.9 of the tariff, it should also be assessed at three times the rate per unit. We are unable to accept the contention raised. Clauses 16.9 and 16.10.3 are separate and distinct clauses in the tariff. Clause 16.9 lays down the formula for calculating the value of the electrical energy abstracted or consumed by a consumer by exceeding the contracted load or by creating obstruction in running of meter. Part (III) of this Clause deals with method of charging the assessed units and sub-para (a) thereof lays down that the consumption so assessed shall be charged at thrice the rate per unit of the tariff applicable to the consumer excluding the consumption recorded by the meter and the latter shall be charged at the appropriate tariff rates. Clause 16.10.3 is a separate clause which deals with fuel surcharge and it nowhere lays down that this additional surcharge will also be levied at thrice the rate per unit of the tariff. The two clauses namely 16.9 and 16.10.3 have to be read separately and there being no specific provision for assessing the fuel surcharge at thrice the rate per unit, it is not possible to hold that in such a case the fuel surcharge should also be charged at thrice the rate per unit.

18. We are, therefore, of the opinion that the view taken by the High Court is perfectly correct and called for no interference. In the result, both the appeals lack merit and are hereby dismissed. No costs.

**********', 3] , 
[ 'HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAW
Criminal Procedure Code, 1898:
Sections  236, 237 and 403(1) - The Customs Act,  1968;  Sections 111 and 135 - Gold (Control) Act, 1968; Section 85 - Whether  the acquittal  for the offences under the Customs Act operates  as  a bar to the prosecution of the same person in connection with  the charge  of  having  committed  the  offence  under  the  Gold (C2ontrol)Act?  -Tests  to  be applied - Ingredients  of  the  two offences are different in scope and content-What is necessary  is to  analyze  the  ingredients of the two  offences  and  not  the allegations  made in the two complaints - Framing of  alternative charge  - Held that if the ingredients of both the  offences  are satisfied the same act of possession of the gold would constitute an  offence  both under the Customs Act as also  under  the  Gold (Control)  Act  0 there is therefore no question  of  framing  an alternative  charge  - Judgment of the High  Court  holding  that subsequent trial was barred set aside.
Appeal allowed.

Held - 
(i)  In order to successfully establish their plea of  bar  under Section 403 (1) the concerned respondents will therefore have  to establish  that......(1)  there  must have been  adoubt  as  to whether  the  offence under the Customs Actcould be  proved  or whether the offence under the Gold(Control)Act would be  proved and  (2) that in the context of this doubt an alternative  charge could  have  been  framed  under Section  236.  Now,  on  a  true interpretation  of Section 236 it would appear that  the  Section WOULD BE ATTRACTED where the offence would fall either under  one or  the other of the two alternative charges. It  WOULD  NOT  BE ATTRACTED  if an offence could all under both of the  alternative charges.  What  is contemplated by Section 236 if framing  of  an alternative  charge  where on the facts of the  case  an  offence would fall under one of the two alternative charges, but the  act would  not  constitute an offence under both  the  charges.  This point is made clear by the illustrations to Section 236. Para5

(ii) IIIustration (a) refers to framing of an alternative  charge in  respect of theft or receiving of stolen property or  criminal breach of trust or cheating. It will be seen that a person cannot be  said to have committed the offence both of theft as  also  of receiving of stolen property. A person who himself commits  the theft,  cannot  be  guilty of the  charge  of  receiving  stolen property  whereas a person who may have nothing to do  with  the commission  of theft, but who may be found in possession  of  the stolen  property,  would be guilty of the offence  of  receiving stolen property. Now the prosecution cannot foresee whether  the person  from  whose possession the stolen article was  found  was himself the thief or was merely a person who had received  stolen property from the thief. A person cannot be found guilty of  both theft  as  also for receiving stolen property. And it  is  in such a case that an alternative charge under Section 236 could be framed.  In the present case the concerned respondents  could  be found  guilty  of  both  the  offences  in  the  context  of  the possession  of  gold.  If it was established  that  there  was  a prohibition  against the import of gold and that he was found  in possession  of  gold which he knew or had reason to  believe  was liable  to  confiscation he would be guilty of that  offence.  He would  also be guilty of an offence under the Gold (Control)  Act provided  the gold is of a purity of atleast 9 carats.  He  would have  violated the provisions of both the Customs Act  and  the Gold (Control) Act if the aforesaid ingredients were established. It  is not as if in case he was found guilty of an offence  under the  Customs Act, he could not have been found guilty  under  the Gold (Control) Act or vice versa. Upon being found guilty of both the  offences the Court may perhaps impose a concurrent  sentence in respect of both the offences but the Court has also the  power to  direct  that the sentence shall run consecutively.  There  is therefore  no question of framing of an alternative  charge  one, under  the Customs Act, and the other, under the  Gold  (Control) Act.  If the ingredients of both the offences are  satisfied  the same  act of possession of the gold would constitute  an  offence both under the Customs Act as also under the Gold (Control)  Act. Such  being the position it cannot be said that they  could  have been  tried  on the same facts for an alternative charge  in  the context  of  Section  236  Cr. P.C. at the  time  of  the  former proceedings. The submission urged in the context of Section  403 (1)  cannot  therefore succeed for it cannot be said that  the persons who are sought to be tried in the subsequent proceedings could have been tried on the same facts at the former trial under section 236. Para 6

CASES REFERRED
1. Maqbool Hussain v The State of Bombay and Ors. etc. etc., 1953 S.C.R. Vol. IV p. 730

2. State of Bombay v S.L.Apte and Another, 1961 (3) SCR p.107

THAKKAR, J.

1.  Does  the  acquittal  of  an  accused  charged  with  having committed  an  offence  punishable under Section  111  read  with Section  135  of the Customs Act 1969 create a legal bar  to  the said  accused subsequently being prosecuted under Section  85  of the Gold (Control) Act, 1968. The High Court having answered this question (in the affirmative) against the prosecution and  having directed  the  dropping  of the  subsequent  proceedings  on  the premise that the acquittal in the former proceedings operated  as a  legal  bar  to the prosecution of the accused  in  the  latter proceedings  operated  as a legal bar to the prosecution  of  the accused in the latter proceedings, the State has approached  this Court by way of the present appeal.

2.  Respondents  1 to 3 came to be prosecuted as a result  of  a raid at their house in which primary gold valued at Rs.  84,770/- at  the material time was found along with some  other  articles. They were prosecuted for an offence punishable under section  111 read  with  Section 135 of the Customs Act, 1969.  In  that  case present respondent No.3 was convicted whereas present  respondent Nos.  1  and 2 were acquitted. The same  alleged  offenders  were later  on  sought to be prosecuted under Section 85 of  the  Gold (Control) Act, 1968 relying on the find of primary gold from  the very  same premises at the time and on the occasion of  the  very same  raid which gave rise to the prosecution under  the  Customs Act  which had culminated in the conviction of respondent  No.  3 and  the  acquittal  of respondents 1 and  2.  A  contention  was thereupon  raised  on behalf of respondents 1 to 3 that  the  new trial  was  barred. The Chief Judicial Magistrate  accepted  this plea  and  ordered that the prosecution be dropped.  The  learned Sessions Judge confirmed the said order. The appellant challenged the order passed by the learned trial Magistrate as confirmed  by the  learned Sessions Judge by way of a Revision  Application  to the  High  Court , the High Court affirmed the  decision  of  the Courts below holding that the present trial was barred by  virtue of  Section 403 (1) of the Code of Criminal  Procedure,1898  (Cr. P.C.). Hence this appeal. In order to determine this question  it is  necessary to identify the ingredients which will have  to  be established by the prosecution in order to bring home the  guilty under  the  different  provisions.  These  ingredients  may  be catalogued as under:

Ingredients of the charge for the  Ingredients of the charge for 
offence under Section 111 read with  the offence under Sec. 85  of  Sec.  135 of the Customs Act, 1969  the Gold (Control)Act,  1968 
in respect of which the respondents  for which the  respondents are
were acquitted.  sought to be prosecuted.


i) Interalia being in possession  The offender owns or  has  of or being concerned in keeping  in his possession,custody,  
or  concealing of goods which the  or control  any  primary 
offender knows or has reason to  gold of not less than 9 
believe  are  liable  to confiscation  carats  in  purity  in  under  Section  111.  unfinished  or  semi-  finished  form  or  in   blocks, bars etc.

ii) The goods in question, gold, was  
imported within the Indian Customs
waters contrary to a prohibition
contained under the Customs Act.

iii) There was a prohibition in 
respect of the import of gold at 
the material time as contemplated
by Sec. 111 - D of the Customs Act.

3.  It is therefore evident that the ingredients required to  be established  in respect of the offence under the Customs Act  are altogether different from the ones required to be established for an  offence  under  the Gold (Control) Act.  In  respect  of  the former,  the  prosecution  has  to establish  that  there  was  a prohibition  against the import into Indian sea waters  of  goods which were found to be in the possession of the offender. On  the other  hand  in respect of the offence under the  Gold  (Control) Act,  it is required to be established that the offender  was  in possession  of primary gold meaning thereby gold of a  purity  of not  less than 9 carats in any unfinished or semi-finished  form. In regard to the latter offence it is not necessary to  establish that  there  is any prohibition against the import of  gold  into Indian  sea  waters. Mere possession of gold of purity  not  less than 9 carats in any unfinished or semi-finished form would be an offence  under the Gold Control Act. It is therefore stating  the obvious  to  say  that the ingredients of the  two  offences  are altogether  different.  Such being the case the  question  arises whether  the  acquittal for the offences under  the  Customs  Act which requires the prosecution to establish altogether  different ingredients operates as bar to the prosecution of the same person in  connection with  the charge of having committed  the  offence under the Gold (Control) Act.

4.  Reliance has been placed on Section 403 (1) of the  Code  of Criminal  Procedure, 1898 (Cr. P.C.) in support of the plea  that the  prosecution under the Gold (Control) Act would be barred  on the basis of the undermentioned facts :-

i) that the respondents had been tried by a competent Court for  the  offence of being in possession of gold under  the  Customs  Act and had been acquitted.

ii)  they are sought to be prosecuted on the same facts for  an  offence under the Gold (Control) Act.

It  is  not  in  dispute that  the  respondents  were  tried  and acquitted  for  the offence under the Customs Act  in  connection with  the possession of a quantity of gold. Their trial would  be barred  by  Section  403  (1) provided  they  are  sought  to  be prosecuted on same facts for any offence for which a  different charge from the one made against them might have been made  under Section  236 and for which they might have been convicted  under Section 237.

5.  In order to successfully establish their plea of  bar  under Section  403(1) the concerned respondents will therefore have  to establish that:-

i)  It  was doubtful as to which of the several  offences  the  facts which could be proved by the prosecution would consitute.

ii)  And they could have been charged in the  alternative  with  having committed one or other of the said offences.

In other words what they would be required to establish would  be that (1) there must have been a doubtas to whether the  offence under  the Customs Act could be proved or whether  the  offence under  the Gold (Control) Act would be proved and (2)  that  in the  context of this doubt an alternative charge could have  been framed  under  Section  236. Now, on  a  true  interpretation  of Section  236 it would appear that the Section WOULD BE  ATTRACTED where the offence would fall either under one or the other of the two alternative charges. It WOULD NOT BE ATTRACTED  if an offence could  fall  under  both  of the  alternative  charges.  What  is contemplated  by Section 236 if framing of an alternative  charge where on the facts of the case an offence would fall under one of the two alternative charges, but the act would not constitute  an offence  under both the charges. This point is made clear by  the illustrations to Section 236 viz:

(a)  A  is accused of an act which may amount  to  theft,  or  receiving  stolen  property,  or criminal breach  of  trust  of  cheating.  He  may  be charged  with  theft,  receiving  stolen  property,  criminal breach of trust and cheating or he  may  be  charged  with  having  committed  theft,  or  receiving  stolen  property, or criminal breach of trust or cheating.

(b)  A states on oath before the Magistrate that he saw B hit C  with a club. Before the Sessions Court A states on oath that  B  never hit C. A may be charged in the alternative and  convicted  of  intentionally giving false evidence, although it cannot  be  proved which of these contradictory statements was false.

6.  Illustration (a) refers to framing of an alternative  charge in  respect of theft or receiving of stolen property or  criminal breach of trust or cheating. It will be seen that a person cannot be  said to have committed the offence both of theft as  also  of receiving of stolen property. A person who himself commits  the theft,  cannot  be  guilty of the  charge  of  receiving  stolen property  whereas a person who may have nothing to do  with  the commission  of theft, but who may be found in possession  of  the stolen  property,  would be guilty of the offence  of  receiving stolen property. Now the prosecution cannot foresee whether  the person  from  whose possession the stolen article was  found  was himself the thief or was merely a person who had received  stolen property from the thief. A person cannot be found guilty of  both theft  as  also for receiving stolen property. And it  is  in such a case that an alternative charge under Section 236 could be framed.  In the present case the concerned respondents  could  be found  guilty  of  both  the  offences  in  the  context  of  the possession  of  gold.  If it was established  that  there  was  a prohibition  against the import of gold and that he was found  in possession  of  gold which he knew of had reason to  believe  was liable  to  confiscation he would be guilty of that  offence.  He would  also be guilty of an offence under the  Gold  (Control)Act provided  the gold is of a purity of atleast 9 carats.  He  would have  violated the provisions of both the Customs Act  and  the Gold (Control) Act if the aforesaid ingredients were established. It  is not as if in case he was found guilty of an offence  under the  Customs Act, he could not have been found guilty  under  the Gold (Control)Act or vice versa. Upon being found guilty of  both the  offences the Court may perhaps impose a concurrent  sentence in respect of both the offences but the Court has also the  power to  direct  that the sentence shall run consecutively.  There  is therefore  no question of framing of an alternative  charge  one, under  the Customs Act, and the other, under the  Gold  (Control) Act.  If the ingredients or both the offences are  satisfied  the same  act of possession of the gold would constitute  an  offence both  under  the Gold (Control) Act. Such being the  position  it cannot be said that they could have been tried on the same  facts for an alternative charge in the context of Section 236 Cr.  P.C. at the time of the former proceedings.The submission urged in the context of Section 403 (1) cannot therefore succeed for it cannot be  said  that  the persons who are sought to  be  tried  in  the subsequent proceedings could have been tried on the same facts at the former trial under section 236.

7.  Strong reliance has been placed on behalf of the  respondents on  MAQBOOL  HUSSAIN VS. THE STATE OF BOMBAY & ORS.  ETC.  ETC.in support of the submission that the second prosecution is  barred. In  Maqbools case the central issue in the context of  the  fact that a person who had arrived at an Indian Airport from abroad on being  searched was found in possession of gold in  contravention of  the  relevant notification, prohibiting the import  of  gold. Action  was taken against him by the Customs authorities and  the gold  seized  from  his possession was confiscated.  Later  on  a prosecution  was  launched against him in the  criminal  court  a Bombay  charging  him  with having committed  the  offence  under Section 8 of the Foreign Exchange Regulation Act (Act 7 of  1947) read  with the relevant notification. In the background of  these facts  the  plea  of  autrefois  acquit  was  raised  seeking protection under Article 20(2) of the Constitution of India. This Court  came  to the conclusion that the  proceedings  before  the Customs  authority  did not constitute the prosecution  of  the appellant. The Court also took the view that the penalty  imposed on  him  did  not  constitute  a  punishment  by  the  judicial tribunal.  The ratio of the decision is altogether different  and has  no  application  in  so  far  as  the  plea  raised  by  the respondents is concerned. However, reliance is placed on  certain observations made in the course of the discussion, at p. 737.

To quote:

The test is whether the former offence and the offence now  charged have the same ingredients in the sense that the facts  constituting the one are sufficient to justify a conviction of  the other, not that the facts relied on by the Crown are the  same in the two trials. A plea of autrefois acquit is not  proved unless it is shown that the verdict of acquittal of the  previous charge necessarily involves an acquittal the latter.  (Vide Halsburys Laws of England, Hailsham Edition, Vol.9 pages  152 and 153, paragraph 212).
(Emphasis added)


We have already applied the very test indicated in this passage. But we have reached the conclusion that in the present case this test does not support the respondentssubmission in as much as the ingredients of the two offences are different in scope and content. The facts constituting the offence under Customs Act are different and are not sufficient to justify the conviction under the Gold Control Act. It must also be realized that what is necessary is to analyze the ingredients of the two offences and not the allegations made in the two complaints as declared by this Court in STATE OF BOMBAY VS. S.L. APTE & ANOTHER.

8.  We have also concluded that a separate charge could have been framed in respect of the distinct offence under Gold Control  Act Under  the  circumstances the plea raised by the  difence  cannot succeed.  The two conclusions reached by us squarely  brings  the matter squarely within the parameters of the law settled by  this Court  decades ago in S.L. Aptes case (Supra). In that case  the element  of  dishonestywas  required to  be  established  under section  409 of Indian Penal Code whereas it was not required  to be established under Section 105 of the Indian Insurance Act.  In this backdrop this Court has enunciated the law in the context of the  plea based on Article 20(2) of the Constitution, Section  26 of  the  General Clauses Act and section 403(2) of  the  Criminal Procedure Code in no uncertain terms:-

If, therefore, the offences were distinct there is no question  of the rule as to double-jeopardy as embodied in Art. 20(2) of  the Constitution, being applicable.

The next point to be considered is as regards the scope of s.26  of  the General Clauses Act. Though ss.26 in its opening  words  refers  to the act or omission constituting an  offence  under  two  or  more  enactments, the emphasis is not  on  the  facts  alleged  in the ingredients which constitute the  two  offences  with  which  a  person is charged. This is made  clear  by  the  concluding portion of the section which refers to shall not be  liable  to  be  punished twice for the  same  offece.  If  the  offences are not the same but are distinct, the ban imposed  by  this  provision  also cannot be invoked. It  therefore  follows  that  in  the  present case as the respondents  are  not  being  sought to be punished for the same offence twice but for  two  distinct  offences  constituted  or  made  up  of  different  ingredients the bar of the provision is inapplicable.

In passing, it may be pointed out that the construction we have  placed  on  Art.  20(2) of the Constitution  and  s.26  of  the  General  Clauses  Act is precisely in line with  the  terms  of  s.403 (2) of the Criminal Procedure Code which runs:

403(2)  A person acquitted or convicted of any offence  may  be  afterwards tried for any distinct offence for which a  separate  charge  might  have been made against him on the  former  trial  under section 235, sub-section (1).

There is no manner of doubt that section 403(1) does not come  to rescue  of the respondents 1 to 3 whereas section 403(2)  of  the Code clearly concludes the matter against them.

9.  The  High  Court  was therefore in  error  in  holding  that subsequent  trial was barred. We accept the appeal on this  point and reverse the decision of the Courts below and the High  Court. The  appellant  was  understandably seriously  aggrieved  by  the crroneous enunciation of law by the High Court as it would  cause prejudice  in  other matters involving the same point  which  may have been pending or might arise in future. With the position  of law being now setted in the appellants favour the main objective of  the appellant is achieved. Learned counsel for the  appellant indicated  at the very commencement that the main purpose of  the appeal was to have the true position in law setted. That 20 years have elapsed since the date of the seizure (November 15,1968) is, in  our  opinion, no ground for not proceeding further  with  the matter inasmuch as the offence in question is a serious  economic offence,  which undermines the entire economy of the Nation.  The delay  occasioned  in the working of the judicial system  by  the ever-increasing  workload cannot provide an alibi  for  upholding such  a plea. However in the present case the sessions Court  has quashed  the proceedings not only on this ground but also on  the basis of certain factual findings as well and the learned Counsel for  the  appellant himself found it difficult  to  assail  these findings at this juncture. The operative order passed by the High Court  cannot  therefore be disturbed in view of  the  facts  and circumstances  peculiar to this particular case.  We  accordingly allow  the appeal to this extent and reverse the findings of  the Lower Court and High Court on the question of maintainability  of the subsequent prosecution but find ourselves unable to pass  any further orders under the circumstances.

**********', 3] , 
[ 'CROSS CITATION
1972 SCC (3) 885
1973 SCR (1) 880

CRIMINAL APPELLATE JURISDICTION : Cr.A. No. 212 of 1968. Appeals by special leave from the judgment and order dated January 19, 1968 ofthe Rajasthan High Court inCrl. Revision No. 383 of 1967.

S. P. Singh and Shiv Pujan Singh for the appellant. Debabroto Mookerjee, P. C. Kapur and K. B. Mehta for the respondent.

The Judgment of the Court was delivered by

Khanna, J. Ayodhya Singh appellant and Hira Singhwere convicted by Additional Munsiff MagistrateJaipur for offences under section 457 and 380 read with section 75 IndianPenal Code. Ayodhya Singh was sentenced to undergo rigorous imprisonment for a period of two years and to pay a fine of rupees two thousand for the offence under section 457 read with section 75 Indian Penal Code. In default of payment of fine, Ayodhya Singh was sentenced to undergo rigorous imprisonment for a further period ofsix months. Similar sentence wasawarded to Ayodhya Singh for the offence under section 380 read with section 75 Indian Penal Code. The two sentences were ordered to run consecutively. Hira Singh was sentenced to undergo rigorousimprisonment for a period of two years and to pay a fine of rupees one thousand, or in default, to undergo rigorousimprisonment for afurther period of six months for the offence under section 457 read with section 75 Indian Penal Code. Similar sentence was awarded to Hira Singh for the offence under section 380 read with section 75 Indian Penal Code. The two sentences of Hira Singh were also ordered to run consecutively. Appeals filed by Ayodhya Singh andHira Singh were dismissed by Additional Sessions Judge Jaipur. Revision petitions filed by Ayodhya Singh and 7--L173Sup.C.I./73 882 Hira Singh in Rajasthan High Court met with no better fate. Ayodhya Singh thereafter filed this appeal by special leave through jail.

The prosecution case is that Kistoor Chand (PW 73) deals in gold and silver. He was running a shop inJohri bazar Jaipur, but sometime before the occurrence he had to vacate the shop and remove the gold and silver ornaments worth over a lakh of rupees to his house situated in Manni Ramji-kaRasta in Jaipur City.The house has four storeyes and the ornaments were put in a room on the third storey of the house. Cash amount was also kept by Kistoor Chand inthat room. When Kistoor Chand got up on the morning of February 9, 1964 he found that the big window of the room in which ornaments had been kept was lying open. On opening the room it was found that the boxes containing ornaments were lying empty. A number of articles were seen scattered in the room.Reportabout the occurrence was lodged at police station Manak Chowk Jaipur City by Mahindra Kumar (PW74), son of Kistoor Chand at 7-30 a.m. on February 9, 1964. A case was then registered by the police under sections 457 and 380 Indian Penal Code.

Sub Inspector Basarat Vallabh went soon after the registration of the case to Kistoor Chands house and found that culpritshad effected their entry into the room by breaking open the window. The Sub Inspector saw a number of articles scattered in the room. The containers for keeping gold and silver ornaments were lying empty. A police photographer was sent for. The photographer developed the fingerprints left by the culprits on a silver plate lying in an almirah of the room. The photographs of the finger impressions were compared with the specimen finger impressions of Hira Singh accused and it was found that they tallied with each other.

Hira Singh accused was arrested on February 21, 1964. In pursuance of disclosure statement of Hira Singh Rs. 1,790 were recovered from Saraswati Bai, wife of the brother of Hira Singh. A box was also recovered in pursuance of the disclosure statement of Hira Singh and a number of stolen articles werefound in that box. Hira Singh also got recovered an instrument of house breaking. As a result of the interrogation of Hira Singh, the police raided the house of Ayodhya Singh appellant at Jairi on February 21, 1964 and recovered from that place 18 stolen articles. Ayodhya Singh was arrested by the police on February 25, 1964 at Etawah and from his personal search 26 items of stolen property were recovered. The recovered property included cash amount of Rs. 6,485/- including 28 currency notes ofthe denominationof Rs. 100/-. In pursuance of information supplied by 883 Ayodhya Singh, the police recovered on March 3, 1964 a numberof stolen gold articles wrapped in anold baniyan which had been buried in a graveyard near milestone No. 5 on the Agra-Etawah-Kanpur road. Identifications of recovered ornaments were held by Shri A. C. Bafna Magistrate (PW 72) on July 17, 1964 and July 20, 1964. The recovered ornaments were then identified by Kistoor Chand and Mahendra Kumar PWs as those which belonged to them and which had been stolen. At the trialthe two accused denied the prosecution allocations against them and stated that they hadbeen falsely involved in this case. According to them, the various articles which had been recovered bythe police, belonged to them. Regarding the recovery of some goldbars from him, the appellant stated that he got the bars prepared for the purpose of purchasing bonds. Thetrial court accepted the prosecution case and convicted and sentenced the accused as, above.The recovered articles were ordered to be restored to Mahendra Kumar complainant.Appeals and revision petitions filed by the accused, as stated earlier, were dismissed.

We have heard Mr. Singh who has argued thecase amicus curiaeon behalf of the appellant and are ofthe opinion that there is no merit in the appeal.The fact thatsome persons had broken into the house of Kistoor Chand on the night betweenFebruary 8 :and February 9, 1964 and had removed valuable articles consisting of cash, jewellery and silverware is proved by the testimony of Kistoor Chand and Mahindra Kumar. The prosecution has also ledevidence to show that a number of stolen articles were recovered in pursuance of the disclosure statement of Hira Singh accused after he was, arrested on February 21, 1964. The interrogation of Hira Singh led to the police raid on the house of Ayodhya Singh appellant wherefrom a number of stolen articles wererecovered. Ayodhya Singh wasarrested on February 25, 1964 and some of the stolen articleswere recovered from his person. Ayodhya Singh thereaftermade disclosure statement ,,which led to the recovery ofmore stolenarticles from a graveyard ,on March 3, 1964. The appellate court and the High Court accepted the evidence adduced by the prosecution in this respect. The version of the accused that the recovered articles belonged tothem was rejected. The courts below in this content reliedupon the identification of the recovered articles by Kistoor Chand and Mahindra Kumar. Nothing has been brought to our noticeby Mr. Singh as may justify interference with the appraisement of the evidence of the trial magistrate, the Additional Sessions Judge and theHigh Court. One significant circumstance which shows the falsity of the claim made by the appellant that the recovered articles belonged to him is the fact that some of those articles were recovered from a graveyard near milestone No. 5 at AgraEtawahKanpur road. The articles were found to havebeen buried there 884 and were recovered in pursuance of the disclosure statement of the appellant. If the aforesaid recovered articles consisting ofgold bars belonged to the appellant, it is difficult to believe that he would have buried them in a lonelyspot in a graveyard. The fact that, the appellant buriedthem in a graveyard shows hisanxiety to conceal those articles so that no one may know that he was in possession of those articles.

Mr. Singh has assailed the propriety of the identification of the recovered articles. In this respect we find that the evidence of Shri A. C. Bafna Magistrate (PW 72) showsthat the recoveredarticles weremixed with other similar articles and all necessary precautions were taken. Kistoor Chand and Mahindra Kumar correctly identified the recovered articles. Nothing cogent has been shown to us as to why the statement of Shri Bafna in this respect be not accepted. Mr. Singh has referred to the observations of the High Court that the judgments of thetrial magistrate and the Additional Sessions Judge were not very satisfactory.This circumstance, in our opinion, is not very material because the High Court considered the evidence which hadbeen adduced in the caseat some length and came to the conclusion that the case against the accused hadbeen proved. In view of the fact that the evidence on record has been discussed in detail by the High Court, it cannot be said that the appellant has been prejudiced because of the fact that the judgments of the trialmagistrate and the appellate court were not as elaborate as theyshouldhave been.

A faint attempt was made by Mr. Singh to show that there had been misjoinder of charges. This submission is plainly without any force because the circumstances of the case show that the accused jointly committed the offences with which they were charged and that those offences were committed in the course of the same transaction. The two accused could consequently be. charged and tried together as such a course is permitted by section 239 of the Codeof Criminal Procedure.

Lastly, it has been argued that the conviction of the appellant should have been under section 411 Indian Penal Code and not under sections 457 and 380 Indian Penal Code. This contention is equally untenable.The house breaking and theft in the house of Kistoor Chand took place on the night between February 8 and February 9, 1964.The various stolen articles were recovered from the appellants house on February 21, 1964 and thereafter from his person on February 25, 1964. The appellant was in police custody after February 25, 1964 and more stolen articles were recovered on March 3, 1964 from the graveyard in pursuance of his disclosure statement. The articles which were recovered on March 3, 1964 can consequently be held to be in the possession of the appellant on February 25, 1694. It would

885 thus follow that within 17 days of the theft the appellant was found in possession of the stolen articles. According to illustration (a) of section 114 of the Indian Evidence Act, a man who is in possession of stolen goods soon after the theft is either the thief or hasreceived the goods knowing them to be stolen, unless he can account for his possession. It would, in our opinion, depend upon the facts and circumstances of each case whether the court should draw the presumption that a person found in possession of stolen goods soon after the theft and who has not been able to account for his possession is the thief or whether he is the receiver of the goods knowing them to be stolen. We may state at this stage that the appellant has not been able to account for his possession of the stolen articles and the explanation furnished by him is not all worthy of credence. Looking to the facts and circumstances of the case, we are of the view that the courts below were justified in drawing the presumption that the appellant was guilty of the offence under section 457 and 380 Indian Penal Code. The factthat the _culprits entered the room on the third floor by opening the window and thereafter broke open a large number of boxes and almirahsand removed huge quantity of gold and silverware shows that it was not the work of a single individual. The fact that the appellant was foundsoon after the theft in possession of a very large number of stolen articles shows that he was himself the thief and not the receiver of stolen goods.The present isnot acase wherein one or two or a very few of the stolen articles were found in the possession of the appellant soon after the theft. On the contrary, the bulk of stolen articleswere recovered from him. The number and the nature of the stolen articles recovered from the appellant soon after the theft coupled with the other circumstances of the case, in our opinion, warrant the presumption that the appellant himself committed thetheft after entering the room on the third storey of Kistoor Chands house through the window. In the result, the appeal, fails and is dismissed. S.C. Appeal

dismissed. 886
**********', 3] , 
[ 'CROSS CITATION
1965 SC 585 (5)
1962 SCR Supl. (1) 8

CRIMINAL APPELLATE JURISDICTION: Criminal Appeal No. 31 of 1961.

Appeal by special leave from the judgment and order dated October 7, 1958 of the Andhra Pradesh High Court in Criminal Appeal No. 456 of 1957.

P . Ram Reddy for the appellants.

Ratna Raoand K R. Choudhri, for respondent No 1.

A. Ganganatham Chetty and T.M. Sen. for respondent No.2.

1961. October 5. The Judgment of the Court was delivered by

HIDAYATULLAH, J.-The two appellants who were granted special leave by this Court, appeal against the judgment of the High Court of Andhra Pradesh convicting them, on appeal against acquittal, of an offence under. 380 of the Indian Penal Code and sentencing them to six months rigorous imprisonment and a fine Rs. 500/- each, with further rigorous imprisonment for one month in default of payment of fine.

The prosecution case which had a chequered career in the High Court and the two Courts below, is as follows: In Dusi, which is a partof Bhaskararaopuram, there was a Press knownas Srinivasa Printing Press at Srinivasa Ashram. This Press existed for over 17 years. Pappala Chinna Ramadasu (P.W.4) was admittedly a printer and for some years, the declared keeper of that Press under s. 4 of the Press and Registration of Books Act, 1867. The declarations were made in 1944 (Ex.P.4) and 1947 (Ex.P-5). On November 21, 1955, 10 Pappala ChinnaRamadasu soldthis press by a registered document (Ex.P. 1 ) to one Boddepalli Lakshminarayana forRs 4,000/-,of which Rs.3,500/- were shown to have been paid in advance and the balance was received by Pappala Chinna Ramadasu on January10, 1956, (Ex.P.2). Two applications were then made on December 1, 1955, respectively by Chinna Ramadasu andBoddepalli Lakshminarayana beforethe Collector and District Magistrate for substituting the name of Boddepalli Lakshminarayana in place of that of Pappala Chinna Ramadasu in the declaration. On December 6, 1955, by Ex.P.11 they were informed that they should apply under the Pressand Registration of Books Act (25 of 1867). Subsequently, on January 11, 1956, a declaration under s. 4 of that Act was made by Boddepalli Lakshminarayana and was accepted (Ex.P.3).

The case of the prosecution further is that Boddepalli Lakshminarayana went to Kurnoolon March 20, 1956, and in hisabsence, the two appellants with two others (who wereprosecuted but acquitted)removed the Printing Press on the night of March 25, 1956 to Korlakota where the first appellant, Apparao, resides. A report of the offence (Ex.P-13), purporting to be writtenon March 27, 1956, was handed in at the police station house on the following day at 8 P.m. The policetook no action, anda complaint was, therefore, filed on April 4, 1956, by Boddepalli Laksminarayana. The Judicial Second class Magistrate, Srikakulam, convicted the two appellants of an offence under 8. 380 of the Indian Penal Code, and acquitted the two others, with whom we are not concerned, and sentenced each of theappellants to imprisonment till the rising of theCourt and a fine of Rs. 250/-, with simple imprisonment for one month in default. On appeal, the Additional District and Sessions Judge, Srikakulam, set aside the conviction and acquitted them. The complainant then obtained special leave of the High Court to file 11 appeal againstthis acquittal, and the High Court reversed theacquittal, asalready indicated above.

In support of the prosecutioncase, the complainant examined four witnesses, including himself. Pappala Chinna Ramadasu was examined as P.W.4 to prove that he had sold the Pressto Boddepalli Lakshminarayana, and two other witnesses wereexamined to prove theremoval of the Printing Press by the appellants.

The defence of the appellants was as follows: According to them, the Press originally belonged to oneGovindachari, and on October 25, 1947 he transferred it to Kuna Appala Naidu by Ex. D-2. In the registered sale deed then executed, Govindachari was joined formally by Pappala Chinna Ramadasu. The sale was for Rs. 6,400/- and on the same day, a promissory note was executed by Kuna Appala Naidu in favour of Govindachari, which was attested by Pappala Chinna Ramadasu. Subsequently, Appala Naidu made payments of certain amounts, and endorsements on tho promissory note showing these payments were signed by Pappala Chinna Ramadasu as a witness. Kuna Appala Naidu was examinedas D.W.1, and he stated that, the name of Pappala ChinnaRamadasu was formally included in the transfer deed,since the declaration stood in his name. He also stated that the deed, Ex. D.2, was signed as witness by one Akkala Naidu, who died years before the present controversy started. Kuna Appala Naidu later sold the Press to the second appellant and one Sri K. Sriramda, and the second appellant continued in possessionas owner. Pappala ChinnaRamadas continued as the printer, and his declaration as the keeper of the Press also continued. In 1953, Pappala Chinna Ramadasu left the Press for good. The Press was leased out by thesecond appellant to one Appanna, and this leave continued till 1956. On March 19, 1956, an agreement for leave was executed in favour of the first appellant, and on March 26, 1956, a registered deed was duly 12 executed. According to the appellants, the Press WAS removed during the day on March 27 and the lease amount was paidon the28th. According to them, the second appellant was the owner, in law and infact, of the Press and the first appellant was the lessee and had removed the Press in the bona fide exercise ofhis right as lessee. The appellants examined eight witnesses in support of their case.

The case of the prosecution hinged upon the evidence of Pappala Chinna Ramadasu, when confronted with Ex. D-2, he denied his signature, and stated evasively that he could not identify the signaturesof Govindachari and Appala Naidu. He admitted, however, that Appanna used to look after the Press after 1953, though he said that he used to visit the Press oncein two or three months before he soldit to P.W.1, and that the correspondence used to be made in his name.He also stated that he had purchased the Press from the Madras Type Foundry Co., for RH. 9,107/- but that the bills were lost, and he added that they were taken away along with the Press, when it was removed. The case of the appellants rested upon the proof of the signature of Pappala Chinna Ramadasu on Es. D-2 and additionally the proof of the signature of Akkala Naidu, beoause if Akkala Naidu signed the document in 1947 and died some four years before the present controversy started, there would be goodreasonto think that a document of this character couldnot be a fabricated one. The appellants examined a handwriting expert, Sri B. R. Singh (D.W.8). He statedcategoricallythat Ex.D-2bore tho signature ofPappala Chimla Ramadasu. The signature of Akkala Naidu was proved by his son, Sri Rangam. He identified the signature of his father not only on that document but also on Ex. D-3, the promissory Dote. He also stated that h father had died in 1951.

From thismaterial, the Additional District and Sessions Judge, Srikakulam, found that Ex- D-2 13 was not a forged document, as was suggested, but was amply proved as genuine by Pappala Chandrudu (D.W 4) and the combined evidence of Sri Rangam (D. W.3) andSri B.R. Singh (D. W. 8).He therefore, held that Pappala Chinna Ramadasu had no right to sell the Pres in 1955 to Boddepalli Lakshminarayana and that his connection with the Press had effectively ceased from. 1953 even as a mere printer. It is unnecessary to examine whether this finding or the finding given by the Judicial SecondClass Magistrate, Srikakulam, who held otherwise, wasthe correct inferencefrom the. facts. The learned Judge of the High Court, who heard the appeal against the acquittal, said nothing about Ex. D-2. According to him, the removal of the Pressamounted to theft, even though the appellants removed it under a bona fide claim of right.

In this statement of the law, the learned Judge was, with respect, clearly in error. This is what the learned Judge observed:

Further, to a charge of theft, the plea

that the property was removed under a bona

fide claim of right would not avail. For

example aperson who bona fide believes that

the fountain pen on his neighbours desk is

his has no right in law to trespass into the

neighbours houseand snatch away the pen

without the latters content.

The first of the statements is certainly not the law. It is settled law that where abona fide claim of right exists, it can be a good defence to a prosecution for theft. An act does not amount to theft, unless there be not only no legal right but no appearance or colour of alegal right. in 2 East .659, the law was stated a long time ago thus:

If there be in the prisoner any fair

pretence of property of right, or if it be

brought into doubt at all, the court will

direct an acquittal. 14 And accordingto I Hale P.C. 509, the best evidence is that the goodswere taken quite openly. The law thus stated by East and Hale has not been altered inmoderntimes.There are numerous casesin which Courts in India have recognised a bone fide claim of right as a defence to the charge of theft. See Ratanlal law of Crimes 19th Ed. p. 933.

We are not concerned in this case with the declaration under the Press and Registrationof Books Act. A declaredkeeper of the Press is not necessarily the owner thereof so as to be able to confertitle to thePress upon another. The ownership of the Press is a matter of the general law and must follow that law. Whether Pappala Chinna Ramadasu was not only the declared keeper of thePress but also its owner can onlybe effectively decided by theCivil Court. For purposes of Criminal law, the evidence prima facie pointed to a transferof thePress by Pappala Chinna Ramadasu and Govindachari to Kuna Appala Naidu. The evidence prima facie also established that the appellants had taken possession of the Press under a bona fide claim of right, and that, in ouropinion. was sufficient to dispose of the present case. The Additional District and Sessions Judge,Srikakulam, had rightly held that the matter was for the decision of the Civil Court, and that this was not a case of theft under the Indian Penal Code, and had rightly directed the acquittal of the appellants. The learned Judge of the High Court considered the declarationby Pappala Chinna Ramadasu,which continued Unchanged, as sufficient to prove anoffence of theft. In our opinion, in tho circumstances and in the light of the finding given by the District and Sessions Judgewith regard to Ex. D-2, it was necessary to go further to see what right Pappala Chinna Ramadasu had to the Press at all. If this had been considered, the learned Judge would have seen that there was some doubt the rightof Pappala Chinna Ramadasu 15 to transfer the Press in 1955 toBoddepalli Lakshminarayana, and further that the defence that the appellantstook possession of the Press under a bona. fide claim of right was a good defence entitling them to an acquittal.

In the result, this appeal must succeed. The convictions ofthe appellantsand the sentences passed on them are set aside, they are acquitted and their bail bonds shall stand discharged. The fines, if realised, are ordered to be remitted.

Appeal allowed.
**********', 3] , 
[ 'HEADNOTE
SERVICE AND LABOUR LAWS
Industrial Dispute Act, 1947
Section 11A - Natural Justice - Termination - Effect of acquittal in criminal case - Theft of Face Milling Cutter - Respondents caught in factory premises - Enquiry officer held charges proved but respondents acquitted in criminal case - Labour Court while holding that departmental enquiry was legal and proper, also held that initiation of enquiry before disposal of criminal case was against principles of natural justice and hence termination was not justified, specially when accused is acquitted by Criminal Court. Held when Labour Court upheld the departmental enquiry as being legal and proper, then it should have confined itself to deciding the legality of dismissal order as per the provisions of Section 11A. Labour Court did not consider the law laid down by Apex Court in The Workmen of M/s Firestone Tyre & Rubber Co. of India (Pvt.) Ltd.s case. It even erred in holding that since appellant failed to lead any evidence to prove the charge in Labour Court, dismissal orders were liable to be set aside.
HELD
When we examine the legality and the correctness of the Awards of the Labour Court, we are of the considered opinion that the Labour Court, having held and indeed rightly that the departmental enquiry conducted by the appellant was legal and proper committed an error in holding that the departmental enquiry got vitiated due to criminal court’s order which had acquitted the respondents from the charge of theft. In our opinion, there was no occasion for the Labour Court to examine this issue once the departmental enquiry was held legal and proper. The Labour Court, in our opinion, committed yet another error in holding that since the appellant failed to lead any evidence to prove the charge in Labour Court, therefore, the dismissal orders of respondents are liable to be set aside. This finding, in our opinion, was again not legally sustainable. (Para 16)
In other words, the Labour Court should have then confined its enquiry to examine only one limited question as to whether the punishment given to the respondents was, in any way, disproportionate to the gravity of the charge leveled against them and this, the Labour Court should have examined by taking recourse to the provisions of Section 11-A of the Industrial Dispute Act, 1947 (in short “the Act”) and the law laid down by this Court in the case of The Workmen of M/s Firestone Tyre & Rubber Co. of India (Pvt.) Ltd. v. The Management & Ors. 1973 (1) SCC 813. It was, however, not done thereby rendering the order of Labour Court legally unsustainable. (Para 18)
Natural justice - Whether initiation of departmental enquiry should be only after decision of Criminal Court, otherwise it would be against the principle of natural justice. Held criminal proceeding and departmental proceedings are two separate proceedings in law. Standard of proof required in domestic enquiry is different from that required in criminal case. In domestic enquiry it is pre-ponderance of probabilities. In this case, dismissal order was not based on Criminal Courts judgement. It was based on domestic enquiry which every employer has a right to conduct independently of criminal case. Divisional Controller, Karnataka State Road Transport Corporations JT 2011 (13) SC 247 case relied.
HELD
The Labour Court should have seen that the dismissal order of the respondents was not based on the criminal Court’s judgment and it could not be so for the reason that it was a case of acquittal. It was, however, based on domestic enquiry, which the employer had every right to conduct independently of the criminal case. (Para 20)
This Court has consistently held that in a case where the enquiry has been held independently of the criminal proceedings, acquittal in criminal Court is of no avail. It is held that even if a person stood acquitted by the criminal Court, domestic enquiry can still be held - the reason being that the standard of proof required in a domestic enquiry and that in criminal case are altogether different. In a criminal case, standard of proof required is beyond reasonable doubt while in a domestic enquiry, it is the preponderance of probabilities. (See Divisional Controller, Karnataka State Road Transport Corporation v. M.G. Vittal Rao jt 2011(13) SC 247). (Para 21)
In the light of this settled legal position, the Labour Court was not right in holding that the departmental enquiry should have been stayed by the appellant awaiting the decision of the criminal Court and that it is rendered illegal consequent upon passing of the acquittal order by the criminal Court. This finding of the Labour Court is, therefore, also not legally sustainable. (Para 22)
Dismissal - Labour court held departmental proceedings to have got vitiated due to acquittal in criminal proceeding - In writ High Court held enquiry to be legal but remanded the matter without directing as to what Labour Court has to decide after remand and why Writ Court could not decide such issues. Held, High Court erred in doing so. Writ Court should have examined the question itself which it had left for consideration i.e. whether order of dismissal was commensurate with the charges or interference was required under Section 11 of the Act. Shankar Chakravartis case referred.
HELD
Now coming to the order of writ Court (Single Judge) though, in our opinion, the Single Judge rightly held the departmental enquiry as being legal and proper but committed an error in remanding the case to the Labour Court without precisely saying as to what the Labour Court has to decide after remand and why writ Court cannot decide such issues in the writ petition. We find that the Single Judge, in concluded para of the order, remanded the whole case afresh for its decision on merits. (Para 23)
In our considered view, the Single Judge (Writ Court) having held the enquiry to be legal and proper instead of remanding the case to the Labour Court should have himself examined the short question which had survived for consideration in the writ petition, namely, whether the punishment of dismissal was commensurate with the charges or it required any interference by the Court under Section 11-A of the Act. (Para 24)
Dismissal order - Whether justified when acquittal was recorded in criminal proceedings - Departmental enquiry held to be legal and proper - Respondent was found committing theft while on duty. Held, act of theft by employee while on duty is a serious charge, which stood proved in enquiry. Hence employer was justified in dismissing the employee from service. Plea that employee was acquitted in criminal case, hence reinstatement should be ordered, has no merit. Dismissal order was not passed on the basis of conviction of employee by the Criminal Court, which was later set aside by Superior Court. Findings were based on preponderance of probabilities and could be recorded by the enquiry officer notwithstanding the order of acquittal by Criminal Court. Dismissal order held to be legal and proper. Division Bench, High Court erred in ordering reinstatement and restoration of the order of Labour Court.
HELD
An act of theft committed by an employee while on duty is a serious charge. This charge once proved in enquiry, the employer is justified in dismissing the employee from service. (Para 29)
Dismissal orders had not been passed on the basis of employees’ conviction by the criminal Court which later stood set aside by the superior Court. Had it been so, then the situation would have been different because once the conviction order is set aside by the superior Court, the dismissal order which was solely based on passing of the conviction order also stands set aside. Such was not the case here. (Para 31)
In the case on hand, the appellant (employer) had conducted the departmental enquiry in accordance with law independently of the criminal case wherein the Enquiry Officer, on the basis of the appreciation of evidence brought on record in the enquiry proceedings, came to a conclusion that a charge of theft against the delinquent employees was proved. This finding was based on preponderance of probabilities and could be recorded by the Enquiry Officer notwithstanding the order of criminal Court acquitting the respondents. (Para 32)

CASES REFERRED
1.  Divisional Controller, Karnataka State Road Transport Corporation v. M.G. Vittal Rao JT 2011 (13) SC 247 (Para 21)
2.  Shankar Chakravarti v. Britannia Biscuits Co. Ltd. & Anr. AIR 1979 SC 1652 (Para 25)
3.  The Workmen of M/s Firestone Tyre & Rubber Co. of India (Pvt.) Ltd. v. The Management & Ors. 1973 (1) SCC 813 (Para 18)


ABHAY MANOHAR SAPRE, J.
1. These appeals are filed against the common final judgment and order dated 16.04.2007 passed by the High Court of Judicature at Madras in Writ Appeal Nos.3789 of 2003 and 3790 of 2003 whereby the High Court allowed the appeals filed by the respondents and directed the appellant to reinstate the respondents with continuity of service and other attendant benefits but without payment of back wages.
2. In order to appreciate the issues involved in these two appeals, it is necessary to set out the facts in detail.
3. The appellant in both the appeals is a Public Sector undertaking known as-Bharat Heavy Electricals Ltd. (BHEL). It has a plant at Ranipet in District Vellore, Tamil Nadu. M. Mani-Respondent in Civil Appeal No.10766/2013 and T.A. Mathivanan (since dead) and represented by his legal representatives-respondent in connected Civil Appeal No.10767/2013 were the employees of BHEL at all relevant time and were working as Driver Grade II in the plant.
4. On 17.02.1991, both the respondents were on duty in the night shift in the Plant. They were supposed to remain present all the time in the Transport Department of the Plant so that on receiving the call they would attend the place of call with their respective vehicles.
5. It was, however, noticed by the officials concerned on duty that both the respondents were not found present on their respective seats and instead were found driving one forklift FLV in another shop floor. It was also noticed that they both had unauthorizedly removed one heavy machine called-”Face Milling Cutter of 500 diameter” from one shop floor and kept it on forklift and loaded in company’s ambulance, which was being driven by T.A. Mathivanan. Both of them then managed to take the said machine in ambulance outside factory premises through South gate.
6. The officials, who witnessed the incident, reported the incident to the appellant (Management). The appellant took up the matter with seriousness and issued charge-sheet to both the respondents. They were asked to submit their explanation. Both denied the charges. The appellant, therefore, appointed Enquiry Officer for holding regular departmental enquiry. Both the respondents participated in the enquiry proceedings. The Enquiry Officer recorded the evidence of the witnesses and submitted his report. The Enquiry Officer, on evaluation of the evidence, held the charges as proved against both the respondents. He held that both the respondents were involved in committing theft of “Face Milling cutter” and were caught in the factory premises while on duty. The appellant accepted the report and dismissed the respondents from service on 31.08.1991. Against their dismissal order, the respondents filed departmental appeals. The appeals were dismissed.
7. This event gave rise to filing of two cases. One was by the State in the Court of Magistrate seeking prosecution of the respondents under Section 379 of the Indian Penal Code, 1860 (in short “IPC”) and the other was by the respondents against the appellant (employer) in Labour Court challenging legality of their dismissal orders (ID Nos. 801 and 839 of 1993). So far as the criminal case was concerned, the Magistrate, by his order dated 24.11.1992, acquitted the respondents from the charge.
8. As regards the cases before the Labour Court out of which these two appeals arise, the Labour Court framed three issues, first, whether the enquiry conducted by the Enquiry Officer was legal and proper; second, whether the findings of the Enquiry Officer holding the charge as proved against the respondents are correct; and third, whether these two employees are entitled to claim the relief of reinstatement with back wages?
9. By Award dated 06.08.2001 (Annexure-P-9), the Labour Court answered the reference in favour of the employees by recording the following findings:
     “Hence it can not be said that there has been denial of reasonable opportunity during the enquiry.”
9.1. and then in Para 7, it was held that,
     “it can not be considered that the departmental enquiry has not been held properly.”
9.2. and then in Para 8 it was held that,
     “till the disposal of the criminal case, the Management ought to have stayed the departmental enquiry and they should have passed the order only after the conclusion  of the criminal proceedings.”
9.3. and, in the same Para 8, it was held that,
     “Therefore, the object of this provision is that till proceedings of criminal court, the departmental enquiry should not be initiated. Therefore, the respondent ought not to have appointed enquiry officer to conduct the enquiry in respect of same charge which has been pending before the Criminal Court. Such an enquiry held is contrary to principles of natural justice. On this ground, I hold that departmental enquiry is held not in accordance with principle of natural justice”
9.4. and in last line of Para 8, it was held that,
     “it is for this reason the removal of the employee from service is not justified.”
9.5. The Labour Court then lastly in para 9 held that,
     “Having held that the departmental enquiry has not been conducted according to principle of natural justice, it has to be decided whether the finding of the Enquiry Officer that the charge against the petitioner is correct. When the criminal case has been pending the finding of the Enquiry Officer that the petitioner is guilty of the charge is not correct. Further the petitioner has been acquired by the criminal court. Hence when in the criminal proceedings, the petitioner has been found not guilty, I hold that the findings of the Enquiry Officer that the charge against the petitioner had been proved, is not correct.”
10. To sum up, the Labour Court held that, firstly, the departmental enquiry was properly held; secondly, the employer instead of holding an enquiry should have stayed it awaiting the outcome of the criminal case; thirdly, since the criminal case resulted in the acquittal of the respondents, the departmental enquiry stood vitiated as violating the principle of natural justice; fourthly, since the employer did not lead any evidence in support of the charge, the charge remained unproved; and lastly, the dismissal orders are bad in law in the light of the four grounds and, therefore, the respondents be reinstated in service with payment of full back wages by the appellant.
11. The appellant, felt aggrieved, filed writ petitions in the High Court. The Single Judge, by order dated 31.07.2003 (Annexure-P-11), allowed the writ petitions, set aside the award of the Labour Court and remanded the case to the Labour Court for deciding both the matters afresh. The Single Judge held that when the Labour Court held the departmental enquiry to be legal and proper then the only question that remained for the Labour Court to decide was as to whether the punishment imposed on two employees, i.e., “dismissal” was just, legal and proper or it required any interference in its quantum and, if so, to what extent. Having observed this, the writ Court remanded the cases to Labour Court to decide the cases afresh on merits. This is what the learned Single Judge in concluding para held,
     “10. Keeping in view of all these aspects, I think interest of justice would be served by quashing the awards in both the cases and directing both the matters are to be considered afresh by the Labour Court. It goes without saying that both the matters should be taken up for hearing together and shall be disposed of. Since the matter is pretty old, the Industrial Disputes are to be decided as expeditiously as possible, preferably within a period of six months from the date of receipt of a copy of this order.”
12. Felt aggrieved, the respondents filed intra court appeals in the High Court before the Division Bench. By impugned judgment, the Division Bench allowed the appeals, set aside the order of writ Court and directed reinstatement of the respondents by restoring the order of the Labour Court to this extent but declined to award to them any back wages except continuity of service and other attendant benefits to the respondents.
13. Felt aggrieved by the judgment of the Division Bench, the appellant (employer) has filed these appeals by way of special leave before this Court.
14. Heard Mr. P.S. Patwalia, learned senior counsel for the appellant and Mr. M.A. Chinnasamy and Mr. M.K. Perwez, learned counsel for the respondents.
15. Having heard learned counsel for the parties and on perusal of the record of the case, we are constrained to allow the appeals, set aside the impugned judgment and uphold the dismissal order of the respondents as legal and proper.
16. To begin with, when we examine the legality and the correctness of the Awards of the Labour Court, we are of the considered opinion that the Labour Court, having held and indeed rightly that the departmental enquiry conducted by the appellant was legal and proper committed an error in holding that the departmental enquiry got vitiated due to criminal court’s order which had acquitted the respondents from the charge of theft. In our opinion, there was no occasion for the Labour Court to examine this issue once the departmental enquiry was held legal and proper. The Labour Court, in our opinion, committed yet another error in holding that since the appellant failed to lead any evidence to prove the charge in Labour Court, therefore, the dismissal orders of respondents are liable to be set aside. This finding, in our opinion, was again not legally sustainable.
17. In our opinion, once the Labour Court upheld the departmental enquiry as being legal and proper then the only question that survived for consideration before the Labour Court was whether the punishment of “dismissal” imposed by the appellant to the respondents was legal and proper or it requires any interference in its quantum.
18. In other words, the Labour Court should have then confined its enquiry to examine only one limited question as to whether the punishment given to the respondents was, in any way, disproportionate to the gravity of the charge leveled against them and this, the Labour Court should have examined by taking recourse to the provisions of Section 11-A of the Industrial Dispute Act, 1947 (in short “the Act”) and the law laid down by this Court in the case of The Workmen of M/s Firestone Tyre & Rubber Co. of India (Pvt.) Ltd. v. The Management & Ors. 1973 (1) SCC 813. It was, however, not done thereby rendering the order of Labour Court legally unsustainable.
19. Similarly, in our considered view, the Labour Court failed to see that the criminal proceedings and departmental proceedings are two separate proceedings in law. One is initiated by the State against the delinquent employees in criminal Court and other, i.e., departmental enquiry which is initiated by the employer under the Labour/Service Laws/Rules, against the delinquent employees.
20. The Labour Court should have seen that the dismissal order of the respondents was not based on the criminal Court’s judgment and it could not be so for the reason that it was a case of acquittal. It was, however, based on domestic enquiry, which the employer had every right to conduct independently of the criminal case.
21. This Court has consistently held that in a case where the enquiry has been held independently of the criminal proceedings, acquittal in criminal Court is of no avail. It is held that even if a person stood acquitted by the criminal Court, domestic enquiry can still be held - the reason being that the standard of proof required in a domestic enquiry and that in criminal case are altogether different. In a criminal case, standard of proof required is beyond reasonable doubt while in a domestic enquiry, it is the preponderance of probabilities. (See Divisional Controller, Karnataka State Road Transport Corporation v. M.G. Vittal Rao JT 2011 (13) SC 247).
22. In the light of this settled legal position, the Labour Court was not right in holding that the departmental enquiry should have been stayed by the appellant awaiting the decision of the criminal Court and that it is rendered illegal consequent upon passing of the acquittal order by the criminal Court. This finding of the Labour Court is, therefore, also not legally sustainable.
23. Now coming to the order of writ Court (Single Judge) though, in our opinion, the Single Judge rightly held the departmental enquiry as being legal and proper but committed an error in remanding the case to the Labour Court without precisely saying as to what the Labour Court has to decide after remand and why writ Court cannot decide such issues in the writ petition. We find that the Single Judge, in concluded para of the order, remanded the whole case afresh for its decision on merits.
24. In our considered view, the Single Judge (Writ Court) having held the enquiry to be legal and proper instead of remanding the case to the Labour Court should have himself examined the short question which had survived for consideration in the writ petition, namely, whether the punishment of dismissal was commensurate with the charges or it required any interference by the Court under Section 11-A of the Act.
25. In other words, the remand to the Labour Court in this case by the Single Judge was not called for. It would have become necessary, if the Single Judge had come to a conclusion that the departmental enquiry is illegal. In such situation, the question would have arisen as to whether the employer should now be given an opportunity to prove the charge before the Labour Court on merits by adducing evidence provided such opportunity had been asked for in any form by the employer (See- Shankar Chakravarti v. Britannia Biscuits Co. Ltd. & Anr. AIR 1979 SC 1652).
26. However, this occasion did not arise because, as observed supra, the enquiry was held legal and proper by the Labour Court and Single Judge.
27. Now coming to the legality of the impugned judgment, in our considered opinion, there was absolutely no justification on the part of the Division Bench to have allowed the appeals of the respondents and restored the order of the Labour Court by setting aside the dismissal order. The Division Bench, in our view, did not take note of correct legal position, which we have discussed above.
28. In our opinion, this is a clear case where the departmental enquiry was held legal and proper. We also, on going through the record of the case, hold that the departmental enquiry was properly held and was, therefore, legal and proper. So far as the quantum of punishment imposed on the respondents is concerned, having regard to the nature of charge which stood proved in the enquiry, in our view, the order of dismissal from service was the appropriate punishment. It was commensurate with the charge.
29. An act of theft committed by an employee while on duty is a serious charge. This charge once proved in enquiry, the employer is justified in dismissing the employee from service.
30. We are not impressed by the submission urged by the learned counsel for the respondents (employees) when he urged that once the respondents (employees) were acquitted from the charge of theft by the criminal Court, the dismissal orders deserve to be set aside entitling the employees to seek reinstatement in service. Learned counsel read the entire criminal Court’s order to show that it was an honorable acquittal of the employees from the charge of theft.
31. The answer to the aforementioned submission lies in the law laid down by this Court in the case of Karnataka SRTC (supra). At the cost of repetition, we may say that in the case on hand, the dismissal orders had not been passed on the basis of employees’ conviction by the criminal Court which later stood set aside by the superior Court. Had it been so, then the situation would have been different because once the conviction order is set aside by the superior Court, the dismissal order which was solely based on passing of the conviction order also stands set aside. Such was not the case here.
32. In the case on hand, the appellant (employer) had conducted the departmental enquiry in accordance with law independently of the criminal case wherein the Enquiry Officer, on the basis of the appreciation of evidence brought on record in the enquiry proceedings, came to a conclusion that a charge of theft against the delinquent employees was proved. This finding was based on preponderance of probabilities and could be recorded by the Enquiry Officer notwithstanding the order of criminal Court acquitting the respondents.
33. In view of the foregoing discussion, the appeals succeed and are allowed. Impugned judgment is set aside. As a consequence thereof, the dismissal orders of the respondents herein are held legal and proper and accordingly upheld.
**********', 3] , 
[ 'CROSS CITATION
2006 AIR (SC) 1214
2006 (2) SCC 373
APPEARANCES
Mrs. D. Bharathi Reddy, Advocate for the Appellants.
Mrs. K. Amareswari, Senior Advocate, Mr. B. Ramana Murthy and Mrs. Anjani Aiyagari, Advocates with for the Respondent.
HEADNOTE
SERVICE AND LABOUR LAWS
Government service - Termination of service for misconduct - Judicial review of administrative decisions - Scope - Respondent, a Police Head Constable charged with the theft of lens of closed circuit TV while on security duty during the visit of US President - After Departmental Enquiry services of delinquent dispensed with by the Disciplinary Authority since the charges stood proved by evidence of witnesses - Delinquent given adequate opportunity of being heard in the said proceedings - Appellate Authority as well as Administrative Tribunal upholding the dismissal - On a writ High Court on reappreciation of the evidence, upsetting the findings and directing the reinstatement of the respondent - Validity. Allowing the appeal held that the Enquiry Officer having held on the basis of evidence that the charge of theft stood proved against the respondent and the said finding having been upheld by the Appellate Authority and the Tribunal, the High Court erred in reappreciating the evidence and upsetting the factual findings. High Court while exercising the power of judicial review does not act as Appellate Court and judicial review is not akin to adjudication on merits by reappreciating the evidence as an Appellate Authority. Considering the gravity of the misconduct the punishment of dismissal was not disproportionate. Writ filed by the respondent therefore dismissed.
HELD
From the finding recorded by the High Court it clearly appears that the High Court re-appreciated the evidence as an Appellate Authority. Apart from reappreciating the evidence, which is not permissible in law, the High Court also fell in grave error by directing the government pleader and the learned counsel for the respondent herein to again view the cassettes. It is on record that the Inquiry Officer relied on the video cassettes displayed during the Inquiry as part of additional evidence. The finding has been clearly recorded by the Inquiry Officer on the basis of the evidence adduced by PWs. 1,2,3 and 4 during the Inquiry. (Para 6)

By now it is a well-established principle of law that the High Court exercising power of judicial review under Article 226 of the Constitution does not act as an Appellate Authority. Its jurisdiction is circumscribed and confined to correct errors of law or procedural error, if any, resulting in manifest miscarriage of justice or violation of principles of natural justice. Judicial review is not akin to adjudication on merit by reappreciating the evidence as an Appellate Authority. (Para 7)

The gravity of the offence must necessarily be measured with the nature of the offence. The respondent was a member of the Discipline Force holding the rank of head constable. The duty assigned to him was a bandobast duty during the visit of the then President Bill Clinton, who ran a security risk of the highest grade. His misconduct could have led to serious security lapse resulting into fatal consequences. But, because of timely detection of the electrician PW4, the lens was recovered and immediately restored. We entirely agree with the inquiry officer that the charges are serious in nature, being committed by a member of Disciplinary Force, who deserved stringent punishment. To instill the confidence of the public in the establishment, the only appropriate punishment in such cases is dismissal from service, which has been correctly awarded. (Para 11)

In the premises aforestated, we are clearly of the view that the High Court has committed patent error of law which has resulted in miscarriage of justice. The order of the High Court is, accordingly, quashed. The appeal is allowed. Consequently, the writ petition, filed by the respondent stands dismissed. (Para 13)

CASES REFERRED
1.B.C. Chaturvedi v. Union of India & Ors. JT 1995 (8) SC 65 (Para 9)

2.Union of India v. Parma Nanda JT 1989 (2) SC 132 (Para 8)

H.K. SEMA, J.

1. This appeal, preferred by the State of Andhra Pradesh, is directed against the judgment and order of the Division Bench of the High Court of Andhra Pradesh dated 9.12.2003 in writ petition no. 14146 of 2003 quashing the order of dismissal dated 21.9.2000 of the respondent herein and the order of the appellate authority dated 20.10.2001 confirming the order of dismissal. The Division Bench of the High Court directed that the respondent herein be reinstated into service forthwith with all back wages and all attendant benefits, which he could have received, had he not been dismissed from service. The High Court further directed that the respondent be reinstated into service within a period of four weeks from the date of receipt of the order. This Court on 16.7.2004, while issuing notice granted interim stay of the impugned order. Further, on 18.7.2005, on the submission of the learned counsel for the respondent that the respondent has been reinstated pursuant to the High Court order but the back wages have not been paid, this Court stayed the payment of back wages directed by the High Court.

2. Briefly stated, the facts are as follows:

2.1 The respondent, Mohd. Nasrullah Khan was working as head constable at Shamshabad Police Station of Ranga Reddy District. Mr. Bill Clinton, the then President of the United States of America was to visit the Hi-Tech City in Hyderabad and the respondent was assigned the bandobast duty at the office of the Oracle Software India Limited on the 4th Floor of Hi-Tech City, Madhapur, Hyderabad. It is alleged that during the bandobast duty, the respondent removed the CCTV Lens No. VAT-660-DSC-56894 of Watal company from ceiling of the said office and concealed the same. It is further alleged that the said removal of the lens was observed in the close circuit TV by one G. Sridhar, the electrician (PW4) and he immediately went to the respondent and asked him about the removal but the respondent denied the same. The electrician, thereafter, informed the same to the Security Supervisor and on enquiry by him, though the respondent denied of having removed the lens at the first instance, later handed over the same stating that the same was lying at the toilet.

2.2 A disciplinary inquiry was initiated against the respondent by the Superintendent of Police, A.R. Ranga Reddy District by appointing Deputy Superintendent of Police (DSP) by its order dated 19.4.2000. The substance of imputations of misconduct and misbehaviour against the respondent are as follows:

Shri Mohd. Nasrullah Khan, High Court 380 of P.S. Shamshabad (u/s) exhibited grave misconduct in committing theft of the C.C.T.V. lens costing about Rs.15,000/- from the office of Oracle India Limited, Hi-Tech City, Madhapur on 24.3.2000, while on bandobast duty, for personal gain.

2.3 In course of the inquiry, the Inquiry Officer examined as many as four witnesses and after conducting detailed inquiry by affording adequate opportunity to the respondent submitted its report dated 18.8.200 holding that the charge against the respondent of theft of C.C.T.V. lens has been proved beyond all reasonable doubt. The Inquiry Officer, in its report, also observed as under:

The charges are serious in nature. The delinquent being the member of the disciplined force and being a protector of public property, ought not to have attempted to commit such a delinquency. I, therefore, propose that the delinquent may be awarded with a stringent punishment to meet the ends of justice.

2.4 After receipt of the Inquiry Report, a show cause notice was issued to the respondent herein by the Disciplinary Authority and after considering the reply to the show cause notice, the Disciplinary Authority dismissed the respondent from service with immediate effect by an order dated 21.9.2000. It was further directed that the period of suspension from 30.3.2000 till the date of dismissal be treated as not on duty. Aggrieved thereby, the respondent preferred an appeal before the Deputy Inspector General of Police, which was dismissed on 11.5.2001. Thereafter, the respondent filed O.A.No. 3700 of 2001 before the Andhra Pradesh Administrative Tribunal. The Administrative Tribunal, by its order dated 1.8.2001, remanded the matter to the Appellate Authority for reconsideration of the matter. The Appellate Authority, after reconsidering the representation, rejected the appeal again and confirmed the order of dismissal by its order dated 20.10.2001. Being aggrieved, the respondent again filed O.A. No. 8066 of 2001 before the Tribunal contending, inter-alia, that the theft, as alleged, was not proved and the Appellate Authority did not properly consider the submissions of the respondent and that the Appellate Authority dismissed the appeal without application of mind. The appellant herein filed a detailed counter repudiating the allegations made in the O.A. It is stated that the order of dismissal was passed in accordance with the rules and regulations and there was no denial of principles of natural justice to the respondent, nor was there any allegations of violations of rules and regulations or procedures. It was also contended that the guilt of the respondent has been proved beyond all reasonable doubt. After considering the petition and the counter, the Andhra Pradesh Appellate Tribunal by its order dated 4.4.03 dismissed the O.A. confirming the order of dismissal. Aggrieved thereby, the respondent preferred writ petition no. 14146 of 2003 before the High Court, which was allowed by the impugned order, as stated earlier. Hence, the present appeal by special leave.

3. It is contended by the learned counsel for the appellant that the finding recorded by the Inquiry Officer is a finding of fact and the High Court cannot act as an appellate authority. Its jurisdiction is circumscribed and confined to correct errors of law or procedural law, if any, or violation of principles of natural justice. It is further contended that the High Court fell in grave error of law by reappreciating the evidence recorded by the Inquiry Officer like an appellate authority in the instant case.

4. Per contra, learned counsel for the respondent contended that the alleged theft of lens or removal of lens by the respondent is not proved and, therefore, the finding of the Inquiry Officer is perverse and the order of dismissal on the basis of the finding recorded by the Inquiry Officer is vitiated. At this stage, we may point out that there is no allegation of violation of principles of natural justice, or that the inquiry was conducted without following the procedures or rules and regulations. The only case put up before us by the respondent is that the theft or removal of lens by the respondent is not proved in the course of Inquiry. This contention need not detain us any longer because going through the report of the Inquiry, the Inquiry Officer, after examining PWs. 1,2,3 and 4 and after affording adequate opportunity to the respondent, has come to the conclusion that the charge levelled against the respondent stands proved.

5. The High Court, while upsetting the order of the Tribunal dated 4.4.03 passed in O.A. No. 8066/01 and order of dismissal dated 21.1.2000 confirmed by the Appellate Authority dated 20.10.2001, recorded its finding in paragraph 5 of its judgment as under:

There is no dispute that the petitioner was posted on bandobast duty on the relevant date and the entire premises was under close circuit T.V. System. The question is whether the petitioner has committed the theft of camera lens. There is no direct evidence on this aspect. It is only on presumption that when once the camera was not relaying the pictures, the officials of Oracle company came to that place where the camera was positioned and found that the lens was not available with the camera. Even the witnesses examined on this aspect namely the employees of Oracle company did not state that the petitioner had committed theft of the lens and further it is on record that the electrician himself traced out the camera lens which was lying outside toilet room and the entire premises was carpeted. No other independent officer has been examined to establish that the petitioner had committed theft. However, we see from the report of the Enquiry Officer that he got the cassette displayed and noticed the movements of the petitioner, sitting on chair, getting up and coming towards the camera and touching the lens of camera (hand is clearly visible) between 13-58 and 13-59 hours on 24.3.2000. But this is not the function of the Enquiry Officer. It must be established by the independent evidence. When we directed the learned government pleader and the learned counsel for the petitioner to again view the cassette, they stated that the visibility is beyond recognition. In such circumstances, it has to be held that the findings of the Enquiry Officer appears to be based on mere surmises and conjectures and it is finding based on no evidence. In such situation, the Tribunal ought to have held that the enquiry is vitiated for lack of acceptable and permissible evidence on this aspect. It is also on record that the lens was not recovered from the person of the petitioner and admittedly the petitioner was on guard duty in the premises where the cameras were positioned. In such a situation, it cannot be said that simply because, the lens of one camera is missing, the petitioner committed theft of it. If really the police had conducted investigation, they could have sent the lens to the Forensic expert with reference to the fingerprints and that could have made the matters clear. But for the reasons best known to the police, they did not take such action and tried to find fault with the police constable fastening the charge of theft. Under these circumstances, we are of the considered view that the Tribunal failed to take into consideration this aspect and held that the Enquiry was conducted properly and finding was validly recorded.

6. From the finding recorded by the High Court it clearly appears that the High Court re-appreciated the evidence as an Appellate Authority. Apart from reappreciating the evidence, which is not permissible in law, the High Court also fell in grave error by directing the government pleader and the learned counsel for the respondent herein to again view the cassettes. It is on record that the Inquiry Officer relied on the video cassettes displayed during the Inquiry as part of additional evidence. The finding has been clearly recorded by the Inquiry Officer on the basis of the evidence adduced by PWs. 1,2,3 and 4 during the Inquiry.

7. By now it is a well-established principle of law that the High Court exercising power of judicial review under Article 226 of the Constitution does not act as an Appellate Authority. Its jurisdiction is circumscribed and confined to correct errors of law or procedural error, if any, resulting in manifest miscarriage of justice or violation of principles of natural justice. Judicial review is not akin to adjudication on merit by reappreciating the evidence as an Appellate Authority.

8. We may now notice a few decisions of this Court on this aspect avoiding multiplicity. In Union of India v. Parma Nanda1, K. Jagannatha Shetty, J., speaking for the Bench, observed as under:

We must unequivocally state that the jurisdiction of the Tribunal to interfere with the disciplinary matters or punishment cannot be equated with an appellate jurisdiction. The Tribunal cannot interfere with the findings of the Inquiry Officer or competent authority where they are not arbitrary or utterly perverse. It is appropriate to remember that the power to impose penalty on a delinquent officer is conferred on the competent authority either by an Act of legislature or rules made under the proviso to Article 309 of the Constitution. If there has been an enquiry consistent with the rules and in accordance with principles of natural justice what punishment would meet the ends of justice is a matter exclusively within the jurisdiction of the competent authority. If the penalty can lawfully be imposed and is imposed on the proved misconduct, the Tribunal has no power to substitute its own discretion for that of the authority. The adequacy of penalty unless it is mala fide is certainly not a matter for the Tribunal to concern itself with. The Tribunal also cannot interfere with the penalty if the conclusion of the Inquiry Officer or the competent authority is based on evidence even if some of it is found to be irrelevant or extraneous to the matter.

9. Again, the same principle has been reiterated by this Court in B.C. Chaturvedi v. Union of India & Ors.2. K. Ramaswamy, J., speaking for the Court, under:

Judicial review is not an appeal from a decision but a review of the manner in which the decision is made. Power of judicial review is meant to ensure that the individual receives fair treatment and not to ensure that the conclusion, which the authority reaches, is necessarily correct in the eye of the court. When an inquiry is conducted on charges of misconduct by a public servant, the court/tribunal is concerned to determine whether the inquiry was held by a competent officer or whether rules of natural justice are complied with. Whether the findings or conclusions are based on some evidence, the authority entrusted with the power to hold inquiry has jurisdiction, power and authority to reach a finding of fact or conclusion. But that finding must be based on some evidence. Neither the technical rules of Evidence Act nor of proof of fact or evidence as defined therein, apply to disciplinary proceeding. When the authority accepts that evidence and conclusion receives
support therefrom, the disciplinary authority is entitled to hold that the delinquent officer is guilty of the charge. The court/tribunal in its power of judicial review does not act as appellate authority to appreciate the evidence and to arrive at its own independent findings on the evidence. The court/tribunal may interfere where the authority held the proceedings against the delinquent officer in a manner inconsistent with the rules of natural justice or in violation of statutory rules prescribing the mode of inquiry or where the conclusion or finding reached by the disciplinary authority is based on no evidence. If the conclusion or finding be such as no reasonable person would have ever reached, the court/tribunal may interfere with the conclusion or the finding and mould the relief so as to make it appropriate to the facts of each case.

10. As already said, in the present case there is no allegation of violation of principles of natural justice or the inquiry being held inconsistent with the mode of procedure prescribed by the rules or regulations.

11. This takes us to the last submission of the counsel for the respondent. Learned counsel for the respondent contended that the offence, said to have been committed, being minor in nature and no loss being caused to the owner of the property, inasmuch as the same had been recovered on the spot, lenient punishment may be awarded in place of dismissal from service. We are unable to countenance this submission. The gravity of the offence must necessarily be measured with the nature of the offence. The respondent was a member of the Discipline Force holding the rank of head constable. The duty assigned to him was a bandobast duty during the visit of the then President Bill Clinton, who ran a security risk of the highest grade. His misconduct could have led to serious security lapse resulting into fatal consequences. But, because of timely detection of the electrician PW4, the lens was recovered and immediately restored. We entirely agree with the Inquiry Officer that the charges are serious in nature, being committed by a member of Disciplinary Force, who deserved stringent punishment. To instill the confidence of the public in the establishment, the only appropriate punishment in such cases is dismissal from service, which has been correctly awarded.

12. It is stated that the respondent was reinstated on 19.6.04, pursuant to the order passed by the High Court and has been working since then and pay and allowances have been paid from 19.6.04. Since, he has been paid for the period he has worked, the salary and allowances already paid to him shall not be disturbed. The respondent, however, shall not get his back wags.

13. In the premises aforestated, we are clearly of the view that the High Court has committed patent error of law which has resulted in miscarriage of justice. The order of the High Court is, accordingly, quashed. The appeal is allowed. Consequently, the writ petition, filed by the respondent stands dismissed. Parties are asked to bear their own costs.

**********', 3] , 
[ 'HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAWS
Indian Penal Code, 1860
Sections 390, 392 - Evidence Act, 1872, Section 3 - Robbery - When can be said to have been committed - Principles stated.
HELD
The provision defines robbery which is theft or extortion when caused with violence of death, hurt or wrongful restraint. When there is no theft committed, then as a natural corollary there cannot be robbery. Robbery is only an aggravated form of offence of theft or extortion. Aggravation is in the use of violence of death, hurt or restraint. Violence must be in course of theft and not subsequently. It is not necessary that violence actually should be committed but even attempt to commit it is enough. (Para 8)

The words for that end in Section 390 clearly mean that the hurt caused must be with the object of facilitating the committing of the theft or must be caused while the offender is committing theft or is carrying away or is attempting to carry away property obtained by the theft. (Para 10)

Sections 390, 392, 395 - Evidence Act, 1872, Section 3 - Robbery - PWs going on scooter at 9 p.m. - Gold chain, thali, ear-drops scooter and cash snatched by threatening with knife - Next day, arrested - Stolen goods recovered and identified by victims - No dispute that place was highway. Held that offence was established. Conviction and sentence of 10 years RI and fine of Rs. 5000/- upheld. (Paras 3 -12)

CASES REFERRED
1.State of Karnataka v. Puttaraja JT 2003 (9) SC 603 (Para 13)

DR. ARIJIT PASAYAT, J.

1. Leave granted.

2. Challenge in this appeal is to the order of a learned Single Judge of the Karnataka High Court holding the appellants guilty of offence punishable under Section 392 of the Indian Penal Code, 1860 (in short the IPC) and sentencing each of 10 years imprisonment.

3. Prosecution version in a nutshell is as follows:

3.1. On 24.6.2001 at 9.00 p.m. on Mulbagal-Punganoor road PWs 2 and 3 were going on a Bajaj Scooter. When they were near Kirumani Mitta of Buddadoru village, accused persons 2 to 5 intercepted PWs 2 and 3, and robbed the gold chain, golden ear drops, thali and cash of Rs.400/- by threatening with knife. The accused tied the legs and hands of PW-2 and PW-3 and threatened them not to escape and get out from the place for about ten minutes after their departure. The victims went to Punganoor Police Station and later on lodged First Information Report with Nangali Police (Kolar Dist.) on 25.6.2001. The Traffic Police while checking found A-2, A-3 and A-4 were going on the scooter (M.O.6) they had robbed from PW-2, the deadly weapons like knives, pistol, iron rod, etc. were hidden in the scooter. On interrogation, the accused persons admitted the commission of offence in question. A-5 and A-8 were arrested on the information given by A-2 to A-4. At the instance of A-2, the gold jewellery (M.Os.2 and 3) are recovered from PW-6-Pawn broker. The Bajaj Scooter (M.O.6) was seized from A-2, A-3 and A-4. PW-13 with whom the ear-studs and the chain were pledged by A-2, testified to the said fact. PWs 2 and 3 identified A-2 to A-5 as the persons who robbed them. Prosecution claimed that the identification of accused persons by PWs 2 and 3 coupled with the recovery of jewellery at the instance of A-2 and seizure of scooter from A-2, A-3 and A-4 clinchingly established the guilt of A-2 to A-5.

3.2. The investigating agency submitted charge sheet for alleged commission of offence punishable under Section 395 of IPC. The case was split up against A-1, A-6 and A-7 as they were absconding.

3.3. Learned Additional Sessions Judge, Kolar referred to the evidence of PWs 1 and 2, the recovery of the scooter, the recovery of stolen articles and identification thereon to conclude that accused persons are guilty and accordingly A-2 to A-5 were convicted for offence punishable under Section 395 IPC. Accused 7 and 8 were acquitted as the evidence was not sufficient to find them guilty. Considering the gravity of the offence, custodial sentence of 10 years imprisonment and a fine of Rs.5,000/- each was imposed. In appeal, the High Court found that the offence committed was covered under Section 392 IPC, but considering the gravity of the offence upheld the sentence.

4. In support of the appeal, learned counsel for the appellants submitted that the evidence of PWs 2 and 3 does not show that any knife was used for robbery. On the contrary, evidence of victim clearly shows that she raised hue and cry when accused persons tried to snatch the stolen articles from her. It was also submitted that the appellants have suffered custody of more than nearly 8 years and the sentence deserves to be reduced to the period already undergone.

5. Learned counsel for the respondent-State on the other hand submitted that there is no minimum sentence prescribed and the maximum sentence is 10 years. It is submitted that the robbery was committed on the highway at about 9.00 p.m. That being so, the sentence can be upto 14 years. Considering the gravity of the offence and the large scale highway robberies, no leniency should be shown.

6. Section 392 IPC provides for punishment for robbery. The essential ingredients are as follows:

1.Accused committed theft;

2.Accused voluntarily caused or attempted to cause.

(i)death, hurt or wrongful restraint.

(ii)Fear of instant death, hurt or wrongful restraint.

3.He did either act for the end.

(i)to commit theft.

(ii)While committing theft.

(iii)In carrying away or in the attempt to carry away property obtained by theft.

7. It is to be noted that the Section 392 provides punishment for robbery. It is punishment for the offence defined in Section 390. Punishment is higher if it is committed on a highway and between sunset and sunrise. Section 390 which defines robbery reads as follows:

390. Robbery.- In all robbery there is either theft or extortion.

When theft is robbery.-Theft is robbery if, in order to the committing of the theft, or in committing the theft, or in carrying away or attempting to carry away property obtained by theft, the offender, for the end, voluntarily causes or attempts to cause to any person death or hurt wrongful restraint, or fear of instant death or of instant hurt, or of instant wrongful restraint.

When extortion is robbery.-Extortion is robbery if the offender at the time of committing the extortion, is in the presence of the person put in fear, and commits the extortion by putting that person in fear of instant death, of instant hurt, or of instant wrongful restraint to that person or to some other person, and, by so putting in fear, induces the person so put in fear then, and there to deliver up the thing extorted.

Explanation.-The offender is said to be present if he is sufficiently near put the other person in fear of instant death, of instant hurt, or of instant wrongful restraint.

8. The provision defines robbery which is theft or extortion when caused with violence of death, hurt or wrongful restraint. When there is no theft committed, then as a natural corollary there cannot be robbery. Robbery is only an aggravated form of offence of theft or extortion. Aggravation is in the use of violence of death, hurt or restraint. Violence must be in course of theft and not subsequently. It is not necessary that violence actually should be committed but even attempt to commit it is enough.

9. The authors of the Code observed as follows:

In one single class of cases, theft and extortion are in practice confounded together so inextricably, that no judge, however, sagacious, could discriminate between them. This class of cases, therefore, has, in all systems of jurisprudence ... been treated as a perfectly distinct class ... we have, therefore, made robbery a separate crime.

There can be no case of robbery which does not fall within the definition either of theft or of extortion; but in a practice it will perpetually be a matter of doubt whether a particular act of robbery was a theft or an extortion. A large proportion of robberies will be half theft, half extortion. A seizes Z, threatens to murder him, unless he delivers all his property, and begins to pull off Zs ornaments. Z in terror begs that A will take all he has, and spare his life, assists in taking off his ornaments, and delivers them to A. Here, such ornaments as A took without Zs consent are taken by theft. Those which Z delivered up from fear of death are acquired by extortion. It is by no means improbable that Zs right arm bracelet may have been obtained by theft, and left-arm bracelet by extortion; that the rupees in Zs girdle may have been obtained by theft, and those in his turban by extortion. Probably in nine-tenths of the robberies which are committed, something like this actually takes place, and it is probable that a few minutes later neither the robber nor the person robbed would be able to recollect in what proportions theft and extortion were mixed in the crime; nor is it at all necessary for the ends of justice that this should be ascertained. For though, in general, the consent of a sufferer is a circumstance which very materially modifies the character of the offence, and which ought, therefore, to be made known to the Courts, yet the consent which a person gives to the taking of this property by a ruffian who holds a pistol to his breast is a circumstance altogether immaterial.

10. The words for that end in Section 390 clearly mean that the hurt caused must be with the object of facilitating the committing of the theft or must be caused while the offender is committing theft or is carrying away or is attempting to carry away property obtained by the theft.

11. As the provision itself provides when the highway robbery is committed, deterrent punishment is called for.

12. In the instant case, the evidence of the victim, her husband, the factum of recovery of the vehicle used has clearly established the commission of offence by the appellants. The offence was committed on a public road. There is no dispute that it was not a highway. It is also not in dispute that the offence was committed during sunset and sunrise that is, at about 9.00 p.m.

13. In State of Karnataka v. Puttaraja JT 2003 (9) SC 603 ; 2004 (1) SCC 475, it was inter-alia observed as follows:

Imposition of sentence without considering its effect on the social order in many cases may be in reality a futile exercise. The social impact of the crime e.g. where it relates to offences against women like the case at hand, dacoity, kidnapping, misappropriation of public money, treason and other offences involving moral turpitude or moral delinquency which have great impact and serious repercussions on social order and public interest, cannot be lost sight of and per se require exemplary treatment. Any liberal attitude by imposing meager sentences or taking too sympathetic a view merely on account of lapse of time or considerations personal to the accused only in respect of such offences will be resultwise counterproductive in the long run and against societal interest which needs to be cared for and strengthened by the required string of deterrence inbuilt in the sentencing system.

14. Above being the position, there is no merit in this appeal which is accordingly dismissed.

**********', 3] , 
[ 'CROSS CITATION
1990 AIR (SC) 882
1990 (2) SCC 659
1990 (2) SCR 733
APPEARANCES
Mr. K.S. Bindra, Senior Advocate, Mr. R.K. Maheshwari and Mr. G.S. Gujananip, Advocates with him for the appellant.
Mr. Prem Sunder Jha, Advocate for the Respondent.
HEADNOTE
ELECTRICITY SUPPLY
Disconnection of - Service of notice on the consumer is a pre- requisite for disconnection.
HELD
... the service of notice is a prerequisite for disconnection, and the appellant can not be allowed to go back upon its words and refuse the consumer the benefit of notice as contemplated by the agreement. The learned counsel for the appellant urged that the Delhi Electric Supply Undertaking will seriously suffer if this view is upheld. We do not understand as to what is the difficulty in the way of the appellant to serve a notice on the consumer before discontinuing the supply. It has to be appreciated that the licensee Undertaking is performing a public duty and is governed by a special statute and the law also contemplates service of a notice before disconnection of supply of electricity. The courts below have made it clear that they have not examined the case on merits. The question whether, the allegations of theft are true or not has to be examined and decided in an appropriate proceeding, and the appellant will not, therefore, be prejudiced by the present judgment in its claim. Para 4

CASES REFERRED
1. Jagarnath Singh v. B.S. Ramaswamy 1966 (1) SCR 885 Distinguished.


SHARMA,J.

1. This appeal by special leave arises out of a suit filed by the respondent-company against the appellant, Municipal Corporation of Delhi, for a mandatory injunction to restore the supply of electricity discontinued during the pendency of the suit. Initially the suit was filed for a prohibitory injunction from disconnecting the electric connection. The plaint was amended following stoppage of the supply of energy.

2. According to the plaintiffs case, the suit had to be filed as the Delhi Electricity Supply Undertaking was threatening disconnection without disclosing any reason. Subsequently, some officers of the Undertaking made an inspection of the meters and alleged theft of electricity after tampering with the seals affixed on the meters. A First Information Report was lodged with the police.

3. Admittedly no notice was served by the Delhi Electricity Supply Undertaking on the plaintiff before severing the electric connection. The learned trial court, however, dismissed the suit and the plaintiff appealed. The First Additional District Judge, Delhi, who heard the appeal decreed the suit on the sole ground of non-service of notice as required under condition no. 36 in regard to supply of electricity by the appellant. The Delhi High Court dismissed the appellants second appeal at the admission stage by a reasoned judgment.

4. The learned counsel for the appellant has contended that in view of the conduct of the plaintiff in stealing electricity, the Court should in its discretion refuse to issue a direction for restoration of the electric supply. We are afraid, it is not possible to agree with the appellant for more reasons than one. The plaintiff is seriously denying the allegation of theft and it is not possible to assume the accusation as correct without a full-fledged trial on this issue. The case of Jagarnath Singh v. B.S. Ramaswamy, 1966 (1) SCR 885; relied upon on behalf of the appellant is clearly distinguishable inasmuch as the consumer in that case was convicted under the Indian Penal Code, and the conviction was being maintained in appeal. Besides, the service of notice is a prerequisite for disconnection, and the appellant can not be allowed to go back upon its words and refuse the consumer the benefit of notice as contemplated by the agreement. The learned counsel for the appellant urged that the Delhi Electric Supply Undertaking will seriously suffer if this view is upheld. We do not understand as to what is the difficulty in the way of the appellant to serve a notice on the consumer before discontinuing the supply. It has to be appreciated that the licensee Undertaking is performing a public duty and is governed by a special statute and the law also contemplates service of a notice before disconnection of supply of electricity. The courts below have made it clear that they have not examined the case on merits. The question whether, the allegations of theft are true or not has to be examined and decided in an appropriate proceeding, and the appellant will not, therefore, be prejudiced by the present judgment in its claim. In the result, the appeal is dismissed but, without costs.

**********', 3] , 
[ 'CONTRACTS/INSURANCE/CONSUMER DISPUTES
General insurance - Insurance of property - Burglary and /or housebreaking policy - Theft - If included in the risks - Respondent taking out a policy against burglary and /house breaking in respect of property which included the godowns used for storing food grains - Theft of food grain bags from the godown - Notice by the insured - Respondent lodging FIR and subsequently raising a claim from the insurance company - Company repudiating the claim on the ground that theft was not covered by the policy and there was no burglary - Respondent raising a consumer dispute - District Forum holding that burglary included theft and hence appellant insurer directed to settle the claim - State Commission and National Commission too upholding the decision of the District Forum - Validity. Whether burglary included theft - Whether insurer liable for the loss arising from theft. Allowing the appeal of the insurer held that the terms of the contract have to be strictly read and natural meaning should be given and no outside help should be sought unless the meaning is ambiguous. When the term burglary has been defined in the policy then the cause should fall within the definition. The element of force and violence is a condition precedent for burglary or housebreaking and therefore in terms of the definition the theft should have preceded with force or violence and it is for the claimant to establish that theft or burglary took place precedent with force or violence and if it is not then the insurance company will be well within their right to repudiate the claim. Decision of the District Forum as upheld by the State and National Commissions held not sustainable. However the claim amount having been paid by the insurer, on the point of equity said decision not disturbed.
HELD
The policy is a contract between the parties and both parties are bound by the terms of contract. As per the definition of the word burglary, followed with violence makes it clear that if any theft is committed it should necessarily precede with violence i.e. entry into the premises for committing theft should involve force or violence or threat to insurer or to his employees or to the members of his family. Therefore, the element of force and violence is a condition precedent for burglary and housebreaking. The term burglary as defined in the English Dictionary means an illegal entry into the building with an intent to commit crime such as theft. But in absence of violence or force the insurer cannot claim indemnification against the insurance company. The terms of the policy have to be construed as it is and we cannot add or subtract something. Howsoever liberally we may construe the policy but we cannot take liberalism to the extent of substituting the words which are not intended. It is true that in common parlance the term burglary would mean theft but it has to be preceded with force or violence. If the element of force and violence is not present then the insurer cannot claim compensation against theft from the insurance company. (Para 6)

It is settled law that the terms of the contract has to be strictly read and natural meaning be given to it. No outside aid should be sought unless the meaning is ambiguous. (Para 14)

From the above discussion, we are of the opinion that theft should have preceded with force or violence as per the terms of insurance policy. In order to substantiate a claim an insurer has to establish that theft or burglary took place preceding with force or violence and if it is not, then the insurance company will be well within their right to repudiate the claim of the insurer. (Para 15)

However, all the three forums have already awarded compensation and the amount has been paid to the respondent, therefore, on the point of equity we would not like to disturb the payment which has already been made. However, in view of legal position stated by us, the orders of the District Forum, State Commission and the National Commission cannot be upheld. (Para 16)

CASES REFERRED
1.National Insurance Company Ltd. v. Public Type College II (2001) CPJ 26(NC). (Para 5)

2.Oriental Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Samayanallur Primary Agricultural Co-op. Bank JT 1999 (9) SC 9 (Para 10)

3.Oriental Insurance Co.Ltd. v. Sony Cheriyan reported in JT 1999 (6) SC 149 (Para 12)

4.General Assurance Society Ltd. v. Chandumull Jain and Anr. (1966) 3 SCR 500 (Para 13)

Foreign Cases Referred
:

1.Halsburys Laws of England Fourth Edition (203 Reissue) Para 646. (Para 6)

2.George and the Goldsmiths and General Burglary Insurance Association, Limited 1899 1 Q.B.595 (Para 7)

3.Dino Services Ltd. v. Prudential Assurance Co. Ltd. 1989 1 All ER 422 (Para 7)

A.K. MATHUR, J.

1. Leave granted.

2. This appeal is directed against the order passed by the National Consumer Disputes Redressal Commission, New Delhi in Revision Petition No.2159 of 2002 confirming the order passed by the State Consumer Disputes Redressal Commission, New Delhi as well as the order passed by the Consumer Disputes Redressal Forum-II (District Forum II), New Delhi.

3. The brief facts which are necessary for the disposal of the appeal are as follows. The respondent took out a policy by the appellant company for a sum of Rs.7 lacs against burglary and/or house breaking policy with effect from September 22, 1991 to September 21,1992. Necessary provisions of the policy read as under:

 THE COMPANY HEREBY AGREES subject to the terms and conditions contained herein endorsed/ or otherwise expressed hereon that if,

(a)The property hereinafter described or any part thereof be LOST or DAMAGED by BURGLARY and/or HOUSE BREAKING or

(b)ANY DAMAGE be caused to the premises to be made good by the insured from BURGLARY and/or HOUSE BREAKING or any attempt thereat.

4. The term Burglary and/or Housebreaking has been defined in terms of the policy also which reads as under.

 Burglary and/or Housebreaking shall mean theft involving entry to or exit from the premises stated therein by forcible and violent means or following assault or violence or threat thereof to the insured or to his employees or to the members of his family

5. There are exceptions to it with which we are not concerned. During the currency of the policy, the respondent had his stock of food grains kept in godown no.48, Srinagar Colony, Bharat Nagar, New Delhi. Shri Ashok Kumar Bansal, one of the partners of the respondent visited his godown on July 2, 1992 and there he found out that 197 bags of gwar were stolen. An F.I.R. was lodged at Police Station Sarai Rohilla under Section 380 of the Indian Penal Code on July 24,1992. Therefore, the respondent raised a claim against the appellant company under the aforesaid policy for incurring the aforesaid loss by theft. The appellant company repudiated the claim of the respondent on the ground that theft is not covered by the insurance policy as no burglary took place in the godown by use of force or violence. Therefore, the respondent approached the Consumer Disputes Redressal Forum-II (District Forum) and made a claim for the loss of 197 bags of gwar. The appellant company contested the claim and took the stand that the claim is not covered as per the insurance policy. However, the District Forum overruled the objection and held that burglary includes theft and by its order dated June 1, 1998 directed the appellant company to release the claim of the respondent within two months with interest at the rate of 15% per annum and also awarded cost quantified at Rs.1,000/-. Aggrieved against the said order of the District Forum the appellant company preferred an appeal before the State Consumer Disputes Redressal Commission, New Delhi which was registered as Appeal No.881 of 1998. The State Commission also by its order dated June 19,2002 upheld the claim of the respondent taking the view that notwithstanding the definition of the term burglary and/or housebreaking as defined in the policy, burglary includes theft also. It also relied upon a decision of the National Consumer Disputes Redressal Commission in the case of National Insurance Company Ltd. v. Public Type College1 . The State Commission thus dismissed the appeal filed by the appellant company. Aggrieved by the said order of the State Commission a revision was filed before the National Consumer Disputes Redressal Commission. The National Commission by its impugned order affirmed the claim of the respondent and dismissed revision on May 20,2003. Hence, the present appeal by way of special leave.

6. The question before us is whether in terms of the policy, the repudiation of the claim of the respondent by the appellant company is justified or not. We have already reproduced the terms of the policy as also the definition of burglary and/or housebreaking as defined in the policy. The definition given in the policy is binding on both the parties. The policy is a contract between the parties and both parties are bound by the terms of contract. As per the definition of the word burglary, followed with violence makes it clear that if any theft is committed it should necessarily precede with violence i.e. entry into the premises for committing theft should involve force or violence or threat to insurer or to his employees or to the members of his family. Therefore, the element of force and violence is a condition precedent for burglary and housebreaking. The term burglary as defined in the English Dictionary means an illegal entry into the building with an intent to commit crime such as theft. But in absence of violence or force the insurer cannot claim indemnification against the insurance company. The terms of the policy have to be construed as it is and we cannot add or subtract something. Howsoever liberally we may construe the policy but we cannot take liberalism to the extent of substituting the words which are not intended. It is true that in common parlance the term burglary would mean theft but it has to be preceded with force or violence. If the element of force and violence is not present then the insurer cannot claim compensation against theft from the insurance company. This expression appearing in the insurance policy came up for interpretation before the English Court and the English Courts in no uncertain terms laid down that burglary or theft has to be preceded with force or violence in order to be indemnified by the insurance company. In this connection reference may be made to the statement of law as summarized in Halsburys Laws of England Fourth Edition (203 Reissue) Para 646. It reads as under:

646. Forcible and violent entry. The terms of a burglary insurance may exclude liability in certain circumstances unless there is forcible and violent entry into the premises. If so, the entry must be obtained by the use of both force and violence or the definition is not satisfied and the policy does not apply. An entry obtained by turning the handle of an outside door or by using a skeleton key, though sufficient to constitute a criminal offence, is not within the policy since the element of violence is absent. However, an entry obtained by picking the lock or forcing back the catch by means of an instrument involves the use of violence and is therefore covered. The policy may be so framed as to apply only to violent entry from the outside; or the violent entry into a room within the insured premises may be sufficient. In any case, the violence must be connected with the act of entry; if the entry is obtained without violence, the subsequent use of violence to effect the theft, as for instance where a show-case is broken open, does not bring the loss within the policy. 

7. In this connection, a reference may be made to an earlier decision (Queens Bench Division) in re George and the Goldsmiths and General Burglary Insurance Association, Limited1. In this case, a policy was taken out for loss or damage by burglary and housebreaking. A theft took place at premises No.78, Strand, in a shop where the front door was shut but not locked or bolted and access to the shop could be obtained by turning the handle of the door. In the early morning before business hours, during the temporary absence of a servant of the assured, some person opened the front door, entered the shop, and breaking open a locked-up compartment or show-case and certain properties were stolen. Reversing the judgment of the Divisional Court, the Court of Appeal held that the loss which has occurred as above mentioned was not covered by the policy. Two propositions were advanced before the Court The first that an entry effected by the exercise of any force, however slight, was sufficient to constitute an entry within the meaning of policy. The contention was advanced that pushing a door open, if it were ajar, or turning the handle of a door, if the door were shut and could be opened in that way, was sufficient force to satisfy the language of the policy. The second proposition was that if that was so, and therefore it could not be said that the original entry in the case was effected by force within the meaning of the policy, yet nevertheless, the language of the policy was satisfied by the fact that the thief, after having entered the shop without force, proceeded to prise off an iron plate to which a locked padlock was attached securing a show-case in which valuables were placed. Their Lordships considered both the propositions and after reproducing the definition, observed that as per the plain reading of the expression used in terms of the policy violence is a condition precedent. The Court of Appeal reversed the decision of Queens Bench. This view was reiterated subsequently in the case of Dino Services Ltd. v. Prudential Assurance Co. Ltd.1. In this case also the proposition of law as enunciated in the case of George and Goldsmith and General Burglary Insurance Association Ltd. was reaffirmed. It was held as follows:

 In the context of a policy of insurance against theft from premises by  forcible and violent means of entry, the word violent was to be construed according to its ordinary meaning and meant entry by the use of any force which was accentuated or accompanied by a physical act which could properly be described as violent in nature and character. In the context of such a policy the word violent accordingly referred to the physical character of the means of entry and not merely to its unlawful character. It followed that the thieves, by gaining entry to the premises simply by using the proper keys to unlock the doors of the premises, had not entered the premises by violent means. Accordingly, the plaintiffs loss was not covered by the policy. The appeal would therefore be allowed.

8. Similarly, view has been expressed by American Courts also in American Jurisprudence 2nd (Vol. 44) 1401 which is as follows:

1401 Provisions as to visible marks or evidence, or use of force or violence

It is not uncommon for insurance companies to include in their theft or burglary policies provisions restricting their liability to cases where there were some visible marks or visible evidence of the use of force or violence. It is generally competent for an insurer to insert such a clause in the contract of insurance, and since such a provision is unambiguous it does not justify the applicability of the general principle that the insurance policy will be construed most favourable to the insured. However, the courts will not read such a requirement into a policy and do not require compliance with such clauses unless the unmistakable language of the policy so requires.

Such a policy requirement has been considered either as a limitation on the liability of the insurer or as a rule characterizing the evidence upon which liability must be predicated, but in either event, the validity of the requirement has been recognized and rarely questioned, although in at least one instance such a requirement has been held in contravention of public policy under the particular terms of the policy involved and the particular circumstances.

Just as policies insuring against burglary of an insureds premises commonly require visible marks upon the insureds premises or upon the exterior of the insureds premises, so also do safe-burglary policies commonly require visible marks either upon the insureds safe, or upon the exterior of the insureds safe, or upon the exterior of the doors of the insureds safe, and in some instances the requirement of visible marks or visible evidence has been imposed in policies pertaining to theft of property from an insureds automobile.

The determination of what constitutes visible marks or visible evidence within the meaning of such a provision, and of where such marks or evidence must be located in order to satisfy the policy requirement, is to a great extent depend upon the particular facts involved in relation to the specific requirements imposed by the policy. Where, for example, a burglary or theft policy requires that there must be visible marks of force or violence  at the place of entry into the premises, this requirement has been held complied with if the visible marks are only on one of the outer doors to the insureds premises, which the burglars or thieves must have used to accomplish their deed. However, under such a requirement, if the only visible marks are those on inside doors which are not at the entrance to the premises, recovery will be denied. Similarly, a policy providing against loss by burglary by felonious entry into a safe by actual force evidenced by visible marks made upon the exterior of all the doors does not cover loss sustained by felonious entry into the safe by a manipulation of the lock on the outer door with no visible marks made thereon, although the inner door of the safe did contain such marks, although there is contrary authority. The opening of a safe by manipulation of the combination within the period covered by a policy of burglary insurance which was made possible by force applied to the safe before such period, leaving visible marks upon the safe, was not within the terms of the policy insuring against loss through felonious entry into the safe by actual force and violence, leaving visible marks upon the safe and occurring within the policy period, with an exemption from liability from loss effected by opening the safe by manipulation of the lock.

9. It is possible that an insurer may sustain loss in technical terms of the criminal law, but no relief can be given to him unless his case is covered by the terms of the policy. It is not open to interpret the expression appearing in policy in terms of common law; but it has to give meaning to the expression as defined in the policy. The act that causes the loss must fall within the definition in the policy and it cannot take the cover and contents of the definition as laid down in the criminal law. Therefore, when the definition of the word burglary has been defined in the policy then the cause should fall within that definition. Once a party has agreed to a particular definition, he is bound by it and the definition of criminal law will be of no avail. In this connection, the decision of the National Consumer Disputes Redressal Commission in the case of National Insurance Company Ltd. v. Public Type College which has taken the colour and content of the definition given in the criminal law does not lay down the correct proposition of law. It is settled law that terms of the policy shall govern the contract between the parties, they have to abide by the definition given therein and all those expressions appearing in the policy should be interpreted with reference to the terms of policy and not with reference to the definition given in other laws. It is a matter of contract and in terms of the contract the relation of the parties shall abide and it is presumed that when the parties have entered into a contract of insurance with their eyes wide open, they cannot rely on definition given in other enactment. Thus, the decision of the National Consumer Disputes Redressal Commission in the case of National Insurance Company Ltd. v. Public Type College is not a good law and all the Tribunals i.e. National Consumer Disputes Redressal Commission, State Commission & District Forum having applied the ratio of that case; the impugned order cannot be sustained.
10. Reference in this connection may be made to the decision of this Court in the case of Oriental Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Samayanallur Primary Agricultural Co-op. Bank1 . In this case question came for interpretation of the similar policy, i.e., policy against burglary. The bank had two insurance policies with the Oriental Insurance Company Ltd. out of which one was cash insurance policy for Rs. 1 lac and the second was a burglary insurance policy for Rs. 25 lacs. The relevant terms of the policy were

3(a)- Are all valuables secured in Burglary resistance safes when Premises are locked Yes (b) If so, state name or maker of safe and cost
Tansi

11. The answer to the question 3(a) was in positive. The question arose that according to the complaint burglary took place from the cashiers cash box. The surveyors report was that the stolen jewels had not been kept in safe locker and the theft was not covered under burglary insurance policy. Though the District Forum directed the insurance company to pay a sum of Rs. 43,729.25 however, the State Commission observed that what is insured is not the contents of the cash box but the jewels kept in the safe which means a safety locker made by Tansi as agreed to in the proposal form. And it was observed that jewels kept in the cashiers cash box which were not covered by the policy. The State forum overruled the order passed by the District Forum. The order passed by the State Commission in revision was reversed by the National Commission. The matter came before this Court in special leave petition by insurance company. Their Lordships observed that there was no necessity of referring to the dictionaries for understanding the meaning of the word safe which the parties in the instant case are proved to have understood while submitting the proposal and accepting the insurance policy. The cashiers box could not be equated with the safe within the meaning of the insurance policy. The alleged burglary and the removal of the jewellery from cash box, the cash box was not covered by the insurance policy between the parties. The insurance policy has to be construed having reference only to the stipulations contained in it and no artificial far-fetched meaning could be given to the words appearing in it. And, therefore, they set aside the order of the National Commission.

12. Similarly, in the case of Oriental Insurance Co.Ltd. v. Sony Cheriyan2 an insurance was taken out under the Motor Vehicles Act, 1988 in which their Lordships observed :

The insurance policy between the insurer and the insured represents a contract between the parties. Since the insurer undertakes to compensate the loss suffered by the insured on account of risks covered by the insurance policy, the terms of the agreement have to be strictly construed to determine the extent of liability of the insurer. The insured cannot claim anything more than what is covered by the insurance policy.

13. Similarly in the case of General Assurance Society Ltd. v. Chandumull Jain and Anr.1 the Constitution Bench has observed that the policy document being a contract and it has to be read strictly. It was observed,

 In interpreting documents relating to a contract of insurance, the duty of the court is to interpret the words in which the contract is expressed by the parties, because it is not for the court to make a new contract, however reasonable, if the parties have not made it themselves. Looking at the proposal, the letter of acceptance and the cover notes, it is clear that a contract of insurance under the standard policy for fire and extended to cover flood, cyclone etc. had come into being.

14. Therefore, it is settled law that the terms of the contract has to be strictly read and natural meaning be given to it. No outside aid should be sought unless the meaning is ambiguous.

15. From the above discussion, we are of the opinion that theft should have preceded with force or violence as per the terms of insurance policy. In order to substantiate a claim an insurer has to establish that theft or burglary took place preceding with force or violence and if it is not, then the insurance company will be well within their right to repudiate the claim of the insurer.
16. However, all the three forums have already awarded compensation and the amount has been paid to the respondent, therefore, on the point of equity we would not like to disturb the payment which has already been made. However, in view of legal position stated by us, the orders of the District Forum, State Commission and the National Commission cannot be upheld.

17. But before parting with the case we would like to observe that the terms of the policy as laid down by the insurance company should be suitably amended by the insurance company so as to make it more viable and facilitate the claimants to make their claim. The definition is so stringent in the present case that it gives rise to difficult situation for the common man to understand that in order to maintain their claim they will have to necessarily show evidence of violence or force. The definition of the word burglary should be given meaning which is closer to the realities of life. The common man understands that he has taken out the policy against theft. He hardly understands whether it should precede violence or force. Therefore, a policy should be a meaningful policy so that a common man can understand what is the meaning of burglary in common parlance. Though we have interpreted the present policy strictly in terms of the policy but we hope that the insurance companies will amend their policies so as to make them more meaningful to the public at large. It should have the meaning which a common man can easily understand rather than become more technical so as to defeat the cause of the public at large.

18. In the result, we allow this appeal, set aside the order passed by the National Consumer Disputes Redressal Commission, New Delhi confirming the order of the State Commission & District Forum. But the amount of compensation which has already been paid to the respondent shall not be recovered in the facts and circumstances of the present case. No order as to costs.

**********', 3] , 
[ 'HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAWS
Penal Code, 1860
Sections 457, 380/34 - Theft - Recovery - Gold chain worn by PW2 lost on the night of 12-11-1995, while she was sleeping - No complaint filed as PWs 1 and 2 were not aware - FIR filed after sixteen days when police caught appellant roaming in a suspicious manner and he disclosed about the theft - Discovery statement made to PW7, circle inspector, regarding sale of chain to PW8 - PW 8 who allegedly purchased the gold chain did not support prosecutions case - Police official, PW3 corroborated PW7s version - Conviction on the basis of alleged recovery at his instance - Out of three, two accused acquitted. Held it is difficult to believe that PW2 was not aware about the theft of chain she was wearing. Only evidence against appellant is the alleged recovery of gold chain and Trial Court erred in convicting him on that basis alone. PW8 turned hostile. It is not safe to convict appellant on the evidence of police officials. Benefit of doubt given.
HELD
FIR was registered after about sixteen days from the date of alleged theft. PWs-1 and 2 did not even realize that the chain was stolen. It is only when the accused were brought to their house after about sixteen days that they realized that the chain was stolen and FIR was lodged. The chain in question was being worn by PW2. It is stated to have been stolen while she was sleeping. It is inconceivable that she would not realize that she had lost her chain. The incident in our view is not unfolded truthfully. A1 and A3 have been rightly acquitted because nothing links them to the offence. But, similar is the case with the appellant. The only evidence against him is the alleged recovery of gold chain at his instance. That cannot connect the appellant to the theft. The Trial Court has stated that since chain was recovered at the instance of the appellant, the only inference which can be drawn is that he committed the theft. Drawing such inference in the facts of this case would be totally unjust. Pertinently, PW8 from whose shop the chain is said to have been recovered has turned hostile. Thus, the prosecution is relying only on police witnesses. In this case, it is unsafe to do so. Grave doubt is, therefore, created as to whether the appellant could be involved in the offence of theft. We are, therefore, of the view that benefit of doubt must be given to the appellant and he must be acquitted. (Para 9)


(Smt.) RANJANA PRAKASH DESAI, J.

1. Leave granted.

2. The appellant (A2-Azeez) along with two others i.e. A1-Khalid and A3-Babu was tried by the Judicial Magistrate, First Class-I, Aluva for offences punishable under Sections 457 and 380 read with Section 34 of the Indian Penal Code (for short, the IPC). By order dated 15/12/2000, learned Magistrate convicted the appellant under Section 457 of the IPC and sentenced him to undergo rigorous imprisonment for one year. The appellant was further convicted for offence under Section 380 of the IPC and sentenced to undergo rigorous imprisonment for two years. The substantive sentences were ordered to run concurrently. A1-Khalid and A3-Babu were acquitted.

3. The appellant challenged the said order before the Additional Sessions Judge, Ernakulam. Learned Sessions Judge by his order dated 28/11/2002 confirmed the conviction and sentence and dismissed the appeal. Being aggrieved by the said conviction and sentence, the appellant filed a criminal revision petition in the Kerala High Court. By the impugned judgment, the High Court dismissed the revision petition. Hence, this appeal by special leave is filed against the said judgment.

4. According to the prosecution, the appellant along with A1-Khalid and A3-Babu with an intention of committing theft entered the house of PW1-Radha at Karumalloor Village on 12/11/1995 at 4.00 a.m. through the door which was kept open. They entered the bedroom where PW2- Renuka Devi was sleeping and committed theft of a gold chain weighing 14 grams worth Rs.7,500/- which PW2 was wearing while she was sleeping. A1 and A3 assisted the appellant in committing the offence. They gave the gold chain to the appellant for selling. The appellant sold the gold chain and the accused divided the sale proceeds and thereby committed the offence.

5. This case presents rather unusual facts. PW7, the Circle Inspector, stated that he arrested the accused on 28/11/1995 at 1 a.m. near the parking area, Municipal Buildings, Aluva, while they were moving in suspicious circumstances. On questioning them, it was revealed that they had committed the offence involved in this case, hence they proceeded to the house of PW1 at Aduvathuruthu and recorded her F.I.R.(Ext.P1).

6. PW1 in her evidence stated that her daughter PW2 was sleeping in her room on the night of 12/11/1995. PW2 was wearing Thara fashion gold chain. The gold chain was stolen but no complaint was lodged at the police station because PW2 did not realize that her gold chain was stolen. It is only on 28/11/1995 when the police came to their house along with the accused and the gold chain was shown to her that she realized that the gold chain was stolen. She identified the gold chain MO1. FIR (Ext.P1) was then lodged. PW2, the daughter, stated that on 12/11/1995 at about 11 p.m. she went to sleep. On the next day morning the gold chain was not seen. On 28/11/1995 when the police came to her house with the accused and showed her the chain, she realized that her chain was stolen. She identified the chain.

7. Evidence of PWs-1 and 2 raise several question marks. If gold chain worn by PW2 was removed by the accused at night, it is unbelievable that she would not realize it in the morning. Even PW1, the mother, did not realize that the chain worn by PW2 was not around her neck. Assuming this to be true, PWs-1 and 2 would at least realize the loss on the next day or a day thereafter. They did not realize that the chain was stolen till 28/11/1995, when the police came to their house with the accused and showed them the chain. At that time they realized that chain was stolen. It is on 28/11/1995 that PW1 lodged her complaint. Thus, the complaint came to be lodged about sixteen days after the incident that too after the police came to PW1s house with the chain. The sequence of events is not convincing and does not stand to reason.

8. According to the prosecution the appellant made a discovery statement to PW7-the Circle Inspector and pursuant to that statement PW7 went to the shop of PW8-Pradeep along with the appellant. The appellant is stated to have pointed out to PW8 as the man to whom he had sold the chain. However, PW8 has not supported the prosecution case. The courts below have while convicting the appellant placed reliance on the evidence of PW7-the Circle Inspector and PW3-the Head Constable who sought to corroborate the version of PW7 regarding recovery of chain at the instance of the appellant from the shop of PW8. We find it difficult to do so. Trial Court has observed that offence under Section 457 of the IPC is not made out because according to PW1 the thieves entered the door which was kept open. The Trial Court, therefore, acquitted the appellant of the offence punishable under Section 457 of the IPC. The Trial Court also acquitted A1 and A3 of the offence punishable under Section 457 read with Section 34 of the IPC. The Trial Court, however, observed that from the evidence of PWs-1 and 2 it is seen that theft had taken in the room in which PW2 was sleeping; the thief entered the house and committed theft of gold chain which PW2 was wearing and, therefore, this act will be covered by Section 451 of the IPC i.e. house-trespass in order to commit offence punishable with imprisonment. The Trial Court further held that since the recovery of gold chain was effected on the basis of statement given by the appellant the only inference that can be drawn is that he committed the theft of gold chain and therefore the case is covered by Section 380 of the IPC i.e. theft in a dwelling house. After observing that there is nothing in the evidence of PWs-1 to 8 to connect A1 and A3 with the crime the Trial Court acquitted them of all the offences. This view is affirmed by the Sessions Court and the High Court.

9. We find it difficult to uphold the above view so far as it relates to the appellant. As we have already noted that FIR was registered after about sixteen days from the date of alleged theft. PWs-1 and 2 did not even realize that the chain was stolen. It is only when the accused were brought to their house after about sixteen days that they realized that the chain was stolen and FIR was lodged. The chain in question was being worn by PW2. It is stated to have been stolen while she was sleeping. It is inconceivable that she would not realize that she had lost her chain. The incident in our view is not unfolded truthfully. A1 and A3 have been rightly acquitted because nothing links them to the offence. But, similar is the case with the appellant. The only evidence against him is the alleged recovery of gold chain at his instance. That cannot connect the appellant to the theft. The Trial Court has stated that since chain was recovered at the instance of the appellant, the only inference which can be drawn is that he committed the theft. Drawing such inference in the facts of this case would be totally unjust. Pertinently, PW8 from whose shop the chain is said to have been recovered has turned hostile. Thus, the prosecution is relying only on police witnesses. In this case, it is unsafe to do so. Grave doubt is, therefore, created as to whether the appellant could be involved in the offence of theft. We are, therefore, of the view that benefit of doubt must be given to the appellant and he must be acquitted.

10. We, therefore, allow the appeal. The impugned judgment and order is quashed and set aside. The appellant is acquitted of the offences under Sections 380 and 451 of the IPC. The appellant is in jail. He is directed to be released forthwith, unless he is required in any other case.

**********', 3] , 
[ 'HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAW
Indian Penal Code, 1860
Section 395 - Dacoity - Ingredients - No evidence of any theft or attempt to commit theft - Accused exploding a bomb and also firing gun - Only evidence of theft in realm of hearsay. Held that offence under section 395 IPC is not made out. (Paras 5, 6)

Criminal Procedure Code, 1973
Section 211(ii) with Indian Penal Code, 1860 - Section 457 - Scope - Accused charged with offence under section 395/311 IPC - Offence not proved - If can be conï¿½victed under section 457 - Armed accused shown to have forcibly entered the house. Held that they can be convicted under section 457 IPC even if they were not charged with said offence. (Paras 7, 8)


ORDER


1. Out of five persons challaned before the sessions court for the offence under section 395 IPC, four were convicted by the trial court and sentenced each of them to rigorous imprisonment for ten years. The four convicted persons filed appeals before the High Court. The conviction was confirmed in respect of two of them (who are appellants before us) while acquitting A4 - Tara Kant Jha and A5 - Badri Jha. However, the High Court reduced the sentence to rigorous imprisonment for seven years.

2. The occurrence happened during the night of 10th January, 1981 (the next morning was 11th). The prosecution case is that all the five accused entered into the courtyard of the house of PW5 Ram Prasad. The male persons of the house were then sleeping in the courtyard. After the assailants entered the courtyard, they trussed up three persons belonging to that house (PW1 Bimal, PW2 Ramchander and PW3 Mahender). They were threatened not to make any noise lest they would be killed. Thereafter, the assailants pushed the door of the house open and committed mischief there including theft of some silver ornaments. When PW4 (Shatrughan Prasad Yadav) tried to escape, one of the assailants fired a gun shot which hit him on the hand. While decamping, they exploded a bomb. Hearing the commotion, the neighbouring people rushed to the scene and haystacks were set fire to by them. In the light of the flames, the faces of the assailants were identified by the villagï¿½ers also.

3. It is unnecessary for us in this appeal to deal with the evidence in detail. We conclude that the case alleged against the convicted persons stand proved to the following extent:-

They entered into the house and tied up the three inmates of the house. They exploded something like a bomb - though none was injured thereby. They entered into the house forcibly opening the door. The story that one of them fired a gun at PW5 is not subï¿½stantiated. When the villagers rushed in, all the assailants left the place.

4. The prosecution attempted to make out that an offence of dacoity was committed. But they can succeed only if there was either theft or at least attempt to commit theft. There is no evidence that there was any act of theft or even attempt to commit theft. Of course, PW5 said that two lady inmates of the house reported to him later that their silver necklaces were snatched away by the dacoits. Unfortunately, those ladies were not examined and hence, the version of PW5 remained only in the realm of hearsay evidence. PW1 made an attempt to say that there was looting or that silver ornaments were stolen by the assailï¿½ants. This was not what he saw and perhaps this too would have been only reported to him. In cross-examination, he definitely said that he did not see any act of theft. No such ornament was recovered by the police during investigation.

5. Thus, there is total lack of evidence to show that the intrudï¿½ers committed theft or made any attempt to commit theft. Theft or extortion or attempt to commit any one of the two is an ineviï¿½table ingredient for robbery. In such a situation, it is extremely difficult for the prosecution to sustain the conviction for the offence under section 395 of the IPC. We, therefore, set aside the conviction and sentence passed on the appellants for the aforesaid offence.

6. The above is not enough to dispose of this appeal nor to exonerate the appellants completely from the charge. The acts proved by the prosecution would fall within the ambit of section 457 of the IPC. Learned counsel for the appellants made a bid to contend that the said count was not included in the charge and hence, the appellants are not liable to be convicted thereunder. Section 221(ii) enables the court to convict the appellants of the offence which they have shown to have committed, although they were not charged with it. If any such alteration is to be made, the question is whether any prejudice would be caused to the appellants. We asked learned counsel for the appellants whether they want another opportunity to cross-examine the proseï¿½cution witnesses focusing on the offence under section 457 IPC. Learned counsel fairly submitted that it is not necessary.

7. We, therefore, convict the appellants for the offence under section 457 read with section 34 of the IPC. We are told that the first appellant has undergone RI for more than three years and the second appellant has undergone RI for more than four years. We feel that the sentence for the aforesaid offence can be limitï¿½ed to imprisonment for the period already undergone by the apï¿½pellants, We do so.

8. The appeal is disposed of accordingly.

9. We direct the jail authorities to release the appellants from jail forthwith unless they are required in any other case.

**********', 3] , 
[ 'HEADNOTE
GENERAL INSURANCE
General insurance - Insurance against theft - Distinction between theft and criminal breach of trust - Respondent, a jewellery shop owner taking out a Jeweller Block Policy from the appellant - Customer visiting the shop taking away some ornament - Res-pondent lodging a claim with the insurer besides registering criminal complaint - Insurer rejecting the claim holding that entrustment of jewellery to customer did not constitute theft covered by the policy - State Consumer Protection Council also finding the claim of respondent to be unsustainable - High Court on appeal holding that it was not a case of entrustment but the act of removal of the goods by the customer constituted theft and therefore the insurer was liable - Whether High Court correct in holding so. Upholding the decision of the High Court held the customer in the instant case being an unknown person as seen from the FIR, there was no occasion for the respondent to entrust the jewellery to him and it being a case of theft, the insurer was clearly liable to make good the loss in terms of the policy taken by the respondent.
HELD
It is not in dispute that an insurance cover against theft was granted by the appellant. The insurance policy, thus, covered the risk of theft also. An insurer determines the extent of its risk. It floats the policy knowing fully well the risk it seeks to cover. Having regard to the determination of the risk only he fixes the quantum of premium. The insured while entering into a contract of insurance must precisely know the extent of his cover so that he may take out additional insurance if it is so required. (Para 7)

Clause 8 of the contract of insurance would be attracted only where the offences specified therein are committed by any of the persons mentioned therein. For defeating the claim of the respondent, it was, thus, obligatory on the part of the appellant to establish that the conditions prescribed therein were satisfied. (Para 9)

The word entrust would imply giving responsibility to a person upon whom the owner has confidence. It envisages establishment of a relationship. When a customer enters into a jewellery shop, as of necessity, the owner or his agent must allow him to inspect the merchandise, the customer intends to purchase. For the said purpose possession in the legal sense is not handed over. The owner or his agent does not loose complete control thereover. (Para 13)

For the purpose of arriving at a conclusion as to whether the exclusion clause is attracted or not, loss or damage must be occasioned, inter alia, by a customer in respect of the property entrusted to him. The word customer contained in clause 8 (c) of the Insurance Policy must be read ejusdem generis. A customer con-templated thereunder must have to be one who would be a man of trust. If a customer is not a man of trust or the property had not been entrusted to him, the exclusion clause would not apply. The customer who committed theft of jewellery was an unknown person. It was so categorically stated in the First Information Report. There was, thus, no occasion for the respondent to entrust the jewellery to him. (Para 14)

We, therefore, are clearly of the opinion that the view taken by the High Court was correct. The High Courts judgment is upheld. The appeal is dismissed. We, in the facts and circumstances of this case, also direct the appellant to pay and bear the cost of the respondent throughout. Counsels fee in this appeal is assessed at Rs.50,000/-. (Para 24)

CASES REFERRED
1.M/s Peacock Plywood Pvt. Ltd. v. The Oriental Insurance Co. Ltd. JT 2007 (1) SC 191 (Para 8)

2.United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Kiran Combers & Spinners (2007) 1 SCC 368 (Para 8)

3.United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Pushpalaya Printers JT 2004 (4) SC 352 (Para 8)

4.Ram Narayan Popli etc. v. Central Bureau of Investigation etc. JT 2003 (1) SC 184 (Para 23)

5.Superintendent and Re-membrancer of Legal Affairs, W.B. v. S.K. Roy AIR 1974 SC 794 (Para 22)

6.The State of Gujarat v. Jaswant Lal Natha Lal (1968) 2 SCR 408 (Para 21)

S.B. SINHA , J.

1. Appellant insurer is before us questioning the correctness or otherwise of a judgment and order dated 10.09.1999 passed by a Division Bench of the High Court of Jammu & Kashmir in CIMA 21 of 1998 allowing the appeal preferred by the respondent herein from a judgment and order dated 16.12.1997 passed by the Jammu & Kashmir Consumers Protection Com-mission.

2. Respondent herein carries on business in jewellery It obtained a policy known as Jeweller Block Policy. A theft of 140 gms of jewellery worth of Rs.63,000/- occurred in his business premises. A First Information Report was lodged therefor. Respondent also lodged a claim with the appellant herein. The same having not been settled for a long time, an application was filed before the State Consumers Protection Commission constituted under the J & K Consumers Protection Act, 1987.

3. The question raised before the Commission was as to whether the loss in question was covered by the insurance policy. Appellant contended that the claim of the respondent is covered by an exclusion clause contained in the policy, which reads as under :

8. Loss or damage occasioned by theft or dishonesty or any attempt there at committed by or where such loss or damage has been expedited or in any way sustained or brought about by :

(a) any of the insureds family members;

(b) any servant or traveller or messenger in the exclusive employment of the insured;

(c) any customer or broker or their customer or angadias or cutters or goldsmiths in respect of the property hereby insured entrusted to them by the insured his or their servants or agents.

4. The Commission by reason of its order dated 16.12.1997, inter alia, found the said claim to be not sustainable on the ground that the loss was not covered by the said policy, stating :

...It appears to us that while preparing the insurance agreement the insurer was aware of the fact that this could be the easiest way for any Jeweller to raise claims against the insurance companies and that is why this clause has been deliberately introduced and theft by customer if any has been put in exclusive clause of the policy...

5. The High Court, as indicated hereinbefore, by reason of its judgment
and order dated 10.09.1999, did not agree therewith. It was held :

What is meant by the term entrustment (and) does handing over of jewellery to a customer amounts to entrustment ? The dictionary meaning of the word entrust would be to give to another for care, protection or to commit something trustfully or plays trust upon a person. If a customer enters the premises of a shopkeeper and examines some movable property and takes away the same, then there hardly arises any occasion for entrustment to such a customer. In the present case a customer entered the business premises and removed 140 gms. of Jewellery. There was no entrustment on the part of the owner to the customer. The act of removal of the goods by the customer is nothing but a plain theft. This is a dishonest taking and removing of the property by the customer with the intent of permanently depriving the owner.

6. A short question which, thus, arises for our consideration is as to whether clause 8 of the policy is applicable to the facts and circumstances of the present case.

7. It is not in dispute that an insurance cover against theft was granted by the appellant. The insurance policy, thus, covered the risk of theft also. An insurer determines the extent of its risk. It floats the policy knowing fully well the risk it seeks to cover. Having regard to the determination of the risk only he fixes the quantum of premium. The insured while entering into a contract of insurance must precisely know the extent of his cover so that he may take out additional insurance if it is so required.

8. However, there may be an express clause excluding the applicability of insurance cover. Wherever such exclusionary clause is contained in a policy, it would be for the insurer to show that the case falls within the purview thereof. In a case of ambiguity, it is trite, the contract of insurance shall be construed in favour of the insured. See United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Pushpalaya Printers1, M/s Peacock Plywood Pvt. Ltd. v. The Oriental Insurance Co. Ltd.2 and United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Kiran Combers & Spinners3.

9. Clause 8 of the contract of insurance would be attracted only where the offences specified therein are committed by any of the persons mentioned therein. For defeating the claim of the respondent, it was, thus, obligatory on the part of the appellant to establish that the conditions prescribed therein were satisfied.

10. Keeping in view the aforementioned legal aspect of the matter, we may advert to the meaning of the word entrust. Its ordinary meaning, would mean to charge or invest with a trust; to commit to another with a certain confidence regarding his care See Advanced Law Lexicon by P. Ramanatha Aiyar 3rd Edn.-Book 2 page1613.

11. It requires no elaboration that offences of breach of trust and theft contain different ingredients. Whereas theft has been defined in Section 378 of the Indian Penal Code; breach of trust has been defined in Section 405 thereof, which reads as under :

378. Theft.- Whoever, intending to take dishonestly any moveable property out of the possession of any person without that persons consent, moves that property in order to such taking, is said to commit theft.

12. Illustration (d) appended thereto reads as under :

(d) A, being Zs servant, and entrusted by Z with the care of Zs plate, dishonestly runs away with the plate, without Zs consent. A has committed theft.

405. Criminal breach of trust.-Whoever, being in any manner entrusted with property, or with any dominion over property, dishonestly misappropriates or converts to his own use that property, or dishonestly uses or disposes
of that property in violation of any direction of law prescribing the mode in which such trust is to be discharged, or of any legal contract, express or implied, which he has made touching the discharge of such trust, or willfully suffers any other person so to do, commits criminal breach of trust

13. The word entrust would imply giving responsibility to a person upon whom the owner has confidence. It envisages establishment of a relationship. When a customer enters into a jewellery shop, as of necessity, the owner or his agent must allow him to inspect the merchandise, the
customer intends to purchase. For the said purpose possession in the legal sense is not handed over. The owner or his agent does not loose complete control thereover.

14. For the purpose of arriving at a conclusion as to whether the exclusion clause is attracted or not, loss or damage must be occasioned, inter alia, by a customer in respect of the property entrusted to him. The word customer contained in clause 8 (c) of the Insurance Policy must be read ejusdem generis. A customer contemplated thereunder must have to be one who would be a man of trust. If a customer is not a man of trust or the property had not been entrusted to him, the exclusion clause would not apply. The customer who committed theft of jewellery was an unknown person. It was so categorically stated in the First Information Report. There was, thus, no occasion for the respondent to entrust the jewellery to him.

15. Mr. Vishnu Mehra, the learned counsel appearing for the appellant has relied upon the meaning of the word entrust as contained in Blacks Law Dictionary, 8th Edn. and Websters Universal Dictionary.

16. In Blacks Law Dictionary, the word entrust has been defined as under :

To give (a person) the responsibility for something after establishing a confidential relationship.

17. In Websters Universal Dictionary meaning of the word entrust reads as under :

To confer as a responsibility, duty etc. to place, something in anothers care.

18. Apart from the fact that the said meaning of the term entrustment goes against the submission of Mr. Mehra, we may notice that in Blacks Law Dictionary the word entrusting in commercial law has been described as The transfer of possession of goods to a merchant who deals in goods of that type and who may in turn transfer the goods and all rights to them to a purchaser in the ordinary course of business. Transfer of possession of goods, therefore, is a sine qua non for entrustment. The person must be handed over the possession of the property. Illustration (d) appended to Section 378 IPC envisages a situation of this nature. It by no stretch of imagination would have contemplated a situation where an unknown customer would have committed theft.

19. The word entrustment, moreover, must be read in the context in which it has been used.

20. In Colinvauxs Law of Insurance, 7th Edn., by Robert Merkin at page 50, it is stated :

Words in context

The above generality is not applicable when it is clear from the context that the words are not used in a colloquial popular sense. Thus the word flood in the phrase strom, tempest or floor does not cover a case where a house-holders bathroom is affected by upward seepage of water to a depth of three inches, as the context of the word requires an event violent, sudden or abnormal. Similarly, heavy rain is not in itself likely to constitute a storm. It has also been held that the phrase sum actually paid in a reinsurance agreement referred to a sum which the reinsured is merely liable to pay, as the agreement read as a whole was against liability rather than actual payment.

21. In The State of Gujarat v. Jaswant Lal Natha Lal1, this Court held :

...The expression entrustment carries with it the implication that the person handing over any property or on whose behalf that property is handed over to another, continues to be its owner. Further the person handing over the property must have confidence in the person
taking the property so as to create a fiduciary relationship between them. A mere transaction of sale cannot amount to an entrustment...

22. In Superintendent and Re-membrancer of Legal Affairs, W.B. v. S.K. Roy1, this Court held :

12. To constitute an offence under Section 409 IPC, it is not required that misappropriation must necessarily take place after the creation of a legally correct entrustment or dominion over property. The entrustment may arise in
any manner whatsoever. That manner may or may not involve fraudulent conduct of the accused. Section 409 IPC, covers dishonest misappropriation in both types of cases; that is to say, those where the receipt of property is itself fraudulent or improper and those where the public servant misappropriates what may have been quite properly and innocently received. All that is required is what may be described as entrustment or acquisition of dominion over property in the capacity of a public, servant who, as a result of it, becomes charged with a duty to act in a particular way, or, atleast honestly.

23. Yet again in Ram Narayan Popli etc. v. Central Bureau of Investigation etc.2, it was held :

361. To constitute an offence of criminal breach of trust, there must be an entrustment, there must be misappropriation or conversion to ones own use, or use in violation of a legal direction or of any legal contract; and the misappropriation or conversion or disposal must be with a dishonest intention. When a person allows others to misappropriate the money entrusted to him, that amounts to a criminal breach of trust as defined by Section 405. The section is relatable to property in a
positive part and a negative part. The positive part deals with criminal misappropriation or conversion of the property and the negative part consists of dishonestly using or disposing of the property in violation of any direction and of law or any contract touching the discharge of trust.

362. In Jaswantrai Manilal Akhaney v. State of Bombay it was held that if the Managing Director of the Bank entrusted with securities owned by the pledgor disposes of their securities against the stipulated terms of the contract entered into by the parties with an intent to cause wrongful loss to the pledgor and wrongful gain to the Bank, there can be no question but that the Managing Director has necessary mens rea required by Section
405.

363. The term entrustment is not necessarily a term of law. It may have different implications in different contexts. In its most general signification all it imports is the handing over possession for some purpose which may not imply the conferring of any proprietary right at all.

364. When a person misappropriates to his own use the property that does not belong to him, the misappropriation is dishonest even though there was an intention to restore it at some future point of time.

24. We, therefore, are clearly of the opinion that the view taken by the High Court was correct. The High Courts judgment is upheld. The appeal is dismissed. We, in the facts and circumstances of this case, also direct the appellant to pay and bear the cost of the respondent throughout. Counsels fee in this appeal is assessed at Rs.50,000/-.

**********', 3] , 
[ 'HEADNOTE
INSURANCE LAW
Rule of contra proferentem - Insurance Policy covered theft following an actual forcible and violent entry/or exit from the premises - Appellant made a case for theft without forcible entry - Respondent No.1 rejected the claim as for a valid claim violent and forcible entry was necessary - Appellant invoked Rule of contra proferentem, alleging ambiguity in terms of policy. Held it is well-settled law that there is no difference between a contract of insurance and any other contract, and that it should be construed strictly without adding or deleting anything from the terms thereof. A plain reading of the policy shows that a forcible entry should precede the theft, and unless that is proved, claim cannot be accepted. There being no ambiguity in the relevant clause of the policy, rule of contra proferentem cannot be invoked. United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Orient Treasures (P) Ltd. JT 2016 (1) SC 147, General Assurance Society Ltd. cases referred.
HELD
We are of the opinion that there is no error committed by the MRTP Commission in rejecting the Claim of the Appellant. It is clear from the facts of the present case that the Appellant has made out a case of theft without a forcible entry. The case of the Appellant is that forcible entry is not required for a claim to be made under the policy. Following the well-accepted principle that a contract of insurance which is like any other commercial contract should be interpreted strictly, we are of the opinion that the policy covers loss or damage by burglary or house breaking which have been explained as theft following an actual, forcible and violent entry from the premises. A plain reading of the policy would show that a forcible entry should precede the theft, and unless they are proved, the claim cannot be accepted. (Para 7)

It is well-settled law that there is no difference between a contract of insurance and any other contract, and that it should be construed strictly without adding or deleting anything from the terms thereof. On applying the said principle, we have no doubt that a forcible entry is required for a claim to be allowed under the policy for burglary/house breaking. (Para 9)

The Policy in this case is in a standard form. The policy for Burglary and House Breaking in United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Orient Treasures (P) Ltd. (supra) and the policy in this case are identical. If there is any ambiguity or doubt the clause in the Policy should be interpreted in favour of the insured. But we see no ambiguity in the relevant clause of the policy and the rule of contra proferentem is not applicable. (Para 12)

For the aforementioned reasons, we uphold the order of the MRTP Commission and dismiss the Appeal with no order as to costs. (Para 13)

RULE OF CONSTRUCTION
Rule of contra proferentem - Verba chartarum fortius accipiuntur contra proferentem - What is. Held, the rule states that ambiguity in the wording of the policy is to be resolved against the party who prepared it. MacGillivrays case, Colinvauxs Law of Insurance referred. (Para 10)

CASES REFERRED
1.United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Orient Treasures (P) Ltd. JT 2016 (1) SC 147 (Para 4.1)

2.United India Assurance Co. Ltd. v. Harchand Rai Chandan Lal JT 2004 (8) SC 8 (Para 5)

3.General Assurance Society Ltd. v. Chandmull Jain and Anr.  1966 (3) SCR 500 (Para 11)

L. NAGESWARA RAO, J.

1. The Appellant is a wholly owned Public Sector Undertaking of the Government of Orissa. The Appellant finances medium and large scale industries within the State of Orissa and is also involved in setting up joint sector industries with private entrepreneurs. The Appellant extended a term loan of Rs. 40,74,000/- to M/s. Josna Casting Centre Orissa Pvt. Ltd. As the loan amount was not repaid, the Appellant exercising its power under Section 29 of the State Finance Corporation Act, 1951, took over the assets of M/s. Josna Casting Centre Orissa Private Limited on 14-02-1992. On 23-01-1996, the Appellant insured the said assets with Respondent No. 1 for a sum of Rs. 46,00,000/- under the Miscellaneous Accident Policy, Rs. 60,40,000/- under the Fire Policy and Rs. 46,00,000/- under the Burglary and House Breaking Policy.

2. The seized assets were put to auction by the Appellant on 22-01-1997 at which point of time it was detected that some parts of the plant and machinery were missing from the factory premises. The Appellant registered an FIR on 25-01-1997 in the Remona Police Station, Balasore regarding the theft/burglary of the plant and machinery. On 07-02-1997, the Appellant informed Respondent No. 1 about the theft and requested for issuance of a claim form. A claim was lodged with Respondent No. 1 on 16-12-1997 for an amount of Rs. 34,40,650/- under the Burglary and House Breaking Policy. The valuation reports given by GEC, Calcutta, the machines supplier and Alpha Transformer Ltd., Bhubaneswar were relied upon by the Appellant/Claimant. The claim of the Appellant was repudiated by Respondent No. 1 on 31-03-1998 on the ground that the alleged loss did not come within the purview of the insurance policy.

3. The Appellant filed compensation application No. 45 of 2001 under Section 12-B read with Section 36-A of the Monopolies and Restrictive Trade Practices (MRTP) Act, 1969, which was rejected by the MRTP Commission, New Delhi by its Order dated 17-08-2005. Aggrieved by the said Order, the Appellant has preferred the present Appeal.

4. Mr. Raj Kumar Mehta, counsel for the Appellant took us through the proposal form for Burglary and House Breaking Insurance (Business) Premises. The scope of cover in the said proposal form is as follows:

SCOPE OF COVER

This Insurance Policy provides cover against loss or damage by Burglary or House breaking i.e. (theft following an actual, forcible and violent entry of and/or exit from the premises) in respect of contents of offices, warehouses, shops, etc. and cash in safe or strong room and also damage caused to the premises, except as detailed below:

4.1 It was further submitted by Mr. Mehta that the rule of contra proferentem would be applicable to the present case and he relied upon the judgment of this Court in United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Orient Treasures (P) Ltd. reported at JT 2016 (1) SC 147 : 2016 (3) SCC 49.

5. Mr. Mehta submitted that the words theft following an actual forcible and violent entry/or exit from the premises are with reference only to house breaking and not burglary. According to him, forcible and violent entry is not necessary for making a valid claim under the policy. It would be sufficient that there is theft of certain goods from the factory premises, which fact has been proved by the Appellant. Mr. Mehta referred to a judgment of this Court in United India Assurance Co. Ltd. v. Harchand Rai Chandan Lal reported in JT 2004 (8) SC 8 : 2004 (8) SCC 644 which related to a claim pertaining to a theft and attempted to distinguish it. He submitted that the clause in the policy in that case is different from that involved in the present case. He urged that the Commission committed an error in relying upon the said judgment to reject the Claim Application for the Appellant.

6. Mr. Salil Paul, Advocate for Respondent No.1 submitted that there is no difference in the policies involved in the case cited supra and the instant case. He also urged that an insurance policy is akin to a commercial contract and has to be construed strictly. Mr. Paul submitted that a forcible entry and/or exit is compulsory for maintainability of a claim under the policy.

7. Having considered the submissions made on both sides, we are of the opinion that there is no error committed by the MRTP Commission in rejecting the Claim of the Appellant. It is clear from the facts of the present case that the Appellant has made out a case of theft without a forcible entry. The case of the Appellant is that forcible entry is not required for a claim to be made under the policy. Following the well- accepted principle that a contract of insurance which is like any other commercial contract should be interpreted strictly, we are of the opinion that the policy covers loss or damage by burglary or house breaking which have been explained as theft following an actual, forcible and violent entry from the premises. A plain reading of the policy would show that a forcible entry should precede the theft, and unless they are proved, the claim cannot be accepted. The provisions of the policy in United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Harchand Rai Chandan Lal (supra) read as under:

THE COMPANY HEREBY AGREES subject to the terms and conditions contained herein endorsed/or otherwise expressed hereon that if, the property hereinafter described or any part thereof be LOST or DAMAGED by BURGLARY and/or HOUSE BREAKING, or ANY DAMAGE be caused to the premises to be made good by the insured from BURGLARY and/or HOUSE BREAKING or any attempt thereat.

7.1 The term burglary and/or house breaking has been defined in terms of the policy which are as follows:

Burglary and/or house breaking shall mean theft involving entry to or exit from the premises stated therein by forcible and violent means or following assault or violence or threat thereof to the insured or to his employees or to the members of his family.

8. A comparison of the above terms as defined in the policy in the case of United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Harchand Rai Chandan Lal (supra) and the scope of cover in the proposal form in the instant case are similar. This Court in the said judgment of United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Harchand Rai Chandan Lal (supra) considered the scope of a policy involving burglary and house breaking and held as follows:

The policy is a contract between the parties and both parties are bound by the terms of contract. As per the definition of the word burglary, followed with violence, makes it clear that if any theft is committed it should necessarily be preceded with violence i.e. entry into the premises for committing theft should involve force or violence or threat to insurer or to his employees or to the members of his family. Therefore, the element of force and violence is a condition precedent for burglary and housebreaking. The term burglary as defined in the English Dictionary means an illegal entry into the building with an intent to commit crime such as theft. But in absence of violence or force the insurer cannot claim indemnification against the insurance company. The terms of the policy have to be construed as it is and we cannot add or subtract something. Howsoever liberally we may construe the policy but we cannot take liberalism to the extent of substituting the words which are not intended. It is true that in common parlance the term burglary would mean theft but it has to be preceded with force or violence. If the element of force and violence is not present then the insurer cannot claim compensation against theft from the insurance company. This expression appearing in the insurance policy came up for interpretation before the English Courts and the English Courts in no uncertain terms laid down that burglary or theft has to be preceded with force or violence in order to be indemnified by the insurance company. In this connection reference may be made to the statement of law as summarized in Halsburys Laws of England Fourth Edition (2003 Reissue) Para 646. It reads as under:

646. Forcible and violent entry. The terms of a burglary insurance may exclude liability in certain circumstances unless there is forcible and violent entry into the premises. If so, the entry must be obtained by the use of both force and violence or the definition is not satisfied and the policy does not apply. An entry obtained by turning the handle of an outside door or by using a skeleton key, though sufficient to constitute a criminal offence, is not within the policy since the element of violence is absent. However, an entry obtained by picking the lock or forcing back the catch by means of an instrument involves the use of violence and is therefore covered. The policy may be so framed as to apply only to violent entry from the outside; or the violent entry into a room within the insured premises may be sufficient. In any case, the violence must be connected with the act of entry; if the entry is obtained without violence, the subsequent use of violence to effect the theft, as for instance where a show-case is broken open, does not bring the loss within the policy.

9. It is well-settled law that there is no difference between a contract of insurance and any other contract, and that it should be construed strictly without adding or deleting anything from the terms thereof. On applying the said principle, we have no doubt that a forcible entry is required for a claim to be allowed under the policy for burglary/house breaking.

10. We proceed to deal with the submission made by counsel for the Appellant regarding the rule of contra proferentem. The Common Law rule of construction verba chartarum fortius accipiuntur contra proferentem means that ambiguity in the wording of the policy is to be resolved against the party who prepared it. MacGillivray on Insurance Law1 deals with the rule of contra proferentem as follows:

The contra proferentem rule of construction arises only where there is a wording employed by those drafting the clause which leaves the court unable to decide by ordinary principles of interpretation which of two meanings is the right one. One must not use the rule to create the ambiguity - one must find the ambiguity first. The words should receive their ordinary and natural meaning unless that is displaced by a real ambiguity either appearing on the face of the policy or, possibly, by extrinsic evidence of surrounding circumstances. (footnotes omitted)

Colinvauxs Law of Insurance2 propounds the contra proferentem rule as under:

Quite apart from contradictory clauses in policies, ambiguities are common in them and it is often very uncertain what the parties to them mean. In such cases the rule is that the policy, being drafted in language chosen by the insurers, must be taken most strongly against them. It is construed contra proferentes, against those who offer it. In a doubtful case the turn of the scale ought to be given against the speaker, because he has not clearly and fully expressed himself. Nothing is easier than for the insurers to express themselves in plain terms. The assured cannot put his own meaning upon a policy, but, where it is ambiguous, it is to be construed in the sense in which he might reasonably have understood it. If the insurers wish to escape liability under given circumstances, they must use words admitting of no possible doubt.

But a clause is only to be contra proferentes in cases of real ambiguity. One must not use the rule to create an ambiguity. On must find the ambiguity first. Even where a clause by itself is ambiguous if, by looking at the whole policy, its meaning becomes clear, there is no room for the application of the doctrine. So also where if one meaning is given to a clause, the rest of the policy becomes clear, the policy should be construed accordingly. (footnotes omitted)

11. This court in General Assurance Society Ltd. v. Chandmull Jain and Anr., reported in 1966 (3) SCR 500 held that there is no difference between a contract of insurance and any other contract except that in a contract of insurance there is a requirement of uberima fides, i.e., good faith on the part of the insured and the contract is likely to be construed contra proferentes, i.e., against the company in case of ambiguity or doubt. It was further held in the said judgment that the duty of the Court is to interpret the words in which the contract is expressed by the parties and it is not for the Court to make a new contract, however reasonable.

12. In United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Orient Treasures (P) Ltd. (supra) cited by the Counsel for the Appellant, it was held that there is no ambiguity in the insurance policy and so the rule of contra proferentem was not applicable. A standard policy of insurance is different from other Contracts and in a claim under a standard policy the rule of contra proferentem is to be applied. The Policy in this case is in a standard form. The policy for Burglary and House Breaking in United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Orient Treasures (P) Ltd. (supra) and the policy in this case are identical. If there is any ambiguity or doubt the clause in the Policy should be interpreted in favour of the insured. But we see no ambiguity in the relevant clause of the policy and the rule of contra proferentem is not applicable.

13. For the aforementioned reasons, we uphold the order of the MRTP Commission and dismiss the Appeal with no order as to costs.

**********', 3] , 
[ 'HEADNOTE
CONSTITUTION OF INDIA, 1950:
Article 32 - Army service - Petitioner dismissed from service for having abetted the commission of offence of theft - Principal accused acquitted of the offence - Abetment fails when substantive offence is not established against the principal offender - Respondents directed to pay the entire pension and other entitlements to the petitioner.

CRIMINAL LAW
Abetment
Abetment of offence of theft - Principal accused acquitted - Abetment fails when substantive offence is not established against the principal offender.

SERVICE AND LABOUR LAW
Army Service
Reinstatement - Petitioner dismissed from service for having abetted the commission of offence of theft - Principal accused acquitted of the offence - Abetment fails when substantive offence is not established against the principal offender - Respondents directed to pay the entire pension and other entitlements to the petitioner - Constitution of India, 1950, Article 32.
HELD
Having examined the facts in the instant case, we are of the view that the ratio laid down in Faguna Kanta Naths case and later followed in Madan Raj Bhandaris case is attracted. The petitioner was charged with the offence of abetment by conspiracy of the commission of the offence of theft by Major Trilok Chand. The High Court of Allahabad has clearly held that there was no evidence that Major Trilok Chand has committed the theft; therefore, unless the substantive offence against the principal offender is established, the question of abettor being held guilty under these circumstances does not arise. The petitioner is alleged to have entered into a conspiracy alongwith eight others and abetted the commission of the offence. All the other alleged abettors are acquitted and the principal offender Major Trilok Chand is also acquitted and the petitioner alone remains in the picture as one having abetted the offence by entering into conspiracy. It is axiomatic that there cannot be a conspiracy of one. In Topan Das v. The State of Bombay 1955(2) SCR 881 it was held that two or more persons must be parties to such an agreement and one person along can never be held guilty of criminal conspiracy for the reason that one cannot conspire with oneself. Para 9

CASES REFERRED
1. Lt. Col. (TS) Harbans Singh Sandhu v. Union of India and Others Judgment dated 22.1.1978.

2. Madan Raj Bhandari v. State of Rajasthan 1970 (1) SCR 688

3. Jamuna Singh v. State of Bihar AIR 1967 SC 553

4. Faguna Kanta Nath v. The State of Assam 1959 Supp.(2) SCR 1

5. Topan Das v. The State of Bombay 1955 (2) SCR 881


REDDY,J.:

1. This petition is filed under Article 32 of the Constitution of India seeking an appropriate writ directing the respondents i.e. Union of India and the Chief of the Army Staff to restore the petitioner to service with all consequential benefits and grant of pension.

2. The petitioner entered the Indian Army in 1939 and served in Burma during the Second World War and later joined Indian National Army and fought under the leadership of the Netaji Subhash Chander Bose and on India attaining independence, he rejoined Indian Army in 1948 and was promoted to the rank of Hawaldar. He was released from Army service on 15.10.1964 consequent to the reduction of manpower and consequently he joined Defence Security Corps on 14.9.1967 and served till 29.7.78. While serving in Defence Security Corps in 1976 at Pathankot, he alongwith Major Trilok Chand who at the relevant time was serving as their Officer and nine others was charge-sheeted by the Court-martial. The charge against them was that Trilok Chand committed the theft of 250 wheel drums while getting them loaded in a civil truck and that the others abetted the commission of the said offence. Major Trilok Chand was found guilty and out of the nine abetters, eight abetters were acquitted. Major Trilok Chand was awarded one year imprisonment. The petitioner was dismissed from the service with an imprisonment of 90 days in civil prison. Major Trilok Chand questioned the proceedings of the Court-martial before the High Court of Allahabad in Writ Petition No. 13161 of 1981. The High Court allowed the writ petition and held that there was no evidence that it was Trilok Chand who removed the wheel drums and consequently the High Court found that there was no material to support the charge of theft. The review petition filed by the Union of India was dismissed by the High Court and the S.L.P. No. 9294 of 1987 filed by the Union of India in the Supreme Court was dismissed on 5.10.87. Consequently Major Trilok Chand has been reinstated in the service.

3. In view of the fact that the main accused has been acquitted and reinstated in service, the petitioner requested the authorities to review his case and give the necessary relief but his request was rejected. Hence the present petition.

4. Learned counsel for the petitioner submitted that since the principal accused Major Trilok Chand has been acquitted of the charge of theft and has also been reinstated, the petitioner who was only charged of abetment of the said offence of theft can not be found guilty.

5. In support of his submissions, learned counsel has relied on some of the decisions of this Court in Faguna Kanta Nath v. The State of Assam (1959) Supp. 2 SCR 1,Jamuna Singh v. State of Bihar, AIR 1967 SC 553 and Madan Raj Bhandari v. State of Rajasthan, (1970) 1 SCR 688.

6. In Faguna Kanta Naths case the appellant was tried for an offence under Section 165A of the Indian Penal Code for having abetted the commission of an offence by an officer. The said officer was acquitted on the ground that no offence under Section 161 was committed. Consequently, the Court held that appellants conviction for the offence of abetment was not maintainable.

7. This case is referred to in Jamuna Singhs case and it is held that it cannot be held in law that a person cannot ever be convicted of abetting a certain offence when the person alleged to have committed that offence in consequence of the abetment has been acquitted. The question of the abettors guilt depends on the nature of the act abetted and the manner in which the abetment was made. The offence of abetment is complete when the alleged abettor has instigated another or engaged with another in a conspiracy to commit the offence. It is not necessary for the offence of abetment that the action abetted must be committed. It is only in the case of a person abetting an offence by intentionally aiding another to commit that offence that the charge of abetment against him would be expected to fail when the person alleged to have committed the offence is acquitted of that offence.

8. Madan Raj Bhandaris is a case where the appellant was charged with having abetted one Mst. Radha in causing miscarriage to a woman and that Mst. Radha was acquitted but the appellant was convicted. This Court referred to the principle laid down in Faguna Kantha Naths case and held that the facts of the present case fell within the rule that a charge of abetment fails ordinarily when the substantive offence is not established against the principal offender. It may not be necessary to multiply the discussions on this aspect.

9. Having examined the facts in the instant case, we are of the view that the ratio laid down in Faguna Kanta Naths case and later followed in Madan Raj Bhandaris case is attracted. The petitioner was charged with the offence of abetment by conspiracy of the commission of the offence of theft by Major Trilok Chand. The High Court of Allahabad has clearly held that there was no evidence that Major Trilok Chand has committed the theft; therefore, unless the substantive offence against the principal offender is established, the question of abettor being held guilty under these circumstances does not arise. The petitioner is alleged to have entered into a conspiracy alongwith eight others and abetted the commission of the offence. All the other alleged abettors are acquitted and the principal offender Major Trilok Chand is also acquitted and the petitioner alone remains in the picture as one having abetted the offence by entering into conspiracy. It is axiomatic that there cannot be a conspiracy of one. In Topan Das v. The State of Bombay 1955(2) SCR 881 it was held that two or more persons must be parties to such an agreement and one person along can never be held guilty of criminal conspiracy for the reason that one cannot conspire with oneself.

10. We may also mention here that under similar circumstances this Court in Writ Petition No. 553 of 1972 - Lt. Col. (TS) Harbans Singh Sandhu v. Union of India and Others Judgment dated 22.11.78, directed the payment of pension and the gratuity as per the rules.

11. For all these reasons, we direct the respondents to pay the entire pension, gratuity and other entitlements to the petitioner as per the rules within four months. The Writ Petition is accordingly allowed with costs.

**********', 3] , 
[ 'HEADNOTE
ELECTRICITY LAWS
Indian Electricity Act, 1910
Sections 39 and 44 - Electricity supply - Tampering of electricity meter and theft of electricity by two industrial users (a company and a partnership firm) located side by side - Theft detected by surprise raid during the night - Managing director of the company and the partners of the firm convicted by the trial court and sentenced to three months imprisonment besides monetary fine -Lower appellate court dismissing the appeals - High Court also dismissing the revision - Validity. Held large scale theft of electricity being an alarming problem causing enormous loss to the Electricity Suppliers, should be dealt with firmly and besides disconnection of supply and conviction of the erring persons, heavy monetary fine should be levied. In the instant cases theft of enormous electricity having been established, no interference was called for in so far as the conviction of the appellants is concerned. However in view of peculiar facts since the appellants had already served out a part of the sentence, instead of making them serve out the remainder term after a lapse of 17 years, in the interest of justice monetary fine imposed by the lower court enhanced.
HELD
On consideration of the totality of the entire case, we do not find any merit in the submissions made on behalf of the appellants. In our view, no interference is called for in the impugned judgment so far as conviction of the appellants under Sections 39 and 44 of the Act is concerned and consequently, we uphold the impugned judgment as far as conviction of the appellants is concerned. (Para 28)

We have also heard the learned counsel for the appellants on the point of sentence. It was submitted before the Trial Court and before this Court also that it is the first offence of the appellants. They have family members and minor dependents. Appellant number 2 is a lady. More than 17 years have elapsed and now, sending the appellants to jail for serving out the remaining part of their sentence would be extremely harsh. The appellants have already served out a part of their sentence and sending them back to jail to serve out the remaining sentence would cause tremendous hardship to the appellants and their family members. (Para 29)

Large scale theft of electricity is a very alarming problem faced by all the State Electricity Boards in our country, which is causing loss to the State revenue running into hundreds of crores every year. In our considered view, after proper adjudication of the cases of all those who are found to be guilty of the offence of committing theft of electricity, apart from the sentence of conviction, the Court should invariably impose heavy fine making theft of electricity a wholly non-profitable venture. The most effective step to curb this tendency perhaps could be to discontinue supply of electricity to those consumers for temporarily or permanently who have been caught abstracting electricity in a clandestine manner on more than one occasion. The legislature may consider incorporating this suggestion as a form of punishment by amending Section 39 of the Indian Electricity Act of 1910. (Para 30)

On consideration of the peculiar facts and circumstances of the case, where the appellants have already served out a part of the sentence and instead of compelling them to serve out the remaining sentence after lapse of 17 years, in the interest of justice, we deem it appropriate to increase the fine from Rs.40,000/- each to Rs.3,00,000/- each in case of appellants number 1 and 3 (Jagmodhan Mehatabsing Gujaral and Harcharanpalsing Nanda respectively) and from Rs.20,000/- to Rs.2,00,000/- under Section 39 of the Act in case of appellant number 2 (Mrs. Rupender Kaur Harcharanpalsing). The appellants are further sentenced to pay a fine of Rs.5,000/- each under Section 44 of the Act. (Para 31)


Dalveer Bhandari, J.


1. Leave granted.

2. This appeal is directed against the judgment of the High Court of Judicature at Bombay dated 23.1.2006 in Criminal Revision Application No.458/2005 and Criminal Revision Application No.11 of 2006.

3. The appellants in this appeal had been convicted by the Additional Chief Judicial Magistrate, First Class, Pune, by the judgment dated 21.12.1996 under Sections 39 and 44 of the Indian Electricity Act, 1910 (hereinafter referred to as the Act) and were also directed to pay a fine. These appellants were directed to suffer three months rigorous imprisonment. Appellants number 1 & 3 were also directed to pay a fine of Rs.40,000/- each and appellant number 2 to pay a fine of Rs.20,000/- under Section 39 of the Act.

4. The appellants, aggrieved by the said judgment of the Additional Chief Judicial Magistrate, Pune, filed an appeal before the Ad-hoc Additional Sessions Judge, Pune being Appeal No. 12 of 1997. The learned Additional Sessions Judge again evaluated the entire evidence and examined the documents on record and reached the same finding and consequently dismissed the appeal filed by the appellants.

5. The Criminal Revision filed against the said judgment of the Additional Sessions Judge was dismissed by the High Court of Judicature at Bombay vide judgment dated 23.1.2006. Both the learned Additional Sessions Judge and the High Court upheld the decision of the Additional Chief Judicial Magistrate.

6. The brief facts which are relevant to dispose of this appeal are recapitulated as under.

7. Appellant number 1 was the Managing Director of M/s. Nanda Glass Industries Pvt. Ltd., located at Gat No. 679/680 Valu, Taluka Bhor and appellants number 2 and 3 are the partners of the partnership firm M/s. Technoframes. Both the industries were adjacent to each other.

8. The Consumer number of M/s. Nanda Glass Industries Pvt. Ltd. is 17941-900102-3 with sanctioned load CD 225 KVA for toughening of glass. The Consumer number of M/s. Technoframes is 1-416 with Meter No. 9030013/TPHR 605 dated 10.7.1986. The sanctioned load of Consumer number 1-416 is 60 H.P. for toughening of glass.

9. Upon receiving information that there was theft of electric energy being committed by the appellants at these two electric connections for their industry at night, the complainant V. G. Kokane, the then Dy. Executive Engineer and in-charge of flying squad of MSEB and Executive Engineer, Kadam with their other testing staff etc. and two Panchas went to M/s. Nanda Glass Industries Pvt. Ltd. and Technoframes in the intervening night of 3/4.10.1989 for the purpose of inspection and checking.

10. It was found that the power of 225 KVA was sanctioned to accused no. 1 on contract demand with H.T. metering for the purposes of recording consumption. One iron box was provided for Trivector Meter. The box was closed and duly sealed under the seal of M.S.E.B. There was CTPC unit provided at D.P. Pole from which the wires were brought into the Meter Box through a conduit pipe so that they could not be tampered. The appellants dislocated the conduit pipe at the bend and socket. They had cut and removed voltage wire of one phase and current wire of another phase so that actual consumption could not be recorded by the meter. Similarly, the appellants by tampering meters ensured that actual consumption of power used for main furnaces and blower was not recorded from December, 1987 so that there could not be any difficulty in putting explanation, if any, called upon by the M.S.E.B. The daily consumption of power was to be recorded by the consumer in prescribed G-7 form, but it was found that it was written only once in every month. On 3.5.1988 while it was inspected by the Testing Division abruptly, abnormal difference was found between the entries noted by the consumer in G-7 form and the reading recorded by the officers of the M.S.E.B. The copies of these forms were attached to the complaint.

11. In the intervening night of 3/4-10-1989, when the complainant and his companions went to the premises they found one watchman on the gate who was called Bapu Bhagwan Alder. He was said to be a Shift Operator-cum-Supervisor and he showed the actual condition of the connections to them. Bapu Bhagwan Alder had put his signatures on the Inspection Reports drawn on the spot, being exhibit Nos.90 and 91. He also voluntarily gave one statement in writing (marked as exhibit No. 80) stating that the industry was actually working at the time of the visit. The factory was normally working in three shifts. It was found at the place of L.T. Connection supplied for Technoframes that though the said company was bearing a different name, the electric power was being used for toughening of glass in M/s. Nanda Glass Industries. The members of the raid team along with complainant found drastic changes and tampering done by the accused in the said connection wherein three incoming wires and other three outgoing wires of the meter were joined together at their respective ends by taking them out from outgoing phase of the terminal box of the meter. Therefore, the meter was totally by-passed and it was not recording the electricity which was consumed. The meter terminal cover and the seals of the M.S.E.B. were not available and there was 100% theft of energy of 60 H.P. The complainant V.G. Kokane had taken photographs to show the tampering of the electric connection and taking of such photographs was indicated in the seizure panchanama.

12. The appellants did not pay any amount more than the minimum charges to the Board, whereas the actual consumption of the electricity was much more. It was assessed by the complainant as an Expert in the field that there was consumption of 10,00,000 units and 16075 VA power worth of Rs.12,00,000/- from H.T. connection whereas 5,00,000 units worth of Rs.4,50,000/- from L.T. connection and the theft of energy of Rs.16,50,000/- committed by them. The photographs of the actual position seen by the raiding party were taken on the spot and that they were produced in the police station during investigation. Similarly, the original seals of H.T. Meter Box were cut and seized in a closed packet duly sealed under the signatures of the Panchas which were also produced by them in the police station. As it was likely that there will be rejoining or change in the position of the L.T. Connection (I-416) the room in which it was installed was duly locked and the lock was sealed with paper bearing signatures of the Panchas was pasted on it. Both the keys of the lock were also given by the complainant in the police station along with the complaint. The complaint was registered at the Bhor Police Station at about 7.30 p.m. on 4.10.1989. The original panchnama drawn by the M.S.E.B. officials and the Panchas at the time of actual raid were also produced by the complainant with true statement of consumption of M/s. Nanda Glass Industries for the purposes of evidence in support of the allegations.

13. After proper investigation of the entire case, the charges against the appellants were framed under Sections 39 and 44 of the Electricity Act, to which the appellants pleaded not guilty. It may be pertinent to mention that the presence of accused Ravindra Birbal Khadake could not be secured in spite of issuing warrants and the Chief Judicial Magistrate was pleased to order for separation of trial against him. We are not concerned with the said accused in this appeal.

14. In the trial of the instant case the prosecution had examined seven witnesses Ramchandra Paigude, PW1 attested the panchanama of exhibit 74. It was drawn during the surprise visit by the raiding party in the night. He also proved exhibit 78 a sealed packet (that was opened in the court), containing three seats which were removed from the meter in the premises of the glass industry. Shankar Anpat, PW2, Executive Engineer, Lokhote, PW3, Junior Engineer, Security Officer, complainant Vijay Kokane PW4, Dy. Executive Engineer and in charge of flying squad and Pathan PW5, Junior Vigilance Officer were employees of the MSEB. These officials of the board described how they had visited the factory and detected existence of fraudulent means of abstraction of electricity without recording consumption in the meter. PW6 is one of the panch witnesses who had attested exhibit 101. In his presence, another panch had climbed atop the meter room located in the premises of Technoframes. It was found that planks in the roof were newly fitted with fresh nailing. Vishnu Mane PW7 had investigated the offence and sent charge sheet to the court.

15. Ramchandra Paigude PW1, an independent witness, fully supported the prosecution version. He was under no obligation to favour the Board officials. He had also stated that the watchman Wadkar had called Bapu Aldar and he was introduced as shift supervisor and had taken the raiding party to the electric installations.

16. The defence of the appellants is that of denial of abstraction and dishonest consumption or use of electric energy by them directly or by any artificial means or the means not authorized by the licensee.

17. The appellants were found guilty of the offences punishable under Sections 39 and 44 of the Electricity Act. According to the Trial Court, the prosecution had succeeded in establishing the commission of theft of the electric energy worth about Rs.16,50,000/-.

18. The appellants, aggrieved by the judgment of the Trial Court, preferred an appeal before the learned Sessions Court, Pune. The first Appellate Court again examined in detail the entire evidence and the arguments advanced by the parties. The first Appellate Court also examined the relevant decided cases of this Court and other courts. The appeal filed by the appellants was dismissed by a detailed and comprehensive judgment dated 27.12.2005.

19. The appellants preferred a revision petition before the High Court of Judicature at Bombay, which was dismissed vide order dated 23.1.2006. The appellants, aggrieved by the said judgment of the High Court, have preferred this appeal.

20. It was submitted by the appellants that the complainant was not authorized to file FIR. The Trial Court had considered this argument of the appellants. The Trial Court has correctly mentioned in its judgment that by the amendment in the provisions of Section 50, the word Government or a State Electricity Board or an Electric Inspector or a person aggrieved by same has been amended and the officers of the State Electricity Board or a person aggrieved by the theft are authorized by the notification to lodge a complaint. The complainant was fully justified in filing the complaint. We do not find any merit in this argument of the appellants.

21. The appellants submitted that there is manifest error in the judgment of the Trial Court, which was affirmed by the first appellate court and the High Court, by which the appellants were convicted and sentenced to three months rigorous imprisonment on the ground that the theft of electricity to the extent of an amount of Rs.17,35,453.52 was extracted by the appellants, whereas, the Civil Court had come to the conclusion and passed the decree in favour of the respondent Maharashtra State Electricity Board in Civil Suit No.156/92 for only Rs.3,07,999.74.

22. On evaluation of the entire evidence and documents on record when the case of theft has been fully proved, then whether the theft of energy was to the extent of Rs.17,35,453.52 or Rs.3,07,999.74, really makes no difference, as there was theft of energy on a large scale for a long time. The appellants cannot take advantage of the fact that the respondents had not appealed against the judgment of the Joint Civil Judge, Senior Division, Pune, who had passed the decree for Rs.3,07,999.74.

23. The appellants had also alleged that 48 hours notice was not given to the appellants before conducting the raid.

24. The Trial Court had dealt with the aspect of giving 48 hours notice before conducting the raid. In a case of a surprise raid 48 hours notice to the appellants is not envisaged by the Legislature and otherwise also it would have been counter productive, because there was a strong possibility of obliterating and/or destroying the entire evidence to connect the appellants with the crime. Moreover, even if it is so accepted, it is on record that the Watchman and Bapu Bhagwan Alder were found present in the premises on behalf of the appellants and that they did assist the raiding team to carry on their work. It is reported by the police in reply to summons that Bapu Bhagwan Alder was serving in some Glass Factory in Pune, but he could not be traced out for the purpose of tendering the evidence before the Court. In fact, it was possible for the appellants to bring him in the box, at least as defence witness, to state that he had no concern with the industry of the accused. Moreover, the employment record or muster roll of the Industry of the accused was not brought for inspection by this Court. Suppression of this clearly gives rise to considerable substance in the allegations of the prosecution. By and large this negatives the arguments on behalf of the appellants that the raid is illegal or otherwise defective. Therefore, we do not find any substance in this submission made by the appellants.

25. The appellants further submitted that the courts in the impugned judgment ought to have appreciated the circumstance that more than 17 years have elapsed; that one of the accused/appellants is a lady partner in the firm and that in fact the public prosecutor had consented and argued for reducing the sentence.

26. The appellants further submitted that the courts below have not properly considered the entire case in the proper perspective because there was no evidence about the tampering with the meter.

27. In the Panchnama, it is categorically mentioned that exhibit no. 91 is the Inspection Sheet pertaining to M/s. Technoframes, Consumer No. I-416 and the observations made are as under:

Meter Terminal Box Seal and cover missing. All the coming and outgoing wires are connected together in the incoming hole resulting total buy passing of meter and no consumption is recorded in the meter.

Therefore, we find no substance in this submission that there was no evidence of tampering of electricity meters by the appellants.

28. On consideration of the totality of the entire case, we do not find any merit in the submissions made on behalf of the appellants. In our view, no interference is called for in the impugned judgment so far as conviction of the appellants under Sections 39 and 44 of the Act is concerned and consequently, we uphold the impugned judgment as far as conviction of the appellants is concerned.

29. We have also heard the learned counsel for the appellants on the point of sentence. It was submitted before the Trial Court and before this Court also that it is the first offence of the appellants. They have family members and minor dependents. Appellant number 2 is a lady. More than 17 years have elapsed and now, sending the appellants to jail for serving out the remaining part of their sentence would be extremely harsh. The appellants have already served out a part of their sentence and sending them back to jail to serve out the remaining sentence would cause tremendous hardship to the appellants and their family members.

30. Large scale theft of electricity is a very alarming problem faced by all the State Electricity Boards in our country, which is causing loss to the State revenue running into hundreds of crores every year. In our considered view, after proper adjudication of the cases of all those who are found to be guilty of the offence of committing theft of electricity, apart from the sentence of conviction, the Court should invariably impose heavy fine making theft of electricity a wholly non-profitable venture. The most effective step to curb this tendency perhaps could be to discontinue supply of electricity to those consumers for temporarily or permanently who have been caught abstracting electricity in a clandestine manner on more than one occasion. The legislature may consider incorporating this suggestion as a form of punishment by amending Section 39 of the Indian Electricity Act of 1910.

31. On consideration of the peculiar facts and circumstances of the case, where the appellants have already served out a part of the sentence and instead of compelling them to serve out the remaining sentence after lapse of 17 years, in the interest of justice, we deem it appropriate to increase the fine from Rs.40,000/- each to Rs.3,00,000/- each in case of appellants number 1 and 3 (Jagmodhan Mehatabsing Gujaral and Harcharanpalsing Nanda respectively) and from Rs.20,000/- to Rs.2,00,000/- under Section 39 of the Act in case of appellant number 2 (Mrs. Rupender Kaur Harcharanpalsing). The appellants are further sentenced to pay a fine of Rs.5,000/- each under Section 44 of the Act.

32. The appellants, in case, have already paid fine imposed by the Trial Court under Section 39 of the Act, then the appellants are directed to deposit only the remaining amount of fine within a period of eight weeks from the date of this judgment. In case the amount of fine, as directed by this Court under Sections 39 and 44 of the Act, is not deposited within the stipulated time, then the appellants shall be taken into custody to serve out the remaining part of their sentence, as imposed by the Trial Court and upheld in the impugned judgment by the High Court.

33. This appeal is accordingly disposed of in terms of the aforesaid observations.

**********', 3] , 
[ 'HEADNOTE
SERVICE AND LABOUR LAWS
Industrial Disputes Act, 1947
Section 11A - Workman - Dismissal for misconduct - Proportionality of punishment - Employee of State Road Transport Corporation committing thefts of automobile parts from Depot - Management instituting an enquiry proceedings and also initiating criminal proceedings - Court absolving the employee in the criminal proceedings - Enquiry proceedings establishing the theft -Corporation dismissing the employee from service - Before the Labour Court delinquent employee admitting the theft and pleading to be excused as being the first offence - Labour Court upholding the dismissal -Single Judge of High Court on a writ filed by the delinquent holding that the dismissal was disproportionate and therefore directing his reinstatement with continuity in service but without back wages - Division Bench dismissing the appeal - Validity - Whether dismissal was disproportionate to the act of misconduct. Allowing the appeal of the Corporation held that the employee having committed a serious misconduct of theft and admitted the same before the Labour Court and thus having lost the confidence of the employer, the High Court erred in considering the punishment of dismissal to be disproportionate to the act of misconduct. Order of Labour Court upholding the dismissal accordingly restored.
HELD
In our view, the theft committed by the respondent amounts to misconduct and, therefore, we have no hesitation to set aside the orders passed by the learned Single Judge and also of the Division Bench and restore the order of removal of the respondent from service. When the Labour Court has proved the charges, no interference by the learned Single Judge or by the Division Bench of the High Court was called for. In the instant case, the jurisdiction vested with the Labour Court has been exercised judiciously and fairly. In our opinion, the conclusion arrived at by the High Court in ordering reinstatement; continuity of service was shockingly disproportionate to the nature of charges already proved which is in the nature of theft. (Para 22)

It is also not open to the Tribunal and Courts to substitute their subjective opinion in place of the one arrived at the domestic Tribunal. In the instant case, the opinion arrived at by the Corporation was rightly accepted by the Tribunal but not by the Court. We, therefore, hold that the order of reinstatement passed by the Single Judge and the Division Bench of the High Court is contrary to the law on the basis of a catena of decisions of this Court. In such cases, there is no place for generosity or sympathy on the part of the judicial forums for interfering with the quantum of punishment of removal which cannot be justified. Similarly, the High Court can modify the punishment in exercise of its jurisdiction under Article 226 of the Constitution only when it finds that the punishment imposed is shockingly disproportionate to the charges proved. (Para 23)

Interfering therefore with the quantum of punishment of the respondent herein, is not called for. In our opinion, the respondent has no legal right to continue in the Corporation. As held by this Court, in a catena of judgments that the loss of confidence occupies the primary factor and not the amount of money and that sympathy and generosity cannot be a factor which is permissible in law in such matters. When the employee is found guilty of theft, there is nothing wrong in the Corporation losing confidence or faith in such an employee and awarding punishment of removal. In such cases, there is no place of generosity or place of sympathy on the part of the judicial forums and interfering with the quantum of the punishment. (Para 24)

For the aforementioned reasons, we hold that the orders passed by learned Single Judge and as modified and affirmed by the learned Judges of the Division Bench in Writ Appeal No. 108 of 2005 dated 29.06.2005 deserves to be set aside. Accordingly, we do so. (Para 25)


Dr. AR. Lakshmanan, J.

1. Leave granted.

2. The Department Manager A.P.S.R.T.C. is the appellant in this appeal. The respondent joined as cleaner in the A.P.S.R.T.C. (in short the Corporation) on 02.10.1976. While working as mechanic, he was involved in a serious case of theft. On 23/24.08.1986, while working in the night shift, he committed a theft of Fuel Injection Pump. This apart, he was also involved in stealing an alternator bearing while working in the night shift on 11.09.1986.

3. He also unauthorisedly entered into the tyre section of the depot and stole a new tube of 900 x 20 size on 23/24.09.1986. A sponge sheet was also stolen from the garage of Gajuwaka Depot, where he was working. A charge-sheet was issued to the respondent framing four charges.

4. The charges are as under:

1.For having stolen the Corporation property of fuel injection pump bearing No. AVD 2305 which was fitted to the engine No. 170207 during the night shift on 23/24.08.86 in the garage which constitutes misconduct under Reg. No. 28(x) of APSRTC Employees conduct, Reg.1963.

2. For having stolen the Corporation property of an alternator bearing No. 3440 during the night shift of 11.09.86 when it was fitted to the parked vehicle in the garage which constitutes misconduct under Reg. No. 28(x) of APSRTC Employees Conduct, Regulations, 1963.

3. For having unauthorisedly entered into the tyres section and stolen the new tube of 900 x 20 size on 23/24.09.86 which constitutes misconduct under Reg. No. 28(x) of APSRTC Employees Conduct, Regulations, 1963.

4. For having stolen the sponge sheets SR from the garage of Gajuwaka depot which constitutes misconduct under Reg. No. 28(x) of APSRTC Employees Conduct, Regulations, 1963.

5. An Enquiry Officer was appointed to enquire into the charges and submit a report. In the domestic enquiry conducted on the charges levelled against the respondent, full and fair opportunity was given to him to defend himself. The Enquiry Officer, on completion of the domestic enquiry, had submitted a report holding the respondent guilty of all the charges that were levelled against him.

6. A criminal case was also initiated against the respondent in C.C. No. 751/1987. The Criminal Court by its judgment and order dated 16.05.1987 acquitted the respondent of the charges that were levelled against him.

7. Basing on the Enquiry Officers report, the Depot Manager, on independently examining the matter, came to a conclusion that orders of removal would be an appropriate punishment for the proved charges of theft. Accordingly, the Depot Manager issued proceedings for removing the respondent from the services of the Corporation.

8. Aggrieved by the order of his removal, the respondent raised an Industrial Dispute. In I.D. No. 139/1992, the Labour Court came to the conclusion that the charges holding that the respondent was involved in a case of theft of the property belonging to the Corporation were correctly proved and the punishment of removal was justified under the factual circumstances of the case.

9. Aggrieved by the award of the Labour Court, the respondent preferred a writ petition before the High Court of Andhra Pradesh at Hyderabad.

10. The learned Single Judge of the High Court came to a conclusion that the charges of theft were correctly proved against the respondent. But, however, came to a conclusion that punishment of removal was not in consonance with the gravity of the charges proved against the respondent. Accordingly, the High Court held that the Labour Court ought to have exercised its power under Section 11A of the Industrial Disputes Act. Accordingly, the Single Judge held that the respondent had put in 12 years of unblemished service and deserved a lenient view in the matter. Hence, by his judgment and order dated 31.12.2004, the learned Single Judge passed a judgment by setting aside the order of removal and directed reinstatement of the respondent with continuity of service but without back wages.

11. The appellant - Corporation preferred a writ appeal before the Division Bench of the High Court under Clause 15 of Letters Patent.

12. By its impugned order dated 29.06.2005, the Division Bench of the High Court dismissed the writ appeal filed by the appellant herein. Aggrieved against the order passed by the Division Bench, the above civil appeal has been filed in this Court.

13. We heard Mr. Mahesh Babu, learned counsel for the appellant and Mr. Vijaya Bhaskar, learned counsel for the respondent. Learned counsel for the appellant submitted that the High Court has failed to appreciate that the misconduct of theft involved in by the respondent was a serious misconduct warranting no less a punishment than removal from services of the Corporation and that the High Court has also failed to appreciate that the delinquent employee gave a statement in which he admitted that he had stolen the property of the Corporation but handed over the same to his friend for sale, and that the Labour Court, on the basis of the said evidence, rightly removed the respondent from the services of the Corporation. Arguing further, learned counsel for the appellant submitted that the Division Bench of the High Court has also failed to appreciate that once the Labour Court in its award, passed orders of removal, by taking into consideration the entire factual circumstances of the case, it does not deserve interference. The High Court, in its extraordinary jurisdiction under Article 226 of the Constitution could not interfere with the said order of removal.

14. Mr. Vijaya Bhaskar, learned counsel for the respondent strenuously contended that the order passed by learned Single Judge and by the Division Bench of the High Court does not call for any interference and that the Division Bench of the High Court has ordered only reinstatement of the respondent without back wages and therefore the Corporation is not prejudiced in any manner. He further submitted that the respondent had put in 12 years of service and deserves a lenient view in the matter.

15. Learned counsel for the respondent further submitted that the respondent had an unblemished career in the past and therefore a lenient view should have been taken as rightly taken by the learned Single Judge and as modified by the Division Bench of the High Court in ordering only reinstatement.

16. We have carefully considered the rival submissions and perused the orders passed by the Labour Court and of the High Court and other annexures. In our opinion, the High Court has failed to appreciate that the delinquent employee categorically admitted that he had stolen the property of the Corporation. The Labour Court, on a careful perusal of the evidence, rightly ordered removal of the respondent from service. When the delinquent employee admitted his guilt before the Enquiry Officer that he had handed over the alternator from pan shop to the police authorities and further deposed that he had handed over the stolen property and requested the Labour Court to excuse him since it was his first offence. The Tribunal rightly set aside the request by taking into consideration the entire factual circumstances on record and after careful examination of the same and held that the delinquent employee does not deserve any sympathy and therefore he ordered removal from service.

17. Learned Single Judge of the High Court likewise also failed to appreciate the statement given by the delinquent employee admitting the guilt and however ordered reinstatement, continuity of service but without back wages.

18. Likewise, the learned Judges of the Division Bench also failed to appreciate that once the Labour Court in its award held removal from service by taking into consideration the entire facts and circumstances of the case, it does not deserve interference and that the High Court in its extraordinary jurisdiction under Article 226 of the Constitution could not have interfered with the said orders of the removal.

19. The enquiry reports also clearly reveal that the departmental enquiry was conducted after giving fair and reasonable opportunity to the delinquent official, after following the procedure and as per the regulations.

20. The learned Single Judge considered the past conduct of the delinquent employee as one of the ground in taking a lenient view. In our view, past conduct of workman is not relevant in departmental proceedings. Likewise, the learned Single Judge has erred in holding that the workman did not involve in any misconduct of theft during his past services and on that ground, granted reinstatement with continuity of service.

21. Learned Judges of the High Court have also failed to appreciate that once an employee lost the confidence of employer, it would not be safe and in the interest of the Corporation to continue the employee in the service. The punishment, imposed by the management in the facts and circumstances of the case, is not disproportionate and that the punishment of removal from service is the just and reasonable and proportionate to the proved misconduct.

22. In our view, the theft committed by the respondent amounts to misconduct and, therefore, we have no hesitation to set aside the orders passed by the learned Single Judge and also of the Division Bench and restore the order of removal of the respondent from service. When the Labour Court has proved the charges, no interference by the learned Single Judge or by the Division Bench of the High Court was called for. In the instant case, the jurisdiction vested with the Labour Court has been exercised judiciously and fairly. In our opinion, the conclusion arrived at by the High Court in ordering reinstatement; continuity of service was shockingly disproportionate to the nature of charges already proved which is in the nature of theft.

23. It is also not open to the Tribunal and Courts to substitute their subjective opinion in place of the one arrived at the domestic Tribunal. In the instant case, the opinion arrived at by the Corporation was rightly accepted by the Tribunal but not by the Court. We, therefore, hold that the order of reinstatement passed by the Single Judge and the Division Bench of the High Court is contrary to the law on the basis of a catena of decisions of this Court. In such cases, there is no place for generosity or sympathy on the part of the judicial forums for interfering with the quantum of punishment of removal which cannot be justified. Similarly, the High Court can modify the punishment in exercise of its jurisdiction under Article 226 of the Constitution only when it finds that the punishment imposed is shockingly disproportionate to the charges proved.

24. Interfering therefore with the quantum of punishment of the respondent herein, is not called for. In our opinion, the respondent has no legal right to continue in the Corporation. As held by this Court, in a catena of judgments that the loss of confidence occupies the primary factor and not the amount of money and that sympathy and generosity cannot be a factor which is permissible in law in such matters. When the employee is found guilty of theft, there is nothing wrong in the Corporation losing confidence or faith in such an employee and awarding punishment of removal. In such cases, there is no place of generosity or place of sympathy on the part of the judicial forums and interfering with the quantum of the punishment.

25. For the aforementioned reasons, we hold that the orders passed by learned Single Judge and as modified and affirmed by the learned Judges of the Division Bench in Writ Appeal No. 108 of 2005 dated 29.06.2005 deserves to be set aside. Accordingly, we do so.

26. In the result, the appeal filed by the appellant Corporation stands allowed and order of removal passed by the Labour Court is confirmed. However, there shall be no order as to costs.

**********', 3] , 
[ ' 
HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAW
Criminal Procedure Code, 1973
Section 31 - Conviction under Section 381 IPC and Section 52, Post Office Act, 1898 - Theft of a registered insured parcel containing Gold Chain - Chief Judicial magistrate, while awarding sentences under the two Acts, not mentioning whether they were to run concurrently or consecutively - Revision dismissed by High Court - Plea that court should invoke the power under Section 31 CrPC and allow sentences to run concurrently as both the offences were tried in one trial and arose out of one act, theft - Appellant 61 years old, suffering from heart ailment - Lost job - Incident of year 1993 - Gold chain recovered and handed out to owner. Held, on facts, sentences to run concurrently. Sawal Dass case relied upon.
HELD
This is a fit case where we can direct the sentences awarded to the appellant to run concurrently for the reasons that firstly, the case out of which this appeal arises relates to the year 1993 and is pending for a long period of 21 years; secondly, the two sentences, which were imposed on the appellant, arose out of one offence of theft punishable under Section 381 IPC tried in one trial; thirdly, the provisions of Section 52 of the IPO Act were required to be invoked against the appellant because he was the postal employee; fourthly, the Gold Chain was long recovered and also handed over to the person concerned; fifthly, the appellant has already been dismissed from services due to impugned conviction; and lastly, the appellant has been suffering from heart ailment since long, as is proved by documents filed along with the appellants affidavit 03.11.2014. (Para 21)

CASES REFERRED
1.Manoj @ Panu v. State of Haryana JT 2013 (15) SC 384 (Para 19)

2.State of Punjab v. Madan Lal JT 2009 (3) SC 326 (Para 19)

3.Chatar Singh v. State of M.P. 2006 12 SCC 37 (Para 19)

4.State of Maharashtra & Anr. v. Najakat Alia Mubarak Ali JT 2001 (Suppl.1) SC 279 (Para 18)

5.Mohd. Akhtar Hussain @ Ibrahim Ahmed Bhatti v. Assistant Collector of Customs (Prevention), Ahmedabad & Anr. JT 1988 (3) SC 586 (Para 17)

ABHAY MANOHAR SAPRE, J.

1. Leave granted.

2. This appeal is filed by the accused against the judgment and final order dated 25.04.2014 passed by the High Court of Karnataka at Bangalore in Criminal Revision Petition No. 924 of 2009 whereby the learned single Judge of the High Court dismissed the revision petition and upheld the order dated 23.09.2008/01.10.2008 passed by the XVII Additional Chief Metropolitan Magistrate, Bangalore in CC No. 2408 of 1995 convicting and sentencing the appellant-accused for the offences punishable under Section 381 of the Indian Penal

3. Facts of the case lie in a narrow compass.

4. The appellant-accused, at the relevant time, (1.3.1992 to 11.3.1993) was working as Sorting Assistant in Bangalore Packet Sorting Office, Head Record Office (Main Unit) at Bangalore. On the intervening night between 05.03.1993 and 06.03.1993, the appellant-accused while on duty committed theft of a registered insured parcel bearing receipt No. 0127 dated 03.03.1993 containing Gold Chain (V shape) weighing 173.650 Grams worth Rs. 70,410/- which was sent by its owner from Ramavadi Post Office, Bombay for being delivered to the consignee - Gulab Jewellery Shop at K.H.B. Road Post Office, Bangalore. The parcel thus could not be delivered to the party concerned though reached to Bangalore post office.

5. Mr. M.N. Narasimha Murthy-Assistant Superintendent of Bags (PW-1) in the office of Chief Post Master General of Karnataka, on coming to know of the missing of parcel and commission of the theft of the parcel, immediately lodged a complaint (Ex-P-1) in the High Grounds Police Station. The complaint was accordingly investigated which revealed complicity of the appellant in commission of its theft which led to registration of Crime Case No. 115/1993 against the appellant for the offences punishable under Sections 381 and 419 of IPC read with Section 52 of the IPO Act. The case was then handed over to the CBI. The CBI registered the case being RC No. 14(S)/93-BLR, which eventually led to filing of the charge-sheet against the appellant in the Court of XVII Additional Chief Metropolitan Magistrate, Bangalore for appellants prosecution for commission of aforementioned offences.

6. The appellant abjured the guilt and claimed the trial. The Chief Metropolitan Magistrate, by his order dated 23.09.2008/01.10.2008 passed in CC No 2408 of 1995 convicted the appellant for the offences punishable under Section 381 IPC and Section 52 of the IPO Act and sentenced him to undergo simple imprisonment for 6 months and to pay a fine of Rs. 2000/- under Section 381 IPC and in default of payment of fine amount to undergo further simple imprisonment for 3 months. Similarly, the appellant was also sentenced to undergo simple imprisonment for 6 months and to pay a fine of Rs. 2000/- for the offence punishable under Section 52 of the IPO Act and in default of payment of fine amount, to undergo further simple imprisonment of 3 months. So far as the offence punishable under Section 419 IPC was concerned, the appellant was acquitted of the charge.

7. It may be pertinent to mention that the Chief Judicial Magistrate while awarding the punishment for commission of two offences as mentioned above did not mention as to whether both the punishments will run concurrently or consecutively. In other words, the order of the Chief Judicial Magistrate in so far as it relates to the award of punishment was concerned it was silent, on this issue.

8. Feeling aggrieved by the order of conviction and sentence, the appellant filed an appeal being Criminal Appeal No. 845 of 2008 before the XXI Additional City Civil and Sessions Judge and Special Judge for CBI Cases, Bangalore. The appellate Judge, by his order dated 08.10.2009, confirmed the conviction and sentences awarded to the appellant and dismissed his appeal. Against the said order, the appellant preferred a revision being Criminal Revision Petition No. 924 of 2009 in the High Court. The High Court, by impugned order, dismissed the revision and in consequence upheld the conviction and sentences awarded to the appellant. It is against this order, the appellant- accused has filed this appeal by way of special leave.

9. While assailing the legality and correctness of the impugned order, learned Counsel for the appellant urged only one point. Learned Counsel, however, did not question the legality and correctness of the conviction on its merit and confined his challenge only to the sentences awarded to the appellant. According to him, the Courts below erred in not directing both the sentences awarded to the appellant, i.e., the one awarded under Section 381 IPC and the other awarded under Section 52 of the IPO Act to run concurrently. It was his submission that since both the offences which resulted in appellants conviction under two different Acts (IPC and IPO Act) were tried in one trial and arose out of one act namely- theft, this was a fit case where the Courts below should have directed both the sentences to run concurrently. Learned Counsel pointed out that in every case of this nature, it is the duty of the Court to specifically mention in the order of conviction as to whether the sentences awarded for the offences under the different sections would run concurrently or consecutively by taking recourse to the provisions of Section 31 of the Code of Criminal Procedure, 1973 (hereinafter referred to as the Code). Learned Counsel contended that in any event, having regard to the nature of offence committed by the appellant, his advanced age (61 years), the serious heart ailment suffered by him while undergoing the sentence duly proved by documents and the fact that he has already been dismissed from service due to his conviction, this Court should invoke the power under Section 31 of the Code and direct both the sentences, i.e., the one awarded under IPC and other awarded under IPO Act to run concurrently instead of to run consecutively.

10. In contra, learned counsel for the respondent- State supported the impugned judgment and submitted that no interference is called for in the impugned judgment.

11. Having heard the learned counsel for the parties and on perusal of the record of the case, we find force in the submissions made by the learned counsel for the appellant.

12. The question, which arises for consideration in this appeal, is whether the sentences awarded to the appellant under IPC and the IPO Act should run concurrently or consecutively?

13. The expressions concurrently and consecutively mentioned in the Code are of immense significance while

awarding punishment to the accused once he is found guilty of any offence punishable under IPC or/and of an offence punishable under any other Special Act arising out of one trial or more. It is for the reason that award of former enure to the benefit of accused whereas award of latter is detrimental to the accuseds interest. It is, therefore, legally obligatory upon the Court of first instance while awarding sentence to specify in clear terms in the order of conviction as to whether sentence awarded to the accused would run concurrently or they would run consecutively

14. Section 31 of the Code deals with power of the Court to award sentence in cases where the accused is convicted of several offences at one trial. It reads as under :

31. Sentence in cases of conviction of several offences at one trial.-

(1) When a person is convicted at one trial of two or more offences, the Court may, subject to the provisions of section 71 of the Indian Penal Code (45 of 1860), sentence him for such offences, to the several punishments prescribed therefor which such Court is competent to inflict; such punishments when consisting of imprisonment to commence the one after the expiration of the other in such order as the Court may direct, unless the Court directs that such punishments shall run concurrently.

(2) In the case of consecutive sentences, it shall not be necessary for the Court by reason only of the aggregate punishment for the several offences being in excess of the punishment which it is competent to inflict on conviction of a single offence, to send the offender for trial before a higher Court:

Provided that-

(a) in no case shall such person be sentenced to imprisonment for a longer period than fourteen years;

(b) the aggregate punishment shall not exceed twice the amount of punishment which the Court is competent to inflict for a single offence.

(3) For the purpose of appeal by a convicted person, the aggregate of the consecutive sentences passed against him under this section shall be deemed to be a single sentence.

15. The issue as to in which circumstances the Court should direct the sentences to run concurrently or consecutively after the accused is convicted of more than one offence in one trial or more has been the subject matter of several cases in this Court and thus remains no more res integra. This issue was considered by this Court while considering the scope of Sections 31, 427 and 428 of the Code and Section 71 of IPC.

16. We consider it apposite to refer to some of the decisions.

17. In Mohd. Akhtar Hussain @ Ibrahim Ahmed Bhatti v. Assistant Collector of Customs (Prevention), Ahmedabad & Anr. JT 1988 (3) SC 586 : 1988 (4) SCC 183, the accused was sentenced to undergo 7 years imprisonment and a fine of Rs. 10 lakhs was imposed for having found to be in possession of primary gold worth Rs.1.4 crores which was in violation of the Gold (Control) Act. He was subsequently indicted for infringing the provisions of Customs Act by smuggling gold valued at Rs. 12.5 Crores and exporting silver worth Rs. 11.5 Crores. The accused pleading guilty in commission of the offences was awarded 4 years imprisonment and also a fine. Both the sentences were directed to run consecutively. However, the State contended that the offence under the Customs Act merited the maximum sentence, while the accused contended that sentences should run concurrently. The High Court, however, enhanced the sentence as contended by the State and rejected the plea of the accused in regard to the award of sentences. This Court in an appeal filed by the accused accepted the plea raised by him and while allowing his appeal directed both the sentences to run concurrently by referring to Section 427 of the Code. The following observations made by this Court in paras 9 and 10 are apposite:

9. The section relates to administration of criminal justice and provides procedure for sentencing. The sentencing court is, therefore, required to consider and make an appropriate order as to how the sentence passed in the subsequent case is to run. Whether it should be concurrent or consecutive?

10. The basic rule of thumb over the years has been the so-called single transaction rule for concurrent sentences. If a given transaction constitutes two offences under two enactments generally, it is wrong to have consecutive sentences. It is proper and legitimate to have concurrent sentences. But this rule has no application if the transaction relating to offences is not the same or the facts constituting the two offences are quite different.

18. Likewise, a question arose before the three-judge Bench in State of Maharashtra & Anr. v. Najakat Alia Mubarak Ali JT 2001 (Suppl-1) SC 279 : 2001 (6) SCC 311, as to whether the accused convicted in two cases one after another was entitled to claim set off the period of detention during investigation, inquiry or trial from the sentence imposed on conviction in both the cases. While interpreting Section 428 of the Code, the majority of the judges answered the question in affirmative. While answering the question, Justice Thomas, speaking for majority of the Judges, made the following observations, which are pertinent.

17. In the above context, it is apposite to point out that very often it happens, when an accused is convicted in one case under different counts of offences and sentenced to different terms of imprisonment under each such count, all such sentences are directed to run concurrently. The idea behind it is that the imprisonment to be suffered by him for one count of offence will, in fact and in effect be imprisonment for other counts as well.

19. The aforesaid principle of law was relied upon by this Court in Chatar Singh v. State of M.P., 2006 (12) SCC 37 and State of Punjab v. Madan Lal JT 2009 (3) SC 326 : 2009 (5) SCC 238, and lastly recently in Manoj @ Panu v. State of Haryana JT 2013 (15) SC 384 : 2014 (2) SCC 153, wherein this Court taking recourse to Section 31 of the Code directed in somewhat similar facts that the sentences awarded to the accused to run concurrently in place of consecutively.

20. Keeping the aforesaid principle of law in mind and applying the same to the facts of this case in the light of powers available under Section 31 of the Code, we are of the considered opinion that both the sentences awarded to the appellant in the case at hand should run concurrently and this we do by invoking Section 31 which enables the Court to so direct.

21. In our considered opinion, this is a fit case where we can direct the sentences awarded to the appellant to run concurrently for the reasons that firstly, the case out of which this appeal arises relates to the year 1993 and is pending for a long period of 21 years; secondly, the two sentences, which were imposed on the appellant, arose out of one offence of theft punishable under Section 381 IPC tried in one trial; thirdly, the provisions of Section 52 of the IPO Act were required to be invoked against the appellant because he was the postal employee; fourthly, the Gold Chain was long recovered and also handed over to the person concerned; fifthly, the appellant has already been dismissed from services due to impugned conviction; and lastly, the appellant has been suffering from heart ailment since long, as is proved by documents filed along with the appellants affidavit 03.11.2014.

22. It is for all these reasons, in our considered opinion, the interest of justice would be sub-served by directing both the sentences awarded to the appellant to run concurrently. Since we have upheld the conviction, which was not challenged by the appellant in this appeal, the directions to run both the sentences concurrently can always be passed by the appellate Court because such directions are in the nature of consequential on and incidental to the affirmance of the conviction as held by this Court in the case reported in Sawal Das v. State of Bihar, 1975 3 SCC 156.

23. In the light of foregoing discussion, the appeal succeeds and is allowed in part. The conviction and sentences awarded to the appellant by the courts below for the offences punishable under Section 381 of IPC and Section 52 of the IPO Act are upheld. However, it is directed that both the sentences awarded to the appellant under IPC and IPO Act would run concurrently.

24. As a consequence, if the appellant has already undergone the period of sentence imposed on him he shall be released forthwith if not required in connection with any other case.

**********, 0 , 
CROSS CITATION
1965 SCR (1) 293

CRIMINAL APPELLATE JURISDICTION : Criminal Appeal No. 29 of 1963.

Appealby special leave from the judgment andorder dated December 13, 1962, of the Patna High Court in Government Appeal No. 24 of 1960.

Nuruddin Ahmed, B. P. Singh and U. P. Singh, for the appellants.

B. P. Jha, for respondent No. 1.

The Judgment of the Court was delivered by

Raghubar Dayal J. This appeal, by special leave, raises the question whether a person who seizes cattle illegally, purporting to act under S. 10 of the Cattle TrespassAct, 1871, hereinafter the Act, commits the offence of theft or robbery or not. The question arises in this way.

On the morning of November 28, 1957, a number of cattle belonging to several persons, including Shamnarain Singh, were observed by a number of persons,including Ramnandan Singh and Ram Rattan alias Ratan Ahir, grazing in a kurthi fieldabout which there was a dispute between the authorities of the Basic School and Shamnarain Singh each of them claiming the field. Ramnandan Singh and others seized those cattle and proceeded to take them to the pound at village Tilauthu. These persons were armed with sharp-edged weapons and lathis.

The report of the seizure of the cattle reached Shamnarain Singh and other people in the village.A number of people, variously armed, started from the village to rescue the cattle. They were joined by others on the way. This party, including Sukhari Mahto, Deocharan, Sheodutt, Hari Mahto and Ramdeo, caught up with the other party a short distance from the cattle pound and asked that party to release the cattle. Altercation took place between the parties and thenthey fought together. According to the prosecution case, members of the appellants 295 party attacked Shamnarain Singh and his companions. According to the appellants it was the other party which attacked them. As a result of the fight five persons got injured on the side of Shamnarain Singh. Of them, Ramdeo got one gaping punctured wound in the right thigh with a spear. He died as a result of the injury received. Sukhari Mahto received 16 injuries including 4 incised wounds. The other three injured persons received ordinary injuries. Deocharan had an abrasion, Sheodutt Singh got a lacerated wound, a swelling and an abrasion and Hari Mahto hada lacerated wound. On the side of the appellants, fourpersons got injured. Ramnandan Singh received 12 injuries, including 4 incised wounds and 3 punctured wounds.Ratan Ahir got three injuries including 2 punctured wounds. Sheorattan got 5 injuries including 2 punctured wounds.Rajkumar Singh got 2 injuries including one punctured wound.

Reports were made at the police station on behalf of the two parties. Hari Mahto lodged a report on behalf of the complainantparty against 20 persons. Ratan Ahir lodged a reportagainst 26 persons. The police, as a result of investigation, sent up 28 persons for trial. The Additional Sessions Judge, Arrah, acquitted all of them. He found that (1) Shamnarain Singh was in, lawful possession of the kurthi field in question on the date of occurrence and that the supposed claim thereto raised on behalf of the defence was not in good faith; (2) the cattle were seized in the presence of the charwahas in spite of their protest; (3) even though the seizure of the cattle from the kurthi field by the accused party in these circumstances was an unlawful act, the conduct of the complainant-party, who were fully armed, in following them in order to release the cattle, was not justified as it showed a determination on their part to get their cattle released by use of force and that therefore there did not exist any right on the part of the owners of the cattle to the extent of securing the release of their cattlefrom the hands of those who had seized them earlier by use of force; (4) there was strong Probability in favour of the view that it was the prosecution-party which created the crisis and took the aggression to initiate the assault and that the prosecution narration as to the manner in which the assault commenced at the scene of occurrence where the assault took place, did not commend itself to him andthat part of the prosecution story appeared tosufferfrom material Suppression, and that, in these circumstances, the accused party had the reasonable apprehension of suffering grievous hurt or death at the hands of the prosecution party and they were justified in the exercise of their right of private defence of their bodies in 296 causing such injuries to the men on the prosecution side as might cause death, the death so caused being justifiable homicide.

The State of Bihar appealed against the acquittal of the 28 accused. The High Court allowed the appeal against 13 respondents and convicted Ratan Ahir under S. 302 I.P.C. and the others under s. 326 read with s. 149 I.P.C. and ofsome other offences. It may be mentioned thatone of the respondents had died and 14 others were acquitted. The High Court agreed with the Sessions Judge that the plot insuit was in the possession of Shamnarain Singh and that the seizure of the cattle by the accused-party was illegal. The learned Judges, however, were of opinion that the Sessions Judge had taken a wrong view of the law in thinking that the members of the prosecution party were not entitled to rescue the cattle by gleans of force only because the respondents had succeeded in taking away the cattle for some distance. They held that once the seizure of cattle was found to be illegal, members of the accused party were in the position of thieves-rather dacoits-when they had seized the cattle by show of force to the cowherd boys, and that therefore the members of the prosecution party had the right of private defence of property and could recover their cattle by use of force,subject to the limitation that force in excess of what was necessary be not used. It also found that the prosecution party, in their attempt to rescuethe cattle. had been violently attacked by the party of the accused. The learned Judges probably did not agree with the view of the Sessions Judge that the attackwas opened by the prosecution party as there was no material in support of the view on the record, but held that even the opening of the attack by the prosecution party would not give any justification to thedefence party for it was bound to defend itself in the act of rescuing the cattle.

To consider the question of law raised in this appeal, we accept the findings of the High Court to the effect that the plot in suit was in the possession of Shamnarain Singh, that the appellants and others seized the cattle grazing inthat plot alleging that they were damaging their crops andthat they would take them to the pound, that Shamnarain Singh and othersarmed, went to rescue the cattle and on meeting the accused partyasked them to release the cattle andthat after some altercation the accused party opened the attack.

It is not disputed-and it has been alleged from thevery beginning in the reports lodged by both the parties-that the appellants and others had seized the cattle allegingthat they 297 were damaging their crops. It follows that they purported to seize the cattle in pursuance of the provisions of s. 10 of the Act. In view of the finding that the plot was in possession of Shamnarain Singh and that he had raised the crop, such seizure was illegal. It is thus that the question arises whether by so seizing the cattle the appellants committed the offence of theft. It is necessary to determine this point as it is only when the appellants and others had committed the offence of theft in so seizing the cattle that any right of private defenceof property arises in favour of Shamnarain Singh and his party whowent to rescue the cattle. If the act ofthe appellants and othersdid not amount to theft, they committed no offence and therefore no right of private defence of property arose in favour of Shamnarain Singh and others as such a right arises against the commission of an offence as defined in s. 40I.P.C. i.e., an act which amounts to a thingmade punishable by the Code. It may be mentioned that no other offence is alleged to have been committed by the appellants and others which would have given the right of private defence of property to Shamnarain Singh and others.

To determine the question raised, it is desirable to refer to the provisions of the Act in order to findwhat actions of the appellants would be in accordance with its provisions, what would be against them and to whatthey would be liable if they acted against such provisions. Section 10 authorizes certain persons having interest in the crops grown on any land to seize or cause to be seized cattle trespassing on it and doing damage thereto or to any crop or produce thereon. It requires them to send the cattle so seized, within 24 hours, to the pound established for the village in which the land is situate. It further provides that all officers of police shall, when required, aid in preventing resistance to such seizuresand rescues from persons making such seizures.

Section 11authorises certain persons to seize cattle which damage public roads, canals, embankments and other thingsmentioned in that section. Section 12 provides for the levy of fine for every head of cattle impounded.

Chapter V deals with complaints of illegal seizure or detention, and has four sections, ss. 20 to 23. Section 20 reads:

Power to make complaints. Any person whose

cattle have been seized under this Act, or,

having been so

298

seized, have been detained in contravention of

this Act, may, at any time within tendays

from the date of the seizure, make a complaint

to the Magistrate of the District or any

Magistrate authorized to receive and try

charges without reference by the Magistrate of

the district.

Section 21 deals with the procedure onsuch

complaint and S. 22 reads:

Compensation for illegal seizure or

detention. If the seizure or detention be

adjudgedillegal, the Magistrate shall award

to the complainant, for the loss caused by the

seizure or detention, reasonable compensation,

not exceeding one hundred rupees, to be paid,

by the person who made the seizure or detained

the cattle, together with all fines paid and

expenses incurred by the complai

nant in

procuring the release of the cattle.

Release of cattle. And, if thecattlehave

not been released, the Magistrate shall,

besides awarding such compensation, order

their release, and direct that the fines and

expenses leviable under this Act shall be paid

by the person who made the seizure or detained

the cattle.

Section 23 provides that the compensation and expensesmentionedin s.22 maybe recovered as if they were fines imposed by the Magistrate.

Section 24 provides penaltyfor forcibly opposing the seizure of cattle liable to be seized under the Act or for rescuing such cattle after seizure, either from a pound or from any person taking or about to take them to a pound. The punishment on conviction is not to exceedsix months imprisonment or a fine of five hundred rupees.

TheAct does not make the illegal seizure of cattle punishable asan offence. The person seizing cattle illegally is made liable to pay compensation for theloss caused to the owner of the cattle on account of the illegal seizure of cattle or of detaining the cattle in contravention of the Act. He is also liableto pay the fine-, and expenses paid in procuring release of the cattle. The expression under this Act in S. 20 does not mean in accordance with the provisions of the Act but means purporting to be in accordance with the provisions of the Act as seizure under the Act i.e., seizure in accordance with the provisions of the 299 Act could never be illegal, and S. 20 deals with complaints of illegal seizure or detention. The expression used in S. 24 isdifferent and makes the forcible opposition of the seizure of cattle punishable when the cattleseizedwere liableto be seized under the Act. If the cattle were not liableto be seized, forcible opposition to their seizure would not be punishable under s. 24.

Section 25 of the Act provides a mode for the recovery of penalty for mischief committed bycausing cattle to trespass. Itthus takes notice of the offence under the Penal Code committed by the person who causes cattle to trespass on others land, and provides that any fine imposed for the commission of that offence can be recovered bysale of all or any of the cattle by which trespass was committed, whether those cattle were seized in the act of trespassing or not and whether they were the property of the person convicted of the offence or were only in his charge when the trespass was committed.

Section 26, inter alia, provides for penalty for damage causedby pigs through neglect or otherwise to crops etc., or public roads or damage by cattle generally if the State Government so notifies.

Section 29 expressly provides that nothingin the Act prohibits any person whose crops or other produce ofland have been damaged by trespass of cattle from suing for compensation in any competent Court, and S. 30 provides that any compensation paid to such person under the Act by order of the convicting Magistrate shall be set off and deducted from any sum claimed by or awarded to him as compensation in such suit. There is no provision in the Act for the award of compensation to the person whose crops or other produce of land had been damaged by trespass of cattle. Section 30, therefore, appears to refer to the award of compensation to such person under S. 545 Cr. P.C. by the Magistrate convicting the person, whose cattle had caused damage, of the offence of mischief under the Penal Code or of the offences under ss. 24 and 26 of the Act.

TheAct has not any provision,comparable to the provisions ofss. 29 and 30, stating that a person whose cattlehad been illegally seized or detained may sue for compensation in a competent Court and thatcompensation awarded by the Magistrate under s. 22 of the Act be deducted from any sum awarded to him in such proceedings. The Act does not make the illegal seizure or detention of cattle an offence.

It appearsthat the legislatureintended that the provisions of Chapter V of the Actwoulddeal comprehensively with the 300 case of illegal seizures or detentions of cattle andthat the remedy available to a person whose cattle had been so seized or detained would be the one provided by S. 22 of the Act and no other and that illegal seizure or detention of cattlewould amount to no offence under thePenal Code. There appears to be good reason for this as the object of the Act was the protection of crops and other produce of land from the damage by cattle trespassing on the land and of the cultivators and occupiers of land from consequent loss and injury.

The Cattle Trespass Act of 1871 was enacted to consolidate and amend the law relating to trespass by cattle. The first CattleTrespass Act was Act ITT of 1857 and its preamble reads:

Whereasloss and injury aresuffered by

cultivators and occupiers of land from damage

done to crops and other produce of land by the

trespass of cattle; and whereas damage is done

to the sides and slopes of public roads and

embankments by cattle trespassing thereon; and

whereas it is expedient to authorize the

seizure and detention of cattle doing damage

as aforesaid and also to make provision for

the disposal of cattle found straying in any

public place : It is enacted as follows:

Section II of the 1857 Act empowered the cultivator or occupier of any land to seize or cause to be seized any cattle trespassing on his land and doing damage to anycrop or produce thereon. Section 10 of the Act gave such right to other persons is well. It did not however give the right to seize cattle damaging the crops to everyone who might noticethe cattle damaging the crops.Though the power to seize cattle trespassing on a persons land was givenonly when the cattle were damaging the land or the crop the,-eon, it should have been considered a difficult matter for the person authorized to seize cattle to determine first whether the cattle had caused damage to his land or crop and thereafter to seize them. The person so authorized would instinctively first seize the cattle on his land presuming that they must have damaged the crop or the land andthat any further presence of the cattle in the field without their being seized would lead to further damage. Further, s. 10of the Act directs all officers of police,when required to do so, to aid in preventing resistance tosuch seizures and rescues from persons making such seizures. The personseizing the cattle is thus given police protection. Me police officers required to aidwould not, in the circumstances, be 301 determining, before rendering aid, whether the seizure of cattle Was legal Or not. They haveto prevent resistance to seizures

and rescue of cattle from persons making seizures if they are called upon by the persons seizing the cattle to prevent

resistance, to the seizure or the rescue. This emphasizes the view that seizures of cattle whether legal or illegal are protected from interference. The remedy of the person whose cattle are illegally seized is contained in the provisions of Chapter V.

In view of these realisticconsiderations, the person happening to seize the cattle which had not actually caused damagewas considered to be acting underthe Act as expressed in S. 20, so that no action not authorized by the Act be taken against him for conduct which be not strictly legal. At the same time the interest of the person whose cattleare seized even when they had not caused damage to the crop had to be protected.It was also bound to happen at times that persons not authorized to seize cattle in the exercise of their larger duty to the people whose crops were being damaged,, may be inclined to take action against the cattlethey might notice damaging the crops. Such persons would be actuated by good intentions., but actuallythey would not be acting in accordance with the provisions of the Act and might be liable for damages in civil courts or possibly alsocriminally if the seizure of cattle could amountto an offence under the Penal. Code or any other law. It was on a balancing of the interest of the persons purporting toseize the cattle to protect crops and the interest of the owners of the cattle that these provisions of Chapter V seem to have been made.

In view of these considerations, we are of opinion that the provisions of Chapter V comprehensively deal with the cases of such seizure of cattle which had been seized in the exercise of the power conferred by the Act or in furtherance of its objects though not in full accordance with the provisions ofthe Act. In view of these considerations based on the provisions of the Act it does not appearthat illegal seizure of cattle by persons. purporting to act in accordance with the provisions of the Act could be an offence of theft under the Penal Code. We arrive at the same conclusion by a scrutiny of the provisions of the Penal Code.

We may now consider what acts constitute the offence of theft under the Penal Code. Theft is defined in s. 378 thus:

Whoever, intending to take dishonestly any

movable property out of the possession of any

person 302

without that persons consent, movesthat

property in.. order to such taking, is said to

commit theft.

This Court had occasion to consider at lengthwhat commission of theft consists of, in K. N. Mehra v. The State of Rajasthan(1). It said at p. 630:

Commission of theft, therefore, consists in

(1) moving a movable property of a person out

of his possession without his consent, (2) the

moving being in order to the taking of the

propertywith a dishonest intention. Thus,

(I) the absence of the persons consent at the

time ofmoving, and (2) thepresence of

dishonest intention in so taking and at the

time, are the essential ingredients of the

offence of theft.

At p. 631 it said :

It is rightly pointed out that since the

definition of theft requires that the moving

of the property is to be in order tosuch

taking, such meaningintending totake

dishonestly the very moving out must bewith

the dishonest intention.

After stating the provisions of ss. 23 and 24 of the Indian Penal Code, this Court said:

Taking these two definitionstogether, a

person can be said to have dishonest intention

if in taking the property it is his intention

to cause gain,by unlawful means, of the

property to which the person so gaining is not

legally entitled or to cause loss, by wrongful

means, of property to which the person so

losing is legally entitled. It is further

clear from the definition that the gain or

loss contemplated need not be a total

acquisition or a total deprivation but it is

enough if it is a temporary retention of

property by the person wrongfully gaining or a

temporary keeping out of property from the

person legally entitled. This is clearly

brought out in illustration (1) to s. 378 of

the Indian Penal Code.... 

The Court did not express an opinion with respect to the submission that the Penal Code makes a distinction between intention to cause a particular result and knowledge or likelihood of causing a particular result and that the maxim that every person must be taken tointendthe natural consequence of his act is a

(1) 1957 S.C.R. 623.

303 legal fiction which is not recognized for penal consequences in the Indian Penal Code.

Till the property is moved, no offence of theft can becommittedeven if the alleged offender had intended totake dishonestly the property out of the possession of any other personwithout his consent. Mere seizure of cattle found trespassing on land does not amount to movingthe cattle. The act Of moving the cattle would be subsequent to seizing them.It follows therefore that theseizure of cattle, though illegal, cannot amount to the offence of theft. It is after the seizure of cattle that the person seizing them moves them in order to take them to the pound.This act of taking them to the pound is what he is directed to do by the Act, Section 10 specifically directs so. Of course, the direction is in regard to the cattle seized for damaging the land or crop, but the same direction will be deemed to be operative when the cattle are seized in the purported exercise of the right to seize them under s. 10 of theAct, specially when s. 20 speaks of such seizure as being under the Act. An act done in accordance with the provisions of the Act cannot be considered, prima facie, to be a dishonest act, and would not justify the conclusion that the taking of the cattle to the pound amounted to the offence of theft. A person is said to do a thing dishonestly when hedoes anything with the intention of causing wrongful gain to one personor wrongful loss to another person. In the case of illegal seizures andimpounding ofcattle, the person seizing the cattle does not gain anything. He simply takes the cattle to the pound. He does not use them for his purpose. He, in fact, exercises no greater dominionover those cattle than that of being in their custody on their journey to the pound.It is said that it causes wrongful loss to the owner of the cattle inasmuch as he keeps the owner out of possession of the cattle as he was wrongfully deprived; of the property for the time being, it being not necessary that the deprivation of property be of a permanent character. We do not think that in such circumstances, the owner of thecattle can be said to be deprived of his property. The person seizing the cattle can act in either of these three ways. He can keep, them himself. Thismay, in certain circumstances, make him guilty of theft. He can let them loose after taking them out of the field.This action will not remove the danger of the cattle trespassing again on the land. He can take them to the pound.. 304 In so doing he not only acts as directed by the Act but also in the interests of both himself and the owner of the cattle. He avoids the risk of further harm to himself and protects the interest of the owner by having the cattle in safe custody and keeping them from doing any further damage to anyones land or crop. The owner can get back the cattle from the pound on payment of the fine andexpenses in accordance with the provisions of S. 15 of ,theAct. Whatever he would have to pay forgetting the cattle released, he can reimburse himself by suitable action under S. 20of the Act, as the Magistrate dealing with his complaint is empowered under S. 22 to order the payment of finesand expenses paid by him in addition to the compensation for any loss that he suffers. The owner of the cattle illegally seized is thus not only reimbursed for the fine and expenses which he paid but also for any lossthat he has suffered on account of illegal seizure. This means that in the ultimate analysis the owner ofthe cattle, seized illegally, suffers no loss and that therefore the act of illegal seizure of cattle does not cause any wrongful loss to the owner of the cattle. It follows that the person seizing cattle purporting to act under the provisions of the Act does not cause any wrongful loss to the owner of the cattle.

Even if it be assumed that some sort of loss which is wrongful in nature is caused to the owner of the cattle by illegal seizure and impounding them, the question arises whether the person seizing the cattle illegally from a field with the avowed object of taking them to the pound on the groundthat it was damaging the field or the crop can be imputed the intention to take the cattle dishonestly. The effect of his seizing the cattle illegally may be assumed to cause wrongful loss to the owner of the cattle, but did he so intend? We are of opinion that he did not so intend. His intention at the time, though based on his wrong notions that he was entitled to seize the cattle, was to takethem to the poundas required by the Act so that no further damagebe done to the land or property. It is truethat intention is mostly gathered from the consequences of the act committed by the accused but that is so because it is not often that the intention with which an act is committed can be definitely known from any previous fact. When a person does a certain act by openly expressing his intention in committingthe act there seemsno reason why his intention should be gathered by the consequences of his act exceptin those cases where it is found that the avowed intention was a mere cloak for some other real 305 intention which is then to be determined in the same way as it is determined in cases of non-expressed intention. In view of the various considerations mentioned above, we are of opinion that when a person seizes cattle on the groundthat they were trespassing on his landand causing damageto his crop or produce and gives out that he was takingthem to the pound, he commits no offence of theft however mistaken he may be about his right to that land or crop. The remedy of the owner of the cattle so seized is to take action under S. 20 of the Act. He has no right to use force to rescue the cattle so seized.

We may now briefly consider the cases referred to in support of the contention that illegal seizure of cattle amounts to theft. These cases were not of the seizure and impounding of cattle in, the purported exercise of the powers under s. 10 ofthe Act. They are: Queen v. PreonathBanerjee(1); Wazuddi v. Rahimuddi(2) ; Abdul Khaliq v. Emperor ( 3) ; ParyagRai v. Arju Mian(4); Queen Empress v. Sri Churn Chungo(5). In these cases seizure of cattle was notmade even ostensibly on account of their causing, damage to any land or crop. They were seized and taken away by persons in order to get their claims against the owners satisfied, or in order to cause them loss otherwise. Suchseizures of cattle, was rightly held to amount to theft.

On the other hand there are cases which held that no offence is committed by a person seizing cattle illegally. In Empress v. Ramjiawan(6) it was held that illegal seizure of cattleunder the Act was not an offence of mischief under the Penal Code and, that the, remedy of the owner of the cattlewas to be found in the provisions of ss. 20, 21 and 22. In Dayal v. Emperor(7) persons who had seized cattle from, a pound and impounded them in retaliation of the action of the owners of the cattle in justifiably impounding their cattle a day earlier, were held not to have committed the offence of mischief under s. 425 T.P.C. inasmuch asdriving the cattleto the pounddid not in any way lead to the diminution in the utility or value of the cattle and not to have committed the offence of theft as no wrongful loss was causedto the owners of cattle even though they wouldhave had to incur expenses in order to get them released. (1) 5 W.R. 68 (criminal).

(3) A.I.R. 1941 Lah. 221.

(5) I.L.R. 22 Cal. 1017.

(2) (1917) 18 Crl. L.J. 849.

(4) I.L.R. 22 Cal. 139.

(6) 1881 1 All. W.N. 158.

(7) A.I.R. 1943 Oudh. 280. 306 We therefore hold that in the circumstances of this case, Rattan and others, appellants, who had seized the cattle from the .disputed field committed no offence of thefteven if they had no right to that fieldand that therefore Shamnarain Singh and others who went armed with sharp-edged weapons and lathis to rescue the cattle had no right of defence of their property, against Rattan and others. The learned Sessions Judge was inclined to the viewthat Shamnarain Singhs party was the aggressor. The view cannot be said to be unreasonable even though the prosecution witnesses did not actually state so. The circumstances of the case, however, indicate that normally Shamnarain Singhs party would have been the aggressors.It is they whowere aggrieved atthe conduct of Rattan andothers and deliberately followed those persons in order to rescue their cattleand therefore would have, in that state of temper. started the attack.

The fact that four persons in Rattans party receivedmore injuries thanfive persons in Shamnarains party and the numberof serious injuries was also larger on theirside support this view. These four persons received 8 punctured wounds and 4 incised wounds out of the total of 26 injuries on them all. The five persons on Shamnarains side received 22 injuries which included only one punctured wound, the only one on Ramdeo deceased, and 4 incised wounds on Sukhari Mahto.

Even if Shamnarain Singhs party were not the aggressors and the attack was started by the party of Rattan, as appears to be the view of the High Court, that would not give any right of private defence of person to Shamnarains party as Rattan and others could have apprehended, in the circumstances, that Shamnarains party was not peacefully inclined and would use force against them in order to rescue the cattle and that the force likely to be used could cause grievous hurt. We are of opinion that Rattan and others, appellants, committed no offencein causing injuries to persons in Shamnarains party and in causing the death of Ramdeo who was in that party. We accordingly allow theappeal, set aside the conviction of Rattan Ahir under s. 302 I.P.C. and of others under s. 326 I.P.C. and also their conviction of the other offences they were convicted of. They will be released forthwith from custody.

Appeal allowed. 307
**********, 0 , 
HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAWS
Penal Code, 1860
Sections 302, 380 read with Section 34 - Murder of land-lady - Recovery of her husbands (PW1s) wrist watch pursuant to appellants disclosure statement - Appellant was the only inmate with deceased present when the incident took place - Both accused convicted under Section 302, 380/34 by trial court - Whether appellants conviction was justified in view of first accuseds acquittal by High Court when said first accused had allegedly strangulated deceased - No appeal by State against his acquittal. Held, merely because both accused were seen with deceased by PWs 3 & 4 in the morning of the date of incident and were not seen for two days thereafter, does not show that appellant authored the crime. As per prosecution first accused had strangulated deceased. First accused had left for village after receiving information about his mothers illness and appellant too had gone to his home from where he was arrested later. Thus they were not absconders as alleged. Sunil Kundus case referred.
HELD
None of the circumstances by itself would lead to the irresistible conclusion that the appellant herein is the author of the crimes under Sections 302 and 380 IPC. It is in evidence of PWs 3 and 4 -the key witnesses that apart from the appellant, one Ranjit Roy was also seen in the house of the deceased and, according to prosecution also, as noted in their report, it was Ranjit Roy-accused no.1 who quietly put a strip of cloth round the neck of the deceased and strangulated her. It is in evidence that both the accused belonged to New Jalpaiguri. It is the case of the prosecution itself that the first accused had received a message on the evening of 5.7.2001 that his mother was seriously ill and she was at home. PW-13 Kakulay does not support the case of the prosecution that she had seen the accused in the afternoon of 4th July, 2001 as proceeding to Siliguri. She is specific and categoric of that date because it was the first death anniversary of her father-in-law. The accused were in fact not absconding. They had gone to their native place New Jalpaiguri and they were arrested from their respective homes only. (Para 9)

On the only ground that the accused was seen with the deceased in the morning of the date of incident and that they were not seen in that place for another two days, cannot, by themselves, lead to the conclusion that it is the appellant who authored the crime. (Para 13)

To abscond means, go away secretly or illegally and hurriedly to escape from custody or avoid arrest. Accused had told others that they were from their place of work at Gangtok to their home at New Jalpaiguri. They were admittedly taken into custody from their respective houses only, at New Jalpaiguri on the third day of the incident. Therefore, it is difficult to hold that the accused had been absconding. (Para 14)

Evidence Act, 1872
Sections 8, 27 - Murder - Motive - Recovery of deceaseds husbands (PW1s) wrist watch pursuant to appellants disclosure statement - Whether could be a basis of conviction - Whether theft was the motive behind murder - Delay of 10 days in effecting recovery - Neither disclosure nor seizure supported by witnesses - As per recovery memo wrist watch handed over to police by appellants mother whereas as per disclosure statement appellant had concealed the same in his house - How mother was in possession of the watch and why it was recovered through her when appellant was available, not explained - His mother also not examined - Neither PW1 nor deceaseds sons, PWs 2 & 3 ever stated about theft of watch and cash - Jewelry worn by deceased was also not stolen. Held, recovery, on the basis of which conviction was recorded by High Court, was doubtful and hence conviction cannot be sustained. Motive also could not be proved. Madhu v. State of Kerala referred.
HELD
The conviction of the appellant is by placing reliance solely on the recovery of the wrist watch. It is faulty in procedure and, apart from that, the same does not infuse any confidence in the mind of the Court in the given circumstances, when pitted against the rest of the evidence, that the appellant committed the murder with the motive of theft. There is no explanation for the delay of about ten days in effecting recovery. The owner of the wrist watch-PW1 does not have a case that his wrist watch had been stolen by the appellant. That version is not also supported by the children of the deceased. They have no case of theft of wrist watch or cash. (Para 20)

Exhibit P5-recovery memo says that the wrist watch had been handed over to the investigating officer by the mother of the appellant. However, Exhibit P6-disclosure statement recorded on 12.07.2001 which has already been extracted above, though, not admissible as such, states that the appellant had kept the wrist watch in his house at New Jalpaiguri and that he could handover the same to the police. The investigating officer examined as PW16 states that the wrist watch was recovered from the house of the appellant. It is not explained as to how the mother of the appellant came into custody of the wrist watch which had been allegedly kept in concealment by the appellant in his house. She was not examined. Yet another significant aspect is that the disclosure statement-Exhibit P6 is made only on 12.07.2001, after five days of the incident and yet the recovery is effected only on 17.07.2001. The witnesses to the disclosure statement as well as seizure memo PWs 11 and 12 have very clearly stated in their evidence that their signatures were obtained on some papers which had already been filled up by the police and that no statement had been given by the appellant in their presence. (Para 11)

If the motive for the accused in committing the murder of Manorama Devi was theft, it is again difficult to understand why the accused did not remove any ornaments worn by the deceased. (Para 15).

Section 302, 380 read with section 34 - Conviction under - Acquittal of one of the accused, who allegedly strangulated deceased - Whether is a ground to acquit the other as ground of common intention disappears. Held, if there is independent evidence against other accused, he cannot be acquitted. Krishna Govind Patils case referred. (Para 17)

CASES REFERRED
1.Raja v. State JT 2013 (11) SC 439 (Para 19)

2.Sunil Kundu v. State of Jharkhand JT 2013 (6) SC 599 (Para 14)

3.Madhu v. State of Kerala JT 2012 (1) SC 181 (Para 15)

4.Amrita alias Amritlal v. State of M.P. JT 2004 (2) SC 295 (Para 18)

5.Krishna Govind Patil v. State of Maharashtra AIR 1963 SC 1413 (Para 17)

KURIAN, J.

1. Appellant is the second accused in Criminal Case No. 31 of 2001 on the file of the Sessions Judge, Sikkim at Gangtok. He was charged along with one Ranjit Roy under Sections 302, 380 read with Section 34 of the Indian Penal Code (45 of 1860) (hereinafter referred to as IPC). According to the prosecution:

These two accused persons were already in need of money for their expenses as Durga Roy (Burman) had already borrowed much cash from his master Sujit Basak before completing his works and he had nothing to get from his master for few days. The money problem became more serious when on 5.7.2001 the accused person received telephonic call from the father of Ranjit Roy stating that his mother is seriously ill at home and he should return home immediately. That night both the accused persons slept late discussing about their monetary problems. Next day (i.e. 6.7.2001) in the morning, Ranjit Roy went to the rented room. Shibu Barman had already left for his job. After some time Durga Roy (Barman) also arrived in the room. Both of them were under the strong impression that Lalan Prasad had enough money in his house as he was engaged in lottery business and both his sons were also working. Therefore, the two accused persons made a plan to steal money from Lalan Prasads house as he was already left for job.

The accused persons had hot discussion with Raju Kumar, elder son of deceased in connection with use of bathing soap for toilet purposes. By 0900 hrs, both the sons also left for their daily works. Then only the deceased Manorama Devi remained in the house besides the two accused persons. The two accused persons decided to kill the deceased Manorama Devi in order to steal money from her house as she was the only person present in the house. Deceased Manorama Devi was inside the room of her sons when accused Durga Roy (Barman) pretended to talk to her, thereby diverting her mind. At that moment, the other accused Ranjit Roy came from his room bringing a strip (sic) of cloth and quietly went behind the deceased Manorama Devi and on getting the opportunity, the accd. Ranjit Roy quietly put the strip round the neck of the deceased and strangulated her. As the victim became unconscious, he encircled the ligature twice on her neck and tightly made a knot on the back of the neck (sic) as a result she died on the spot due to strangulation by ligature. Then leaving the dead body on the floor, the accused persons searched the house and took away one wrist watch SITCO and cash Rs.2300/- and fled away from P.O. At about 1200 hrs, the accused persons were seen by one Mrs. Kakulay Biswas w/o. Parusotham Biswas, at Tenzing and Tenzing, Gangtok going towards Deorali side. Accused Durga Roy, who was known to her, told her that they were going home. Then they never came back to Gangtok.

(Emphasis supplied)

2. It is thus further case of the prosecution that the appellant herein made Exhibit P6-disclosure statement while in custody on 12.07.2001:

My true statement is that on 6/7/01 Friday that the Watch which I had stolen after murdering the Lottery Sellers wife, I have kept the same in NJP. I can hand over the said Watch to Police. I have kept the said Watch in homes at NJP.

Sd/-
(illegible)
Accused Durga Roy
Witness
1) BRIJ KISHORE PRASAD,
S/o. Ram Janam Prasad,
Basantpur Near Police Station,
Dist. Sewan, Bihar,
A/P. R.N. Chamling Building Sd/-
Brij Kishore Prasad
M.G. Marg, gangtok, Ext.P-6(a)
Occupation : Lottery Agent.
2) TASHI TSHERING BHUTIA
S/o. Tensang Bhutia Sd/-
Dalep Busty, Kewzing SJ (E/N)
South Sikkim Gangtok
A/P Rajya Sainik Board,
Palger Stadium Road, Sd/-
Gangtok Tashi
Occupation : Lottery Seller Ext.P6(b)
Sd/-
SJ (E/N)
Recorded by
Sd/- Ex.P6(c)
(P.M. Rai) Sd/-
Police Inspector SJ (E/N)
Sadar P.S.
Gangtok

3. On the basis of above disclosure made on 12.7.2001, recovery of the watch was made on 17.07.2001, as per Annexure-P5 memo. The two witnesses in Exhibit P6 are witnesses to the seizure also. The Sessions Court, as per judgment dated 31.12.2002, convicted both the accused under Section 302/380/34 IPC.

4. In appeal, the High Court of Sikkim, by judgment dated 15.12.2003, acquitted the first accused Ranjit Roy for the following reasons:

12. At this stage, it is relevant to state that the appellants were charged under section 302/34 IPC and have been found guilty thereunder. To invoke the aid of section 34 IPC, it is necessary that the criminal act complained against was done in furtherance of the common intention of all the accused persons. The common intention implies prior meeting of mind. It can also be formed suddenly at the spot. The prosecution has not laid any evidence on this score.

So far as appellant no.1 Ranjit Roy is concerned, there is no evidence against him except that in the morning on the date of occurrence he was present in the house of the deceased and remain absconded till he was arrested on 8th July, 2001 at New Jalpaiguri. An act of absconding is no doubt a relevant piece of evidence but the said act does not by itself lead to a conclusion that he is guilty. There is no other incriminating material against him to connect with the offence. The suspicion however strong be cannot take the place of proof. For reasons aforesaid, we are inclined to hold that the prosecution has not been able to prove its case against appellant no.1 Ranjit Roy beyond reasonable doubt. He is, therefore, entitled to be acquitted on the benefit of doubt.

(Emphasis supplied)

5. However, in the case of second accused-appellant herein, it was held by the court as follows:

13. In the present case, the charge against both the appellants is specific in the sense that in furtherance of their common intention they committed the murder of the deceased. With the acquittal of appellant no.1 Ranjit Roy the charge of sharing common intention fails. It does not however mean that appellant no. 2 Durga Roy can also secure acquittal. There is no legal bar to convict him under the substantive provision if on the basis of evidence it could be held that he was the author of the crime.

Let us, therefore, examine his case separately. As already stated, he was found in the house of deceased in the morning on the date of occurrence. In the said house, no other inmate was present except the deceased. He was a co-tenant along with Shibu PW4 in respect of one room belonging to the deceased. Shibu PW4 deposed that he had gone to the house of the deceased at 2.30 p.m. to 2.45 p.m. to find out if he was present in his room but he did not find him and his room was locked. He had not returned to his room since then and remained absconded till he was arrested on 8th July, 2001. He gave recovery to the Sitco wrist which was found missing on the date of occurrence. Having regard to the above circumstances, we have no hesitation to hold, that he (appellant no.2 Durga Roy) after committing murder of the deceased also committed the theft of the wrist watch exhibit IX. He is, therefore, clearly guilty of offences punishable under sections 302 and 380 IPC. The conviction recorded by the Sessions Judge under sections 302/380/34 IPC is hereby converted to one under sections 302 and 380 IPC.

(Emphasis supplied)

6. Heard learned counsel appearing for the appellant and learned counsel appearing for the State of Sikkim.

7. The basis of maintaining the conviction against the appellant herein who is the second accused is:

i. He was in the house of the deceased in the morning on the date of occurrence.

ii. No other inmate was present except thedeceased.

iii. The co-tenant had deposed that when he went to the house of the deceased between 2.30 - 2.45 p.m. on the same day, he could not find the appellant and room was locked.

iv. He had not returned to his room and remained absconded till he was arrested on 8th July, 2001.

v. He gave recovery of the wrist watch belonging to husband of the deceased which was allegedly found missing on the date of occurrence.

8. On these grounds, it was concluded that the appellant/accused after committing the murder of the deceased, also committed theft of the wrist watch and, hence, he was guilty of offence punishable under Sections 302 and 380 IPC.

9. We are afraid, none of the circumstances by itself would lead to the irresistible conclusion that the appellant herein is the author of the crimes under Sections 302 and 380 IPC. It is in evidence of PWs 3 and 4 -the key witnesses that apart from the appellant, one Ranjit Roy was also seen in the house of the deceased and, according to prosecution also, as noted in their report, it was Ranjit Roy-accused no.1 who quietly put a strip of cloth round the neck of the deceased and strangulated her. It is in evidence that both the accused belonged to New Jalpaiguri. It is the case of the prosecution itself that the first accused had received a message on the evening of 5.7.2001 that his mother was seriously ill and she was at home. PW-13 Kakulay does not support the case of the prosecution that she had seen the accused in the afternoon of 4th July, 2001 as proceeding to Siliguri. She is specific and categoric of that date because it was the first death anniversary of her father-in-law. The accused were in fact not absconding. They had gone to their native place New Jalpaiguri and they were arrested from their respective homes only.

10. The only other ground is that of recovery under Section 27 of the Indian Evidence Act, 1872 (hereinafter referred to as Evidence Act), recovery of the wrist watch which was alleged to have been stolen by the appellant. From the evidence available on record, we find it extremely difficult to place reliance on that recovery for many reasons. The wrist watch belongs to PW1, the husband of the deceased. PWs 2 and 3 are the sons of the deceased and were staying with PW1 and the deceased. PWs 1, 2 and 3 do not have a case that the wrist watch belonging to PW1 had been stolen by the appellant. They do not also have a case about the money that has been allegedly taken by the accused after committing murder. There is not even a whisper in the evidence of PWs 1, 2 and 3 regarding the theft of either the wrist watch or the cash except for the identification of the wrist watch by PW1 as belonging to him. There is not even a reference to the alleged missing of the wrist watch since 06.07.2001 or the loss of cash. It is only in the evidence of PW16-the investigating officer that the accused had a motive of committing theft after murdering Smt. Manorama Devi and that an amount of Rs.2,300/- and wrist watch belonging to PW1 had been taken by the accused.

11. Exhibit P5-recovery memo says that the wrist watch had been handed over to the investigating officer by the mother of the appellant. However, Exhibit P6-disclosure statement recorded on 12.07.2001 which has already been extracted above, though, not admissible as such, states that the appellant had kept the wrist watch in his house at New Jalpaiguri and that he could handover the same to the police. The investigating officer examined as PW16 states that the wrist watch was recovered from the house of the appellant. It is not explained as to how the mother of the appellant came into custody of the wrist watch which had been allegedly kept in concealment by the appellant in his house. She was not examined. Yet another significant aspect is that the disclosure statement-Exhibit P6 is made only on 12.07.2001, after five days of the incident and yet the recovery is effected only on 17.07.2001. The witnesses to the disclosure statement as well as seizure memo PWs 11 and 12 have very clearly stated in their evidence that their signatures were obtained on some papers which had already been filled up by the police and that no statement had been given by the appellant in their presence.

12. Another significant aspect in the case is that all ornaments worn by the deceased were on the body and nothing had been removed. If the accused had a motive to commit theft, it is only normal that they would lay their hands on the jewelry as well.

13. On the basis of the evidence we have discussed above, we find it extremely difficult to hold that the prosecution has laid a foundation for an effective prosecution and has proved beyond doubt that it is the appellant who committed the murder of Manorama Devi. It has to be noted that this case is set up only on circumstantial evidence. All the circumstances should lead to, without breaking the chain, the involvement of the accused and the accused only. On the only ground that the accused was seen with the deceased in the morning of the date of incident and that they were not seen in that place for another two days, cannot, by themselves, lead to the conclusion that it is the appellant who authored the crime.

14. To abscond means, go away secretly or illegally and hurriedly to escape from custody or avoid arrest. It has come in evidence that the accused had told others that they were from their place of work at Gangtok to their home at New Jalpaiguri. They were admittedly taken into custody from their respective houses only, at New Jalpaiguri on the third day of the incident. Therefore, it is difficult to hold that the accused had been absconding. Even assuming for argument sake that they were not seen at their work place after the alleged incident, it cannot be held that by itself an adverse inference is to be drawn against them as held by this Court in Sunil Kundu v. State of Jharkhand JT 2013 (6) SC 599. To quote paragraph-28:

28. It was argued that the accused were absconding and, therefore, adverse inference needs to be drawn against them. It is well settled that absconding by itself does not prove the guilt of a person. A person may run away due to fear of false implication or arrest. (See: SK. Yusuf v. State of W.B. JT 2011 (6) SC 640) It is also true that the plea of alibi taken by the accused has failed. The defence witnesses examined by them have been disbelieved. It was urged that adverse inference should be drawn from this. We reject this submission. When the prosecution is not able to prove its case beyond reasonable doubt it pic cannot take advantage of the fact that the accused have not been able to probabilise their defence. It is well settled that the prosecution must stand or fall on its own feet. It cannot draw support from the weakness of the case of the accused, if it has not proved its case beyond reasonable doubt.

15. If the motive for the accused in committing the murder of Manorama Devi was theft, it is again difficult to understand why the accused did not remove any ornaments worn by the deceased. Hence, the prosecution version regarding the motive also, is shaken. (Please see the decision of this Court in Madhu v. State of Kerala JT 2012 (1) SC 181).

16. The evidence available on record would on the contrary give an indication that theft is a story of the investigation officer only. Neither PW1 whose wrist watch is said to be stolen nor the sons of the deceased-PWs 2 and 3 have any case of the alleged theft of wrist watch or cash. The recovery is also doubtful. There is no consistent version of the recovery. The person from whom the recovery has been effected, viz., the mother of the appellant, has not been examined. Despite the availability of the appellant, the recovery is through his mother. There is no explanation as to how she got to watch. This could also be the reason why the trial court in the judgment dated 31.12.2012 held that Technically speaking there is no compliance of Section 27 Evidence Act. Though the wrist watch Ext. IX was recovered from the house of accused Durga Roy but the record reveals that the said wrist watch was handed over to the Police by the mother of the accused Durga Roy. It has to be noted that recovery of the wrist watch from the house of the appellant is the only ground on which the High Court has maintained the conviction of the appellant.

17. It has been argued by the learned counsel for the appellant that the accused no.1 Ranjit Roy on whom the overt act of strangulation is alleged, having been acquitted by the High Court, the conviction of the appellant cannot be maintained. It is further contended that by the acquittal of the main accused, the whole theory of common intention has been shattered and that the appellant is entitled to succeed on that ground. We are afraid, the contention cannot be appreciated. No doubt, there are only two accused and they have been charged under Sections 302/380/34 IPC and one of them has been acquitted. That by itself is not a ground to acquit the co-accused, in case there is independent evidence. Of course in the absence of such independent evidence, the accused could succeed on that ground as held by this Court in Krishna Govind Patil v. State of Maharashtra AIR 1963 SC 1413, which is a case of Section 302 read with Section 34 IPC. To quote,

8. ... While it acquitted Accused 1, 3 and 4 under Section 302, read with Section 34 of the Indian Penal Code, it convicted Accused 2 under Section 302, read with Section 34, of the said Code, for having committed the offence jointly with the acquitted persons. That is a legally impossible position. When accused were acquitted either on the ground that the evidence was not acceptable or by giving benefit of doubt to them, the result in law would be the same: it would mean that they did not take part in the offence. The effect of the acquittal of Accused 1, 3 and 4 is that they did not conjointly act with Accused 2 in committing the murder. If they did not act conjointly with Accused 2, Accused 2 could not have acted conjointly with them. ...

18. In the case before us, the allegation is that after committing the murder, the accused committed theft also. As held by this Court in Amrita alias Amritlal v. State of M.P. JT 2004 (2) SC 295 at paragraph-8 that:

8. ... Mere acquittal of some of the accused on the same evidence by itself does not lead to a conclusion that all deserve to be acquitted in case appropriate reasons have been given on appreciation of evidence both in regard to acquittal and conviction of the accused. ...

19. The same view was followed by this Court in Raja v. State JT 2013 (11) SC 439. To quote paragraph-12:

12. ... It is also relevant to point out that the High Court took note of the general principle that if the prosecution case is the same against all the accused or with regard to some of the accused on the same set of evidence available on record with reference to any of the accused, then the Court would not be committing any mistake in acquitting all the accused and conversely, if it is possible to do so, namely, to remove the chaff from the grain, the Court would not be committing any mistake in sustaining the prosecution case against whom the evidence is shown to be intact.

20. Thus, there should be independent evidence. The conviction of the appellant is by placing reliance solely on the recovery of the wrist watch. We have already held above that, it is faulty in procedure and, apart from that, the same does not infuse any confidence in the mind of the Court in the given circumstances, when pitted against the rest of the evidence, that the appellant committed the murder with the motive of theft. It is not enough that the circumstances lead to possibility or probability of the involvement of the accused; the circumstances should point all the fingers to the accused and the accused only. That is not the situation in this case. The circumstances can lead to many other inferences. The chain is also not complete. The first accused, who according to the prosecution is the perpetrator of the offence under Section 302 IPC, has been acquitted. The State has not filed an appeal against the acquittal. It is a case of Sections 302, 380 read with Section 34 IPC. The whole theory of the prosecution is that it is the first accused who has been acquitted by the High Court, who tied the piece of cloth on the neck of the deceased and strangulated her. The only piece of shaky evidence against the appellant is of recovery of the wrist watch of PW1 from and through the mother of the appellant. She was not examined. There is no explanation as to how despite the availability of the appellant, the recovery is effected through his mother. There is no explanation for the delay of about ten days in effecting recovery. The witnesses have not supported the disclosure statement or the seizure. The owner of the wrist watch-PW1 does not have a case that his wrist watch had been stolen by the appellant. That version is not also supported by the children of the deceased. They have no case of theft of wrist watch or cash.

21. In such circumstances, we have no hesitation in holding that the prosecution has miserably failed in proving the case against the appellant and the appellant is entitled to succeed. The appeal is allowed. The conviction of the appellant under Section 302/380 IPC is set aside. He shall be released forthwith in case he is not required to be detained in connection with any other case.

**********, 0 , 
CROSS CITATION
1967 SC 349 (11)
1963 SCR Supl. (1) 689

CRIMINAL APPELLATE, JURISDICTION: Criminal Appeal No. 2 of 1962. Appealby special leave from the judgment andorder dated April 25, 1953 of the Rajasthan High Court Jaipur Bench, Jaipur in Criminal Revision No. 237 of 1956.

S. P. Varma, for the appellant.

S. K. Kapur and P. D. Menon, for the respondent. 1962. October 22. The judgment of the Court was delivered by

SUBBA RAO, J. This appeal by specialleave is directed against the decisionof the High Court of Rajasthan in Criminal Revision No. 237 of 1956 confirming that of the Sessions judge, Alwar, convicting the appellant under s. 379 of the Indian Penal Code and sentencing him to a fine of Rs. 200/-.

To appreciatethe questions raised in this appeal the following facts, either admitted or found by the High Court, may be stated. On November 24, 1945, one Ram Kumar Ram obtained permission, Ex. PB, from the Government oftile former Alwar State to supply electricity at Rajgarh, Khertal and Kherli. Thereafter, he entered into partnership with 4 otherswith an understanding that the licence would be transferred to a company that would be floated by thesaid partnership. After the company was formed, it put in an application to the Government through 691 its managing agents for the issue of a licence in its favour. Ex. P. W. 15/B is that application. On the advice given by the Government Advocate, theGovernment required Ram Kumar Ram to file a declaration attested by a Magistrate with regard to the transfer of his rights and the licence to the company.On April 8, 1948, RamKumar Ram filed a declaration to that effect. The case of the prosecution is that Ram Kumar Ram was a friend of the appellant. Pyarelal Bhargava, who was a Superintendent in the Chief Engineers Office, Alwar. At the instance of Ram Kumar Ram, Pyarelal Bhargava got the file Ex. PA/ 1 from the Secretariat through Bishan Swarup, a clerk, before December 16, 1948, took the file to his house sometime between December 15 and 16,1948, made it available to Ram Kumar Ram for removing the affidavitfiled by him on April 9, 1948, and the application, Ex. P. W. 15/B from the file andsubstituting in their place another letter Ex. PC and another application Ex. PB. After replacing the said documents, Ram Kumar Ram made an application to the Chief Engineer on December 24, 1948, that the licence should not be issued in the name of the company. After the discovery of the tampering of the said documents, Pyarelal and Ram Kumar were prosecuted before the Sub-Divisional Magistrate, Alwar--the former for an offence under s. 379 and s. 465, read with s. 109, of the. Indian Penal Code, and the latter for an offence underss. 465 and 379, read with s.109 of the Indian Penal Code. The Sub-Divisional Magistrate convicted both the accused under the said sections and sentencedthem on both the counts. On appeal the Sessions judge set aside the Conviction under s. 465, but maintained the conviction and sentence of Pyarelal Bhargava under s. 379, and Ram Kumar Ram under s. 379, read with s. 109, of the Indian Penal Code. Ram Kumar Ram was sentenced to pay a fine of Rs. 500/- and Pyarelal Bhargava to pay a fine of Rs. 200/-. Against these convictions both the accused 692 filed revisions to the High Court and the High Court set aside the convictionand sentence of Ram Kumar Ram but confirmed those of Pyarelal Bhargava. Pyarelal Bhargava has preferred the present appeal.

Learned counsel for the appellant raised before us three points, namely, (1) the High Court has wrongly reliedupon the confession made by the accusedbeforeShri P. N. Singhal, Officiating ChiefSecretary tothe Matsya Government atthat time, as that confession was notmade voluntarily and, therefore, irrelevant under s. 24 of the Evidence Act; (2) the said confession having been retracted by the appellant, the High Court should not have relied upon it as it was not corroborated in material particulars; and (3) on the facts found the offence of theft has not been made out within the meaning of s. 379 of the Indian Penal Code. Another argument, namely, that the statement made by Pyarelal Bhargava before the Chief Secretary was not a confession inlaw, was suggested but not pursuedand, therefore, nothing need be said about it.

The first question turns upon the interpretation of the provisions of s. 24 of the Evidence Act and its application to the facts found in this case. Section 24 of the Evidence Act lays down that a confession caused by inducement, threat or promise is irrelevant incriminal proceedings under certain circumstances. Under that section a confession would be irrelevant if thefollowing conditionswere satisfied: (1) it should appear to the court to havebeen causedby any inducement, threat or promise; (2) thesaid threat, inducement or promise must have reference to the charge against the accused person; (3) it shall proceed from a personal authority; and (4) the court shall be of the opinion that the said inducement, threat or promise is sufficient to give the accused per-son grounds which would appear to him reasonable in supposing that he would gain an advantage or avoid any 693 evil of a temporal nature in reference to the proceedings against him. The crucial word in the first ingredient is the expression  appears. The appropriate meaning of the word appears is seems. It imports a lesser degree of probability than proof. Section 3 of the Evidence Act says:

A factis said to be proved when after

considering the matters before it, the Court

either believes it to exist, or considers its

existence so probable that aprudent man

ought, under the circumstances of the

particular case, to act upon the supposition

that it exists.

Therefore, the test of proof is that there is such ahigh degreeof probability that a prudent man would act on the assumption that the thing is true. But under s. 24 of the Evidence Act such a stringent rule is waived but a lesser degreeof assurance is laid down as the criterion. The standard of a prudent man is not completely displaced, but the stringent rule of proof is relaxed. Even so, the laxity of proof permitted does not warrant a courts opinion based on pure surmise. A prima facie opinion basedon evidence and circumstances may be adopted as the standard laid down. To put it in otherwords,on the evidence and the circumstances in a particular case it may appear to the court that there was a threat, inducement or promise, though the said fact is not strictly proved.This deviationfrom the strict standards ,of proof has been designedly accepted by the Legislature with a. view to exclude forced or induced confessions which sometimes are extorted and put inwhen there is a lack of direct evidence. It is not possible or advisable to lay down an, inflexible standard for guidance of courts, for in the ultimate analysis it is the court which is called upon to exclude a confession by holding in the circumstances of a particular case that the confession was not made voluntarily.

The threat, inducement or promise must proceed from a person in authority and it is a question 694 of fact in each case whether the person concerned is a man of authority or not.What is more important is that the mere existence of the threat, inducement or promise is not enough, but in the opinion of the court the said threat, inducement orpromise shallbe sufficientto cause a reasonable belief in the mind of accused that by confessing he would get an advantage or avoid any evil of a temporal naturein reference to the proceedings against him: while the opinion is that of the court, the criterion is the reasonable belief of the accused. The section, therefore, makes it clear that it is the duty of the court to place itself in the position of the accused and to form an opinion as to the state of his mind in the circumstances of a case. In the present case it was found that certain documents in the Chief Enginecrs Office were tampered with and certain papers weresubstituted.The appellant was the Superintendent in the Chief Engineers Office.On April 11, 1949, Shri P. N. Singhal, Officiating Chief Secretary to the MatsyaGovernment, was making a departmental inquiry in respect of the missing documents. The appellant, among others, was questioned about the said documents. The appellant first madea statement, Ex. PL, in which he stated that he neither asked Bishan Swarup to bring file No. 127, nor did he recollect any cause for calling forthat file on or about that date. As Shri Singhal was not able to find out the culprit, he expresser his opinion that if the whole truth did not come out, he would hand over the inquiry to the police.Thereafter, the appellant made a statement, Ex. P.L. 1, wherein, in clear terms, he admitted that about the middle of December 1948 Ram Kumar Ram took file No. 127P. W./48 regardingissue of licence tothe Bharat Electrical and Industrial Corporation Ltd., Alwar, from his residence to show it to his lawyers, and that he took the file more than once for that purpose.He also addedthat this was 695 a voluntary statement. Learned counsel for the appellant argued that the Chief Secretary gave the threat that, if the appellant didnot disclose the truth he would place the matterin the hands of the police and that the threat induced the appellant to make the disclosure in thehope that he would be excused by the authority concerned. There is no doubt that the Chief Secretary is an authority within the meaning of s. 24 of the Evidence Act, but the simple question is whether the alleged statement by thesaid authority reappears to the court to be athreatwith reference to the charge against the accused.As wehave said, under particular circumstances whethera statement appears to the court to be a threat or not is a question of fact. In this case the three lower courts concurrently held that in the circumstances of the case the statement did not appearto be a threat within the meaning of s. 24 of The Evidence Act., but that was only a general statement which any person who lost his property and was not able tofind out the culprit would make. It may be that such a statement under different circumstances may amount to a threat or it may also be that another court may take a differentview even in the present circumstances of the case, but in exercising the powers under Art. 136 of the Constitution we are not prepared to differ from the concurrent finding given by the three courts that in the circumstances of the present case that the said statement did not appear to them to be a threat.

The second argument also has no merits.A retracted confession may form the legal basis of a conviction if the court is satisfied that it was true and was voluntarily made But it has been held that a court shallnot base a conviction on such a confession without corroboration. It is not a rule of law, but is only rule of prudence. It cannoteven be laid down as an inflexible rule of practice or prudence that under no circumstances such a conviction can be 696 made without corroboration, for a court may, in a particular case, be convinced of the absolute truth of a confession and prepared to act upon it without corroboration; but it may be laid down as a general rule of practice that it is unsafe to rely upon a confession, much less on a retracted confession, unless the court is satisfied that the retracted confession is true and voluntarily made and has been corroborated in material particulars., The High Court having regard to the said principles looked for corroboration and found it in the evidence of Bishan Swaroop, P.W-7, and the entry in the Dak Book, Ex. PA. 4, and accepted the confession in view of the said pieces of corroboration.The finding is one offact and there is no permissible ground for disturbing it in this appeal.

The last point is that on the facts found no case of theft has been made out. The facts found were that the appellant got the filebetween December 15 and 16, 1948, to his house,made it available to Ram Kumar Ram andon December 16, 1948, returned it to the office. On these facts it is contended that the prosecution has not made out that the appellant dishonestly took any movable property within the meaning of s. 378 of the Indian Penal Code. Thesaid section reads :

Whoever, intending to take dishonestly any

movable property out of the possession of any

person without that persons consent, moves

that property in order to such taking, is said

to commit theft.

The section may be dissected into its component parts thus : a person will be guilty of the offence of theft, (1) if he.intends to cause a wrongful gain or a wrongful loss by unlawful means of Property to which the person gaming is not legally entitled or to which the person losing is legally entitled, as the case may be: 697 see ss.23 and 24 of the Indian Penal Code; (2) thesaid intention to act dishonestly is inrespect of movable property; (3) the said property shall be taken out of the possession of another person without his consent; and (4) he shall move that property in order to such taking. In the present case the record was in the possession of the Engineering Department underthe control of the Chief Engineer. The appellant was the Superintendent inthat office; he took the file out of the session of thesaid engineer. removed the file from office and handed it over to Ram Kumar Ram. But it is contended that the said facts do not constitute the offence of theft for three reasons, namely, (i) the Superintendent was in possession of the file and therefore he could not have taken the file from himself; (ii) there was no intention to take it dishonestly as he had taken it only for the purpose of showing the documents to Ram Kumar Ram and returned it the next day to the office and therefore he had not taken the said fileout of the possession ofany person; and (iii) he did not intend to take it dishonestly, as he did not receive any wrongful gain or cause any wrongful loss to any other per-son. We cannot agree that the appellant was in session of the file. The file was in the Secretariat of the Department concerned, which was in charge of the Chief Engineer. The appellant was only one of the officers working in that, department and it cannot, therefore, be said that he was in legal possession of the file. Nor can we accept the argument that on the assumption that the Chief Engineer was in possession of the said file, the accused had not taken itout of his possession. To commit theft one need not take movable property permanently out of the possession of anotherwith the intention not to return it to him.It would satisfy the definition ifhe took any movable propertyout of the possession of another person though he intended to return it later on. We cannot also agree with learned counselthat there is no wrongful loss in the present case. 698 Wrongful loss is loss by unlawful means of property to which the person losing it is legally entitled. It cannot be disputed thatthe appellant unauthorisedly took thefile from the office and handed it over to Ram Kumar Ram. He had, therefore, unlawfully taken the file from the department, and for a short time he deprived the Engineering Department ofthe possession of the said file. Theloss need not be caused by a permanent deprivationof property but may be caused even by temporary dispossession, though the per-son taking it intended to restore it sooner or later. A temporary period of deprivation or dispossession of the property of another causes loss to the other. That a person- will act dishonestly if he temporarilydispossesses another of his property is made clear by illustrations (b) and (1) of s.378 of the Indian penal code. They are:

(b) A puts a bait for dogs inhis pocket,

and thus induces zs dog to follow it. Here,

if As intention be dishonestly to take the

dog out of Zs possession without Zs consent,

A has committed theft as soon as Zs dog has

begun to follow A.

(1). A takes an article belonging to Z out of

Zs possession without Zs consent, with the

intention of keeping it until he obtains money

from Z as a reward for its restoration.Here

A takes dishonestly; A has therefore committed

theft.

It will be seen from the said illustrations that a temporary removal of a dog which might ultimately be returned to the owner or the temporary taking of an article with a view to returnit after receiving some reward constitutes theft, indicating thereby that temporary deprivation of another personof his property causes wrongful loss to him. We, therefore, hold that the facts found in this case clearly bring them within the four comers of s. 378 of the Indian 699 Penal Code and, therefore, the courts have rightly held that the appellant had committed the offence of theft. No other Point was pressed before us. In the result the appeal fails and is dismissed.

Appeal dismissed.
**********, 0 , 
HEADNOTE
ELECTRICITY LAWS
Indian Electricity Act, 1910
Section 26(6) - Scope - Dispute regarding fraud in tampering with meter or breaking body seal. Held to be outside the ambit of the provision. (Para 10)

Bihar State Electricity Tariff
Clause 16.9 - Applicability - Assessment made on the basis of theft, for 180 days - Justification. Held that the Board has rightly applied Clause 16.9 and there is no infirmity in the bill raised.
HELD
In the cases of theft of electricity or dishonest abstraction of electrical energy the assessment for compensation has to be done on the basis of a formula wherein D stands for number of days for which the pilferage took place and where there is no possible evidence to establish the period, this factor can be taken to be equivalent to 180 days. Similarly, in case where connected load is more than the sanctioned load, the assessment charge has to be done on the basis of a formula where C stands for six months or the number of months or part thereof elapsed from the date of connection/installation, whichever is less. Therefore under the tariff in both the cases the period can be taken as 180 days or six months. It is on the basis of this formula that the assessment for consumption of units has been done for 180 days. The electricity board rightly applied Clause 16.9 of the Tariff and there is no infirmity in the assessment made and the bill prepared in pursuance thereof. (Para 12)

Clause 16.9 with Electricity Act - Section 39/44 - Assessment as per tariff - Case of dishonest abstraction or theft - Trial of accused in criminal court. Held that it has no bearing on assessment made according to tariff. (Para 13)

Clause 16.9 and 16.10.3 - Fuel surcharge - Method of calculation - Dishonest abstraction - Assessment thereof - Fuel surcharge at thrice the rate per unit - Legality. Held that Clause 16.10.3 is separate from Clause 16.9 and it does not lay the fuel surcharge at thrice the rate of per unit. (Para 17)

CASES REFERRED
1.Apparel Export Promotion Council v. A.K. Chopra JT 1999 (1) SC 61 (Para 15)

2.Hyderabad Vanaspathi Ltd. v. A.P. State Electricity Board & Ors., JT 1998 (3) SC 84 (Para 12)

3.State of U.P. & Ors. v. Maharaja Dharmander Prasad Singh JT 1989 (1) SC 118 (Para 14)

4.Madhya Pradesh Electricity Board & Ors. v. Basantibai JT 1987 (4) SC 294 (Para 10)

FOREIGN CASES REFERRED
:

1.North Wales Police v. Evans (1982) 1 W.L.R. 1155 (Para 14)

G.P. MATHUR, J.

1. These appeals are directed against the judgment and order dated 18.4.2000 of a Division Bench of Patna High Court, by which the writ petition preferred by M/s J.M.D. Alloys Ltd. was partly allowed and the Bihar State Electricity Board was directed to serve a fresh bill as per the observations made in the judgment and to restore the electricity connection within two days of the payment of the said bill.

2. M/s J.M.D. Alloys Ltd. (hereinafter referred to as the petitioner) has a high tension industrial connection of electricity for running induction furnaces for manufacturing steel ingots. The officials of the Bihar State Electricity Board (hereinafter referred to as the electricity board) inspected the petitioners factory premises on 26th and 27th August, 1999 and found that the seal fixed on CT/PT box was tampered. An FIR was lodged at the concerned police station on 27.8.1999 alleging that the petitioner had committed theft of 6.96 lakh units and had thereby caused a loss of Rs. 2.58 crores to the electricity Board. The electricity board thereafter issued a bill dated 31.8.1999 for Rs. 8,85,77,131/-. This bill was challenged by the petitioner by filing CWJC no. 8939 of 1999 before the High Court. The learned single judge, who heard the writ petition vide his judgment/order dated 27.9.1999 directed that a show cause notice in the light of the observations made in the judgment be given to the petitioner within a week and it will be open to the petitioner to raise all its defences against the charge of committing theft of electrical energy and/or drawing electrical energy at a load higher than its contracted demand. It was further directed that the show notice shall be given by the general manager-cum-chief engineer, Central, Bihar Area, Electricity Board, Patna, or by any other officer of the electricity board of equal or higher rank and he shall pass final order after giving an opportunity of hearing to the petitioner. The liability of the petitioner was to be determined afresh on the basis of the final order passed by the chief engineer.

3. The chief engineer (Transmission) Bihar State Electricity Board thereafter issued a notice dated 13.10.1999 to which a reply was given by the petitioner on 20.10.1999. After affording an opportunity of personal hearing and considering the reply, the chief engineer passed an order on 27.10.1999 holding that clause 16.9 (b) and (c) of Tariff is attracted and the consumer M/s J.M.D. Alloys Ltd. is liable to pay compensatory bill in terms of the aforesaid clauses of the Tariff. In accordance with the decision of the Chief Engineer, a fresh bill dated 29.10.1999 for Rs. 8,85,77,131/- was issued. This bill was again challenged by the petitioner by fling a writ petition which was dismissed by a learned single judge on 13.12.1999. Against the said decision the petitioner preferred a letters patent appeal which was partly allowed by the Division Bench by the impugned judgment and order dated 18.4.2000. The Division Bench held that the petitioner is liable to pay electricity charges in accordance with Clause 16.9 of the Tariff. However with regard to fuel surcharge it was held that the same cannot be levied at thrice the rate in accordance with Clause 16.9 of the Tariff, which permits consumption of electricity to be assessed at thrice the rate per unit. Feeling aggrieved by the aforesaid decision, M/s J.M.D. Alloys Ltd. have preferred civil appeal no. 8394 of 2002 and the Bihar State Electricity Board has preferred civil appeal no. 8395 of 2002.

4. As stated earlier, the chief engineer (transmission), Bihar State Electricity Board, issued a notice dated 13.10.1999 to the petitioner. The notice was issued on the grounds, inter alia, that the inspection of the business premises of the petitioner was conducted from 14.15 hours to 20.30 hours on 26.8.1999 and thereafter on the following day; that on examination of CT/PT unit and its terminal box, the seal bearing no. 04566OP which was put on CT/PT terminal box on 14.5.1999, was found to be tampered with and the signature of the authority was also not found on the same; that a seizure memo of the tampered seal was prepared on the same day; that on account of the fact that the seal on the terminal box had been removed, it had become easily accessible to the consumer and by fiddling with the terminals, namely by removing the wires or putting wires of higher resistance, the flow of energy to the metering unit was manipulated to show a very low recording of both KVA and unit consumption; that the total capacity of induction furnaces on operation was 12 M.T. for which energy requirement was 7200 KVA but the petitioner had entered into a contract demand of 4850 KVA and, therefore, the consumer was engaged in theft of electricity and was consuming energy at a much higher load than the contracted demand; that the supplier of the furnaces to the petitioner, namely Megatherm Electronic Pvt. Ltd. had reported to the director general of police (vigilance), Bihar State Electricity Board consumption equivalent to approximately 3000 KVA for running the furnaces exclusive of auxiliary load like water supply, cooling systems, cranes, etc; that the feasibility report given to the electricity board by the petitioner showed that the minimum required energy for each MT furnace was 500 KVA for the furnace alone besides 100 KVA for auxiliary load and thus 600 KVA was required for each MT furnace; that the electronic meter showed that the power had been consumed by the factory on an average basis of 21.25 hours per day which runs into two shifts of 12 hours each having 40 workers in each shift and the load and the capacity of two furnaces showed production of 3000 MT ingots every month and, therefore, the minimum consumption of power was 16.20 lakh units per month whereas bills had been paid on an average of 9.24 lakh units per month; that the theft of power was further substantiated from the meter reading of J.D. Feeder at 3311 KV Air Force Sub-station Bihta and also the claim filed by the petitioner under Clause 13 of the agreement and on the basis of the aforesaid facts and material it was obvious that the petitioner had been committing theft of electricity on a massive scale by tampering with the seal of the CT/PT terminal cover. The petitioner was accordingly directed to show cause as to why a bill in terms of Clause 16.9 of the tariff notification be not raised. The petitioner give a reply to the show cause notice raising various pleas and denying that it had committed any theft of electricity. It was pleaded that the meter had been regularly inspected by different teams of the electricity board but no tampering of the seal of the CT/PT terminal cover had been found; that the furnaces can operate only to the extent of 80% of its rated capacity; that the electricity board itself had assessed the capacity of the connected load at 5100 KVA, which was very near to the contracted demand; that the meter installed in the factory premises never recorded a maximum demand of more than the contracted demand; that the assumption that 100 KVA per ton is required for auxiliary load was not based on facts and that in the case of a high tension industrial consumer the connected load is of no relevance because to constantly monitor the load availed of by a high tension consumer a trivector meter, containing the maximum demand indicator is compulsorily installed. It was further submitted that the seal in CT/PT unit had not been tampered with an the allegation regarding tampering of the seal was being investigated by the investigating officer of the criminal case registered against the petitioner and his report shall be considered by the court of law at the appropriate time.

5. The chief engineer after consideration of the material and the submissions made held that the theft of electricity cannot be found physically and this has to be worked out from evidences parameters and various circumstances under which the consumer is availing power. He passed a detailed order on 27.10.1999 and the relevant part of the findings recorded by him are being reproduced below:

It appears from annexure 1 of show-cause notice that two nos. of induction furnaces of six M.T. capacity each totalling 12 MT were in operation. This is supported by the facts with the inspection report that the total capacity of transformer was 7230 KVA. The CTPT cover terminal seal which was found tampered was unsigned. There were large number officials of the board including executive magistrates and therefore there is no reason to disbelieve that seal of terminal cover of CTPT was tampered. The capacity of the furnaces being 12 MT it is evidently clear that the power was used unauthorised by the consumer because the consumption recorded in the meter was much less than what it ought to have been on actual load i.e. 7200 KVA (600 x 12 T). In this connection the annexure-3 & 4 the vouchers of the purchase of induction furnace from Megatherm, show the capacity of induction furnace 6 MT as 2500 KW i.e. equivalent to 3000 KVA therefore the load of 12 M.T. Furnace besides @ KVA/MT as auxiliary load totalling to 7200 KVA as the actual load. It is not out of place to mention here that the induction furnace association of Bihar has proposed and agreed that the load of induction furnace could be 600 KVA per M.T.

This is also brought to my notice that on average basis the power was consumed at the average period of 21.25 hrs. per day. The factory runs into two shifts with 40 workers in each shift. So far as the nos of days of pilferage is concerned, it has been rightly interpreted and assessed the maximum period of six months for the assessment of compensatory amount under clause 16.9 of Tariff.

The variant factors of the consumption as per formula i.e. LEFXIIED have been thoroughly taken care of in the formula provided in the Tariff.

From the facts and circumstances as set forth above, it is absolutely clear that clause 16.9 (b) and (c) of Tariff is attracted and the consumer M/s JMD Alloys is liable to pay the compensatory bill in terms of Clause 16.9 of Tariff.

6. In accordance with the order of the chief engineer, a fresh electricity bill was prepared on 29.10.1999 for Rs. 4,09,32,925/- towards the cost of units of electricity and Rs. 3,90,73,217/- towards fuel surcharge. After adding the electricity duty and charges for rental of transformer and fuse replacement, etc. a bill was issued for Rs. 8,85,77,131/-.

7. Shri Gopal Subramanium, learned senior counsel for the petitioner, has submitted that the factory premises of the petitioner had been inspected on 14.5.1999 and then again on 20.7.1999 and no irregularity of any kind had been found on the said dates and, therefore, the allegation that the petitioner had tampered with the seal of CT/PT unit is wholly incorrect. There was no material or evidence to show that any effort had been made by the petitioner to interfere with the metering unit which may have the effect of showing lesser consumption of energy. learned counsel has also submitted that in absence of any evidence relating to presence of artificial means which would have rendered abstraction of electrical energy possible the provisions of Clause 16.9 of the tariff could not be made applicable and the electricity bill issued to the petitioner is incorrect It has also been urged that the last inspection of the petitioners premises having been done on 20.7.1999, there is no justification for counting the period of dishonest abstraction of energy as 180 days (six months) and, therefore, the bill issued to the petitioner is for much longer period which was not permissible in law. The learned counsel has further submitted that the findings recorded by the chief engineer are wholly incorrect as instead of basing his order on the actual production of steel, he has gone by the capacity of the furnaces. Shri Subramanium has also urged that the faulty recording of the meter has to be judged from the standpoint of section 26(6) of the Indian Electricity Act, 1910 and the matter should have been referred to electrical inspector.

8. Shri V.R. Reddy, learned senior counsel for the Electricity Board, has submitted that section 26(6) of the Indian Electricity Act has no application to a case where the seal fixed on CT/PT terminal box had been tampered with and the recording of consumption by the meter had been effected by recourse to artificial means. Learned counsel has laid stress on the fact that the chief engineer, after considering all the relevant material and circumstances has recorded a categorical finding that the seal of the CT/PT terminal box had been tampered with and the petitioner had exceeded the contracted load and had also dishonestly abstracted electrical energy to a very large extent. According to the learned counsel, the findings recorded by the Chief Engineer being based upon relevant material are not open to challenge in proceedings under Article 226 of the Constitution of India. In support of the appeal preferred by the Electricity Board, Shri Reddy has submitted that the surcharge being part of the electricity bill, the Division Bench of the High Court had erred in holding that the same was chargeable on per unit basis and not at thrice the value thereof. According to the learned counsel, in view of Clause 16.9 of the Tariff, the fuel surcharge has also to be levied at three times the units assessed.

9. It may be stated at the very outset that a detailed show cause notice dated 13.10.1999 mentioning all the relevant facts was served upon the petitioner to which the petitioner gave a reply on 20.10.1999. The order of the chief engineer mentions that the petitioner was afforded an opportunity of personal hearing and its counsel appeared before him and argued the matter on 25.10.1999 and 26.10.99. The chief engineer has recorded a clear finding that the seal on CT/PT terminal box was found to be tampered with. A seal bearing No. 045660P had been put on the CT/PT terminal box on 14.5.1999 and the authority fixing the seal had put his signatures thereon. At the time of the inspection on 27.8.1999, the seal was found to be tampered with, which was seized by the inspecting team. The seal did not contain the signature of the authority who had put the seal. The record shows that the inspection had been done by a high level team consisting of as many as 8 responsible officers, some of whom had come from the headquarters of the electricity board at Patna. An executive magistrate was also a member of the team. The manager of the petitioner himself lodged a report on 28.8.1999 with the deputy superintendent of police, Danapur (Patna), alleging that 8 officers of the Bihar State Electricity Board with armed force visited and tested the installation and the members of the team with the help of screw and plier themselves tampered with the cover of the LT terminal box of CT/PT and the plastic seal was removed and brought down by one of the executive engineers. However, in reply to the show cause notice filed by the petitioner, tampering of the seal was denied and it was pleaded that the matter was being investigated by the investigating officer of the criminal case registered against the petitioner and his report shall be considered by the court at the appropriate time. The chief engineer after considering the entire material and taking into consideration the fact that there were large number of officers of the board at the time of the inspection, has recorded a finding that the seal had been tampered with. It is an admitted position that in the factory of the petitioner there were two furnaces, each of 6 MT and thus the total capacity was 12 MT. The manufacturer of the induction furnaces namely, Megatherm Electronic Pvt. Ltd. had given in writing that the load of 6 MT induction furnace was 2500 KV which is equivalent to 3000 KVA and, therefore, the actual load of the furnaces installed at the petitioners factory, after taking into consideration the auxiliary load, came to 7200 KVA. The Induction Furnaces Association of Bihar of which the petitioner is also a member, had agreed and proposed that the load of an induction furnace could be taken to be 600 KVA per MT. On consideration of these factors the chief engineer came to a conclusion that the actual load of the petitioners factory was 7200 KVA. The other material which has been considered by the chief engineer is that on an average the power was consumed for 21.25 hours per day as the factory was running in two shifts with 40 workers in each shift and, therefore, the number of units being actually consumed were much higher than that recorded in the meter. On the basis of these findings, the assessment has been made of the compensatory amount under clause 16.9 of the tariff.

10. The contention that the dispute regarding tampering of the seal of CT/PT terminal unit should have been referred to the electrical inspector, has hardly any merit. In Madhya Pradesh Electricity Board & Ors. v. Basantibai1, it has been held that a dispute regarding the commission of fraud in tampering with the meter and breaking the body seal is one outside the ambit of section 26(6) of the Indian Electricity Act and the electrical inspector has no jurisdiction to decide such cases of fraud. It was further held that under section 26(6), the only dispute which can be decided by the electrical inspector is as to whether the meter is correct and is accurately recording the reading or there is some fault in the same. Since in the present case it has been found that the seal on the CT/PT terminal box had been tampered with and the natural working of the meter had been affected by taking recourse to external devices, a dispute of this kind cannot be referred to an electrical inspector.

11. The next contention raised is that the period of 180 days for which theft of electricity has been assessed is absolutely wrong and has no rational basis. The electricity board has proceeded on the footing that Clause 16.9 of the Tariff framed by the Bihar State Electricity Board with the approval of the State government is applicable. Clause 16.9 of the Tariff reads as under :

16.9 (A) Detection of unauthorised load:- If at any time the consumer is found exceeding the contracted load without specific permission of the board, the board may without prejudice to its other rights under the agreement or under the provisions of the Electricity Act, estimate the value of the electrical energy, so extracted, consumed or used shall be calculated as below and may also disconnect the supply without notice :-

I. Necessary assessment for compensation in the following malpractice and theft of energy cases shall be made as below:-

(a) ................
(b) In case of using energy by creating obstruction in running of meters or interfering with the system of supply or wires etc.
(c) ....................

Unit assessed - L x F x H x D

Where L = .....................
H = .....................

D = is the no. of days for which the pilferage took place which can be established from production of satisfactory evidence by the consumer. In case there is no possible evidence to establish the period, this factor be taken equivalent to 180 or the no. of days elapsed from the date of connection/installation of meter till the date of detection of the pilferage whichever is less.

F=................................

II. ..................

III Method of charging the assessed units as indicated in para I & II above.
(a) The consumption so assessed shall be charged at thrice the rate per unit of the tariff applicable to the consumer excluding the consumption recorded by the meter and the latter shall be charged at the appropriate tariff rates. The amount billed at this (thrice the tariff rate) shall not be taken into consideration for the purpose of computing consumers liability to pay monthly/minimum guarantee.

(b) ................

IV When connected load is more than the sanctioned load in case of all categories LT connection except domestic service.

Assessment charge:- Rs. C x M (LD-LS)x3
Where, M=Minimum consumption guarantee charge pet BHP per month as applicable in the tariff schedule.

LD - is the load detected in BHP at the time of inspection.

LS = is the load sanctioned to the consumer in BHP

C= This factor be taken equivalent to six months or no. of months or part thereof elapsed from the date of connection/installation whichever is less.

12. The relevant part of the tariff quoted above shows that in the cases of theft of electricity or dishonest abstraction of electrical energy the assessment for compensation has to be done on the basis of a formula wherein D stands for number of days for which the pilferage took place and where there is no possible evidence to establish the period, this factor can be taken to be equivalent to 180 days. Similarly, in case where connected load is more than the sanctioned load, the assessment charge has to be done on the basis of a formula where C stands for six months or the number of months or part thereof elapsed from the date of connection/installation, whichever is less. Therefore under the tariff in both the cases the period can be taken as 180 days or six months. It is on the basis of this formula that the assessment for consumption of units has been done for 180 days. In Hyderabad Vanaspathi Ltd. v. A.P. State Electricity Board & Ors.1, it has been held that the terms of conditions for supply of electricity to consumers notified by the board in exercise of power under section 49 of Electricity (Supply) Act, 1948 and made applicable to all consumers availing supply of electricity, are statutory in character. This being the legal position, the electricity board in our opinion rightly applied Clause 16.9 of the Tariff and there is no infirmity in the assessment made and the bill prepared in pursuance thereof.

13. Shri Gopal Subramanium has also submitted that after the inspection had been done on 27.8.1999, an FIR had been lodged against the petitioner on the same day by Shri Om Prakash, Assistant Executive Engineer at the police station and a criminal case was registered under section 39/44 of Indian Electricity Act. This case was investigated and thereafter a final repot was submitted, which was accepted by the concerned magistrate and as a result of this order, the petitioner stands exonerated from the charge of theft of electricity and no compensatory bill could be issued by taking recourse to Clause 16.9 of the tariff. Shri V.R. Reddy, learned senior counsel for the electricity board has submitted that before accepting the final report, the learned magistrate had issued notice to Shri Om Prakash, assistant executive engineer, but the said notice was not served upon him as he was transferred from Patna on account of his allocation to Jharkhand State and as such no representation could be made on behalf of the electricity board against the final report. Subsequently, an application has been moved on behalf of the electricity board before the concerned magistrate for recall of the order by which final report was accepted. In our opinion, the mere acceptance of final report by the magistrate cannot amount to a finding by the criminal court that theft of electricity was not committed. The accused was not even summoned, no charge was framed nor any evidence was recorded. In such a situation, it cannot be held that the criminal court has recorded any finding to the effect that the petitioner has not committed theft of electricity. That apart, the purpose of a trial under section 39/44 of the Indian Electricity Act is entirely different and the object is to punish and sentence the person who is alleged to have committed the offence. The trial of an accused in a criminal case can have no bearing in the matter of assessment made in accordance with the tariff of the value of electricity dishonestly abstracted or consumed. Therefore, the contention raised on the basis of alleged acceptance of the final report in the criminal case has absolutely no merit.

14. It is to be noted that in pursuance of the order passed on 27.9.1999 by the High Court in CWJC no 8939 of 1999, the chief engineer decided the matter holding that the petitioner had exceeded the contracted load and had also committed theft of electricity and consequently assessment of compensatory amount had to be done in accordance with clause 16.9 of the tariff. In terms of the order of the chief engineer the bill dated 29.10.1999 was prepared which was challenged by the petitioner by filing the writ petition before the High Court under Article 226 of the Constitution. The High Court was not hearing an appeal against the decision of the chief engineer. The scope of inquiry in such a matter is a limited one. We would like to quote here what was said by Venkatachaliah, J. in State of U.P. & Ors. v. Maharaja Dharmander Prasad Singh1, which reads as under :

However, Judicial review under Article 226 cannot be converted into appeal. Judicial review is directed, not against the decision, but is confined to the examination of the decision making process. In Chief Constable of the North Wales Police v. Evans, (1982) 1 W.L.R. 1155 refers to the merits-legality distinction in judicial review. Lord Hailsham said:

The purpose of judicial review is to ensure that the individual receives fair treatment, and not to ensure that the authority, after according fair treatment, reaches on a matter which it is authorised by law to decide for itself a conclusion which is correct in the eyes of the Court.

Lord Brightman observed:

 ..........Judicial review, as the words imply, is not an appeal from a decision, but a review of the manner in which the decision was made.....

And held that it would be an error to think:

..........that the Court sits in judgment not only on the correctness of the decision making process but also on the correctness of the decision itself.

When the issue raised in judicial review is whether a decision is vitiated by taking into account irrelevant, or neglecting to take into account of relevant factors or is so manifestly unreasonable that no reasonable authority entrusted with the power in question could reasonably have made such a decision, the judicial review of the decision-making process includes examination, as a matter of law, of the relevance of the factors............

15. In Apparel Export Promotion Council v. A.K. Chopra1, Chief Justice Anand held as under :

Judicial Review, not being an appeal from a decision, but a review of the manner in which the decision was arrived at, the court while exercising the power of judicial review must remain conscious of the fact that if the decision has been arrived at by the administrative authority after following the principles established by law and the rules of natural justice and the individual has received a fair treatment to meet the case against him, the court cannot substitute its judgment for that of the administrative authority on a matter which fell squarely within the sphere of jurisdiction of that authority.

16. There is not dispute that the chief engineer issued notice to the petitioner mentioning all the relevant facts to which the petitioner gave a reply. The petitioner was also afforded an opportunity of hearing and it appeared through a counsel, who made submissions on two days and thereafter the chief engineer passed the order. As discussed earlier, the chief engineer has taken into consideration relevant factors and the findings recorded by him are clearly borne out from the material available before him. It cannot be said that the order passed by him is unreasonable or perverse in any manner. The High Court therefore rightly took the view that the order passed by the chief engineer that the compensatory bill is to be prepared in accordance with Clause 16.9 of the tariff could not be interfered with in a writ petition under Article 226 of the Constitution.

17. The Bihar State Electricity Board feels aggrieved by that part of the judgment and order of the Division Bench of the High Court by which it has been held that the surcharge cannot be levied at thrice the rate per unit and has accordingly filed civil appeal no. 8395 of 2002. Shri V.R. Reddy, learned senior counsel for the electricity board has submitted that the cost of a unit of electricity is not fixed and on the contrary it is dependent upon the fuel surcharge. The formula for calculating the fuel surcharge is a long and complicated one and is given in Clause 16.10.3 of the tariff. A host of factors have to be taken into consideration in calculating the fuel surcharge and they depend upon many variables. Shri Reddy has submitted that since the surcharge has necessarily to be taken into consideration and has to be added in the cost of electricity and, therefore, in accordance with part (III) of clause 16.9 of the tariff, it should also be assessed at three times the rate per unit. We are unable to accept the contention raised. Clauses 16.9 and 16.10.3 are separate and distinct clauses in the tariff. Clause 16.9 lays down the formula for calculating the value of the electrical energy abstracted or consumed by a consumer by exceeding the contracted load or by creating obstruction in running of meter. Part (III) of this Clause deals with method of charging the assessed units and sub-para (a) thereof lays down that the consumption so assessed shall be charged at thrice the rate per unit of the tariff applicable to the consumer excluding the consumption recorded by the meter and the latter shall be charged at the appropriate tariff rates. Clause 16.10.3 is a separate clause which deals with fuel surcharge and it nowhere lays down that this additional surcharge will also be levied at thrice the rate per unit of the tariff. The two clauses namely 16.9 and 16.10.3 have to be read separately and there being no specific provision for assessing the fuel surcharge at thrice the rate per unit, it is not possible to hold that in such a case the fuel surcharge should also be charged at thrice the rate per unit.

18. We are, therefore, of the opinion that the view taken by the High Court is perfectly correct and called for no interference. In the result, both the appeals lack merit and are hereby dismissed. No costs.

**********, 0 , 
HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAW
Criminal Procedure Code, 1898:
Sections  236, 237 and 403(1) - The Customs Act,  1968;  Sections 111 and 135 - Gold (Control) Act, 1968; Section 85 - Whether  the acquittal  for the offences under the Customs Act operates  as  a bar to the prosecution of the same person in connection with  the charge  of  having  committed  the  offence  under  the  Gold (C2ontrol)Act?  -Tests  to  be applied - Ingredients  of  the  two offences are different in scope and content-What is necessary  is to  analyze  the  ingredients of the two  offences  and  not  the allegations  made in the two complaints - Framing of  alternative charge  - Held that if the ingredients of both the  offences  are satisfied the same act of possession of the gold would constitute an  offence  both under the Customs Act as also  under  the  Gold (Control)  Act  0 there is therefore no question  of  framing  an alternative  charge  - Judgment of the High  Court  holding  that subsequent trial was barred set aside.
Appeal allowed.

Held - 
(i)  In order to successfully establish their plea of  bar  under Section 403 (1) the concerned respondents will therefore have  to establish  that......(1)  there  must have been  adoubt  as  to whether  the  offence under the Customs Actcould be  proved  or whether the offence under the Gold(Control)Act would be  proved and  (2) that in the context of this doubt an alternative  charge could  have  been  framed  under Section  236.  Now,  on  a  true interpretation  of Section 236 it would appear that  the  Section WOULD BE ATTRACTED where the offence would fall either under  one or  the other of the two alternative charges. It  WOULD  NOT  BE ATTRACTED  if an offence could all under both of the  alternative charges.  What  is contemplated by Section 236 if framing  of  an alternative  charge  where on the facts of the  case  an  offence would fall under one of the two alternative charges, but the  act would  not  constitute an offence under both  the  charges.  This point is made clear by the illustrations to Section 236. Para5

(ii) IIIustration (a) refers to framing of an alternative  charge in  respect of theft or receiving of stolen property or  criminal breach of trust or cheating. It will be seen that a person cannot be  said to have committed the offence both of theft as  also  of receiving of stolen property. A person who himself commits  the theft,  cannot  be  guilty of the  charge  of  receiving  stolen property  whereas a person who may have nothing to do  with  the commission  of theft, but who may be found in possession  of  the stolen  property,  would be guilty of the offence  of  receiving stolen property. Now the prosecution cannot foresee whether  the person  from  whose possession the stolen article was  found  was himself the thief or was merely a person who had received  stolen property from the thief. A person cannot be found guilty of  both theft  as  also for receiving stolen property. And it  is  in such a case that an alternative charge under Section 236 could be framed.  In the present case the concerned respondents  could  be found  guilty  of  both  the  offences  in  the  context  of  the possession  of  gold.  If it was established  that  there  was  a prohibition  against the import of gold and that he was found  in possession  of  gold which he knew or had reason to  believe  was liable  to  confiscation he would be guilty of that  offence.  He would  also be guilty of an offence under the Gold (Control)  Act provided  the gold is of a purity of atleast 9 carats.  He  would have  violated the provisions of both the Customs Act  and  the Gold (Control) Act if the aforesaid ingredients were established. It  is not as if in case he was found guilty of an offence  under the  Customs Act, he could not have been found guilty  under  the Gold (Control) Act or vice versa. Upon being found guilty of both the  offences the Court may perhaps impose a concurrent  sentence in respect of both the offences but the Court has also the  power to  direct  that the sentence shall run consecutively.  There  is therefore  no question of framing of an alternative  charge  one, under  the Customs Act, and the other, under the  Gold  (Control) Act.  If the ingredients of both the offences are  satisfied  the same  act of possession of the gold would constitute  an  offence both under the Customs Act as also under the Gold (Control)  Act. Such  being the position it cannot be said that they  could  have been  tried  on the same facts for an alternative charge  in  the context  of  Section  236  Cr. P.C. at the  time  of  the  former proceedings. The submission urged in the context of Section  403 (1)  cannot  therefore succeed for it cannot be said that  the persons who are sought to be tried in the subsequent proceedings could have been tried on the same facts at the former trial under section 236. Para 6

CASES REFERRED
1. Maqbool Hussain v The State of Bombay and Ors. etc. etc., 1953 S.C.R. Vol. IV p. 730

2. State of Bombay v S.L.Apte and Another, 1961 (3) SCR p.107

THAKKAR, J.

1.  Does  the  acquittal  of  an  accused  charged  with  having committed  an  offence  punishable under Section  111  read  with Section  135  of the Customs Act 1969 create a legal bar  to  the said  accused subsequently being prosecuted under Section  85  of the Gold (Control) Act, 1968. The High Court having answered this question (in the affirmative) against the prosecution and  having directed  the  dropping  of the  subsequent  proceedings  on  the premise that the acquittal in the former proceedings operated  as a  legal  bar  to the prosecution of the accused  in  the  latter proceedings  operated  as a legal bar to the prosecution  of  the accused in the latter proceedings, the State has approached  this Court by way of the present appeal.

2.  Respondents  1 to 3 came to be prosecuted as a result  of  a raid at their house in which primary gold valued at Rs.  84,770/- at  the material time was found along with some  other  articles. They were prosecuted for an offence punishable under section  111 read  with  Section 135 of the Customs Act, 1969.  In  that  case present respondent No.3 was convicted whereas present  respondent Nos.  1  and 2 were acquitted. The same  alleged  offenders  were later  on  sought to be prosecuted under Section 85 of  the  Gold (Control) Act, 1968 relying on the find of primary gold from  the very  same premises at the time and on the occasion of  the  very same  raid which gave rise to the prosecution under  the  Customs Act  which had culminated in the conviction of respondent  No.  3 and  the  acquittal  of respondents 1 and  2.  A  contention  was thereupon  raised  on behalf of respondents 1 to 3 that  the  new trial  was  barred. The Chief Judicial Magistrate  accepted  this plea  and  ordered that the prosecution be dropped.  The  learned Sessions Judge confirmed the said order. The appellant challenged the order passed by the learned trial Magistrate as confirmed  by the  learned Sessions Judge by way of a Revision  Application  to the  High  Court , the High Court affirmed the  decision  of  the Courts below holding that the present trial was barred by  virtue of  Section 403 (1) of the Code of Criminal  Procedure,1898  (Cr. P.C.). Hence this appeal. In order to determine this question  it is  necessary to identify the ingredients which will have  to  be established by the prosecution in order to bring home the  guilty under  the  different  provisions.  These  ingredients  may  be catalogued as under:

Ingredients of the charge for the  Ingredients of the charge for 
offence under Section 111 read with  the offence under Sec. 85  of  Sec.  135 of the Customs Act, 1969  the Gold (Control)Act,  1968 
in respect of which the respondents  for which the  respondents are
were acquitted.  sought to be prosecuted.


i) Interalia being in possession  The offender owns or  has  of or being concerned in keeping  in his possession,custody,  
or  concealing of goods which the  or control  any  primary 
offender knows or has reason to  gold of not less than 9 
believe  are  liable  to confiscation  carats  in  purity  in  under  Section  111.  unfinished  or  semi-  finished  form  or  in   blocks, bars etc.

ii) The goods in question, gold, was  
imported within the Indian Customs
waters contrary to a prohibition
contained under the Customs Act.

iii) There was a prohibition in 
respect of the import of gold at 
the material time as contemplated
by Sec. 111 - D of the Customs Act.

3.  It is therefore evident that the ingredients required to  be established  in respect of the offence under the Customs Act  are altogether different from the ones required to be established for an  offence  under  the Gold (Control) Act.  In  respect  of  the former,  the  prosecution  has  to establish  that  there  was  a prohibition  against the import into Indian sea waters  of  goods which were found to be in the possession of the offender. On  the other  hand  in respect of the offence under the  Gold  (Control) Act,  it is required to be established that the offender  was  in possession  of primary gold meaning thereby gold of a  purity  of not  less than 9 carats in any unfinished or semi-finished  form. In regard to the latter offence it is not necessary to  establish that  there  is any prohibition against the import of  gold  into Indian  sea  waters. Mere possession of gold of purity  not  less than 9 carats in any unfinished or semi-finished form would be an offence  under the Gold Control Act. It is therefore stating  the obvious  to  say  that the ingredients of the  two  offences  are altogether  different.  Such being the case the  question  arises whether  the  acquittal for the offences under  the  Customs  Act which requires the prosecution to establish altogether  different ingredients operates as bar to the prosecution of the same person in  connection with  the charge of having committed  the  offence under the Gold (Control) Act.

4.  Reliance has been placed on Section 403 (1) of the  Code  of Criminal  Procedure, 1898 (Cr. P.C.) in support of the plea  that the  prosecution under the Gold (Control) Act would be barred  on the basis of the undermentioned facts :-

i) that the respondents had been tried by a competent Court for  the  offence of being in possession of gold under  the  Customs  Act and had been acquitted.

ii)  they are sought to be prosecuted on the same facts for  an  offence under the Gold (Control) Act.

It  is  not  in  dispute that  the  respondents  were  tried  and acquitted  for  the offence under the Customs Act  in  connection with  the possession of a quantity of gold. Their trial would  be barred  by  Section  403  (1) provided  they  are  sought  to  be prosecuted on same facts for any offence for which a  different charge from the one made against them might have been made  under Section  236 and for which they might have been convicted  under Section 237.

5.  In order to successfully establish their plea of  bar  under Section  403(1) the concerned respondents will therefore have  to establish that:-

i)  It  was doubtful as to which of the several  offences  the  facts which could be proved by the prosecution would consitute.

ii)  And they could have been charged in the  alternative  with  having committed one or other of the said offences.

In other words what they would be required to establish would  be that (1) there must have been a doubtas to whether the  offence under  the Customs Act could be proved or whether  the  offence under  the Gold (Control) Act would be proved and (2)  that  in the  context of this doubt an alternative charge could have  been framed  under  Section  236. Now, on  a  true  interpretation  of Section  236 it would appear that the Section WOULD BE  ATTRACTED where the offence would fall either under one or the other of the two alternative charges. It WOULD NOT BE ATTRACTED  if an offence could  fall  under  both  of the  alternative  charges.  What  is contemplated  by Section 236 if framing of an alternative  charge where on the facts of the case an offence would fall under one of the two alternative charges, but the act would not constitute  an offence  under both the charges. This point is made clear by  the illustrations to Section 236 viz:

(a)  A  is accused of an act which may amount  to  theft,  or  receiving  stolen  property,  or criminal breach  of  trust  of  cheating.  He  may  be charged  with  theft,  receiving  stolen  property,  criminal breach of trust and cheating or he  may  be  charged  with  having  committed  theft,  or  receiving  stolen  property, or criminal breach of trust or cheating.

(b)  A states on oath before the Magistrate that he saw B hit C  with a club. Before the Sessions Court A states on oath that  B  never hit C. A may be charged in the alternative and  convicted  of  intentionally giving false evidence, although it cannot  be  proved which of these contradictory statements was false.

6.  Illustration (a) refers to framing of an alternative  charge in  respect of theft or receiving of stolen property or  criminal breach of trust or cheating. It will be seen that a person cannot be  said to have committed the offence both of theft as  also  of receiving of stolen property. A person who himself commits  the theft,  cannot  be  guilty of the  charge  of  receiving  stolen property  whereas a person who may have nothing to do  with  the commission  of theft, but who may be found in possession  of  the stolen  property,  would be guilty of the offence  of  receiving stolen property. Now the prosecution cannot foresee whether  the person  from  whose possession the stolen article was  found  was himself the thief or was merely a person who had received  stolen property from the thief. A person cannot be found guilty of  both theft  as  also for receiving stolen property. And it  is  in such a case that an alternative charge under Section 236 could be framed.  In the present case the concerned respondents  could  be found  guilty  of  both  the  offences  in  the  context  of  the possession  of  gold.  If it was established  that  there  was  a prohibition  against the import of gold and that he was found  in possession  of  gold which he knew of had reason to  believe  was liable  to  confiscation he would be guilty of that  offence.  He would  also be guilty of an offence under the  Gold  (Control)Act provided  the gold is of a purity of atleast 9 carats.  He  would have  violated the provisions of both the Customs Act  and  the Gold (Control) Act if the aforesaid ingredients were established. It  is not as if in case he was found guilty of an offence  under the  Customs Act, he could not have been found guilty  under  the Gold (Control)Act or vice versa. Upon being found guilty of  both the  offences the Court may perhaps impose a concurrent  sentence in respect of both the offences but the Court has also the  power to  direct  that the sentence shall run consecutively.  There  is therefore  no question of framing of an alternative  charge  one, under  the Customs Act, and the other, under the  Gold  (Control) Act.  If the ingredients or both the offences are  satisfied  the same  act of possession of the gold would constitute  an  offence both  under  the Gold (Control) Act. Such being the  position  it cannot be said that they could have been tried on the same  facts for an alternative charge in the context of Section 236 Cr.  P.C. at the time of the former proceedings.The submission urged in the context of Section 403 (1) cannot therefore succeed for it cannot be  said  that  the persons who are sought to  be  tried  in  the subsequent proceedings could have been tried on the same facts at the former trial under section 236.

7.  Strong reliance has been placed on behalf of the  respondents on  MAQBOOL  HUSSAIN VS. THE STATE OF BOMBAY & ORS.  ETC.  ETC.in support of the submission that the second prosecution is  barred. In  Maqbools case the central issue in the context of  the  fact that a person who had arrived at an Indian Airport from abroad on being  searched was found in possession of gold in  contravention of  the  relevant notification, prohibiting the import  of  gold. Action  was taken against him by the Customs authorities and  the gold  seized  from  his possession was confiscated.  Later  on  a prosecution  was  launched against him in the  criminal  court  a Bombay  charging  him  with having committed  the  offence  under Section 8 of the Foreign Exchange Regulation Act (Act 7 of  1947) read  with the relevant notification. In the background of  these facts  the  plea  of  autrefois  acquit  was  raised  seeking protection under Article 20(2) of the Constitution of India. This Court  came  to the conclusion that the  proceedings  before  the Customs  authority  did not constitute the prosecution  of  the appellant. The Court also took the view that the penalty  imposed on  him  did  not  constitute  a  punishment  by  the  judicial tribunal.  The ratio of the decision is altogether different  and has  no  application  in  so  far  as  the  plea  raised  by  the respondents is concerned. However, reliance is placed on  certain observations made in the course of the discussion, at p. 737.

To quote:

The test is whether the former offence and the offence now  charged have the same ingredients in the sense that the facts  constituting the one are sufficient to justify a conviction of  the other, not that the facts relied on by the Crown are the  same in the two trials. A plea of autrefois acquit is not  proved unless it is shown that the verdict of acquittal of the  previous charge necessarily involves an acquittal the latter.  (Vide Halsburys Laws of England, Hailsham Edition, Vol.9 pages  152 and 153, paragraph 212).
(Emphasis added)


We have already applied the very test indicated in this passage. But we have reached the conclusion that in the present case this test does not support the respondentssubmission in as much as the ingredients of the two offences are different in scope and content. The facts constituting the offence under Customs Act are different and are not sufficient to justify the conviction under the Gold Control Act. It must also be realized that what is necessary is to analyze the ingredients of the two offences and not the allegations made in the two complaints as declared by this Court in STATE OF BOMBAY VS. S.L. APTE & ANOTHER.

8.  We have also concluded that a separate charge could have been framed in respect of the distinct offence under Gold Control  Act Under  the  circumstances the plea raised by the  difence  cannot succeed.  The two conclusions reached by us squarely  brings  the matter squarely within the parameters of the law settled by  this Court  decades ago in S.L. Aptes case (Supra). In that case  the element  of  dishonestywas  required to  be  established  under section  409 of Indian Penal Code whereas it was not required  to be established under Section 105 of the Indian Insurance Act.  In this backdrop this Court has enunciated the law in the context of the  plea based on Article 20(2) of the Constitution, Section  26 of  the  General Clauses Act and section 403(2) of  the  Criminal Procedure Code in no uncertain terms:-

If, therefore, the offences were distinct there is no question  of the rule as to double-jeopardy as embodied in Art. 20(2) of  the Constitution, being applicable.

The next point to be considered is as regards the scope of s.26  of  the General Clauses Act. Though ss.26 in its opening  words  refers  to the act or omission constituting an  offence  under  two  or  more  enactments, the emphasis is not  on  the  facts  alleged  in the ingredients which constitute the  two  offences  with  which  a  person is charged. This is made  clear  by  the  concluding portion of the section which refers to shall not be  liable  to  be  punished twice for the  same  offece.  If  the  offences are not the same but are distinct, the ban imposed  by  this  provision  also cannot be invoked. It  therefore  follows  that  in  the  present case as the respondents  are  not  being  sought to be punished for the same offence twice but for  two  distinct  offences  constituted  or  made  up  of  different  ingredients the bar of the provision is inapplicable.

In passing, it may be pointed out that the construction we have  placed  on  Art.  20(2) of the Constitution  and  s.26  of  the  General  Clauses  Act is precisely in line with  the  terms  of  s.403 (2) of the Criminal Procedure Code which runs:

403(2)  A person acquitted or convicted of any offence  may  be  afterwards tried for any distinct offence for which a  separate  charge  might  have been made against him on the  former  trial  under section 235, sub-section (1).

There is no manner of doubt that section 403(1) does not come  to rescue  of the respondents 1 to 3 whereas section 403(2)  of  the Code clearly concludes the matter against them.

9.  The  High  Court  was therefore in  error  in  holding  that subsequent  trial was barred. We accept the appeal on this  point and reverse the decision of the Courts below and the High  Court. The  appellant  was  understandably seriously  aggrieved  by  the crroneous enunciation of law by the High Court as it would  cause prejudice  in  other matters involving the same point  which  may have been pending or might arise in future. With the position  of law being now setted in the appellants favour the main objective of  the appellant is achieved. Learned counsel for the  appellant indicated  at the very commencement that the main purpose of  the appeal was to have the true position in law setted. That 20 years have elapsed since the date of the seizure (November 15,1968) is, in  our  opinion, no ground for not proceeding further  with  the matter inasmuch as the offence in question is a serious  economic offence,  which undermines the entire economy of the Nation.  The delay  occasioned  in the working of the judicial system  by  the ever-increasing  workload cannot provide an alibi  for  upholding such  a plea. However in the present case the sessions Court  has quashed  the proceedings not only on this ground but also on  the basis of certain factual findings as well and the learned Counsel for  the  appellant himself found it difficult  to  assail  these findings at this juncture. The operative order passed by the High Court  cannot  therefore be disturbed in view of  the  facts  and circumstances  peculiar to this particular case.  We  accordingly allow  the appeal to this extent and reverse the findings of  the Lower Court and High Court on the question of maintainability  of the subsequent prosecution but find ourselves unable to pass  any further orders under the circumstances.

**********, 0 , 
CROSS CITATION
1972 SCC (3) 885
1973 SCR (1) 880

CRIMINAL APPELLATE JURISDICTION : Cr.A. No. 212 of 1968. Appeals by special leave from the judgment and order dated January 19, 1968 ofthe Rajasthan High Court inCrl. Revision No. 383 of 1967.

S. P. Singh and Shiv Pujan Singh for the appellant. Debabroto Mookerjee, P. C. Kapur and K. B. Mehta for the respondent.

The Judgment of the Court was delivered by

Khanna, J. Ayodhya Singh appellant and Hira Singhwere convicted by Additional Munsiff MagistrateJaipur for offences under section 457 and 380 read with section 75 IndianPenal Code. Ayodhya Singh was sentenced to undergo rigorous imprisonment for a period of two years and to pay a fine of rupees two thousand for the offence under section 457 read with section 75 Indian Penal Code. In default of payment of fine, Ayodhya Singh was sentenced to undergo rigorous imprisonment for a further period ofsix months. Similar sentence wasawarded to Ayodhya Singh for the offence under section 380 read with section 75 Indian Penal Code. The two sentences were ordered to run consecutively. Hira Singh was sentenced to undergo rigorousimprisonment for a period of two years and to pay a fine of rupees one thousand, or in default, to undergo rigorousimprisonment for afurther period of six months for the offence under section 457 read with section 75 Indian Penal Code. Similar sentence was awarded to Hira Singh for the offence under section 380 read with section 75 Indian Penal Code. The two sentences of Hira Singh were also ordered to run consecutively. Appeals filed by Ayodhya Singh andHira Singh were dismissed by Additional Sessions Judge Jaipur. Revision petitions filed by Ayodhya Singh and 7--L173Sup.C.I./73 882 Hira Singh in Rajasthan High Court met with no better fate. Ayodhya Singh thereafter filed this appeal by special leave through jail.

The prosecution case is that Kistoor Chand (PW 73) deals in gold and silver. He was running a shop inJohri bazar Jaipur, but sometime before the occurrence he had to vacate the shop and remove the gold and silver ornaments worth over a lakh of rupees to his house situated in Manni Ramji-kaRasta in Jaipur City.The house has four storeyes and the ornaments were put in a room on the third storey of the house. Cash amount was also kept by Kistoor Chand inthat room. When Kistoor Chand got up on the morning of February 9, 1964 he found that the big window of the room in which ornaments had been kept was lying open. On opening the room it was found that the boxes containing ornaments were lying empty. A number of articles were seen scattered in the room.Reportabout the occurrence was lodged at police station Manak Chowk Jaipur City by Mahindra Kumar (PW74), son of Kistoor Chand at 7-30 a.m. on February 9, 1964. A case was then registered by the police under sections 457 and 380 Indian Penal Code.

Sub Inspector Basarat Vallabh went soon after the registration of the case to Kistoor Chands house and found that culpritshad effected their entry into the room by breaking open the window. The Sub Inspector saw a number of articles scattered in the room. The containers for keeping gold and silver ornaments were lying empty. A police photographer was sent for. The photographer developed the fingerprints left by the culprits on a silver plate lying in an almirah of the room. The photographs of the finger impressions were compared with the specimen finger impressions of Hira Singh accused and it was found that they tallied with each other.

Hira Singh accused was arrested on February 21, 1964. In pursuance of disclosure statement of Hira Singh Rs. 1,790 were recovered from Saraswati Bai, wife of the brother of Hira Singh. A box was also recovered in pursuance of the disclosure statement of Hira Singh and a number of stolen articles werefound in that box. Hira Singh also got recovered an instrument of house breaking. As a result of the interrogation of Hira Singh, the police raided the house of Ayodhya Singh appellant at Jairi on February 21, 1964 and recovered from that place 18 stolen articles. Ayodhya Singh was arrested by the police on February 25, 1964 at Etawah and from his personal search 26 items of stolen property were recovered. The recovered property included cash amount of Rs. 6,485/- including 28 currency notes ofthe denominationof Rs. 100/-. In pursuance of information supplied by 883 Ayodhya Singh, the police recovered on March 3, 1964 a numberof stolen gold articles wrapped in anold baniyan which had been buried in a graveyard near milestone No. 5 on the Agra-Etawah-Kanpur road. Identifications of recovered ornaments were held by Shri A. C. Bafna Magistrate (PW 72) on July 17, 1964 and July 20, 1964. The recovered ornaments were then identified by Kistoor Chand and Mahendra Kumar PWs as those which belonged to them and which had been stolen. At the trialthe two accused denied the prosecution allocations against them and stated that they hadbeen falsely involved in this case. According to them, the various articles which had been recovered bythe police, belonged to them. Regarding the recovery of some goldbars from him, the appellant stated that he got the bars prepared for the purpose of purchasing bonds. Thetrial court accepted the prosecution case and convicted and sentenced the accused as, above.The recovered articles were ordered to be restored to Mahendra Kumar complainant.Appeals and revision petitions filed by the accused, as stated earlier, were dismissed.

We have heard Mr. Singh who has argued thecase amicus curiaeon behalf of the appellant and are ofthe opinion that there is no merit in the appeal.The fact thatsome persons had broken into the house of Kistoor Chand on the night betweenFebruary 8 :and February 9, 1964 and had removed valuable articles consisting of cash, jewellery and silverware is proved by the testimony of Kistoor Chand and Mahindra Kumar. The prosecution has also ledevidence to show that a number of stolen articles were recovered in pursuance of the disclosure statement of Hira Singh accused after he was, arrested on February 21, 1964. The interrogation of Hira Singh led to the police raid on the house of Ayodhya Singh appellant wherefrom a number of stolen articles wererecovered. Ayodhya Singh wasarrested on February 25, 1964 and some of the stolen articleswere recovered from his person. Ayodhya Singh thereaftermade disclosure statement ,,which led to the recovery ofmore stolenarticles from a graveyard ,on March 3, 1964. The appellate court and the High Court accepted the evidence adduced by the prosecution in this respect. The version of the accused that the recovered articles belonged tothem was rejected. The courts below in this content reliedupon the identification of the recovered articles by Kistoor Chand and Mahindra Kumar. Nothing has been brought to our noticeby Mr. Singh as may justify interference with the appraisement of the evidence of the trial magistrate, the Additional Sessions Judge and theHigh Court. One significant circumstance which shows the falsity of the claim made by the appellant that the recovered articles belonged to him is the fact that some of those articles were recovered from a graveyard near milestone No. 5 at AgraEtawahKanpur road. The articles were found to havebeen buried there 884 and were recovered in pursuance of the disclosure statement of the appellant. If the aforesaid recovered articles consisting ofgold bars belonged to the appellant, it is difficult to believe that he would have buried them in a lonelyspot in a graveyard. The fact that, the appellant buriedthem in a graveyard shows hisanxiety to conceal those articles so that no one may know that he was in possession of those articles.

Mr. Singh has assailed the propriety of the identification of the recovered articles. In this respect we find that the evidence of Shri A. C. Bafna Magistrate (PW 72) showsthat the recoveredarticles weremixed with other similar articles and all necessary precautions were taken. Kistoor Chand and Mahindra Kumar correctly identified the recovered articles. Nothing cogent has been shown to us as to why the statement of Shri Bafna in this respect be not accepted. Mr. Singh has referred to the observations of the High Court that the judgments of thetrial magistrate and the Additional Sessions Judge were not very satisfactory.This circumstance, in our opinion, is not very material because the High Court considered the evidence which hadbeen adduced in the caseat some length and came to the conclusion that the case against the accused hadbeen proved. In view of the fact that the evidence on record has been discussed in detail by the High Court, it cannot be said that the appellant has been prejudiced because of the fact that the judgments of the trialmagistrate and the appellate court were not as elaborate as theyshouldhave been.

A faint attempt was made by Mr. Singh to show that there had been misjoinder of charges. This submission is plainly without any force because the circumstances of the case show that the accused jointly committed the offences with which they were charged and that those offences were committed in the course of the same transaction. The two accused could consequently be. charged and tried together as such a course is permitted by section 239 of the Codeof Criminal Procedure.

Lastly, it has been argued that the conviction of the appellant should have been under section 411 Indian Penal Code and not under sections 457 and 380 Indian Penal Code. This contention is equally untenable.The house breaking and theft in the house of Kistoor Chand took place on the night between February 8 and February 9, 1964.The various stolen articles were recovered from the appellants house on February 21, 1964 and thereafter from his person on February 25, 1964. The appellant was in police custody after February 25, 1964 and more stolen articles were recovered on March 3, 1964 from the graveyard in pursuance of his disclosure statement. The articles which were recovered on March 3, 1964 can consequently be held to be in the possession of the appellant on February 25, 1694. It would

885 thus follow that within 17 days of the theft the appellant was found in possession of the stolen articles. According to illustration (a) of section 114 of the Indian Evidence Act, a man who is in possession of stolen goods soon after the theft is either the thief or hasreceived the goods knowing them to be stolen, unless he can account for his possession. It would, in our opinion, depend upon the facts and circumstances of each case whether the court should draw the presumption that a person found in possession of stolen goods soon after the theft and who has not been able to account for his possession is the thief or whether he is the receiver of the goods knowing them to be stolen. We may state at this stage that the appellant has not been able to account for his possession of the stolen articles and the explanation furnished by him is not all worthy of credence. Looking to the facts and circumstances of the case, we are of the view that the courts below were justified in drawing the presumption that the appellant was guilty of the offence under section 457 and 380 Indian Penal Code. The factthat the _culprits entered the room on the third floor by opening the window and thereafter broke open a large number of boxes and almirahsand removed huge quantity of gold and silverware shows that it was not the work of a single individual. The fact that the appellant was foundsoon after the theft in possession of a very large number of stolen articles shows that he was himself the thief and not the receiver of stolen goods.The present isnot acase wherein one or two or a very few of the stolen articles were found in the possession of the appellant soon after the theft. On the contrary, the bulk of stolen articleswere recovered from him. The number and the nature of the stolen articles recovered from the appellant soon after the theft coupled with the other circumstances of the case, in our opinion, warrant the presumption that the appellant himself committed thetheft after entering the room on the third storey of Kistoor Chands house through the window. In the result, the appeal, fails and is dismissed. S.C. Appeal

dismissed. 886
**********, 0 , 
CROSS CITATION
1965 SC 585 (5)
1962 SCR Supl. (1) 8

CRIMINAL APPELLATE JURISDICTION: Criminal Appeal No. 31 of 1961.

Appeal by special leave from the judgment and order dated October 7, 1958 of the Andhra Pradesh High Court in Criminal Appeal No. 456 of 1957.

P . Ram Reddy for the appellants.

Ratna Raoand K R. Choudhri, for respondent No 1.

A. Ganganatham Chetty and T.M. Sen. for respondent No.2.

1961. October 5. The Judgment of the Court was delivered by

HIDAYATULLAH, J.-The two appellants who were granted special leave by this Court, appeal against the judgment of the High Court of Andhra Pradesh convicting them, on appeal against acquittal, of an offence under. 380 of the Indian Penal Code and sentencing them to six months rigorous imprisonment and a fine Rs. 500/- each, with further rigorous imprisonment for one month in default of payment of fine.

The prosecution case which had a chequered career in the High Court and the two Courts below, is as follows: In Dusi, which is a partof Bhaskararaopuram, there was a Press knownas Srinivasa Printing Press at Srinivasa Ashram. This Press existed for over 17 years. Pappala Chinna Ramadasu (P.W.4) was admittedly a printer and for some years, the declared keeper of that Press under s. 4 of the Press and Registration of Books Act, 1867. The declarations were made in 1944 (Ex.P.4) and 1947 (Ex.P-5). On November 21, 1955, 10 Pappala ChinnaRamadasu soldthis press by a registered document (Ex.P. 1 ) to one Boddepalli Lakshminarayana forRs 4,000/-,of which Rs.3,500/- were shown to have been paid in advance and the balance was received by Pappala Chinna Ramadasu on January10, 1956, (Ex.P.2). Two applications were then made on December 1, 1955, respectively by Chinna Ramadasu andBoddepalli Lakshminarayana beforethe Collector and District Magistrate for substituting the name of Boddepalli Lakshminarayana in place of that of Pappala Chinna Ramadasu in the declaration. On December 6, 1955, by Ex.P.11 they were informed that they should apply under the Pressand Registration of Books Act (25 of 1867). Subsequently, on January 11, 1956, a declaration under s. 4 of that Act was made by Boddepalli Lakshminarayana and was accepted (Ex.P.3).

The case of the prosecution further is that Boddepalli Lakshminarayana went to Kurnoolon March 20, 1956, and in hisabsence, the two appellants with two others (who wereprosecuted but acquitted)removed the Printing Press on the night of March 25, 1956 to Korlakota where the first appellant, Apparao, resides. A report of the offence (Ex.P-13), purporting to be writtenon March 27, 1956, was handed in at the police station house on the following day at 8 P.m. The policetook no action, anda complaint was, therefore, filed on April 4, 1956, by Boddepalli Laksminarayana. The Judicial Second class Magistrate, Srikakulam, convicted the two appellants of an offence under 8. 380 of the Indian Penal Code, and acquitted the two others, with whom we are not concerned, and sentenced each of theappellants to imprisonment till the rising of theCourt and a fine of Rs. 250/-, with simple imprisonment for one month in default. On appeal, the Additional District and Sessions Judge, Srikakulam, set aside the conviction and acquitted them. The complainant then obtained special leave of the High Court to file 11 appeal againstthis acquittal, and the High Court reversed theacquittal, asalready indicated above.

In support of the prosecutioncase, the complainant examined four witnesses, including himself. Pappala Chinna Ramadasu was examined as P.W.4 to prove that he had sold the Pressto Boddepalli Lakshminarayana, and two other witnesses wereexamined to prove theremoval of the Printing Press by the appellants.

The defence of the appellants was as follows: According to them, the Press originally belonged to oneGovindachari, and on October 25, 1947 he transferred it to Kuna Appala Naidu by Ex. D-2. In the registered sale deed then executed, Govindachari was joined formally by Pappala Chinna Ramadasu. The sale was for Rs. 6,400/- and on the same day, a promissory note was executed by Kuna Appala Naidu in favour of Govindachari, which was attested by Pappala Chinna Ramadasu. Subsequently, Appala Naidu made payments of certain amounts, and endorsements on tho promissory note showing these payments were signed by Pappala Chinna Ramadasu as a witness. Kuna Appala Naidu was examinedas D.W.1, and he stated that, the name of Pappala ChinnaRamadasu was formally included in the transfer deed,since the declaration stood in his name. He also stated that the deed, Ex. D.2, was signed as witness by one Akkala Naidu, who died years before the present controversy started. Kuna Appala Naidu later sold the Press to the second appellant and one Sri K. Sriramda, and the second appellant continued in possessionas owner. Pappala ChinnaRamadas continued as the printer, and his declaration as the keeper of the Press also continued. In 1953, Pappala Chinna Ramadasu left the Press for good. The Press was leased out by thesecond appellant to one Appanna, and this leave continued till 1956. On March 19, 1956, an agreement for leave was executed in favour of the first appellant, and on March 26, 1956, a registered deed was duly 12 executed. According to the appellants, the Press WAS removed during the day on March 27 and the lease amount was paidon the28th. According to them, the second appellant was the owner, in law and infact, of the Press and the first appellant was the lessee and had removed the Press in the bona fide exercise ofhis right as lessee. The appellants examined eight witnesses in support of their case.

The case of the prosecution hinged upon the evidence of Pappala Chinna Ramadasu, when confronted with Ex. D-2, he denied his signature, and stated evasively that he could not identify the signaturesof Govindachari and Appala Naidu. He admitted, however, that Appanna used to look after the Press after 1953, though he said that he used to visit the Press oncein two or three months before he soldit to P.W.1, and that the correspondence used to be made in his name.He also stated that he had purchased the Press from the Madras Type Foundry Co., for RH. 9,107/- but that the bills were lost, and he added that they were taken away along with the Press, when it was removed. The case of the appellants rested upon the proof of the signature of Pappala Chinna Ramadasu on Es. D-2 and additionally the proof of the signature of Akkala Naidu, beoause if Akkala Naidu signed the document in 1947 and died some four years before the present controversy started, there would be goodreasonto think that a document of this character couldnot be a fabricated one. The appellants examined a handwriting expert, Sri B. R. Singh (D.W.8). He statedcategoricallythat Ex.D-2bore tho signature ofPappala Chimla Ramadasu. The signature of Akkala Naidu was proved by his son, Sri Rangam. He identified the signature of his father not only on that document but also on Ex. D-3, the promissory Dote. He also stated that h father had died in 1951.

From thismaterial, the Additional District and Sessions Judge, Srikakulam, found that Ex- D-2 13 was not a forged document, as was suggested, but was amply proved as genuine by Pappala Chandrudu (D.W 4) and the combined evidence of Sri Rangam (D. W.3) andSri B.R. Singh (D. W. 8).He therefore, held that Pappala Chinna Ramadasu had no right to sell the Pres in 1955 to Boddepalli Lakshminarayana and that his connection with the Press had effectively ceased from. 1953 even as a mere printer. It is unnecessary to examine whether this finding or the finding given by the Judicial SecondClass Magistrate, Srikakulam, who held otherwise, wasthe correct inferencefrom the. facts. The learned Judge of the High Court, who heard the appeal against the acquittal, said nothing about Ex. D-2. According to him, the removal of the Pressamounted to theft, even though the appellants removed it under a bona fide claim of right.

In this statement of the law, the learned Judge was, with respect, clearly in error. This is what the learned Judge observed:

Further, to a charge of theft, the plea

that the property was removed under a bona

fide claim of right would not avail. For

example aperson who bona fide believes that

the fountain pen on his neighbours desk is

his has no right in law to trespass into the

neighbours houseand snatch away the pen

without the latters content.

The first of the statements is certainly not the law. It is settled law that where abona fide claim of right exists, it can be a good defence to a prosecution for theft. An act does not amount to theft, unless there be not only no legal right but no appearance or colour of alegal right. in 2 East .659, the law was stated a long time ago thus:

If there be in the prisoner any fair

pretence of property of right, or if it be

brought into doubt at all, the court will

direct an acquittal. 14 And accordingto I Hale P.C. 509, the best evidence is that the goodswere taken quite openly. The law thus stated by East and Hale has not been altered inmoderntimes.There are numerous casesin which Courts in India have recognised a bone fide claim of right as a defence to the charge of theft. See Ratanlal law of Crimes 19th Ed. p. 933.

We are not concerned in this case with the declaration under the Press and Registrationof Books Act. A declaredkeeper of the Press is not necessarily the owner thereof so as to be able to confertitle to thePress upon another. The ownership of the Press is a matter of the general law and must follow that law. Whether Pappala Chinna Ramadasu was not only the declared keeper of thePress but also its owner can onlybe effectively decided by theCivil Court. For purposes of Criminal law, the evidence prima facie pointed to a transferof thePress by Pappala Chinna Ramadasu and Govindachari to Kuna Appala Naidu. The evidence prima facie also established that the appellants had taken possession of the Press under a bona fide claim of right, and that, in ouropinion. was sufficient to dispose of the present case. The Additional District and Sessions Judge,Srikakulam, had rightly held that the matter was for the decision of the Civil Court, and that this was not a case of theft under the Indian Penal Code, and had rightly directed the acquittal of the appellants. The learned Judge of the High Court considered the declarationby Pappala Chinna Ramadasu,which continued Unchanged, as sufficient to prove anoffence of theft. In our opinion, in tho circumstances and in the light of the finding given by the District and Sessions Judgewith regard to Ex. D-2, it was necessary to go further to see what right Pappala Chinna Ramadasu had to the Press at all. If this had been considered, the learned Judge would have seen that there was some doubt the rightof Pappala Chinna Ramadasu 15 to transfer the Press in 1955 toBoddepalli Lakshminarayana, and further that the defence that the appellantstook possession of the Press under a bona. fide claim of right was a good defence entitling them to an acquittal.

In the result, this appeal must succeed. The convictions ofthe appellantsand the sentences passed on them are set aside, they are acquitted and their bail bonds shall stand discharged. The fines, if realised, are ordered to be remitted.

Appeal allowed.
**********, 0 , 
HEADNOTE
SERVICE AND LABOUR LAWS
Industrial Dispute Act, 1947
Section 11A - Natural Justice - Termination - Effect of acquittal in criminal case - Theft of Face Milling Cutter - Respondents caught in factory premises - Enquiry officer held charges proved but respondents acquitted in criminal case - Labour Court while holding that departmental enquiry was legal and proper, also held that initiation of enquiry before disposal of criminal case was against principles of natural justice and hence termination was not justified, specially when accused is acquitted by Criminal Court. Held when Labour Court upheld the departmental enquiry as being legal and proper, then it should have confined itself to deciding the legality of dismissal order as per the provisions of Section 11A. Labour Court did not consider the law laid down by Apex Court in The Workmen of M/s Firestone Tyre & Rubber Co. of India (Pvt.) Ltd.s case. It even erred in holding that since appellant failed to lead any evidence to prove the charge in Labour Court, dismissal orders were liable to be set aside.
HELD
When we examine the legality and the correctness of the Awards of the Labour Court, we are of the considered opinion that the Labour Court, having held and indeed rightly that the departmental enquiry conducted by the appellant was legal and proper committed an error in holding that the departmental enquiry got vitiated due to criminal court’s order which had acquitted the respondents from the charge of theft. In our opinion, there was no occasion for the Labour Court to examine this issue once the departmental enquiry was held legal and proper. The Labour Court, in our opinion, committed yet another error in holding that since the appellant failed to lead any evidence to prove the charge in Labour Court, therefore, the dismissal orders of respondents are liable to be set aside. This finding, in our opinion, was again not legally sustainable. (Para 16)
In other words, the Labour Court should have then confined its enquiry to examine only one limited question as to whether the punishment given to the respondents was, in any way, disproportionate to the gravity of the charge leveled against them and this, the Labour Court should have examined by taking recourse to the provisions of Section 11-A of the Industrial Dispute Act, 1947 (in short “the Act”) and the law laid down by this Court in the case of The Workmen of M/s Firestone Tyre & Rubber Co. of India (Pvt.) Ltd. v. The Management & Ors. 1973 (1) SCC 813. It was, however, not done thereby rendering the order of Labour Court legally unsustainable. (Para 18)
Natural justice - Whether initiation of departmental enquiry should be only after decision of Criminal Court, otherwise it would be against the principle of natural justice. Held criminal proceeding and departmental proceedings are two separate proceedings in law. Standard of proof required in domestic enquiry is different from that required in criminal case. In domestic enquiry it is pre-ponderance of probabilities. In this case, dismissal order was not based on Criminal Courts judgement. It was based on domestic enquiry which every employer has a right to conduct independently of criminal case. Divisional Controller, Karnataka State Road Transport Corporations JT 2011 (13) SC 247 case relied.
HELD
The Labour Court should have seen that the dismissal order of the respondents was not based on the criminal Court’s judgment and it could not be so for the reason that it was a case of acquittal. It was, however, based on domestic enquiry, which the employer had every right to conduct independently of the criminal case. (Para 20)
This Court has consistently held that in a case where the enquiry has been held independently of the criminal proceedings, acquittal in criminal Court is of no avail. It is held that even if a person stood acquitted by the criminal Court, domestic enquiry can still be held - the reason being that the standard of proof required in a domestic enquiry and that in criminal case are altogether different. In a criminal case, standard of proof required is beyond reasonable doubt while in a domestic enquiry, it is the preponderance of probabilities. (See Divisional Controller, Karnataka State Road Transport Corporation v. M.G. Vittal Rao jt 2011(13) SC 247). (Para 21)
In the light of this settled legal position, the Labour Court was not right in holding that the departmental enquiry should have been stayed by the appellant awaiting the decision of the criminal Court and that it is rendered illegal consequent upon passing of the acquittal order by the criminal Court. This finding of the Labour Court is, therefore, also not legally sustainable. (Para 22)
Dismissal - Labour court held departmental proceedings to have got vitiated due to acquittal in criminal proceeding - In writ High Court held enquiry to be legal but remanded the matter without directing as to what Labour Court has to decide after remand and why Writ Court could not decide such issues. Held, High Court erred in doing so. Writ Court should have examined the question itself which it had left for consideration i.e. whether order of dismissal was commensurate with the charges or interference was required under Section 11 of the Act. Shankar Chakravartis case referred.
HELD
Now coming to the order of writ Court (Single Judge) though, in our opinion, the Single Judge rightly held the departmental enquiry as being legal and proper but committed an error in remanding the case to the Labour Court without precisely saying as to what the Labour Court has to decide after remand and why writ Court cannot decide such issues in the writ petition. We find that the Single Judge, in concluded para of the order, remanded the whole case afresh for its decision on merits. (Para 23)
In our considered view, the Single Judge (Writ Court) having held the enquiry to be legal and proper instead of remanding the case to the Labour Court should have himself examined the short question which had survived for consideration in the writ petition, namely, whether the punishment of dismissal was commensurate with the charges or it required any interference by the Court under Section 11-A of the Act. (Para 24)
Dismissal order - Whether justified when acquittal was recorded in criminal proceedings - Departmental enquiry held to be legal and proper - Respondent was found committing theft while on duty. Held, act of theft by employee while on duty is a serious charge, which stood proved in enquiry. Hence employer was justified in dismissing the employee from service. Plea that employee was acquitted in criminal case, hence reinstatement should be ordered, has no merit. Dismissal order was not passed on the basis of conviction of employee by the Criminal Court, which was later set aside by Superior Court. Findings were based on preponderance of probabilities and could be recorded by the enquiry officer notwithstanding the order of acquittal by Criminal Court. Dismissal order held to be legal and proper. Division Bench, High Court erred in ordering reinstatement and restoration of the order of Labour Court.
HELD
An act of theft committed by an employee while on duty is a serious charge. This charge once proved in enquiry, the employer is justified in dismissing the employee from service. (Para 29)
Dismissal orders had not been passed on the basis of employees’ conviction by the criminal Court which later stood set aside by the superior Court. Had it been so, then the situation would have been different because once the conviction order is set aside by the superior Court, the dismissal order which was solely based on passing of the conviction order also stands set aside. Such was not the case here. (Para 31)
In the case on hand, the appellant (employer) had conducted the departmental enquiry in accordance with law independently of the criminal case wherein the Enquiry Officer, on the basis of the appreciation of evidence brought on record in the enquiry proceedings, came to a conclusion that a charge of theft against the delinquent employees was proved. This finding was based on preponderance of probabilities and could be recorded by the Enquiry Officer notwithstanding the order of criminal Court acquitting the respondents. (Para 32)

CASES REFERRED
1.  Divisional Controller, Karnataka State Road Transport Corporation v. M.G. Vittal Rao JT 2011 (13) SC 247 (Para 21)
2.  Shankar Chakravarti v. Britannia Biscuits Co. Ltd. & Anr. AIR 1979 SC 1652 (Para 25)
3.  The Workmen of M/s Firestone Tyre & Rubber Co. of India (Pvt.) Ltd. v. The Management & Ors. 1973 (1) SCC 813 (Para 18)


ABHAY MANOHAR SAPRE, J.
1. These appeals are filed against the common final judgment and order dated 16.04.2007 passed by the High Court of Judicature at Madras in Writ Appeal Nos.3789 of 2003 and 3790 of 2003 whereby the High Court allowed the appeals filed by the respondents and directed the appellant to reinstate the respondents with continuity of service and other attendant benefits but without payment of back wages.
2. In order to appreciate the issues involved in these two appeals, it is necessary to set out the facts in detail.
3. The appellant in both the appeals is a Public Sector undertaking known as-Bharat Heavy Electricals Ltd. (BHEL). It has a plant at Ranipet in District Vellore, Tamil Nadu. M. Mani-Respondent in Civil Appeal No.10766/2013 and T.A. Mathivanan (since dead) and represented by his legal representatives-respondent in connected Civil Appeal No.10767/2013 were the employees of BHEL at all relevant time and were working as Driver Grade II in the plant.
4. On 17.02.1991, both the respondents were on duty in the night shift in the Plant. They were supposed to remain present all the time in the Transport Department of the Plant so that on receiving the call they would attend the place of call with their respective vehicles.
5. It was, however, noticed by the officials concerned on duty that both the respondents were not found present on their respective seats and instead were found driving one forklift FLV in another shop floor. It was also noticed that they both had unauthorizedly removed one heavy machine called-”Face Milling Cutter of 500 diameter” from one shop floor and kept it on forklift and loaded in company’s ambulance, which was being driven by T.A. Mathivanan. Both of them then managed to take the said machine in ambulance outside factory premises through South gate.
6. The officials, who witnessed the incident, reported the incident to the appellant (Management). The appellant took up the matter with seriousness and issued charge-sheet to both the respondents. They were asked to submit their explanation. Both denied the charges. The appellant, therefore, appointed Enquiry Officer for holding regular departmental enquiry. Both the respondents participated in the enquiry proceedings. The Enquiry Officer recorded the evidence of the witnesses and submitted his report. The Enquiry Officer, on evaluation of the evidence, held the charges as proved against both the respondents. He held that both the respondents were involved in committing theft of “Face Milling cutter” and were caught in the factory premises while on duty. The appellant accepted the report and dismissed the respondents from service on 31.08.1991. Against their dismissal order, the respondents filed departmental appeals. The appeals were dismissed.
7. This event gave rise to filing of two cases. One was by the State in the Court of Magistrate seeking prosecution of the respondents under Section 379 of the Indian Penal Code, 1860 (in short “IPC”) and the other was by the respondents against the appellant (employer) in Labour Court challenging legality of their dismissal orders (ID Nos. 801 and 839 of 1993). So far as the criminal case was concerned, the Magistrate, by his order dated 24.11.1992, acquitted the respondents from the charge.
8. As regards the cases before the Labour Court out of which these two appeals arise, the Labour Court framed three issues, first, whether the enquiry conducted by the Enquiry Officer was legal and proper; second, whether the findings of the Enquiry Officer holding the charge as proved against the respondents are correct; and third, whether these two employees are entitled to claim the relief of reinstatement with back wages?
9. By Award dated 06.08.2001 (Annexure-P-9), the Labour Court answered the reference in favour of the employees by recording the following findings:
     “Hence it can not be said that there has been denial of reasonable opportunity during the enquiry.”
9.1. and then in Para 7, it was held that,
     “it can not be considered that the departmental enquiry has not been held properly.”
9.2. and then in Para 8 it was held that,
     “till the disposal of the criminal case, the Management ought to have stayed the departmental enquiry and they should have passed the order only after the conclusion  of the criminal proceedings.”
9.3. and, in the same Para 8, it was held that,
     “Therefore, the object of this provision is that till proceedings of criminal court, the departmental enquiry should not be initiated. Therefore, the respondent ought not to have appointed enquiry officer to conduct the enquiry in respect of same charge which has been pending before the Criminal Court. Such an enquiry held is contrary to principles of natural justice. On this ground, I hold that departmental enquiry is held not in accordance with principle of natural justice”
9.4. and in last line of Para 8, it was held that,
     “it is for this reason the removal of the employee from service is not justified.”
9.5. The Labour Court then lastly in para 9 held that,
     “Having held that the departmental enquiry has not been conducted according to principle of natural justice, it has to be decided whether the finding of the Enquiry Officer that the charge against the petitioner is correct. When the criminal case has been pending the finding of the Enquiry Officer that the petitioner is guilty of the charge is not correct. Further the petitioner has been acquired by the criminal court. Hence when in the criminal proceedings, the petitioner has been found not guilty, I hold that the findings of the Enquiry Officer that the charge against the petitioner had been proved, is not correct.”
10. To sum up, the Labour Court held that, firstly, the departmental enquiry was properly held; secondly, the employer instead of holding an enquiry should have stayed it awaiting the outcome of the criminal case; thirdly, since the criminal case resulted in the acquittal of the respondents, the departmental enquiry stood vitiated as violating the principle of natural justice; fourthly, since the employer did not lead any evidence in support of the charge, the charge remained unproved; and lastly, the dismissal orders are bad in law in the light of the four grounds and, therefore, the respondents be reinstated in service with payment of full back wages by the appellant.
11. The appellant, felt aggrieved, filed writ petitions in the High Court. The Single Judge, by order dated 31.07.2003 (Annexure-P-11), allowed the writ petitions, set aside the award of the Labour Court and remanded the case to the Labour Court for deciding both the matters afresh. The Single Judge held that when the Labour Court held the departmental enquiry to be legal and proper then the only question that remained for the Labour Court to decide was as to whether the punishment imposed on two employees, i.e., “dismissal” was just, legal and proper or it required any interference in its quantum and, if so, to what extent. Having observed this, the writ Court remanded the cases to Labour Court to decide the cases afresh on merits. This is what the learned Single Judge in concluding para held,
     “10. Keeping in view of all these aspects, I think interest of justice would be served by quashing the awards in both the cases and directing both the matters are to be considered afresh by the Labour Court. It goes without saying that both the matters should be taken up for hearing together and shall be disposed of. Since the matter is pretty old, the Industrial Disputes are to be decided as expeditiously as possible, preferably within a period of six months from the date of receipt of a copy of this order.”
12. Felt aggrieved, the respondents filed intra court appeals in the High Court before the Division Bench. By impugned judgment, the Division Bench allowed the appeals, set aside the order of writ Court and directed reinstatement of the respondents by restoring the order of the Labour Court to this extent but declined to award to them any back wages except continuity of service and other attendant benefits to the respondents.
13. Felt aggrieved by the judgment of the Division Bench, the appellant (employer) has filed these appeals by way of special leave before this Court.
14. Heard Mr. P.S. Patwalia, learned senior counsel for the appellant and Mr. M.A. Chinnasamy and Mr. M.K. Perwez, learned counsel for the respondents.
15. Having heard learned counsel for the parties and on perusal of the record of the case, we are constrained to allow the appeals, set aside the impugned judgment and uphold the dismissal order of the respondents as legal and proper.
16. To begin with, when we examine the legality and the correctness of the Awards of the Labour Court, we are of the considered opinion that the Labour Court, having held and indeed rightly that the departmental enquiry conducted by the appellant was legal and proper committed an error in holding that the departmental enquiry got vitiated due to criminal court’s order which had acquitted the respondents from the charge of theft. In our opinion, there was no occasion for the Labour Court to examine this issue once the departmental enquiry was held legal and proper. The Labour Court, in our opinion, committed yet another error in holding that since the appellant failed to lead any evidence to prove the charge in Labour Court, therefore, the dismissal orders of respondents are liable to be set aside. This finding, in our opinion, was again not legally sustainable.
17. In our opinion, once the Labour Court upheld the departmental enquiry as being legal and proper then the only question that survived for consideration before the Labour Court was whether the punishment of “dismissal” imposed by the appellant to the respondents was legal and proper or it requires any interference in its quantum.
18. In other words, the Labour Court should have then confined its enquiry to examine only one limited question as to whether the punishment given to the respondents was, in any way, disproportionate to the gravity of the charge leveled against them and this, the Labour Court should have examined by taking recourse to the provisions of Section 11-A of the Industrial Dispute Act, 1947 (in short “the Act”) and the law laid down by this Court in the case of The Workmen of M/s Firestone Tyre & Rubber Co. of India (Pvt.) Ltd. v. The Management & Ors. 1973 (1) SCC 813. It was, however, not done thereby rendering the order of Labour Court legally unsustainable.
19. Similarly, in our considered view, the Labour Court failed to see that the criminal proceedings and departmental proceedings are two separate proceedings in law. One is initiated by the State against the delinquent employees in criminal Court and other, i.e., departmental enquiry which is initiated by the employer under the Labour/Service Laws/Rules, against the delinquent employees.
20. The Labour Court should have seen that the dismissal order of the respondents was not based on the criminal Court’s judgment and it could not be so for the reason that it was a case of acquittal. It was, however, based on domestic enquiry, which the employer had every right to conduct independently of the criminal case.
21. This Court has consistently held that in a case where the enquiry has been held independently of the criminal proceedings, acquittal in criminal Court is of no avail. It is held that even if a person stood acquitted by the criminal Court, domestic enquiry can still be held - the reason being that the standard of proof required in a domestic enquiry and that in criminal case are altogether different. In a criminal case, standard of proof required is beyond reasonable doubt while in a domestic enquiry, it is the preponderance of probabilities. (See Divisional Controller, Karnataka State Road Transport Corporation v. M.G. Vittal Rao JT 2011 (13) SC 247).
22. In the light of this settled legal position, the Labour Court was not right in holding that the departmental enquiry should have been stayed by the appellant awaiting the decision of the criminal Court and that it is rendered illegal consequent upon passing of the acquittal order by the criminal Court. This finding of the Labour Court is, therefore, also not legally sustainable.
23. Now coming to the order of writ Court (Single Judge) though, in our opinion, the Single Judge rightly held the departmental enquiry as being legal and proper but committed an error in remanding the case to the Labour Court without precisely saying as to what the Labour Court has to decide after remand and why writ Court cannot decide such issues in the writ petition. We find that the Single Judge, in concluded para of the order, remanded the whole case afresh for its decision on merits.
24. In our considered view, the Single Judge (Writ Court) having held the enquiry to be legal and proper instead of remanding the case to the Labour Court should have himself examined the short question which had survived for consideration in the writ petition, namely, whether the punishment of dismissal was commensurate with the charges or it required any interference by the Court under Section 11-A of the Act.
25. In other words, the remand to the Labour Court in this case by the Single Judge was not called for. It would have become necessary, if the Single Judge had come to a conclusion that the departmental enquiry is illegal. In such situation, the question would have arisen as to whether the employer should now be given an opportunity to prove the charge before the Labour Court on merits by adducing evidence provided such opportunity had been asked for in any form by the employer (See- Shankar Chakravarti v. Britannia Biscuits Co. Ltd. & Anr. AIR 1979 SC 1652).
26. However, this occasion did not arise because, as observed supra, the enquiry was held legal and proper by the Labour Court and Single Judge.
27. Now coming to the legality of the impugned judgment, in our considered opinion, there was absolutely no justification on the part of the Division Bench to have allowed the appeals of the respondents and restored the order of the Labour Court by setting aside the dismissal order. The Division Bench, in our view, did not take note of correct legal position, which we have discussed above.
28. In our opinion, this is a clear case where the departmental enquiry was held legal and proper. We also, on going through the record of the case, hold that the departmental enquiry was properly held and was, therefore, legal and proper. So far as the quantum of punishment imposed on the respondents is concerned, having regard to the nature of charge which stood proved in the enquiry, in our view, the order of dismissal from service was the appropriate punishment. It was commensurate with the charge.
29. An act of theft committed by an employee while on duty is a serious charge. This charge once proved in enquiry, the employer is justified in dismissing the employee from service.
30. We are not impressed by the submission urged by the learned counsel for the respondents (employees) when he urged that once the respondents (employees) were acquitted from the charge of theft by the criminal Court, the dismissal orders deserve to be set aside entitling the employees to seek reinstatement in service. Learned counsel read the entire criminal Court’s order to show that it was an honorable acquittal of the employees from the charge of theft.
31. The answer to the aforementioned submission lies in the law laid down by this Court in the case of Karnataka SRTC (supra). At the cost of repetition, we may say that in the case on hand, the dismissal orders had not been passed on the basis of employees’ conviction by the criminal Court which later stood set aside by the superior Court. Had it been so, then the situation would have been different because once the conviction order is set aside by the superior Court, the dismissal order which was solely based on passing of the conviction order also stands set aside. Such was not the case here.
32. In the case on hand, the appellant (employer) had conducted the departmental enquiry in accordance with law independently of the criminal case wherein the Enquiry Officer, on the basis of the appreciation of evidence brought on record in the enquiry proceedings, came to a conclusion that a charge of theft against the delinquent employees was proved. This finding was based on preponderance of probabilities and could be recorded by the Enquiry Officer notwithstanding the order of criminal Court acquitting the respondents.
33. In view of the foregoing discussion, the appeals succeed and are allowed. Impugned judgment is set aside. As a consequence thereof, the dismissal orders of the respondents herein are held legal and proper and accordingly upheld.
**********, 0 , 
CROSS CITATION
2006 AIR (SC) 1214
2006 (2) SCC 373
APPEARANCES
Mrs. D. Bharathi Reddy, Advocate for the Appellants.
Mrs. K. Amareswari, Senior Advocate, Mr. B. Ramana Murthy and Mrs. Anjani Aiyagari, Advocates with for the Respondent.
HEADNOTE
SERVICE AND LABOUR LAWS
Government service - Termination of service for misconduct - Judicial review of administrative decisions - Scope - Respondent, a Police Head Constable charged with the theft of lens of closed circuit TV while on security duty during the visit of US President - After Departmental Enquiry services of delinquent dispensed with by the Disciplinary Authority since the charges stood proved by evidence of witnesses - Delinquent given adequate opportunity of being heard in the said proceedings - Appellate Authority as well as Administrative Tribunal upholding the dismissal - On a writ High Court on reappreciation of the evidence, upsetting the findings and directing the reinstatement of the respondent - Validity. Allowing the appeal held that the Enquiry Officer having held on the basis of evidence that the charge of theft stood proved against the respondent and the said finding having been upheld by the Appellate Authority and the Tribunal, the High Court erred in reappreciating the evidence and upsetting the factual findings. High Court while exercising the power of judicial review does not act as Appellate Court and judicial review is not akin to adjudication on merits by reappreciating the evidence as an Appellate Authority. Considering the gravity of the misconduct the punishment of dismissal was not disproportionate. Writ filed by the respondent therefore dismissed.
HELD
From the finding recorded by the High Court it clearly appears that the High Court re-appreciated the evidence as an Appellate Authority. Apart from reappreciating the evidence, which is not permissible in law, the High Court also fell in grave error by directing the government pleader and the learned counsel for the respondent herein to again view the cassettes. It is on record that the Inquiry Officer relied on the video cassettes displayed during the Inquiry as part of additional evidence. The finding has been clearly recorded by the Inquiry Officer on the basis of the evidence adduced by PWs. 1,2,3 and 4 during the Inquiry. (Para 6)

By now it is a well-established principle of law that the High Court exercising power of judicial review under Article 226 of the Constitution does not act as an Appellate Authority. Its jurisdiction is circumscribed and confined to correct errors of law or procedural error, if any, resulting in manifest miscarriage of justice or violation of principles of natural justice. Judicial review is not akin to adjudication on merit by reappreciating the evidence as an Appellate Authority. (Para 7)

The gravity of the offence must necessarily be measured with the nature of the offence. The respondent was a member of the Discipline Force holding the rank of head constable. The duty assigned to him was a bandobast duty during the visit of the then President Bill Clinton, who ran a security risk of the highest grade. His misconduct could have led to serious security lapse resulting into fatal consequences. But, because of timely detection of the electrician PW4, the lens was recovered and immediately restored. We entirely agree with the inquiry officer that the charges are serious in nature, being committed by a member of Disciplinary Force, who deserved stringent punishment. To instill the confidence of the public in the establishment, the only appropriate punishment in such cases is dismissal from service, which has been correctly awarded. (Para 11)

In the premises aforestated, we are clearly of the view that the High Court has committed patent error of law which has resulted in miscarriage of justice. The order of the High Court is, accordingly, quashed. The appeal is allowed. Consequently, the writ petition, filed by the respondent stands dismissed. (Para 13)

CASES REFERRED
1.B.C. Chaturvedi v. Union of India & Ors. JT 1995 (8) SC 65 (Para 9)

2.Union of India v. Parma Nanda JT 1989 (2) SC 132 (Para 8)

H.K. SEMA, J.

1. This appeal, preferred by the State of Andhra Pradesh, is directed against the judgment and order of the Division Bench of the High Court of Andhra Pradesh dated 9.12.2003 in writ petition no. 14146 of 2003 quashing the order of dismissal dated 21.9.2000 of the respondent herein and the order of the appellate authority dated 20.10.2001 confirming the order of dismissal. The Division Bench of the High Court directed that the respondent herein be reinstated into service forthwith with all back wages and all attendant benefits, which he could have received, had he not been dismissed from service. The High Court further directed that the respondent be reinstated into service within a period of four weeks from the date of receipt of the order. This Court on 16.7.2004, while issuing notice granted interim stay of the impugned order. Further, on 18.7.2005, on the submission of the learned counsel for the respondent that the respondent has been reinstated pursuant to the High Court order but the back wages have not been paid, this Court stayed the payment of back wages directed by the High Court.

2. Briefly stated, the facts are as follows:

2.1 The respondent, Mohd. Nasrullah Khan was working as head constable at Shamshabad Police Station of Ranga Reddy District. Mr. Bill Clinton, the then President of the United States of America was to visit the Hi-Tech City in Hyderabad and the respondent was assigned the bandobast duty at the office of the Oracle Software India Limited on the 4th Floor of Hi-Tech City, Madhapur, Hyderabad. It is alleged that during the bandobast duty, the respondent removed the CCTV Lens No. VAT-660-DSC-56894 of Watal company from ceiling of the said office and concealed the same. It is further alleged that the said removal of the lens was observed in the close circuit TV by one G. Sridhar, the electrician (PW4) and he immediately went to the respondent and asked him about the removal but the respondent denied the same. The electrician, thereafter, informed the same to the Security Supervisor and on enquiry by him, though the respondent denied of having removed the lens at the first instance, later handed over the same stating that the same was lying at the toilet.

2.2 A disciplinary inquiry was initiated against the respondent by the Superintendent of Police, A.R. Ranga Reddy District by appointing Deputy Superintendent of Police (DSP) by its order dated 19.4.2000. The substance of imputations of misconduct and misbehaviour against the respondent are as follows:

Shri Mohd. Nasrullah Khan, High Court 380 of P.S. Shamshabad (u/s) exhibited grave misconduct in committing theft of the C.C.T.V. lens costing about Rs.15,000/- from the office of Oracle India Limited, Hi-Tech City, Madhapur on 24.3.2000, while on bandobast duty, for personal gain.

2.3 In course of the inquiry, the Inquiry Officer examined as many as four witnesses and after conducting detailed inquiry by affording adequate opportunity to the respondent submitted its report dated 18.8.200 holding that the charge against the respondent of theft of C.C.T.V. lens has been proved beyond all reasonable doubt. The Inquiry Officer, in its report, also observed as under:

The charges are serious in nature. The delinquent being the member of the disciplined force and being a protector of public property, ought not to have attempted to commit such a delinquency. I, therefore, propose that the delinquent may be awarded with a stringent punishment to meet the ends of justice.

2.4 After receipt of the Inquiry Report, a show cause notice was issued to the respondent herein by the Disciplinary Authority and after considering the reply to the show cause notice, the Disciplinary Authority dismissed the respondent from service with immediate effect by an order dated 21.9.2000. It was further directed that the period of suspension from 30.3.2000 till the date of dismissal be treated as not on duty. Aggrieved thereby, the respondent preferred an appeal before the Deputy Inspector General of Police, which was dismissed on 11.5.2001. Thereafter, the respondent filed O.A.No. 3700 of 2001 before the Andhra Pradesh Administrative Tribunal. The Administrative Tribunal, by its order dated 1.8.2001, remanded the matter to the Appellate Authority for reconsideration of the matter. The Appellate Authority, after reconsidering the representation, rejected the appeal again and confirmed the order of dismissal by its order dated 20.10.2001. Being aggrieved, the respondent again filed O.A. No. 8066 of 2001 before the Tribunal contending, inter-alia, that the theft, as alleged, was not proved and the Appellate Authority did not properly consider the submissions of the respondent and that the Appellate Authority dismissed the appeal without application of mind. The appellant herein filed a detailed counter repudiating the allegations made in the O.A. It is stated that the order of dismissal was passed in accordance with the rules and regulations and there was no denial of principles of natural justice to the respondent, nor was there any allegations of violations of rules and regulations or procedures. It was also contended that the guilt of the respondent has been proved beyond all reasonable doubt. After considering the petition and the counter, the Andhra Pradesh Appellate Tribunal by its order dated 4.4.03 dismissed the O.A. confirming the order of dismissal. Aggrieved thereby, the respondent preferred writ petition no. 14146 of 2003 before the High Court, which was allowed by the impugned order, as stated earlier. Hence, the present appeal by special leave.

3. It is contended by the learned counsel for the appellant that the finding recorded by the Inquiry Officer is a finding of fact and the High Court cannot act as an appellate authority. Its jurisdiction is circumscribed and confined to correct errors of law or procedural law, if any, or violation of principles of natural justice. It is further contended that the High Court fell in grave error of law by reappreciating the evidence recorded by the Inquiry Officer like an appellate authority in the instant case.

4. Per contra, learned counsel for the respondent contended that the alleged theft of lens or removal of lens by the respondent is not proved and, therefore, the finding of the Inquiry Officer is perverse and the order of dismissal on the basis of the finding recorded by the Inquiry Officer is vitiated. At this stage, we may point out that there is no allegation of violation of principles of natural justice, or that the inquiry was conducted without following the procedures or rules and regulations. The only case put up before us by the respondent is that the theft or removal of lens by the respondent is not proved in the course of Inquiry. This contention need not detain us any longer because going through the report of the Inquiry, the Inquiry Officer, after examining PWs. 1,2,3 and 4 and after affording adequate opportunity to the respondent, has come to the conclusion that the charge levelled against the respondent stands proved.

5. The High Court, while upsetting the order of the Tribunal dated 4.4.03 passed in O.A. No. 8066/01 and order of dismissal dated 21.1.2000 confirmed by the Appellate Authority dated 20.10.2001, recorded its finding in paragraph 5 of its judgment as under:

There is no dispute that the petitioner was posted on bandobast duty on the relevant date and the entire premises was under close circuit T.V. System. The question is whether the petitioner has committed the theft of camera lens. There is no direct evidence on this aspect. It is only on presumption that when once the camera was not relaying the pictures, the officials of Oracle company came to that place where the camera was positioned and found that the lens was not available with the camera. Even the witnesses examined on this aspect namely the employees of Oracle company did not state that the petitioner had committed theft of the lens and further it is on record that the electrician himself traced out the camera lens which was lying outside toilet room and the entire premises was carpeted. No other independent officer has been examined to establish that the petitioner had committed theft. However, we see from the report of the Enquiry Officer that he got the cassette displayed and noticed the movements of the petitioner, sitting on chair, getting up and coming towards the camera and touching the lens of camera (hand is clearly visible) between 13-58 and 13-59 hours on 24.3.2000. But this is not the function of the Enquiry Officer. It must be established by the independent evidence. When we directed the learned government pleader and the learned counsel for the petitioner to again view the cassette, they stated that the visibility is beyond recognition. In such circumstances, it has to be held that the findings of the Enquiry Officer appears to be based on mere surmises and conjectures and it is finding based on no evidence. In such situation, the Tribunal ought to have held that the enquiry is vitiated for lack of acceptable and permissible evidence on this aspect. It is also on record that the lens was not recovered from the person of the petitioner and admittedly the petitioner was on guard duty in the premises where the cameras were positioned. In such a situation, it cannot be said that simply because, the lens of one camera is missing, the petitioner committed theft of it. If really the police had conducted investigation, they could have sent the lens to the Forensic expert with reference to the fingerprints and that could have made the matters clear. But for the reasons best known to the police, they did not take such action and tried to find fault with the police constable fastening the charge of theft. Under these circumstances, we are of the considered view that the Tribunal failed to take into consideration this aspect and held that the Enquiry was conducted properly and finding was validly recorded.

6. From the finding recorded by the High Court it clearly appears that the High Court re-appreciated the evidence as an Appellate Authority. Apart from reappreciating the evidence, which is not permissible in law, the High Court also fell in grave error by directing the government pleader and the learned counsel for the respondent herein to again view the cassettes. It is on record that the Inquiry Officer relied on the video cassettes displayed during the Inquiry as part of additional evidence. The finding has been clearly recorded by the Inquiry Officer on the basis of the evidence adduced by PWs. 1,2,3 and 4 during the Inquiry.

7. By now it is a well-established principle of law that the High Court exercising power of judicial review under Article 226 of the Constitution does not act as an Appellate Authority. Its jurisdiction is circumscribed and confined to correct errors of law or procedural error, if any, resulting in manifest miscarriage of justice or violation of principles of natural justice. Judicial review is not akin to adjudication on merit by reappreciating the evidence as an Appellate Authority.

8. We may now notice a few decisions of this Court on this aspect avoiding multiplicity. In Union of India v. Parma Nanda1, K. Jagannatha Shetty, J., speaking for the Bench, observed as under:

We must unequivocally state that the jurisdiction of the Tribunal to interfere with the disciplinary matters or punishment cannot be equated with an appellate jurisdiction. The Tribunal cannot interfere with the findings of the Inquiry Officer or competent authority where they are not arbitrary or utterly perverse. It is appropriate to remember that the power to impose penalty on a delinquent officer is conferred on the competent authority either by an Act of legislature or rules made under the proviso to Article 309 of the Constitution. If there has been an enquiry consistent with the rules and in accordance with principles of natural justice what punishment would meet the ends of justice is a matter exclusively within the jurisdiction of the competent authority. If the penalty can lawfully be imposed and is imposed on the proved misconduct, the Tribunal has no power to substitute its own discretion for that of the authority. The adequacy of penalty unless it is mala fide is certainly not a matter for the Tribunal to concern itself with. The Tribunal also cannot interfere with the penalty if the conclusion of the Inquiry Officer or the competent authority is based on evidence even if some of it is found to be irrelevant or extraneous to the matter.

9. Again, the same principle has been reiterated by this Court in B.C. Chaturvedi v. Union of India & Ors.2. K. Ramaswamy, J., speaking for the Court, under:

Judicial review is not an appeal from a decision but a review of the manner in which the decision is made. Power of judicial review is meant to ensure that the individual receives fair treatment and not to ensure that the conclusion, which the authority reaches, is necessarily correct in the eye of the court. When an inquiry is conducted on charges of misconduct by a public servant, the court/tribunal is concerned to determine whether the inquiry was held by a competent officer or whether rules of natural justice are complied with. Whether the findings or conclusions are based on some evidence, the authority entrusted with the power to hold inquiry has jurisdiction, power and authority to reach a finding of fact or conclusion. But that finding must be based on some evidence. Neither the technical rules of Evidence Act nor of proof of fact or evidence as defined therein, apply to disciplinary proceeding. When the authority accepts that evidence and conclusion receives
support therefrom, the disciplinary authority is entitled to hold that the delinquent officer is guilty of the charge. The court/tribunal in its power of judicial review does not act as appellate authority to appreciate the evidence and to arrive at its own independent findings on the evidence. The court/tribunal may interfere where the authority held the proceedings against the delinquent officer in a manner inconsistent with the rules of natural justice or in violation of statutory rules prescribing the mode of inquiry or where the conclusion or finding reached by the disciplinary authority is based on no evidence. If the conclusion or finding be such as no reasonable person would have ever reached, the court/tribunal may interfere with the conclusion or the finding and mould the relief so as to make it appropriate to the facts of each case.

10. As already said, in the present case there is no allegation of violation of principles of natural justice or the inquiry being held inconsistent with the mode of procedure prescribed by the rules or regulations.

11. This takes us to the last submission of the counsel for the respondent. Learned counsel for the respondent contended that the offence, said to have been committed, being minor in nature and no loss being caused to the owner of the property, inasmuch as the same had been recovered on the spot, lenient punishment may be awarded in place of dismissal from service. We are unable to countenance this submission. The gravity of the offence must necessarily be measured with the nature of the offence. The respondent was a member of the Discipline Force holding the rank of head constable. The duty assigned to him was a bandobast duty during the visit of the then President Bill Clinton, who ran a security risk of the highest grade. His misconduct could have led to serious security lapse resulting into fatal consequences. But, because of timely detection of the electrician PW4, the lens was recovered and immediately restored. We entirely agree with the Inquiry Officer that the charges are serious in nature, being committed by a member of Disciplinary Force, who deserved stringent punishment. To instill the confidence of the public in the establishment, the only appropriate punishment in such cases is dismissal from service, which has been correctly awarded.

12. It is stated that the respondent was reinstated on 19.6.04, pursuant to the order passed by the High Court and has been working since then and pay and allowances have been paid from 19.6.04. Since, he has been paid for the period he has worked, the salary and allowances already paid to him shall not be disturbed. The respondent, however, shall not get his back wags.

13. In the premises aforestated, we are clearly of the view that the High Court has committed patent error of law which has resulted in miscarriage of justice. The order of the High Court is, accordingly, quashed. The appeal is allowed. Consequently, the writ petition, filed by the respondent stands dismissed. Parties are asked to bear their own costs.

**********, 0 , 
HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAWS
Indian Penal Code, 1860
Sections 390, 392 - Evidence Act, 1872, Section 3 - Robbery - When can be said to have been committed - Principles stated.
HELD
The provision defines robbery which is theft or extortion when caused with violence of death, hurt or wrongful restraint. When there is no theft committed, then as a natural corollary there cannot be robbery. Robbery is only an aggravated form of offence of theft or extortion. Aggravation is in the use of violence of death, hurt or restraint. Violence must be in course of theft and not subsequently. It is not necessary that violence actually should be committed but even attempt to commit it is enough. (Para 8)

The words for that end in Section 390 clearly mean that the hurt caused must be with the object of facilitating the committing of the theft or must be caused while the offender is committing theft or is carrying away or is attempting to carry away property obtained by the theft. (Para 10)

Sections 390, 392, 395 - Evidence Act, 1872, Section 3 - Robbery - PWs going on scooter at 9 p.m. - Gold chain, thali, ear-drops scooter and cash snatched by threatening with knife - Next day, arrested - Stolen goods recovered and identified by victims - No dispute that place was highway. Held that offence was established. Conviction and sentence of 10 years RI and fine of Rs. 5000/- upheld. (Paras 3 -12)

CASES REFERRED
1.State of Karnataka v. Puttaraja JT 2003 (9) SC 603 (Para 13)

DR. ARIJIT PASAYAT, J.

1. Leave granted.

2. Challenge in this appeal is to the order of a learned Single Judge of the Karnataka High Court holding the appellants guilty of offence punishable under Section 392 of the Indian Penal Code, 1860 (in short the IPC) and sentencing each of 10 years imprisonment.

3. Prosecution version in a nutshell is as follows:

3.1. On 24.6.2001 at 9.00 p.m. on Mulbagal-Punganoor road PWs 2 and 3 were going on a Bajaj Scooter. When they were near Kirumani Mitta of Buddadoru village, accused persons 2 to 5 intercepted PWs 2 and 3, and robbed the gold chain, golden ear drops, thali and cash of Rs.400/- by threatening with knife. The accused tied the legs and hands of PW-2 and PW-3 and threatened them not to escape and get out from the place for about ten minutes after their departure. The victims went to Punganoor Police Station and later on lodged First Information Report with Nangali Police (Kolar Dist.) on 25.6.2001. The Traffic Police while checking found A-2, A-3 and A-4 were going on the scooter (M.O.6) they had robbed from PW-2, the deadly weapons like knives, pistol, iron rod, etc. were hidden in the scooter. On interrogation, the accused persons admitted the commission of offence in question. A-5 and A-8 were arrested on the information given by A-2 to A-4. At the instance of A-2, the gold jewellery (M.Os.2 and 3) are recovered from PW-6-Pawn broker. The Bajaj Scooter (M.O.6) was seized from A-2, A-3 and A-4. PW-13 with whom the ear-studs and the chain were pledged by A-2, testified to the said fact. PWs 2 and 3 identified A-2 to A-5 as the persons who robbed them. Prosecution claimed that the identification of accused persons by PWs 2 and 3 coupled with the recovery of jewellery at the instance of A-2 and seizure of scooter from A-2, A-3 and A-4 clinchingly established the guilt of A-2 to A-5.

3.2. The investigating agency submitted charge sheet for alleged commission of offence punishable under Section 395 of IPC. The case was split up against A-1, A-6 and A-7 as they were absconding.

3.3. Learned Additional Sessions Judge, Kolar referred to the evidence of PWs 1 and 2, the recovery of the scooter, the recovery of stolen articles and identification thereon to conclude that accused persons are guilty and accordingly A-2 to A-5 were convicted for offence punishable under Section 395 IPC. Accused 7 and 8 were acquitted as the evidence was not sufficient to find them guilty. Considering the gravity of the offence, custodial sentence of 10 years imprisonment and a fine of Rs.5,000/- each was imposed. In appeal, the High Court found that the offence committed was covered under Section 392 IPC, but considering the gravity of the offence upheld the sentence.

4. In support of the appeal, learned counsel for the appellants submitted that the evidence of PWs 2 and 3 does not show that any knife was used for robbery. On the contrary, evidence of victim clearly shows that she raised hue and cry when accused persons tried to snatch the stolen articles from her. It was also submitted that the appellants have suffered custody of more than nearly 8 years and the sentence deserves to be reduced to the period already undergone.

5. Learned counsel for the respondent-State on the other hand submitted that there is no minimum sentence prescribed and the maximum sentence is 10 years. It is submitted that the robbery was committed on the highway at about 9.00 p.m. That being so, the sentence can be upto 14 years. Considering the gravity of the offence and the large scale highway robberies, no leniency should be shown.

6. Section 392 IPC provides for punishment for robbery. The essential ingredients are as follows:

1.Accused committed theft;

2.Accused voluntarily caused or attempted to cause.

(i)death, hurt or wrongful restraint.

(ii)Fear of instant death, hurt or wrongful restraint.

3.He did either act for the end.

(i)to commit theft.

(ii)While committing theft.

(iii)In carrying away or in the attempt to carry away property obtained by theft.

7. It is to be noted that the Section 392 provides punishment for robbery. It is punishment for the offence defined in Section 390. Punishment is higher if it is committed on a highway and between sunset and sunrise. Section 390 which defines robbery reads as follows:

390. Robbery.- In all robbery there is either theft or extortion.

When theft is robbery.-Theft is robbery if, in order to the committing of the theft, or in committing the theft, or in carrying away or attempting to carry away property obtained by theft, the offender, for the end, voluntarily causes or attempts to cause to any person death or hurt wrongful restraint, or fear of instant death or of instant hurt, or of instant wrongful restraint.

When extortion is robbery.-Extortion is robbery if the offender at the time of committing the extortion, is in the presence of the person put in fear, and commits the extortion by putting that person in fear of instant death, of instant hurt, or of instant wrongful restraint to that person or to some other person, and, by so putting in fear, induces the person so put in fear then, and there to deliver up the thing extorted.

Explanation.-The offender is said to be present if he is sufficiently near put the other person in fear of instant death, of instant hurt, or of instant wrongful restraint.

8. The provision defines robbery which is theft or extortion when caused with violence of death, hurt or wrongful restraint. When there is no theft committed, then as a natural corollary there cannot be robbery. Robbery is only an aggravated form of offence of theft or extortion. Aggravation is in the use of violence of death, hurt or restraint. Violence must be in course of theft and not subsequently. It is not necessary that violence actually should be committed but even attempt to commit it is enough.

9. The authors of the Code observed as follows:

In one single class of cases, theft and extortion are in practice confounded together so inextricably, that no judge, however, sagacious, could discriminate between them. This class of cases, therefore, has, in all systems of jurisprudence ... been treated as a perfectly distinct class ... we have, therefore, made robbery a separate crime.

There can be no case of robbery which does not fall within the definition either of theft or of extortion; but in a practice it will perpetually be a matter of doubt whether a particular act of robbery was a theft or an extortion. A large proportion of robberies will be half theft, half extortion. A seizes Z, threatens to murder him, unless he delivers all his property, and begins to pull off Zs ornaments. Z in terror begs that A will take all he has, and spare his life, assists in taking off his ornaments, and delivers them to A. Here, such ornaments as A took without Zs consent are taken by theft. Those which Z delivered up from fear of death are acquired by extortion. It is by no means improbable that Zs right arm bracelet may have been obtained by theft, and left-arm bracelet by extortion; that the rupees in Zs girdle may have been obtained by theft, and those in his turban by extortion. Probably in nine-tenths of the robberies which are committed, something like this actually takes place, and it is probable that a few minutes later neither the robber nor the person robbed would be able to recollect in what proportions theft and extortion were mixed in the crime; nor is it at all necessary for the ends of justice that this should be ascertained. For though, in general, the consent of a sufferer is a circumstance which very materially modifies the character of the offence, and which ought, therefore, to be made known to the Courts, yet the consent which a person gives to the taking of this property by a ruffian who holds a pistol to his breast is a circumstance altogether immaterial.

10. The words for that end in Section 390 clearly mean that the hurt caused must be with the object of facilitating the committing of the theft or must be caused while the offender is committing theft or is carrying away or is attempting to carry away property obtained by the theft.

11. As the provision itself provides when the highway robbery is committed, deterrent punishment is called for.

12. In the instant case, the evidence of the victim, her husband, the factum of recovery of the vehicle used has clearly established the commission of offence by the appellants. The offence was committed on a public road. There is no dispute that it was not a highway. It is also not in dispute that the offence was committed during sunset and sunrise that is, at about 9.00 p.m.

13. In State of Karnataka v. Puttaraja JT 2003 (9) SC 603 ; 2004 (1) SCC 475, it was inter-alia observed as follows:

Imposition of sentence without considering its effect on the social order in many cases may be in reality a futile exercise. The social impact of the crime e.g. where it relates to offences against women like the case at hand, dacoity, kidnapping, misappropriation of public money, treason and other offences involving moral turpitude or moral delinquency which have great impact and serious repercussions on social order and public interest, cannot be lost sight of and per se require exemplary treatment. Any liberal attitude by imposing meager sentences or taking too sympathetic a view merely on account of lapse of time or considerations personal to the accused only in respect of such offences will be resultwise counterproductive in the long run and against societal interest which needs to be cared for and strengthened by the required string of deterrence inbuilt in the sentencing system.

14. Above being the position, there is no merit in this appeal which is accordingly dismissed.

**********, 0 , 
CROSS CITATION
1990 AIR (SC) 882
1990 (2) SCC 659
1990 (2) SCR 733
APPEARANCES
Mr. K.S. Bindra, Senior Advocate, Mr. R.K. Maheshwari and Mr. G.S. Gujananip, Advocates with him for the appellant.
Mr. Prem Sunder Jha, Advocate for the Respondent.
HEADNOTE
ELECTRICITY SUPPLY
Disconnection of - Service of notice on the consumer is a pre- requisite for disconnection.
HELD
... the service of notice is a prerequisite for disconnection, and the appellant can not be allowed to go back upon its words and refuse the consumer the benefit of notice as contemplated by the agreement. The learned counsel for the appellant urged that the Delhi Electric Supply Undertaking will seriously suffer if this view is upheld. We do not understand as to what is the difficulty in the way of the appellant to serve a notice on the consumer before discontinuing the supply. It has to be appreciated that the licensee Undertaking is performing a public duty and is governed by a special statute and the law also contemplates service of a notice before disconnection of supply of electricity. The courts below have made it clear that they have not examined the case on merits. The question whether, the allegations of theft are true or not has to be examined and decided in an appropriate proceeding, and the appellant will not, therefore, be prejudiced by the present judgment in its claim. Para 4

CASES REFERRED
1. Jagarnath Singh v. B.S. Ramaswamy 1966 (1) SCR 885 Distinguished.


SHARMA,J.

1. This appeal by special leave arises out of a suit filed by the respondent-company against the appellant, Municipal Corporation of Delhi, for a mandatory injunction to restore the supply of electricity discontinued during the pendency of the suit. Initially the suit was filed for a prohibitory injunction from disconnecting the electric connection. The plaint was amended following stoppage of the supply of energy.

2. According to the plaintiffs case, the suit had to be filed as the Delhi Electricity Supply Undertaking was threatening disconnection without disclosing any reason. Subsequently, some officers of the Undertaking made an inspection of the meters and alleged theft of electricity after tampering with the seals affixed on the meters. A First Information Report was lodged with the police.

3. Admittedly no notice was served by the Delhi Electricity Supply Undertaking on the plaintiff before severing the electric connection. The learned trial court, however, dismissed the suit and the plaintiff appealed. The First Additional District Judge, Delhi, who heard the appeal decreed the suit on the sole ground of non-service of notice as required under condition no. 36 in regard to supply of electricity by the appellant. The Delhi High Court dismissed the appellants second appeal at the admission stage by a reasoned judgment.

4. The learned counsel for the appellant has contended that in view of the conduct of the plaintiff in stealing electricity, the Court should in its discretion refuse to issue a direction for restoration of the electric supply. We are afraid, it is not possible to agree with the appellant for more reasons than one. The plaintiff is seriously denying the allegation of theft and it is not possible to assume the accusation as correct without a full-fledged trial on this issue. The case of Jagarnath Singh v. B.S. Ramaswamy, 1966 (1) SCR 885; relied upon on behalf of the appellant is clearly distinguishable inasmuch as the consumer in that case was convicted under the Indian Penal Code, and the conviction was being maintained in appeal. Besides, the service of notice is a prerequisite for disconnection, and the appellant can not be allowed to go back upon its words and refuse the consumer the benefit of notice as contemplated by the agreement. The learned counsel for the appellant urged that the Delhi Electric Supply Undertaking will seriously suffer if this view is upheld. We do not understand as to what is the difficulty in the way of the appellant to serve a notice on the consumer before discontinuing the supply. It has to be appreciated that the licensee Undertaking is performing a public duty and is governed by a special statute and the law also contemplates service of a notice before disconnection of supply of electricity. The courts below have made it clear that they have not examined the case on merits. The question whether, the allegations of theft are true or not has to be examined and decided in an appropriate proceeding, and the appellant will not, therefore, be prejudiced by the present judgment in its claim. In the result, the appeal is dismissed but, without costs.

**********, 0 , 
CONTRACTS/INSURANCE/CONSUMER DISPUTES
General insurance - Insurance of property - Burglary and /or housebreaking policy - Theft - If included in the risks - Respondent taking out a policy against burglary and /house breaking in respect of property which included the godowns used for storing food grains - Theft of food grain bags from the godown - Notice by the insured - Respondent lodging FIR and subsequently raising a claim from the insurance company - Company repudiating the claim on the ground that theft was not covered by the policy and there was no burglary - Respondent raising a consumer dispute - District Forum holding that burglary included theft and hence appellant insurer directed to settle the claim - State Commission and National Commission too upholding the decision of the District Forum - Validity. Whether burglary included theft - Whether insurer liable for the loss arising from theft. Allowing the appeal of the insurer held that the terms of the contract have to be strictly read and natural meaning should be given and no outside help should be sought unless the meaning is ambiguous. When the term burglary has been defined in the policy then the cause should fall within the definition. The element of force and violence is a condition precedent for burglary or housebreaking and therefore in terms of the definition the theft should have preceded with force or violence and it is for the claimant to establish that theft or burglary took place precedent with force or violence and if it is not then the insurance company will be well within their right to repudiate the claim. Decision of the District Forum as upheld by the State and National Commissions held not sustainable. However the claim amount having been paid by the insurer, on the point of equity said decision not disturbed.
HELD
The policy is a contract between the parties and both parties are bound by the terms of contract. As per the definition of the word burglary, followed with violence makes it clear that if any theft is committed it should necessarily precede with violence i.e. entry into the premises for committing theft should involve force or violence or threat to insurer or to his employees or to the members of his family. Therefore, the element of force and violence is a condition precedent for burglary and housebreaking. The term burglary as defined in the English Dictionary means an illegal entry into the building with an intent to commit crime such as theft. But in absence of violence or force the insurer cannot claim indemnification against the insurance company. The terms of the policy have to be construed as it is and we cannot add or subtract something. Howsoever liberally we may construe the policy but we cannot take liberalism to the extent of substituting the words which are not intended. It is true that in common parlance the term burglary would mean theft but it has to be preceded with force or violence. If the element of force and violence is not present then the insurer cannot claim compensation against theft from the insurance company. (Para 6)

It is settled law that the terms of the contract has to be strictly read and natural meaning be given to it. No outside aid should be sought unless the meaning is ambiguous. (Para 14)

From the above discussion, we are of the opinion that theft should have preceded with force or violence as per the terms of insurance policy. In order to substantiate a claim an insurer has to establish that theft or burglary took place preceding with force or violence and if it is not, then the insurance company will be well within their right to repudiate the claim of the insurer. (Para 15)

However, all the three forums have already awarded compensation and the amount has been paid to the respondent, therefore, on the point of equity we would not like to disturb the payment which has already been made. However, in view of legal position stated by us, the orders of the District Forum, State Commission and the National Commission cannot be upheld. (Para 16)

CASES REFERRED
1.National Insurance Company Ltd. v. Public Type College II (2001) CPJ 26(NC). (Para 5)

2.Oriental Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Samayanallur Primary Agricultural Co-op. Bank JT 1999 (9) SC 9 (Para 10)

3.Oriental Insurance Co.Ltd. v. Sony Cheriyan reported in JT 1999 (6) SC 149 (Para 12)

4.General Assurance Society Ltd. v. Chandumull Jain and Anr. (1966) 3 SCR 500 (Para 13)

Foreign Cases Referred
:

1.Halsburys Laws of England Fourth Edition (203 Reissue) Para 646. (Para 6)

2.George and the Goldsmiths and General Burglary Insurance Association, Limited 1899 1 Q.B.595 (Para 7)

3.Dino Services Ltd. v. Prudential Assurance Co. Ltd. 1989 1 All ER 422 (Para 7)

A.K. MATHUR, J.

1. Leave granted.

2. This appeal is directed against the order passed by the National Consumer Disputes Redressal Commission, New Delhi in Revision Petition No.2159 of 2002 confirming the order passed by the State Consumer Disputes Redressal Commission, New Delhi as well as the order passed by the Consumer Disputes Redressal Forum-II (District Forum II), New Delhi.

3. The brief facts which are necessary for the disposal of the appeal are as follows. The respondent took out a policy by the appellant company for a sum of Rs.7 lacs against burglary and/or house breaking policy with effect from September 22, 1991 to September 21,1992. Necessary provisions of the policy read as under:

 THE COMPANY HEREBY AGREES subject to the terms and conditions contained herein endorsed/ or otherwise expressed hereon that if,

(a)The property hereinafter described or any part thereof be LOST or DAMAGED by BURGLARY and/or HOUSE BREAKING or

(b)ANY DAMAGE be caused to the premises to be made good by the insured from BURGLARY and/or HOUSE BREAKING or any attempt thereat.

4. The term Burglary and/or Housebreaking has been defined in terms of the policy also which reads as under.

 Burglary and/or Housebreaking shall mean theft involving entry to or exit from the premises stated therein by forcible and violent means or following assault or violence or threat thereof to the insured or to his employees or to the members of his family

5. There are exceptions to it with which we are not concerned. During the currency of the policy, the respondent had his stock of food grains kept in godown no.48, Srinagar Colony, Bharat Nagar, New Delhi. Shri Ashok Kumar Bansal, one of the partners of the respondent visited his godown on July 2, 1992 and there he found out that 197 bags of gwar were stolen. An F.I.R. was lodged at Police Station Sarai Rohilla under Section 380 of the Indian Penal Code on July 24,1992. Therefore, the respondent raised a claim against the appellant company under the aforesaid policy for incurring the aforesaid loss by theft. The appellant company repudiated the claim of the respondent on the ground that theft is not covered by the insurance policy as no burglary took place in the godown by use of force or violence. Therefore, the respondent approached the Consumer Disputes Redressal Forum-II (District Forum) and made a claim for the loss of 197 bags of gwar. The appellant company contested the claim and took the stand that the claim is not covered as per the insurance policy. However, the District Forum overruled the objection and held that burglary includes theft and by its order dated June 1, 1998 directed the appellant company to release the claim of the respondent within two months with interest at the rate of 15% per annum and also awarded cost quantified at Rs.1,000/-. Aggrieved against the said order of the District Forum the appellant company preferred an appeal before the State Consumer Disputes Redressal Commission, New Delhi which was registered as Appeal No.881 of 1998. The State Commission also by its order dated June 19,2002 upheld the claim of the respondent taking the view that notwithstanding the definition of the term burglary and/or housebreaking as defined in the policy, burglary includes theft also. It also relied upon a decision of the National Consumer Disputes Redressal Commission in the case of National Insurance Company Ltd. v. Public Type College1 . The State Commission thus dismissed the appeal filed by the appellant company. Aggrieved by the said order of the State Commission a revision was filed before the National Consumer Disputes Redressal Commission. The National Commission by its impugned order affirmed the claim of the respondent and dismissed revision on May 20,2003. Hence, the present appeal by way of special leave.

6. The question before us is whether in terms of the policy, the repudiation of the claim of the respondent by the appellant company is justified or not. We have already reproduced the terms of the policy as also the definition of burglary and/or housebreaking as defined in the policy. The definition given in the policy is binding on both the parties. The policy is a contract between the parties and both parties are bound by the terms of contract. As per the definition of the word burglary, followed with violence makes it clear that if any theft is committed it should necessarily precede with violence i.e. entry into the premises for committing theft should involve force or violence or threat to insurer or to his employees or to the members of his family. Therefore, the element of force and violence is a condition precedent for burglary and housebreaking. The term burglary as defined in the English Dictionary means an illegal entry into the building with an intent to commit crime such as theft. But in absence of violence or force the insurer cannot claim indemnification against the insurance company. The terms of the policy have to be construed as it is and we cannot add or subtract something. Howsoever liberally we may construe the policy but we cannot take liberalism to the extent of substituting the words which are not intended. It is true that in common parlance the term burglary would mean theft but it has to be preceded with force or violence. If the element of force and violence is not present then the insurer cannot claim compensation against theft from the insurance company. This expression appearing in the insurance policy came up for interpretation before the English Court and the English Courts in no uncertain terms laid down that burglary or theft has to be preceded with force or violence in order to be indemnified by the insurance company. In this connection reference may be made to the statement of law as summarized in Halsburys Laws of England Fourth Edition (203 Reissue) Para 646. It reads as under:

646. Forcible and violent entry. The terms of a burglary insurance may exclude liability in certain circumstances unless there is forcible and violent entry into the premises. If so, the entry must be obtained by the use of both force and violence or the definition is not satisfied and the policy does not apply. An entry obtained by turning the handle of an outside door or by using a skeleton key, though sufficient to constitute a criminal offence, is not within the policy since the element of violence is absent. However, an entry obtained by picking the lock or forcing back the catch by means of an instrument involves the use of violence and is therefore covered. The policy may be so framed as to apply only to violent entry from the outside; or the violent entry into a room within the insured premises may be sufficient. In any case, the violence must be connected with the act of entry; if the entry is obtained without violence, the subsequent use of violence to effect the theft, as for instance where a show-case is broken open, does not bring the loss within the policy. 

7. In this connection, a reference may be made to an earlier decision (Queens Bench Division) in re George and the Goldsmiths and General Burglary Insurance Association, Limited1. In this case, a policy was taken out for loss or damage by burglary and housebreaking. A theft took place at premises No.78, Strand, in a shop where the front door was shut but not locked or bolted and access to the shop could be obtained by turning the handle of the door. In the early morning before business hours, during the temporary absence of a servant of the assured, some person opened the front door, entered the shop, and breaking open a locked-up compartment or show-case and certain properties were stolen. Reversing the judgment of the Divisional Court, the Court of Appeal held that the loss which has occurred as above mentioned was not covered by the policy. Two propositions were advanced before the Court The first that an entry effected by the exercise of any force, however slight, was sufficient to constitute an entry within the meaning of policy. The contention was advanced that pushing a door open, if it were ajar, or turning the handle of a door, if the door were shut and could be opened in that way, was sufficient force to satisfy the language of the policy. The second proposition was that if that was so, and therefore it could not be said that the original entry in the case was effected by force within the meaning of the policy, yet nevertheless, the language of the policy was satisfied by the fact that the thief, after having entered the shop without force, proceeded to prise off an iron plate to which a locked padlock was attached securing a show-case in which valuables were placed. Their Lordships considered both the propositions and after reproducing the definition, observed that as per the plain reading of the expression used in terms of the policy violence is a condition precedent. The Court of Appeal reversed the decision of Queens Bench. This view was reiterated subsequently in the case of Dino Services Ltd. v. Prudential Assurance Co. Ltd.1. In this case also the proposition of law as enunciated in the case of George and Goldsmith and General Burglary Insurance Association Ltd. was reaffirmed. It was held as follows:

 In the context of a policy of insurance against theft from premises by  forcible and violent means of entry, the word violent was to be construed according to its ordinary meaning and meant entry by the use of any force which was accentuated or accompanied by a physical act which could properly be described as violent in nature and character. In the context of such a policy the word violent accordingly referred to the physical character of the means of entry and not merely to its unlawful character. It followed that the thieves, by gaining entry to the premises simply by using the proper keys to unlock the doors of the premises, had not entered the premises by violent means. Accordingly, the plaintiffs loss was not covered by the policy. The appeal would therefore be allowed.

8. Similarly, view has been expressed by American Courts also in American Jurisprudence 2nd (Vol. 44) 1401 which is as follows:

1401 Provisions as to visible marks or evidence, or use of force or violence

It is not uncommon for insurance companies to include in their theft or burglary policies provisions restricting their liability to cases where there were some visible marks or visible evidence of the use of force or violence. It is generally competent for an insurer to insert such a clause in the contract of insurance, and since such a provision is unambiguous it does not justify the applicability of the general principle that the insurance policy will be construed most favourable to the insured. However, the courts will not read such a requirement into a policy and do not require compliance with such clauses unless the unmistakable language of the policy so requires.

Such a policy requirement has been considered either as a limitation on the liability of the insurer or as a rule characterizing the evidence upon which liability must be predicated, but in either event, the validity of the requirement has been recognized and rarely questioned, although in at least one instance such a requirement has been held in contravention of public policy under the particular terms of the policy involved and the particular circumstances.

Just as policies insuring against burglary of an insureds premises commonly require visible marks upon the insureds premises or upon the exterior of the insureds premises, so also do safe-burglary policies commonly require visible marks either upon the insureds safe, or upon the exterior of the insureds safe, or upon the exterior of the doors of the insureds safe, and in some instances the requirement of visible marks or visible evidence has been imposed in policies pertaining to theft of property from an insureds automobile.

The determination of what constitutes visible marks or visible evidence within the meaning of such a provision, and of where such marks or evidence must be located in order to satisfy the policy requirement, is to a great extent depend upon the particular facts involved in relation to the specific requirements imposed by the policy. Where, for example, a burglary or theft policy requires that there must be visible marks of force or violence  at the place of entry into the premises, this requirement has been held complied with if the visible marks are only on one of the outer doors to the insureds premises, which the burglars or thieves must have used to accomplish their deed. However, under such a requirement, if the only visible marks are those on inside doors which are not at the entrance to the premises, recovery will be denied. Similarly, a policy providing against loss by burglary by felonious entry into a safe by actual force evidenced by visible marks made upon the exterior of all the doors does not cover loss sustained by felonious entry into the safe by a manipulation of the lock on the outer door with no visible marks made thereon, although the inner door of the safe did contain such marks, although there is contrary authority. The opening of a safe by manipulation of the combination within the period covered by a policy of burglary insurance which was made possible by force applied to the safe before such period, leaving visible marks upon the safe, was not within the terms of the policy insuring against loss through felonious entry into the safe by actual force and violence, leaving visible marks upon the safe and occurring within the policy period, with an exemption from liability from loss effected by opening the safe by manipulation of the lock.

9. It is possible that an insurer may sustain loss in technical terms of the criminal law, but no relief can be given to him unless his case is covered by the terms of the policy. It is not open to interpret the expression appearing in policy in terms of common law; but it has to give meaning to the expression as defined in the policy. The act that causes the loss must fall within the definition in the policy and it cannot take the cover and contents of the definition as laid down in the criminal law. Therefore, when the definition of the word burglary has been defined in the policy then the cause should fall within that definition. Once a party has agreed to a particular definition, he is bound by it and the definition of criminal law will be of no avail. In this connection, the decision of the National Consumer Disputes Redressal Commission in the case of National Insurance Company Ltd. v. Public Type College which has taken the colour and content of the definition given in the criminal law does not lay down the correct proposition of law. It is settled law that terms of the policy shall govern the contract between the parties, they have to abide by the definition given therein and all those expressions appearing in the policy should be interpreted with reference to the terms of policy and not with reference to the definition given in other laws. It is a matter of contract and in terms of the contract the relation of the parties shall abide and it is presumed that when the parties have entered into a contract of insurance with their eyes wide open, they cannot rely on definition given in other enactment. Thus, the decision of the National Consumer Disputes Redressal Commission in the case of National Insurance Company Ltd. v. Public Type College is not a good law and all the Tribunals i.e. National Consumer Disputes Redressal Commission, State Commission & District Forum having applied the ratio of that case; the impugned order cannot be sustained.
10. Reference in this connection may be made to the decision of this Court in the case of Oriental Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Samayanallur Primary Agricultural Co-op. Bank1 . In this case question came for interpretation of the similar policy, i.e., policy against burglary. The bank had two insurance policies with the Oriental Insurance Company Ltd. out of which one was cash insurance policy for Rs. 1 lac and the second was a burglary insurance policy for Rs. 25 lacs. The relevant terms of the policy were

3(a)- Are all valuables secured in Burglary resistance safes when Premises are locked Yes (b) If so, state name or maker of safe and cost
Tansi

11. The answer to the question 3(a) was in positive. The question arose that according to the complaint burglary took place from the cashiers cash box. The surveyors report was that the stolen jewels had not been kept in safe locker and the theft was not covered under burglary insurance policy. Though the District Forum directed the insurance company to pay a sum of Rs. 43,729.25 however, the State Commission observed that what is insured is not the contents of the cash box but the jewels kept in the safe which means a safety locker made by Tansi as agreed to in the proposal form. And it was observed that jewels kept in the cashiers cash box which were not covered by the policy. The State forum overruled the order passed by the District Forum. The order passed by the State Commission in revision was reversed by the National Commission. The matter came before this Court in special leave petition by insurance company. Their Lordships observed that there was no necessity of referring to the dictionaries for understanding the meaning of the word safe which the parties in the instant case are proved to have understood while submitting the proposal and accepting the insurance policy. The cashiers box could not be equated with the safe within the meaning of the insurance policy. The alleged burglary and the removal of the jewellery from cash box, the cash box was not covered by the insurance policy between the parties. The insurance policy has to be construed having reference only to the stipulations contained in it and no artificial far-fetched meaning could be given to the words appearing in it. And, therefore, they set aside the order of the National Commission.

12. Similarly, in the case of Oriental Insurance Co.Ltd. v. Sony Cheriyan2 an insurance was taken out under the Motor Vehicles Act, 1988 in which their Lordships observed :

The insurance policy between the insurer and the insured represents a contract between the parties. Since the insurer undertakes to compensate the loss suffered by the insured on account of risks covered by the insurance policy, the terms of the agreement have to be strictly construed to determine the extent of liability of the insurer. The insured cannot claim anything more than what is covered by the insurance policy.

13. Similarly in the case of General Assurance Society Ltd. v. Chandumull Jain and Anr.1 the Constitution Bench has observed that the policy document being a contract and it has to be read strictly. It was observed,

 In interpreting documents relating to a contract of insurance, the duty of the court is to interpret the words in which the contract is expressed by the parties, because it is not for the court to make a new contract, however reasonable, if the parties have not made it themselves. Looking at the proposal, the letter of acceptance and the cover notes, it is clear that a contract of insurance under the standard policy for fire and extended to cover flood, cyclone etc. had come into being.

14. Therefore, it is settled law that the terms of the contract has to be strictly read and natural meaning be given to it. No outside aid should be sought unless the meaning is ambiguous.

15. From the above discussion, we are of the opinion that theft should have preceded with force or violence as per the terms of insurance policy. In order to substantiate a claim an insurer has to establish that theft or burglary took place preceding with force or violence and if it is not, then the insurance company will be well within their right to repudiate the claim of the insurer.
16. However, all the three forums have already awarded compensation and the amount has been paid to the respondent, therefore, on the point of equity we would not like to disturb the payment which has already been made. However, in view of legal position stated by us, the orders of the District Forum, State Commission and the National Commission cannot be upheld.

17. But before parting with the case we would like to observe that the terms of the policy as laid down by the insurance company should be suitably amended by the insurance company so as to make it more viable and facilitate the claimants to make their claim. The definition is so stringent in the present case that it gives rise to difficult situation for the common man to understand that in order to maintain their claim they will have to necessarily show evidence of violence or force. The definition of the word burglary should be given meaning which is closer to the realities of life. The common man understands that he has taken out the policy against theft. He hardly understands whether it should precede violence or force. Therefore, a policy should be a meaningful policy so that a common man can understand what is the meaning of burglary in common parlance. Though we have interpreted the present policy strictly in terms of the policy but we hope that the insurance companies will amend their policies so as to make them more meaningful to the public at large. It should have the meaning which a common man can easily understand rather than become more technical so as to defeat the cause of the public at large.

18. In the result, we allow this appeal, set aside the order passed by the National Consumer Disputes Redressal Commission, New Delhi confirming the order of the State Commission & District Forum. But the amount of compensation which has already been paid to the respondent shall not be recovered in the facts and circumstances of the present case. No order as to costs.

**********, 0 , 
HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAWS
Penal Code, 1860
Sections 457, 380/34 - Theft - Recovery - Gold chain worn by PW2 lost on the night of 12-11-1995, while she was sleeping - No complaint filed as PWs 1 and 2 were not aware - FIR filed after sixteen days when police caught appellant roaming in a suspicious manner and he disclosed about the theft - Discovery statement made to PW7, circle inspector, regarding sale of chain to PW8 - PW 8 who allegedly purchased the gold chain did not support prosecutions case - Police official, PW3 corroborated PW7s version - Conviction on the basis of alleged recovery at his instance - Out of three, two accused acquitted. Held it is difficult to believe that PW2 was not aware about the theft of chain she was wearing. Only evidence against appellant is the alleged recovery of gold chain and Trial Court erred in convicting him on that basis alone. PW8 turned hostile. It is not safe to convict appellant on the evidence of police officials. Benefit of doubt given.
HELD
FIR was registered after about sixteen days from the date of alleged theft. PWs-1 and 2 did not even realize that the chain was stolen. It is only when the accused were brought to their house after about sixteen days that they realized that the chain was stolen and FIR was lodged. The chain in question was being worn by PW2. It is stated to have been stolen while she was sleeping. It is inconceivable that she would not realize that she had lost her chain. The incident in our view is not unfolded truthfully. A1 and A3 have been rightly acquitted because nothing links them to the offence. But, similar is the case with the appellant. The only evidence against him is the alleged recovery of gold chain at his instance. That cannot connect the appellant to the theft. The Trial Court has stated that since chain was recovered at the instance of the appellant, the only inference which can be drawn is that he committed the theft. Drawing such inference in the facts of this case would be totally unjust. Pertinently, PW8 from whose shop the chain is said to have been recovered has turned hostile. Thus, the prosecution is relying only on police witnesses. In this case, it is unsafe to do so. Grave doubt is, therefore, created as to whether the appellant could be involved in the offence of theft. We are, therefore, of the view that benefit of doubt must be given to the appellant and he must be acquitted. (Para 9)


(Smt.) RANJANA PRAKASH DESAI, J.

1. Leave granted.

2. The appellant (A2-Azeez) along with two others i.e. A1-Khalid and A3-Babu was tried by the Judicial Magistrate, First Class-I, Aluva for offences punishable under Sections 457 and 380 read with Section 34 of the Indian Penal Code (for short, the IPC). By order dated 15/12/2000, learned Magistrate convicted the appellant under Section 457 of the IPC and sentenced him to undergo rigorous imprisonment for one year. The appellant was further convicted for offence under Section 380 of the IPC and sentenced to undergo rigorous imprisonment for two years. The substantive sentences were ordered to run concurrently. A1-Khalid and A3-Babu were acquitted.

3. The appellant challenged the said order before the Additional Sessions Judge, Ernakulam. Learned Sessions Judge by his order dated 28/11/2002 confirmed the conviction and sentence and dismissed the appeal. Being aggrieved by the said conviction and sentence, the appellant filed a criminal revision petition in the Kerala High Court. By the impugned judgment, the High Court dismissed the revision petition. Hence, this appeal by special leave is filed against the said judgment.

4. According to the prosecution, the appellant along with A1-Khalid and A3-Babu with an intention of committing theft entered the house of PW1-Radha at Karumalloor Village on 12/11/1995 at 4.00 a.m. through the door which was kept open. They entered the bedroom where PW2- Renuka Devi was sleeping and committed theft of a gold chain weighing 14 grams worth Rs.7,500/- which PW2 was wearing while she was sleeping. A1 and A3 assisted the appellant in committing the offence. They gave the gold chain to the appellant for selling. The appellant sold the gold chain and the accused divided the sale proceeds and thereby committed the offence.

5. This case presents rather unusual facts. PW7, the Circle Inspector, stated that he arrested the accused on 28/11/1995 at 1 a.m. near the parking area, Municipal Buildings, Aluva, while they were moving in suspicious circumstances. On questioning them, it was revealed that they had committed the offence involved in this case, hence they proceeded to the house of PW1 at Aduvathuruthu and recorded her F.I.R.(Ext.P1).

6. PW1 in her evidence stated that her daughter PW2 was sleeping in her room on the night of 12/11/1995. PW2 was wearing Thara fashion gold chain. The gold chain was stolen but no complaint was lodged at the police station because PW2 did not realize that her gold chain was stolen. It is only on 28/11/1995 when the police came to their house along with the accused and the gold chain was shown to her that she realized that the gold chain was stolen. She identified the gold chain MO1. FIR (Ext.P1) was then lodged. PW2, the daughter, stated that on 12/11/1995 at about 11 p.m. she went to sleep. On the next day morning the gold chain was not seen. On 28/11/1995 when the police came to her house with the accused and showed her the chain, she realized that her chain was stolen. She identified the chain.

7. Evidence of PWs-1 and 2 raise several question marks. If gold chain worn by PW2 was removed by the accused at night, it is unbelievable that she would not realize it in the morning. Even PW1, the mother, did not realize that the chain worn by PW2 was not around her neck. Assuming this to be true, PWs-1 and 2 would at least realize the loss on the next day or a day thereafter. They did not realize that the chain was stolen till 28/11/1995, when the police came to their house with the accused and showed them the chain. At that time they realized that chain was stolen. It is on 28/11/1995 that PW1 lodged her complaint. Thus, the complaint came to be lodged about sixteen days after the incident that too after the police came to PW1s house with the chain. The sequence of events is not convincing and does not stand to reason.

8. According to the prosecution the appellant made a discovery statement to PW7-the Circle Inspector and pursuant to that statement PW7 went to the shop of PW8-Pradeep along with the appellant. The appellant is stated to have pointed out to PW8 as the man to whom he had sold the chain. However, PW8 has not supported the prosecution case. The courts below have while convicting the appellant placed reliance on the evidence of PW7-the Circle Inspector and PW3-the Head Constable who sought to corroborate the version of PW7 regarding recovery of chain at the instance of the appellant from the shop of PW8. We find it difficult to do so. Trial Court has observed that offence under Section 457 of the IPC is not made out because according to PW1 the thieves entered the door which was kept open. The Trial Court, therefore, acquitted the appellant of the offence punishable under Section 457 of the IPC. The Trial Court also acquitted A1 and A3 of the offence punishable under Section 457 read with Section 34 of the IPC. The Trial Court, however, observed that from the evidence of PWs-1 and 2 it is seen that theft had taken in the room in which PW2 was sleeping; the thief entered the house and committed theft of gold chain which PW2 was wearing and, therefore, this act will be covered by Section 451 of the IPC i.e. house-trespass in order to commit offence punishable with imprisonment. The Trial Court further held that since the recovery of gold chain was effected on the basis of statement given by the appellant the only inference that can be drawn is that he committed the theft of gold chain and therefore the case is covered by Section 380 of the IPC i.e. theft in a dwelling house. After observing that there is nothing in the evidence of PWs-1 to 8 to connect A1 and A3 with the crime the Trial Court acquitted them of all the offences. This view is affirmed by the Sessions Court and the High Court.

9. We find it difficult to uphold the above view so far as it relates to the appellant. As we have already noted that FIR was registered after about sixteen days from the date of alleged theft. PWs-1 and 2 did not even realize that the chain was stolen. It is only when the accused were brought to their house after about sixteen days that they realized that the chain was stolen and FIR was lodged. The chain in question was being worn by PW2. It is stated to have been stolen while she was sleeping. It is inconceivable that she would not realize that she had lost her chain. The incident in our view is not unfolded truthfully. A1 and A3 have been rightly acquitted because nothing links them to the offence. But, similar is the case with the appellant. The only evidence against him is the alleged recovery of gold chain at his instance. That cannot connect the appellant to the theft. The Trial Court has stated that since chain was recovered at the instance of the appellant, the only inference which can be drawn is that he committed the theft. Drawing such inference in the facts of this case would be totally unjust. Pertinently, PW8 from whose shop the chain is said to have been recovered has turned hostile. Thus, the prosecution is relying only on police witnesses. In this case, it is unsafe to do so. Grave doubt is, therefore, created as to whether the appellant could be involved in the offence of theft. We are, therefore, of the view that benefit of doubt must be given to the appellant and he must be acquitted.

10. We, therefore, allow the appeal. The impugned judgment and order is quashed and set aside. The appellant is acquitted of the offences under Sections 380 and 451 of the IPC. The appellant is in jail. He is directed to be released forthwith, unless he is required in any other case.

**********, 0 , 
HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAW
Indian Penal Code, 1860
Section 395 - Dacoity - Ingredients - No evidence of any theft or attempt to commit theft - Accused exploding a bomb and also firing gun - Only evidence of theft in realm of hearsay. Held that offence under section 395 IPC is not made out. (Paras 5, 6)

Criminal Procedure Code, 1973
Section 211(ii) with Indian Penal Code, 1860 - Section 457 - Scope - Accused charged with offence under section 395/311 IPC - Offence not proved - If can be conï¿½victed under section 457 - Armed accused shown to have forcibly entered the house. Held that they can be convicted under section 457 IPC even if they were not charged with said offence. (Paras 7, 8)


ORDER


1. Out of five persons challaned before the sessions court for the offence under section 395 IPC, four were convicted by the trial court and sentenced each of them to rigorous imprisonment for ten years. The four convicted persons filed appeals before the High Court. The conviction was confirmed in respect of two of them (who are appellants before us) while acquitting A4 - Tara Kant Jha and A5 - Badri Jha. However, the High Court reduced the sentence to rigorous imprisonment for seven years.

2. The occurrence happened during the night of 10th January, 1981 (the next morning was 11th). The prosecution case is that all the five accused entered into the courtyard of the house of PW5 Ram Prasad. The male persons of the house were then sleeping in the courtyard. After the assailants entered the courtyard, they trussed up three persons belonging to that house (PW1 Bimal, PW2 Ramchander and PW3 Mahender). They were threatened not to make any noise lest they would be killed. Thereafter, the assailants pushed the door of the house open and committed mischief there including theft of some silver ornaments. When PW4 (Shatrughan Prasad Yadav) tried to escape, one of the assailants fired a gun shot which hit him on the hand. While decamping, they exploded a bomb. Hearing the commotion, the neighbouring people rushed to the scene and haystacks were set fire to by them. In the light of the flames, the faces of the assailants were identified by the villagï¿½ers also.

3. It is unnecessary for us in this appeal to deal with the evidence in detail. We conclude that the case alleged against the convicted persons stand proved to the following extent:-

They entered into the house and tied up the three inmates of the house. They exploded something like a bomb - though none was injured thereby. They entered into the house forcibly opening the door. The story that one of them fired a gun at PW5 is not subï¿½stantiated. When the villagers rushed in, all the assailants left the place.

4. The prosecution attempted to make out that an offence of dacoity was committed. But they can succeed only if there was either theft or at least attempt to commit theft. There is no evidence that there was any act of theft or even attempt to commit theft. Of course, PW5 said that two lady inmates of the house reported to him later that their silver necklaces were snatched away by the dacoits. Unfortunately, those ladies were not examined and hence, the version of PW5 remained only in the realm of hearsay evidence. PW1 made an attempt to say that there was looting or that silver ornaments were stolen by the assailï¿½ants. This was not what he saw and perhaps this too would have been only reported to him. In cross-examination, he definitely said that he did not see any act of theft. No such ornament was recovered by the police during investigation.

5. Thus, there is total lack of evidence to show that the intrudï¿½ers committed theft or made any attempt to commit theft. Theft or extortion or attempt to commit any one of the two is an ineviï¿½table ingredient for robbery. In such a situation, it is extremely difficult for the prosecution to sustain the conviction for the offence under section 395 of the IPC. We, therefore, set aside the conviction and sentence passed on the appellants for the aforesaid offence.

6. The above is not enough to dispose of this appeal nor to exonerate the appellants completely from the charge. The acts proved by the prosecution would fall within the ambit of section 457 of the IPC. Learned counsel for the appellants made a bid to contend that the said count was not included in the charge and hence, the appellants are not liable to be convicted thereunder. Section 221(ii) enables the court to convict the appellants of the offence which they have shown to have committed, although they were not charged with it. If any such alteration is to be made, the question is whether any prejudice would be caused to the appellants. We asked learned counsel for the appellants whether they want another opportunity to cross-examine the proseï¿½cution witnesses focusing on the offence under section 457 IPC. Learned counsel fairly submitted that it is not necessary.

7. We, therefore, convict the appellants for the offence under section 457 read with section 34 of the IPC. We are told that the first appellant has undergone RI for more than three years and the second appellant has undergone RI for more than four years. We feel that the sentence for the aforesaid offence can be limitï¿½ed to imprisonment for the period already undergone by the apï¿½pellants, We do so.

8. The appeal is disposed of accordingly.

9. We direct the jail authorities to release the appellants from jail forthwith unless they are required in any other case.

**********, 0 , 
HEADNOTE
GENERAL INSURANCE
General insurance - Insurance against theft - Distinction between theft and criminal breach of trust - Respondent, a jewellery shop owner taking out a Jeweller Block Policy from the appellant - Customer visiting the shop taking away some ornament - Res-pondent lodging a claim with the insurer besides registering criminal complaint - Insurer rejecting the claim holding that entrustment of jewellery to customer did not constitute theft covered by the policy - State Consumer Protection Council also finding the claim of respondent to be unsustainable - High Court on appeal holding that it was not a case of entrustment but the act of removal of the goods by the customer constituted theft and therefore the insurer was liable - Whether High Court correct in holding so. Upholding the decision of the High Court held the customer in the instant case being an unknown person as seen from the FIR, there was no occasion for the respondent to entrust the jewellery to him and it being a case of theft, the insurer was clearly liable to make good the loss in terms of the policy taken by the respondent.
HELD
It is not in dispute that an insurance cover against theft was granted by the appellant. The insurance policy, thus, covered the risk of theft also. An insurer determines the extent of its risk. It floats the policy knowing fully well the risk it seeks to cover. Having regard to the determination of the risk only he fixes the quantum of premium. The insured while entering into a contract of insurance must precisely know the extent of his cover so that he may take out additional insurance if it is so required. (Para 7)

Clause 8 of the contract of insurance would be attracted only where the offences specified therein are committed by any of the persons mentioned therein. For defeating the claim of the respondent, it was, thus, obligatory on the part of the appellant to establish that the conditions prescribed therein were satisfied. (Para 9)

The word entrust would imply giving responsibility to a person upon whom the owner has confidence. It envisages establishment of a relationship. When a customer enters into a jewellery shop, as of necessity, the owner or his agent must allow him to inspect the merchandise, the customer intends to purchase. For the said purpose possession in the legal sense is not handed over. The owner or his agent does not loose complete control thereover. (Para 13)

For the purpose of arriving at a conclusion as to whether the exclusion clause is attracted or not, loss or damage must be occasioned, inter alia, by a customer in respect of the property entrusted to him. The word customer contained in clause 8 (c) of the Insurance Policy must be read ejusdem generis. A customer con-templated thereunder must have to be one who would be a man of trust. If a customer is not a man of trust or the property had not been entrusted to him, the exclusion clause would not apply. The customer who committed theft of jewellery was an unknown person. It was so categorically stated in the First Information Report. There was, thus, no occasion for the respondent to entrust the jewellery to him. (Para 14)

We, therefore, are clearly of the opinion that the view taken by the High Court was correct. The High Courts judgment is upheld. The appeal is dismissed. We, in the facts and circumstances of this case, also direct the appellant to pay and bear the cost of the respondent throughout. Counsels fee in this appeal is assessed at Rs.50,000/-. (Para 24)

CASES REFERRED
1.M/s Peacock Plywood Pvt. Ltd. v. The Oriental Insurance Co. Ltd. JT 2007 (1) SC 191 (Para 8)

2.United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Kiran Combers & Spinners (2007) 1 SCC 368 (Para 8)

3.United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Pushpalaya Printers JT 2004 (4) SC 352 (Para 8)

4.Ram Narayan Popli etc. v. Central Bureau of Investigation etc. JT 2003 (1) SC 184 (Para 23)

5.Superintendent and Re-membrancer of Legal Affairs, W.B. v. S.K. Roy AIR 1974 SC 794 (Para 22)

6.The State of Gujarat v. Jaswant Lal Natha Lal (1968) 2 SCR 408 (Para 21)

S.B. SINHA , J.

1. Appellant insurer is before us questioning the correctness or otherwise of a judgment and order dated 10.09.1999 passed by a Division Bench of the High Court of Jammu & Kashmir in CIMA 21 of 1998 allowing the appeal preferred by the respondent herein from a judgment and order dated 16.12.1997 passed by the Jammu & Kashmir Consumers Protection Com-mission.

2. Respondent herein carries on business in jewellery It obtained a policy known as Jeweller Block Policy. A theft of 140 gms of jewellery worth of Rs.63,000/- occurred in his business premises. A First Information Report was lodged therefor. Respondent also lodged a claim with the appellant herein. The same having not been settled for a long time, an application was filed before the State Consumers Protection Commission constituted under the J & K Consumers Protection Act, 1987.

3. The question raised before the Commission was as to whether the loss in question was covered by the insurance policy. Appellant contended that the claim of the respondent is covered by an exclusion clause contained in the policy, which reads as under :

8. Loss or damage occasioned by theft or dishonesty or any attempt there at committed by or where such loss or damage has been expedited or in any way sustained or brought about by :

(a) any of the insureds family members;

(b) any servant or traveller or messenger in the exclusive employment of the insured;

(c) any customer or broker or their customer or angadias or cutters or goldsmiths in respect of the property hereby insured entrusted to them by the insured his or their servants or agents.

4. The Commission by reason of its order dated 16.12.1997, inter alia, found the said claim to be not sustainable on the ground that the loss was not covered by the said policy, stating :

...It appears to us that while preparing the insurance agreement the insurer was aware of the fact that this could be the easiest way for any Jeweller to raise claims against the insurance companies and that is why this clause has been deliberately introduced and theft by customer if any has been put in exclusive clause of the policy...

5. The High Court, as indicated hereinbefore, by reason of its judgment
and order dated 10.09.1999, did not agree therewith. It was held :

What is meant by the term entrustment (and) does handing over of jewellery to a customer amounts to entrustment ? The dictionary meaning of the word entrust would be to give to another for care, protection or to commit something trustfully or plays trust upon a person. If a customer enters the premises of a shopkeeper and examines some movable property and takes away the same, then there hardly arises any occasion for entrustment to such a customer. In the present case a customer entered the business premises and removed 140 gms. of Jewellery. There was no entrustment on the part of the owner to the customer. The act of removal of the goods by the customer is nothing but a plain theft. This is a dishonest taking and removing of the property by the customer with the intent of permanently depriving the owner.

6. A short question which, thus, arises for our consideration is as to whether clause 8 of the policy is applicable to the facts and circumstances of the present case.

7. It is not in dispute that an insurance cover against theft was granted by the appellant. The insurance policy, thus, covered the risk of theft also. An insurer determines the extent of its risk. It floats the policy knowing fully well the risk it seeks to cover. Having regard to the determination of the risk only he fixes the quantum of premium. The insured while entering into a contract of insurance must precisely know the extent of his cover so that he may take out additional insurance if it is so required.

8. However, there may be an express clause excluding the applicability of insurance cover. Wherever such exclusionary clause is contained in a policy, it would be for the insurer to show that the case falls within the purview thereof. In a case of ambiguity, it is trite, the contract of insurance shall be construed in favour of the insured. See United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Pushpalaya Printers1, M/s Peacock Plywood Pvt. Ltd. v. The Oriental Insurance Co. Ltd.2 and United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Kiran Combers & Spinners3.

9. Clause 8 of the contract of insurance would be attracted only where the offences specified therein are committed by any of the persons mentioned therein. For defeating the claim of the respondent, it was, thus, obligatory on the part of the appellant to establish that the conditions prescribed therein were satisfied.

10. Keeping in view the aforementioned legal aspect of the matter, we may advert to the meaning of the word entrust. Its ordinary meaning, would mean to charge or invest with a trust; to commit to another with a certain confidence regarding his care See Advanced Law Lexicon by P. Ramanatha Aiyar 3rd Edn.-Book 2 page1613.

11. It requires no elaboration that offences of breach of trust and theft contain different ingredients. Whereas theft has been defined in Section 378 of the Indian Penal Code; breach of trust has been defined in Section 405 thereof, which reads as under :

378. Theft.- Whoever, intending to take dishonestly any moveable property out of the possession of any person without that persons consent, moves that property in order to such taking, is said to commit theft.

12. Illustration (d) appended thereto reads as under :

(d) A, being Zs servant, and entrusted by Z with the care of Zs plate, dishonestly runs away with the plate, without Zs consent. A has committed theft.

405. Criminal breach of trust.-Whoever, being in any manner entrusted with property, or with any dominion over property, dishonestly misappropriates or converts to his own use that property, or dishonestly uses or disposes
of that property in violation of any direction of law prescribing the mode in which such trust is to be discharged, or of any legal contract, express or implied, which he has made touching the discharge of such trust, or willfully suffers any other person so to do, commits criminal breach of trust

13. The word entrust would imply giving responsibility to a person upon whom the owner has confidence. It envisages establishment of a relationship. When a customer enters into a jewellery shop, as of necessity, the owner or his agent must allow him to inspect the merchandise, the
customer intends to purchase. For the said purpose possession in the legal sense is not handed over. The owner or his agent does not loose complete control thereover.

14. For the purpose of arriving at a conclusion as to whether the exclusion clause is attracted or not, loss or damage must be occasioned, inter alia, by a customer in respect of the property entrusted to him. The word customer contained in clause 8 (c) of the Insurance Policy must be read ejusdem generis. A customer contemplated thereunder must have to be one who would be a man of trust. If a customer is not a man of trust or the property had not been entrusted to him, the exclusion clause would not apply. The customer who committed theft of jewellery was an unknown person. It was so categorically stated in the First Information Report. There was, thus, no occasion for the respondent to entrust the jewellery to him.

15. Mr. Vishnu Mehra, the learned counsel appearing for the appellant has relied upon the meaning of the word entrust as contained in Blacks Law Dictionary, 8th Edn. and Websters Universal Dictionary.

16. In Blacks Law Dictionary, the word entrust has been defined as under :

To give (a person) the responsibility for something after establishing a confidential relationship.

17. In Websters Universal Dictionary meaning of the word entrust reads as under :

To confer as a responsibility, duty etc. to place, something in anothers care.

18. Apart from the fact that the said meaning of the term entrustment goes against the submission of Mr. Mehra, we may notice that in Blacks Law Dictionary the word entrusting in commercial law has been described as The transfer of possession of goods to a merchant who deals in goods of that type and who may in turn transfer the goods and all rights to them to a purchaser in the ordinary course of business. Transfer of possession of goods, therefore, is a sine qua non for entrustment. The person must be handed over the possession of the property. Illustration (d) appended to Section 378 IPC envisages a situation of this nature. It by no stretch of imagination would have contemplated a situation where an unknown customer would have committed theft.

19. The word entrustment, moreover, must be read in the context in which it has been used.

20. In Colinvauxs Law of Insurance, 7th Edn., by Robert Merkin at page 50, it is stated :

Words in context

The above generality is not applicable when it is clear from the context that the words are not used in a colloquial popular sense. Thus the word flood in the phrase strom, tempest or floor does not cover a case where a house-holders bathroom is affected by upward seepage of water to a depth of three inches, as the context of the word requires an event violent, sudden or abnormal. Similarly, heavy rain is not in itself likely to constitute a storm. It has also been held that the phrase sum actually paid in a reinsurance agreement referred to a sum which the reinsured is merely liable to pay, as the agreement read as a whole was against liability rather than actual payment.

21. In The State of Gujarat v. Jaswant Lal Natha Lal1, this Court held :

...The expression entrustment carries with it the implication that the person handing over any property or on whose behalf that property is handed over to another, continues to be its owner. Further the person handing over the property must have confidence in the person
taking the property so as to create a fiduciary relationship between them. A mere transaction of sale cannot amount to an entrustment...

22. In Superintendent and Re-membrancer of Legal Affairs, W.B. v. S.K. Roy1, this Court held :

12. To constitute an offence under Section 409 IPC, it is not required that misappropriation must necessarily take place after the creation of a legally correct entrustment or dominion over property. The entrustment may arise in
any manner whatsoever. That manner may or may not involve fraudulent conduct of the accused. Section 409 IPC, covers dishonest misappropriation in both types of cases; that is to say, those where the receipt of property is itself fraudulent or improper and those where the public servant misappropriates what may have been quite properly and innocently received. All that is required is what may be described as entrustment or acquisition of dominion over property in the capacity of a public, servant who, as a result of it, becomes charged with a duty to act in a particular way, or, atleast honestly.

23. Yet again in Ram Narayan Popli etc. v. Central Bureau of Investigation etc.2, it was held :

361. To constitute an offence of criminal breach of trust, there must be an entrustment, there must be misappropriation or conversion to ones own use, or use in violation of a legal direction or of any legal contract; and the misappropriation or conversion or disposal must be with a dishonest intention. When a person allows others to misappropriate the money entrusted to him, that amounts to a criminal breach of trust as defined by Section 405. The section is relatable to property in a
positive part and a negative part. The positive part deals with criminal misappropriation or conversion of the property and the negative part consists of dishonestly using or disposing of the property in violation of any direction and of law or any contract touching the discharge of trust.

362. In Jaswantrai Manilal Akhaney v. State of Bombay it was held that if the Managing Director of the Bank entrusted with securities owned by the pledgor disposes of their securities against the stipulated terms of the contract entered into by the parties with an intent to cause wrongful loss to the pledgor and wrongful gain to the Bank, there can be no question but that the Managing Director has necessary mens rea required by Section
405.

363. The term entrustment is not necessarily a term of law. It may have different implications in different contexts. In its most general signification all it imports is the handing over possession for some purpose which may not imply the conferring of any proprietary right at all.

364. When a person misappropriates to his own use the property that does not belong to him, the misappropriation is dishonest even though there was an intention to restore it at some future point of time.

24. We, therefore, are clearly of the opinion that the view taken by the High Court was correct. The High Courts judgment is upheld. The appeal is dismissed. We, in the facts and circumstances of this case, also direct the appellant to pay and bear the cost of the respondent throughout. Counsels fee in this appeal is assessed at Rs.50,000/-.

**********, 0 , 
HEADNOTE
INSURANCE LAW
Rule of contra proferentem - Insurance Policy covered theft following an actual forcible and violent entry/or exit from the premises - Appellant made a case for theft without forcible entry - Respondent No.1 rejected the claim as for a valid claim violent and forcible entry was necessary - Appellant invoked Rule of contra proferentem, alleging ambiguity in terms of policy. Held it is well-settled law that there is no difference between a contract of insurance and any other contract, and that it should be construed strictly without adding or deleting anything from the terms thereof. A plain reading of the policy shows that a forcible entry should precede the theft, and unless that is proved, claim cannot be accepted. There being no ambiguity in the relevant clause of the policy, rule of contra proferentem cannot be invoked. United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Orient Treasures (P) Ltd. JT 2016 (1) SC 147, General Assurance Society Ltd. cases referred.
HELD
We are of the opinion that there is no error committed by the MRTP Commission in rejecting the Claim of the Appellant. It is clear from the facts of the present case that the Appellant has made out a case of theft without a forcible entry. The case of the Appellant is that forcible entry is not required for a claim to be made under the policy. Following the well-accepted principle that a contract of insurance which is like any other commercial contract should be interpreted strictly, we are of the opinion that the policy covers loss or damage by burglary or house breaking which have been explained as theft following an actual, forcible and violent entry from the premises. A plain reading of the policy would show that a forcible entry should precede the theft, and unless they are proved, the claim cannot be accepted. (Para 7)

It is well-settled law that there is no difference between a contract of insurance and any other contract, and that it should be construed strictly without adding or deleting anything from the terms thereof. On applying the said principle, we have no doubt that a forcible entry is required for a claim to be allowed under the policy for burglary/house breaking. (Para 9)

The Policy in this case is in a standard form. The policy for Burglary and House Breaking in United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Orient Treasures (P) Ltd. (supra) and the policy in this case are identical. If there is any ambiguity or doubt the clause in the Policy should be interpreted in favour of the insured. But we see no ambiguity in the relevant clause of the policy and the rule of contra proferentem is not applicable. (Para 12)

For the aforementioned reasons, we uphold the order of the MRTP Commission and dismiss the Appeal with no order as to costs. (Para 13)

RULE OF CONSTRUCTION
Rule of contra proferentem - Verba chartarum fortius accipiuntur contra proferentem - What is. Held, the rule states that ambiguity in the wording of the policy is to be resolved against the party who prepared it. MacGillivrays case, Colinvauxs Law of Insurance referred. (Para 10)

CASES REFERRED
1.United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Orient Treasures (P) Ltd. JT 2016 (1) SC 147 (Para 4.1)

2.United India Assurance Co. Ltd. v. Harchand Rai Chandan Lal JT 2004 (8) SC 8 (Para 5)

3.General Assurance Society Ltd. v. Chandmull Jain and Anr.  1966 (3) SCR 500 (Para 11)

L. NAGESWARA RAO, J.

1. The Appellant is a wholly owned Public Sector Undertaking of the Government of Orissa. The Appellant finances medium and large scale industries within the State of Orissa and is also involved in setting up joint sector industries with private entrepreneurs. The Appellant extended a term loan of Rs. 40,74,000/- to M/s. Josna Casting Centre Orissa Pvt. Ltd. As the loan amount was not repaid, the Appellant exercising its power under Section 29 of the State Finance Corporation Act, 1951, took over the assets of M/s. Josna Casting Centre Orissa Private Limited on 14-02-1992. On 23-01-1996, the Appellant insured the said assets with Respondent No. 1 for a sum of Rs. 46,00,000/- under the Miscellaneous Accident Policy, Rs. 60,40,000/- under the Fire Policy and Rs. 46,00,000/- under the Burglary and House Breaking Policy.

2. The seized assets were put to auction by the Appellant on 22-01-1997 at which point of time it was detected that some parts of the plant and machinery were missing from the factory premises. The Appellant registered an FIR on 25-01-1997 in the Remona Police Station, Balasore regarding the theft/burglary of the plant and machinery. On 07-02-1997, the Appellant informed Respondent No. 1 about the theft and requested for issuance of a claim form. A claim was lodged with Respondent No. 1 on 16-12-1997 for an amount of Rs. 34,40,650/- under the Burglary and House Breaking Policy. The valuation reports given by GEC, Calcutta, the machines supplier and Alpha Transformer Ltd., Bhubaneswar were relied upon by the Appellant/Claimant. The claim of the Appellant was repudiated by Respondent No. 1 on 31-03-1998 on the ground that the alleged loss did not come within the purview of the insurance policy.

3. The Appellant filed compensation application No. 45 of 2001 under Section 12-B read with Section 36-A of the Monopolies and Restrictive Trade Practices (MRTP) Act, 1969, which was rejected by the MRTP Commission, New Delhi by its Order dated 17-08-2005. Aggrieved by the said Order, the Appellant has preferred the present Appeal.

4. Mr. Raj Kumar Mehta, counsel for the Appellant took us through the proposal form for Burglary and House Breaking Insurance (Business) Premises. The scope of cover in the said proposal form is as follows:

SCOPE OF COVER

This Insurance Policy provides cover against loss or damage by Burglary or House breaking i.e. (theft following an actual, forcible and violent entry of and/or exit from the premises) in respect of contents of offices, warehouses, shops, etc. and cash in safe or strong room and also damage caused to the premises, except as detailed below:

4.1 It was further submitted by Mr. Mehta that the rule of contra proferentem would be applicable to the present case and he relied upon the judgment of this Court in United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Orient Treasures (P) Ltd. reported at JT 2016 (1) SC 147 : 2016 (3) SCC 49.

5. Mr. Mehta submitted that the words theft following an actual forcible and violent entry/or exit from the premises are with reference only to house breaking and not burglary. According to him, forcible and violent entry is not necessary for making a valid claim under the policy. It would be sufficient that there is theft of certain goods from the factory premises, which fact has been proved by the Appellant. Mr. Mehta referred to a judgment of this Court in United India Assurance Co. Ltd. v. Harchand Rai Chandan Lal reported in JT 2004 (8) SC 8 : 2004 (8) SCC 644 which related to a claim pertaining to a theft and attempted to distinguish it. He submitted that the clause in the policy in that case is different from that involved in the present case. He urged that the Commission committed an error in relying upon the said judgment to reject the Claim Application for the Appellant.

6. Mr. Salil Paul, Advocate for Respondent No.1 submitted that there is no difference in the policies involved in the case cited supra and the instant case. He also urged that an insurance policy is akin to a commercial contract and has to be construed strictly. Mr. Paul submitted that a forcible entry and/or exit is compulsory for maintainability of a claim under the policy.

7. Having considered the submissions made on both sides, we are of the opinion that there is no error committed by the MRTP Commission in rejecting the Claim of the Appellant. It is clear from the facts of the present case that the Appellant has made out a case of theft without a forcible entry. The case of the Appellant is that forcible entry is not required for a claim to be made under the policy. Following the well- accepted principle that a contract of insurance which is like any other commercial contract should be interpreted strictly, we are of the opinion that the policy covers loss or damage by burglary or house breaking which have been explained as theft following an actual, forcible and violent entry from the premises. A plain reading of the policy would show that a forcible entry should precede the theft, and unless they are proved, the claim cannot be accepted. The provisions of the policy in United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Harchand Rai Chandan Lal (supra) read as under:

THE COMPANY HEREBY AGREES subject to the terms and conditions contained herein endorsed/or otherwise expressed hereon that if, the property hereinafter described or any part thereof be LOST or DAMAGED by BURGLARY and/or HOUSE BREAKING, or ANY DAMAGE be caused to the premises to be made good by the insured from BURGLARY and/or HOUSE BREAKING or any attempt thereat.

7.1 The term burglary and/or house breaking has been defined in terms of the policy which are as follows:

Burglary and/or house breaking shall mean theft involving entry to or exit from the premises stated therein by forcible and violent means or following assault or violence or threat thereof to the insured or to his employees or to the members of his family.

8. A comparison of the above terms as defined in the policy in the case of United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Harchand Rai Chandan Lal (supra) and the scope of cover in the proposal form in the instant case are similar. This Court in the said judgment of United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Harchand Rai Chandan Lal (supra) considered the scope of a policy involving burglary and house breaking and held as follows:

The policy is a contract between the parties and both parties are bound by the terms of contract. As per the definition of the word burglary, followed with violence, makes it clear that if any theft is committed it should necessarily be preceded with violence i.e. entry into the premises for committing theft should involve force or violence or threat to insurer or to his employees or to the members of his family. Therefore, the element of force and violence is a condition precedent for burglary and housebreaking. The term burglary as defined in the English Dictionary means an illegal entry into the building with an intent to commit crime such as theft. But in absence of violence or force the insurer cannot claim indemnification against the insurance company. The terms of the policy have to be construed as it is and we cannot add or subtract something. Howsoever liberally we may construe the policy but we cannot take liberalism to the extent of substituting the words which are not intended. It is true that in common parlance the term burglary would mean theft but it has to be preceded with force or violence. If the element of force and violence is not present then the insurer cannot claim compensation against theft from the insurance company. This expression appearing in the insurance policy came up for interpretation before the English Courts and the English Courts in no uncertain terms laid down that burglary or theft has to be preceded with force or violence in order to be indemnified by the insurance company. In this connection reference may be made to the statement of law as summarized in Halsburys Laws of England Fourth Edition (2003 Reissue) Para 646. It reads as under:

646. Forcible and violent entry. The terms of a burglary insurance may exclude liability in certain circumstances unless there is forcible and violent entry into the premises. If so, the entry must be obtained by the use of both force and violence or the definition is not satisfied and the policy does not apply. An entry obtained by turning the handle of an outside door or by using a skeleton key, though sufficient to constitute a criminal offence, is not within the policy since the element of violence is absent. However, an entry obtained by picking the lock or forcing back the catch by means of an instrument involves the use of violence and is therefore covered. The policy may be so framed as to apply only to violent entry from the outside; or the violent entry into a room within the insured premises may be sufficient. In any case, the violence must be connected with the act of entry; if the entry is obtained without violence, the subsequent use of violence to effect the theft, as for instance where a show-case is broken open, does not bring the loss within the policy.

9. It is well-settled law that there is no difference between a contract of insurance and any other contract, and that it should be construed strictly without adding or deleting anything from the terms thereof. On applying the said principle, we have no doubt that a forcible entry is required for a claim to be allowed under the policy for burglary/house breaking.

10. We proceed to deal with the submission made by counsel for the Appellant regarding the rule of contra proferentem. The Common Law rule of construction verba chartarum fortius accipiuntur contra proferentem means that ambiguity in the wording of the policy is to be resolved against the party who prepared it. MacGillivray on Insurance Law1 deals with the rule of contra proferentem as follows:

The contra proferentem rule of construction arises only where there is a wording employed by those drafting the clause which leaves the court unable to decide by ordinary principles of interpretation which of two meanings is the right one. One must not use the rule to create the ambiguity - one must find the ambiguity first. The words should receive their ordinary and natural meaning unless that is displaced by a real ambiguity either appearing on the face of the policy or, possibly, by extrinsic evidence of surrounding circumstances. (footnotes omitted)

Colinvauxs Law of Insurance2 propounds the contra proferentem rule as under:

Quite apart from contradictory clauses in policies, ambiguities are common in them and it is often very uncertain what the parties to them mean. In such cases the rule is that the policy, being drafted in language chosen by the insurers, must be taken most strongly against them. It is construed contra proferentes, against those who offer it. In a doubtful case the turn of the scale ought to be given against the speaker, because he has not clearly and fully expressed himself. Nothing is easier than for the insurers to express themselves in plain terms. The assured cannot put his own meaning upon a policy, but, where it is ambiguous, it is to be construed in the sense in which he might reasonably have understood it. If the insurers wish to escape liability under given circumstances, they must use words admitting of no possible doubt.

But a clause is only to be contra proferentes in cases of real ambiguity. One must not use the rule to create an ambiguity. On must find the ambiguity first. Even where a clause by itself is ambiguous if, by looking at the whole policy, its meaning becomes clear, there is no room for the application of the doctrine. So also where if one meaning is given to a clause, the rest of the policy becomes clear, the policy should be construed accordingly. (footnotes omitted)

11. This court in General Assurance Society Ltd. v. Chandmull Jain and Anr., reported in 1966 (3) SCR 500 held that there is no difference between a contract of insurance and any other contract except that in a contract of insurance there is a requirement of uberima fides, i.e., good faith on the part of the insured and the contract is likely to be construed contra proferentes, i.e., against the company in case of ambiguity or doubt. It was further held in the said judgment that the duty of the Court is to interpret the words in which the contract is expressed by the parties and it is not for the Court to make a new contract, however reasonable.

12. In United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Orient Treasures (P) Ltd. (supra) cited by the Counsel for the Appellant, it was held that there is no ambiguity in the insurance policy and so the rule of contra proferentem was not applicable. A standard policy of insurance is different from other Contracts and in a claim under a standard policy the rule of contra proferentem is to be applied. The Policy in this case is in a standard form. The policy for Burglary and House Breaking in United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Orient Treasures (P) Ltd. (supra) and the policy in this case are identical. If there is any ambiguity or doubt the clause in the Policy should be interpreted in favour of the insured. But we see no ambiguity in the relevant clause of the policy and the rule of contra proferentem is not applicable.

13. For the aforementioned reasons, we uphold the order of the MRTP Commission and dismiss the Appeal with no order as to costs.

**********, 0 , 
HEADNOTE
CONSTITUTION OF INDIA, 1950:
Article 32 - Army service - Petitioner dismissed from service for having abetted the commission of offence of theft - Principal accused acquitted of the offence - Abetment fails when substantive offence is not established against the principal offender - Respondents directed to pay the entire pension and other entitlements to the petitioner.

CRIMINAL LAW
Abetment
Abetment of offence of theft - Principal accused acquitted - Abetment fails when substantive offence is not established against the principal offender.

SERVICE AND LABOUR LAW
Army Service
Reinstatement - Petitioner dismissed from service for having abetted the commission of offence of theft - Principal accused acquitted of the offence - Abetment fails when substantive offence is not established against the principal offender - Respondents directed to pay the entire pension and other entitlements to the petitioner - Constitution of India, 1950, Article 32.
HELD
Having examined the facts in the instant case, we are of the view that the ratio laid down in Faguna Kanta Naths case and later followed in Madan Raj Bhandaris case is attracted. The petitioner was charged with the offence of abetment by conspiracy of the commission of the offence of theft by Major Trilok Chand. The High Court of Allahabad has clearly held that there was no evidence that Major Trilok Chand has committed the theft; therefore, unless the substantive offence against the principal offender is established, the question of abettor being held guilty under these circumstances does not arise. The petitioner is alleged to have entered into a conspiracy alongwith eight others and abetted the commission of the offence. All the other alleged abettors are acquitted and the principal offender Major Trilok Chand is also acquitted and the petitioner alone remains in the picture as one having abetted the offence by entering into conspiracy. It is axiomatic that there cannot be a conspiracy of one. In Topan Das v. The State of Bombay 1955(2) SCR 881 it was held that two or more persons must be parties to such an agreement and one person along can never be held guilty of criminal conspiracy for the reason that one cannot conspire with oneself. Para 9

CASES REFERRED
1. Lt. Col. (TS) Harbans Singh Sandhu v. Union of India and Others Judgment dated 22.1.1978.

2. Madan Raj Bhandari v. State of Rajasthan 1970 (1) SCR 688

3. Jamuna Singh v. State of Bihar AIR 1967 SC 553

4. Faguna Kanta Nath v. The State of Assam 1959 Supp.(2) SCR 1

5. Topan Das v. The State of Bombay 1955 (2) SCR 881


REDDY,J.:

1. This petition is filed under Article 32 of the Constitution of India seeking an appropriate writ directing the respondents i.e. Union of India and the Chief of the Army Staff to restore the petitioner to service with all consequential benefits and grant of pension.

2. The petitioner entered the Indian Army in 1939 and served in Burma during the Second World War and later joined Indian National Army and fought under the leadership of the Netaji Subhash Chander Bose and on India attaining independence, he rejoined Indian Army in 1948 and was promoted to the rank of Hawaldar. He was released from Army service on 15.10.1964 consequent to the reduction of manpower and consequently he joined Defence Security Corps on 14.9.1967 and served till 29.7.78. While serving in Defence Security Corps in 1976 at Pathankot, he alongwith Major Trilok Chand who at the relevant time was serving as their Officer and nine others was charge-sheeted by the Court-martial. The charge against them was that Trilok Chand committed the theft of 250 wheel drums while getting them loaded in a civil truck and that the others abetted the commission of the said offence. Major Trilok Chand was found guilty and out of the nine abetters, eight abetters were acquitted. Major Trilok Chand was awarded one year imprisonment. The petitioner was dismissed from the service with an imprisonment of 90 days in civil prison. Major Trilok Chand questioned the proceedings of the Court-martial before the High Court of Allahabad in Writ Petition No. 13161 of 1981. The High Court allowed the writ petition and held that there was no evidence that it was Trilok Chand who removed the wheel drums and consequently the High Court found that there was no material to support the charge of theft. The review petition filed by the Union of India was dismissed by the High Court and the S.L.P. No. 9294 of 1987 filed by the Union of India in the Supreme Court was dismissed on 5.10.87. Consequently Major Trilok Chand has been reinstated in the service.

3. In view of the fact that the main accused has been acquitted and reinstated in service, the petitioner requested the authorities to review his case and give the necessary relief but his request was rejected. Hence the present petition.

4. Learned counsel for the petitioner submitted that since the principal accused Major Trilok Chand has been acquitted of the charge of theft and has also been reinstated, the petitioner who was only charged of abetment of the said offence of theft can not be found guilty.

5. In support of his submissions, learned counsel has relied on some of the decisions of this Court in Faguna Kanta Nath v. The State of Assam (1959) Supp. 2 SCR 1,Jamuna Singh v. State of Bihar, AIR 1967 SC 553 and Madan Raj Bhandari v. State of Rajasthan, (1970) 1 SCR 688.

6. In Faguna Kanta Naths case the appellant was tried for an offence under Section 165A of the Indian Penal Code for having abetted the commission of an offence by an officer. The said officer was acquitted on the ground that no offence under Section 161 was committed. Consequently, the Court held that appellants conviction for the offence of abetment was not maintainable.

7. This case is referred to in Jamuna Singhs case and it is held that it cannot be held in law that a person cannot ever be convicted of abetting a certain offence when the person alleged to have committed that offence in consequence of the abetment has been acquitted. The question of the abettors guilt depends on the nature of the act abetted and the manner in which the abetment was made. The offence of abetment is complete when the alleged abettor has instigated another or engaged with another in a conspiracy to commit the offence. It is not necessary for the offence of abetment that the action abetted must be committed. It is only in the case of a person abetting an offence by intentionally aiding another to commit that offence that the charge of abetment against him would be expected to fail when the person alleged to have committed the offence is acquitted of that offence.

8. Madan Raj Bhandaris is a case where the appellant was charged with having abetted one Mst. Radha in causing miscarriage to a woman and that Mst. Radha was acquitted but the appellant was convicted. This Court referred to the principle laid down in Faguna Kantha Naths case and held that the facts of the present case fell within the rule that a charge of abetment fails ordinarily when the substantive offence is not established against the principal offender. It may not be necessary to multiply the discussions on this aspect.

9. Having examined the facts in the instant case, we are of the view that the ratio laid down in Faguna Kanta Naths case and later followed in Madan Raj Bhandaris case is attracted. The petitioner was charged with the offence of abetment by conspiracy of the commission of the offence of theft by Major Trilok Chand. The High Court of Allahabad has clearly held that there was no evidence that Major Trilok Chand has committed the theft; therefore, unless the substantive offence against the principal offender is established, the question of abettor being held guilty under these circumstances does not arise. The petitioner is alleged to have entered into a conspiracy alongwith eight others and abetted the commission of the offence. All the other alleged abettors are acquitted and the principal offender Major Trilok Chand is also acquitted and the petitioner alone remains in the picture as one having abetted the offence by entering into conspiracy. It is axiomatic that there cannot be a conspiracy of one. In Topan Das v. The State of Bombay 1955(2) SCR 881 it was held that two or more persons must be parties to such an agreement and one person along can never be held guilty of criminal conspiracy for the reason that one cannot conspire with oneself.

10. We may also mention here that under similar circumstances this Court in Writ Petition No. 553 of 1972 - Lt. Col. (TS) Harbans Singh Sandhu v. Union of India and Others Judgment dated 22.11.78, directed the payment of pension and the gratuity as per the rules.

11. For all these reasons, we direct the respondents to pay the entire pension, gratuity and other entitlements to the petitioner as per the rules within four months. The Writ Petition is accordingly allowed with costs.

**********, 0 , 
HEADNOTE
ELECTRICITY LAWS
Indian Electricity Act, 1910
Sections 39 and 44 - Electricity supply - Tampering of electricity meter and theft of electricity by two industrial users (a company and a partnership firm) located side by side - Theft detected by surprise raid during the night - Managing director of the company and the partners of the firm convicted by the trial court and sentenced to three months imprisonment besides monetary fine -Lower appellate court dismissing the appeals - High Court also dismissing the revision - Validity. Held large scale theft of electricity being an alarming problem causing enormous loss to the Electricity Suppliers, should be dealt with firmly and besides disconnection of supply and conviction of the erring persons, heavy monetary fine should be levied. In the instant cases theft of enormous electricity having been established, no interference was called for in so far as the conviction of the appellants is concerned. However in view of peculiar facts since the appellants had already served out a part of the sentence, instead of making them serve out the remainder term after a lapse of 17 years, in the interest of justice monetary fine imposed by the lower court enhanced.
HELD
On consideration of the totality of the entire case, we do not find any merit in the submissions made on behalf of the appellants. In our view, no interference is called for in the impugned judgment so far as conviction of the appellants under Sections 39 and 44 of the Act is concerned and consequently, we uphold the impugned judgment as far as conviction of the appellants is concerned. (Para 28)

We have also heard the learned counsel for the appellants on the point of sentence. It was submitted before the Trial Court and before this Court also that it is the first offence of the appellants. They have family members and minor dependents. Appellant number 2 is a lady. More than 17 years have elapsed and now, sending the appellants to jail for serving out the remaining part of their sentence would be extremely harsh. The appellants have already served out a part of their sentence and sending them back to jail to serve out the remaining sentence would cause tremendous hardship to the appellants and their family members. (Para 29)

Large scale theft of electricity is a very alarming problem faced by all the State Electricity Boards in our country, which is causing loss to the State revenue running into hundreds of crores every year. In our considered view, after proper adjudication of the cases of all those who are found to be guilty of the offence of committing theft of electricity, apart from the sentence of conviction, the Court should invariably impose heavy fine making theft of electricity a wholly non-profitable venture. The most effective step to curb this tendency perhaps could be to discontinue supply of electricity to those consumers for temporarily or permanently who have been caught abstracting electricity in a clandestine manner on more than one occasion. The legislature may consider incorporating this suggestion as a form of punishment by amending Section 39 of the Indian Electricity Act of 1910. (Para 30)

On consideration of the peculiar facts and circumstances of the case, where the appellants have already served out a part of the sentence and instead of compelling them to serve out the remaining sentence after lapse of 17 years, in the interest of justice, we deem it appropriate to increase the fine from Rs.40,000/- each to Rs.3,00,000/- each in case of appellants number 1 and 3 (Jagmodhan Mehatabsing Gujaral and Harcharanpalsing Nanda respectively) and from Rs.20,000/- to Rs.2,00,000/- under Section 39 of the Act in case of appellant number 2 (Mrs. Rupender Kaur Harcharanpalsing). The appellants are further sentenced to pay a fine of Rs.5,000/- each under Section 44 of the Act. (Para 31)


Dalveer Bhandari, J.


1. Leave granted.

2. This appeal is directed against the judgment of the High Court of Judicature at Bombay dated 23.1.2006 in Criminal Revision Application No.458/2005 and Criminal Revision Application No.11 of 2006.

3. The appellants in this appeal had been convicted by the Additional Chief Judicial Magistrate, First Class, Pune, by the judgment dated 21.12.1996 under Sections 39 and 44 of the Indian Electricity Act, 1910 (hereinafter referred to as the Act) and were also directed to pay a fine. These appellants were directed to suffer three months rigorous imprisonment. Appellants number 1 & 3 were also directed to pay a fine of Rs.40,000/- each and appellant number 2 to pay a fine of Rs.20,000/- under Section 39 of the Act.

4. The appellants, aggrieved by the said judgment of the Additional Chief Judicial Magistrate, Pune, filed an appeal before the Ad-hoc Additional Sessions Judge, Pune being Appeal No. 12 of 1997. The learned Additional Sessions Judge again evaluated the entire evidence and examined the documents on record and reached the same finding and consequently dismissed the appeal filed by the appellants.

5. The Criminal Revision filed against the said judgment of the Additional Sessions Judge was dismissed by the High Court of Judicature at Bombay vide judgment dated 23.1.2006. Both the learned Additional Sessions Judge and the High Court upheld the decision of the Additional Chief Judicial Magistrate.

6. The brief facts which are relevant to dispose of this appeal are recapitulated as under.

7. Appellant number 1 was the Managing Director of M/s. Nanda Glass Industries Pvt. Ltd., located at Gat No. 679/680 Valu, Taluka Bhor and appellants number 2 and 3 are the partners of the partnership firm M/s. Technoframes. Both the industries were adjacent to each other.

8. The Consumer number of M/s. Nanda Glass Industries Pvt. Ltd. is 17941-900102-3 with sanctioned load CD 225 KVA for toughening of glass. The Consumer number of M/s. Technoframes is 1-416 with Meter No. 9030013/TPHR 605 dated 10.7.1986. The sanctioned load of Consumer number 1-416 is 60 H.P. for toughening of glass.

9. Upon receiving information that there was theft of electric energy being committed by the appellants at these two electric connections for their industry at night, the complainant V. G. Kokane, the then Dy. Executive Engineer and in-charge of flying squad of MSEB and Executive Engineer, Kadam with their other testing staff etc. and two Panchas went to M/s. Nanda Glass Industries Pvt. Ltd. and Technoframes in the intervening night of 3/4.10.1989 for the purpose of inspection and checking.

10. It was found that the power of 225 KVA was sanctioned to accused no. 1 on contract demand with H.T. metering for the purposes of recording consumption. One iron box was provided for Trivector Meter. The box was closed and duly sealed under the seal of M.S.E.B. There was CTPC unit provided at D.P. Pole from which the wires were brought into the Meter Box through a conduit pipe so that they could not be tampered. The appellants dislocated the conduit pipe at the bend and socket. They had cut and removed voltage wire of one phase and current wire of another phase so that actual consumption could not be recorded by the meter. Similarly, the appellants by tampering meters ensured that actual consumption of power used for main furnaces and blower was not recorded from December, 1987 so that there could not be any difficulty in putting explanation, if any, called upon by the M.S.E.B. The daily consumption of power was to be recorded by the consumer in prescribed G-7 form, but it was found that it was written only once in every month. On 3.5.1988 while it was inspected by the Testing Division abruptly, abnormal difference was found between the entries noted by the consumer in G-7 form and the reading recorded by the officers of the M.S.E.B. The copies of these forms were attached to the complaint.

11. In the intervening night of 3/4-10-1989, when the complainant and his companions went to the premises they found one watchman on the gate who was called Bapu Bhagwan Alder. He was said to be a Shift Operator-cum-Supervisor and he showed the actual condition of the connections to them. Bapu Bhagwan Alder had put his signatures on the Inspection Reports drawn on the spot, being exhibit Nos.90 and 91. He also voluntarily gave one statement in writing (marked as exhibit No. 80) stating that the industry was actually working at the time of the visit. The factory was normally working in three shifts. It was found at the place of L.T. Connection supplied for Technoframes that though the said company was bearing a different name, the electric power was being used for toughening of glass in M/s. Nanda Glass Industries. The members of the raid team along with complainant found drastic changes and tampering done by the accused in the said connection wherein three incoming wires and other three outgoing wires of the meter were joined together at their respective ends by taking them out from outgoing phase of the terminal box of the meter. Therefore, the meter was totally by-passed and it was not recording the electricity which was consumed. The meter terminal cover and the seals of the M.S.E.B. were not available and there was 100% theft of energy of 60 H.P. The complainant V.G. Kokane had taken photographs to show the tampering of the electric connection and taking of such photographs was indicated in the seizure panchanama.

12. The appellants did not pay any amount more than the minimum charges to the Board, whereas the actual consumption of the electricity was much more. It was assessed by the complainant as an Expert in the field that there was consumption of 10,00,000 units and 16075 VA power worth of Rs.12,00,000/- from H.T. connection whereas 5,00,000 units worth of Rs.4,50,000/- from L.T. connection and the theft of energy of Rs.16,50,000/- committed by them. The photographs of the actual position seen by the raiding party were taken on the spot and that they were produced in the police station during investigation. Similarly, the original seals of H.T. Meter Box were cut and seized in a closed packet duly sealed under the signatures of the Panchas which were also produced by them in the police station. As it was likely that there will be rejoining or change in the position of the L.T. Connection (I-416) the room in which it was installed was duly locked and the lock was sealed with paper bearing signatures of the Panchas was pasted on it. Both the keys of the lock were also given by the complainant in the police station along with the complaint. The complaint was registered at the Bhor Police Station at about 7.30 p.m. on 4.10.1989. The original panchnama drawn by the M.S.E.B. officials and the Panchas at the time of actual raid were also produced by the complainant with true statement of consumption of M/s. Nanda Glass Industries for the purposes of evidence in support of the allegations.

13. After proper investigation of the entire case, the charges against the appellants were framed under Sections 39 and 44 of the Electricity Act, to which the appellants pleaded not guilty. It may be pertinent to mention that the presence of accused Ravindra Birbal Khadake could not be secured in spite of issuing warrants and the Chief Judicial Magistrate was pleased to order for separation of trial against him. We are not concerned with the said accused in this appeal.

14. In the trial of the instant case the prosecution had examined seven witnesses Ramchandra Paigude, PW1 attested the panchanama of exhibit 74. It was drawn during the surprise visit by the raiding party in the night. He also proved exhibit 78 a sealed packet (that was opened in the court), containing three seats which were removed from the meter in the premises of the glass industry. Shankar Anpat, PW2, Executive Engineer, Lokhote, PW3, Junior Engineer, Security Officer, complainant Vijay Kokane PW4, Dy. Executive Engineer and in charge of flying squad and Pathan PW5, Junior Vigilance Officer were employees of the MSEB. These officials of the board described how they had visited the factory and detected existence of fraudulent means of abstraction of electricity without recording consumption in the meter. PW6 is one of the panch witnesses who had attested exhibit 101. In his presence, another panch had climbed atop the meter room located in the premises of Technoframes. It was found that planks in the roof were newly fitted with fresh nailing. Vishnu Mane PW7 had investigated the offence and sent charge sheet to the court.

15. Ramchandra Paigude PW1, an independent witness, fully supported the prosecution version. He was under no obligation to favour the Board officials. He had also stated that the watchman Wadkar had called Bapu Aldar and he was introduced as shift supervisor and had taken the raiding party to the electric installations.

16. The defence of the appellants is that of denial of abstraction and dishonest consumption or use of electric energy by them directly or by any artificial means or the means not authorized by the licensee.

17. The appellants were found guilty of the offences punishable under Sections 39 and 44 of the Electricity Act. According to the Trial Court, the prosecution had succeeded in establishing the commission of theft of the electric energy worth about Rs.16,50,000/-.

18. The appellants, aggrieved by the judgment of the Trial Court, preferred an appeal before the learned Sessions Court, Pune. The first Appellate Court again examined in detail the entire evidence and the arguments advanced by the parties. The first Appellate Court also examined the relevant decided cases of this Court and other courts. The appeal filed by the appellants was dismissed by a detailed and comprehensive judgment dated 27.12.2005.

19. The appellants preferred a revision petition before the High Court of Judicature at Bombay, which was dismissed vide order dated 23.1.2006. The appellants, aggrieved by the said judgment of the High Court, have preferred this appeal.

20. It was submitted by the appellants that the complainant was not authorized to file FIR. The Trial Court had considered this argument of the appellants. The Trial Court has correctly mentioned in its judgment that by the amendment in the provisions of Section 50, the word Government or a State Electricity Board or an Electric Inspector or a person aggrieved by same has been amended and the officers of the State Electricity Board or a person aggrieved by the theft are authorized by the notification to lodge a complaint. The complainant was fully justified in filing the complaint. We do not find any merit in this argument of the appellants.

21. The appellants submitted that there is manifest error in the judgment of the Trial Court, which was affirmed by the first appellate court and the High Court, by which the appellants were convicted and sentenced to three months rigorous imprisonment on the ground that the theft of electricity to the extent of an amount of Rs.17,35,453.52 was extracted by the appellants, whereas, the Civil Court had come to the conclusion and passed the decree in favour of the respondent Maharashtra State Electricity Board in Civil Suit No.156/92 for only Rs.3,07,999.74.

22. On evaluation of the entire evidence and documents on record when the case of theft has been fully proved, then whether the theft of energy was to the extent of Rs.17,35,453.52 or Rs.3,07,999.74, really makes no difference, as there was theft of energy on a large scale for a long time. The appellants cannot take advantage of the fact that the respondents had not appealed against the judgment of the Joint Civil Judge, Senior Division, Pune, who had passed the decree for Rs.3,07,999.74.

23. The appellants had also alleged that 48 hours notice was not given to the appellants before conducting the raid.

24. The Trial Court had dealt with the aspect of giving 48 hours notice before conducting the raid. In a case of a surprise raid 48 hours notice to the appellants is not envisaged by the Legislature and otherwise also it would have been counter productive, because there was a strong possibility of obliterating and/or destroying the entire evidence to connect the appellants with the crime. Moreover, even if it is so accepted, it is on record that the Watchman and Bapu Bhagwan Alder were found present in the premises on behalf of the appellants and that they did assist the raiding team to carry on their work. It is reported by the police in reply to summons that Bapu Bhagwan Alder was serving in some Glass Factory in Pune, but he could not be traced out for the purpose of tendering the evidence before the Court. In fact, it was possible for the appellants to bring him in the box, at least as defence witness, to state that he had no concern with the industry of the accused. Moreover, the employment record or muster roll of the Industry of the accused was not brought for inspection by this Court. Suppression of this clearly gives rise to considerable substance in the allegations of the prosecution. By and large this negatives the arguments on behalf of the appellants that the raid is illegal or otherwise defective. Therefore, we do not find any substance in this submission made by the appellants.

25. The appellants further submitted that the courts in the impugned judgment ought to have appreciated the circumstance that more than 17 years have elapsed; that one of the accused/appellants is a lady partner in the firm and that in fact the public prosecutor had consented and argued for reducing the sentence.

26. The appellants further submitted that the courts below have not properly considered the entire case in the proper perspective because there was no evidence about the tampering with the meter.

27. In the Panchnama, it is categorically mentioned that exhibit no. 91 is the Inspection Sheet pertaining to M/s. Technoframes, Consumer No. I-416 and the observations made are as under:

Meter Terminal Box Seal and cover missing. All the coming and outgoing wires are connected together in the incoming hole resulting total buy passing of meter and no consumption is recorded in the meter.

Therefore, we find no substance in this submission that there was no evidence of tampering of electricity meters by the appellants.

28. On consideration of the totality of the entire case, we do not find any merit in the submissions made on behalf of the appellants. In our view, no interference is called for in the impugned judgment so far as conviction of the appellants under Sections 39 and 44 of the Act is concerned and consequently, we uphold the impugned judgment as far as conviction of the appellants is concerned.

29. We have also heard the learned counsel for the appellants on the point of sentence. It was submitted before the Trial Court and before this Court also that it is the first offence of the appellants. They have family members and minor dependents. Appellant number 2 is a lady. More than 17 years have elapsed and now, sending the appellants to jail for serving out the remaining part of their sentence would be extremely harsh. The appellants have already served out a part of their sentence and sending them back to jail to serve out the remaining sentence would cause tremendous hardship to the appellants and their family members.

30. Large scale theft of electricity is a very alarming problem faced by all the State Electricity Boards in our country, which is causing loss to the State revenue running into hundreds of crores every year. In our considered view, after proper adjudication of the cases of all those who are found to be guilty of the offence of committing theft of electricity, apart from the sentence of conviction, the Court should invariably impose heavy fine making theft of electricity a wholly non-profitable venture. The most effective step to curb this tendency perhaps could be to discontinue supply of electricity to those consumers for temporarily or permanently who have been caught abstracting electricity in a clandestine manner on more than one occasion. The legislature may consider incorporating this suggestion as a form of punishment by amending Section 39 of the Indian Electricity Act of 1910.

31. On consideration of the peculiar facts and circumstances of the case, where the appellants have already served out a part of the sentence and instead of compelling them to serve out the remaining sentence after lapse of 17 years, in the interest of justice, we deem it appropriate to increase the fine from Rs.40,000/- each to Rs.3,00,000/- each in case of appellants number 1 and 3 (Jagmodhan Mehatabsing Gujaral and Harcharanpalsing Nanda respectively) and from Rs.20,000/- to Rs.2,00,000/- under Section 39 of the Act in case of appellant number 2 (Mrs. Rupender Kaur Harcharanpalsing). The appellants are further sentenced to pay a fine of Rs.5,000/- each under Section 44 of the Act.

32. The appellants, in case, have already paid fine imposed by the Trial Court under Section 39 of the Act, then the appellants are directed to deposit only the remaining amount of fine within a period of eight weeks from the date of this judgment. In case the amount of fine, as directed by this Court under Sections 39 and 44 of the Act, is not deposited within the stipulated time, then the appellants shall be taken into custody to serve out the remaining part of their sentence, as imposed by the Trial Court and upheld in the impugned judgment by the High Court.

33. This appeal is accordingly disposed of in terms of the aforesaid observations.

**********, 0 , 
HEADNOTE
SERVICE AND LABOUR LAWS
Industrial Disputes Act, 1947
Section 11A - Workman - Dismissal for misconduct - Proportionality of punishment - Employee of State Road Transport Corporation committing thefts of automobile parts from Depot - Management instituting an enquiry proceedings and also initiating criminal proceedings - Court absolving the employee in the criminal proceedings - Enquiry proceedings establishing the theft -Corporation dismissing the employee from service - Before the Labour Court delinquent employee admitting the theft and pleading to be excused as being the first offence - Labour Court upholding the dismissal -Single Judge of High Court on a writ filed by the delinquent holding that the dismissal was disproportionate and therefore directing his reinstatement with continuity in service but without back wages - Division Bench dismissing the appeal - Validity - Whether dismissal was disproportionate to the act of misconduct. Allowing the appeal of the Corporation held that the employee having committed a serious misconduct of theft and admitted the same before the Labour Court and thus having lost the confidence of the employer, the High Court erred in considering the punishment of dismissal to be disproportionate to the act of misconduct. Order of Labour Court upholding the dismissal accordingly restored.
HELD
In our view, the theft committed by the respondent amounts to misconduct and, therefore, we have no hesitation to set aside the orders passed by the learned Single Judge and also of the Division Bench and restore the order of removal of the respondent from service. When the Labour Court has proved the charges, no interference by the learned Single Judge or by the Division Bench of the High Court was called for. In the instant case, the jurisdiction vested with the Labour Court has been exercised judiciously and fairly. In our opinion, the conclusion arrived at by the High Court in ordering reinstatement; continuity of service was shockingly disproportionate to the nature of charges already proved which is in the nature of theft. (Para 22)

It is also not open to the Tribunal and Courts to substitute their subjective opinion in place of the one arrived at the domestic Tribunal. In the instant case, the opinion arrived at by the Corporation was rightly accepted by the Tribunal but not by the Court. We, therefore, hold that the order of reinstatement passed by the Single Judge and the Division Bench of the High Court is contrary to the law on the basis of a catena of decisions of this Court. In such cases, there is no place for generosity or sympathy on the part of the judicial forums for interfering with the quantum of punishment of removal which cannot be justified. Similarly, the High Court can modify the punishment in exercise of its jurisdiction under Article 226 of the Constitution only when it finds that the punishment imposed is shockingly disproportionate to the charges proved. (Para 23)

Interfering therefore with the quantum of punishment of the respondent herein, is not called for. In our opinion, the respondent has no legal right to continue in the Corporation. As held by this Court, in a catena of judgments that the loss of confidence occupies the primary factor and not the amount of money and that sympathy and generosity cannot be a factor which is permissible in law in such matters. When the employee is found guilty of theft, there is nothing wrong in the Corporation losing confidence or faith in such an employee and awarding punishment of removal. In such cases, there is no place of generosity or place of sympathy on the part of the judicial forums and interfering with the quantum of the punishment. (Para 24)

For the aforementioned reasons, we hold that the orders passed by learned Single Judge and as modified and affirmed by the learned Judges of the Division Bench in Writ Appeal No. 108 of 2005 dated 29.06.2005 deserves to be set aside. Accordingly, we do so. (Para 25)


Dr. AR. Lakshmanan, J.

1. Leave granted.

2. The Department Manager A.P.S.R.T.C. is the appellant in this appeal. The respondent joined as cleaner in the A.P.S.R.T.C. (in short the Corporation) on 02.10.1976. While working as mechanic, he was involved in a serious case of theft. On 23/24.08.1986, while working in the night shift, he committed a theft of Fuel Injection Pump. This apart, he was also involved in stealing an alternator bearing while working in the night shift on 11.09.1986.

3. He also unauthorisedly entered into the tyre section of the depot and stole a new tube of 900 x 20 size on 23/24.09.1986. A sponge sheet was also stolen from the garage of Gajuwaka Depot, where he was working. A charge-sheet was issued to the respondent framing four charges.

4. The charges are as under:

1.For having stolen the Corporation property of fuel injection pump bearing No. AVD 2305 which was fitted to the engine No. 170207 during the night shift on 23/24.08.86 in the garage which constitutes misconduct under Reg. No. 28(x) of APSRTC Employees conduct, Reg.1963.

2. For having stolen the Corporation property of an alternator bearing No. 3440 during the night shift of 11.09.86 when it was fitted to the parked vehicle in the garage which constitutes misconduct under Reg. No. 28(x) of APSRTC Employees Conduct, Regulations, 1963.

3. For having unauthorisedly entered into the tyres section and stolen the new tube of 900 x 20 size on 23/24.09.86 which constitutes misconduct under Reg. No. 28(x) of APSRTC Employees Conduct, Regulations, 1963.

4. For having stolen the sponge sheets SR from the garage of Gajuwaka depot which constitutes misconduct under Reg. No. 28(x) of APSRTC Employees Conduct, Regulations, 1963.

5. An Enquiry Officer was appointed to enquire into the charges and submit a report. In the domestic enquiry conducted on the charges levelled against the respondent, full and fair opportunity was given to him to defend himself. The Enquiry Officer, on completion of the domestic enquiry, had submitted a report holding the respondent guilty of all the charges that were levelled against him.

6. A criminal case was also initiated against the respondent in C.C. No. 751/1987. The Criminal Court by its judgment and order dated 16.05.1987 acquitted the respondent of the charges that were levelled against him.

7. Basing on the Enquiry Officers report, the Depot Manager, on independently examining the matter, came to a conclusion that orders of removal would be an appropriate punishment for the proved charges of theft. Accordingly, the Depot Manager issued proceedings for removing the respondent from the services of the Corporation.

8. Aggrieved by the order of his removal, the respondent raised an Industrial Dispute. In I.D. No. 139/1992, the Labour Court came to the conclusion that the charges holding that the respondent was involved in a case of theft of the property belonging to the Corporation were correctly proved and the punishment of removal was justified under the factual circumstances of the case.

9. Aggrieved by the award of the Labour Court, the respondent preferred a writ petition before the High Court of Andhra Pradesh at Hyderabad.

10. The learned Single Judge of the High Court came to a conclusion that the charges of theft were correctly proved against the respondent. But, however, came to a conclusion that punishment of removal was not in consonance with the gravity of the charges proved against the respondent. Accordingly, the High Court held that the Labour Court ought to have exercised its power under Section 11A of the Industrial Disputes Act. Accordingly, the Single Judge held that the respondent had put in 12 years of unblemished service and deserved a lenient view in the matter. Hence, by his judgment and order dated 31.12.2004, the learned Single Judge passed a judgment by setting aside the order of removal and directed reinstatement of the respondent with continuity of service but without back wages.

11. The appellant - Corporation preferred a writ appeal before the Division Bench of the High Court under Clause 15 of Letters Patent.

12. By its impugned order dated 29.06.2005, the Division Bench of the High Court dismissed the writ appeal filed by the appellant herein. Aggrieved against the order passed by the Division Bench, the above civil appeal has been filed in this Court.

13. We heard Mr. Mahesh Babu, learned counsel for the appellant and Mr. Vijaya Bhaskar, learned counsel for the respondent. Learned counsel for the appellant submitted that the High Court has failed to appreciate that the misconduct of theft involved in by the respondent was a serious misconduct warranting no less a punishment than removal from services of the Corporation and that the High Court has also failed to appreciate that the delinquent employee gave a statement in which he admitted that he had stolen the property of the Corporation but handed over the same to his friend for sale, and that the Labour Court, on the basis of the said evidence, rightly removed the respondent from the services of the Corporation. Arguing further, learned counsel for the appellant submitted that the Division Bench of the High Court has also failed to appreciate that once the Labour Court in its award, passed orders of removal, by taking into consideration the entire factual circumstances of the case, it does not deserve interference. The High Court, in its extraordinary jurisdiction under Article 226 of the Constitution could not interfere with the said order of removal.

14. Mr. Vijaya Bhaskar, learned counsel for the respondent strenuously contended that the order passed by learned Single Judge and by the Division Bench of the High Court does not call for any interference and that the Division Bench of the High Court has ordered only reinstatement of the respondent without back wages and therefore the Corporation is not prejudiced in any manner. He further submitted that the respondent had put in 12 years of service and deserves a lenient view in the matter.

15. Learned counsel for the respondent further submitted that the respondent had an unblemished career in the past and therefore a lenient view should have been taken as rightly taken by the learned Single Judge and as modified by the Division Bench of the High Court in ordering only reinstatement.

16. We have carefully considered the rival submissions and perused the orders passed by the Labour Court and of the High Court and other annexures. In our opinion, the High Court has failed to appreciate that the delinquent employee categorically admitted that he had stolen the property of the Corporation. The Labour Court, on a careful perusal of the evidence, rightly ordered removal of the respondent from service. When the delinquent employee admitted his guilt before the Enquiry Officer that he had handed over the alternator from pan shop to the police authorities and further deposed that he had handed over the stolen property and requested the Labour Court to excuse him since it was his first offence. The Tribunal rightly set aside the request by taking into consideration the entire factual circumstances on record and after careful examination of the same and held that the delinquent employee does not deserve any sympathy and therefore he ordered removal from service.

17. Learned Single Judge of the High Court likewise also failed to appreciate the statement given by the delinquent employee admitting the guilt and however ordered reinstatement, continuity of service but without back wages.

18. Likewise, the learned Judges of the Division Bench also failed to appreciate that once the Labour Court in its award held removal from service by taking into consideration the entire facts and circumstances of the case, it does not deserve interference and that the High Court in its extraordinary jurisdiction under Article 226 of the Constitution could not have interfered with the said orders of the removal.

19. The enquiry reports also clearly reveal that the departmental enquiry was conducted after giving fair and reasonable opportunity to the delinquent official, after following the procedure and as per the regulations.

20. The learned Single Judge considered the past conduct of the delinquent employee as one of the ground in taking a lenient view. In our view, past conduct of workman is not relevant in departmental proceedings. Likewise, the learned Single Judge has erred in holding that the workman did not involve in any misconduct of theft during his past services and on that ground, granted reinstatement with continuity of service.

21. Learned Judges of the High Court have also failed to appreciate that once an employee lost the confidence of employer, it would not be safe and in the interest of the Corporation to continue the employee in the service. The punishment, imposed by the management in the facts and circumstances of the case, is not disproportionate and that the punishment of removal from service is the just and reasonable and proportionate to the proved misconduct.

22. In our view, the theft committed by the respondent amounts to misconduct and, therefore, we have no hesitation to set aside the orders passed by the learned Single Judge and also of the Division Bench and restore the order of removal of the respondent from service. When the Labour Court has proved the charges, no interference by the learned Single Judge or by the Division Bench of the High Court was called for. In the instant case, the jurisdiction vested with the Labour Court has been exercised judiciously and fairly. In our opinion, the conclusion arrived at by the High Court in ordering reinstatement; continuity of service was shockingly disproportionate to the nature of charges already proved which is in the nature of theft.

23. It is also not open to the Tribunal and Courts to substitute their subjective opinion in place of the one arrived at the domestic Tribunal. In the instant case, the opinion arrived at by the Corporation was rightly accepted by the Tribunal but not by the Court. We, therefore, hold that the order of reinstatement passed by the Single Judge and the Division Bench of the High Court is contrary to the law on the basis of a catena of decisions of this Court. In such cases, there is no place for generosity or sympathy on the part of the judicial forums for interfering with the quantum of punishment of removal which cannot be justified. Similarly, the High Court can modify the punishment in exercise of its jurisdiction under Article 226 of the Constitution only when it finds that the punishment imposed is shockingly disproportionate to the charges proved.

24. Interfering therefore with the quantum of punishment of the respondent herein, is not called for. In our opinion, the respondent has no legal right to continue in the Corporation. As held by this Court, in a catena of judgments that the loss of confidence occupies the primary factor and not the amount of money and that sympathy and generosity cannot be a factor which is permissible in law in such matters. When the employee is found guilty of theft, there is nothing wrong in the Corporation losing confidence or faith in such an employee and awarding punishment of removal. In such cases, there is no place of generosity or place of sympathy on the part of the judicial forums and interfering with the quantum of the punishment.

25. For the aforementioned reasons, we hold that the orders passed by learned Single Judge and as modified and affirmed by the learned Judges of the Division Bench in Writ Appeal No. 108 of 2005 dated 29.06.2005 deserves to be set aside. Accordingly, we do so.

26. In the result, the appeal filed by the appellant Corporation stands allowed and order of removal passed by the Labour Court is confirmed. However, there shall be no order as to costs.

**********, 0 , 
 
HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAW
Criminal Procedure Code, 1973
Section 31 - Conviction under Section 381 IPC and Section 52, Post Office Act, 1898 - Theft of a registered insured parcel containing Gold Chain - Chief Judicial magistrate, while awarding sentences under the two Acts, not mentioning whether they were to run concurrently or consecutively - Revision dismissed by High Court - Plea that court should invoke the power under Section 31 CrPC and allow sentences to run concurrently as both the offences were tried in one trial and arose out of one act, theft - Appellant 61 years old, suffering from heart ailment - Lost job - Incident of year 1993 - Gold chain recovered and handed out to owner. Held, on facts, sentences to run concurrently. Sawal Dass case relied upon.
HELD
This is a fit case where we can direct the sentences awarded to the appellant to run concurrently for the reasons that firstly, the case out of which this appeal arises relates to the year 1993 and is pending for a long period of 21 years; secondly, the two sentences, which were imposed on the appellant, arose out of one offence of theft punishable under Section 381 IPC tried in one trial; thirdly, the provisions of Section 52 of the IPO Act were required to be invoked against the appellant because he was the postal employee; fourthly, the Gold Chain was long recovered and also handed over to the person concerned; fifthly, the appellant has already been dismissed from services due to impugned conviction; and lastly, the appellant has been suffering from heart ailment since long, as is proved by documents filed along with the appellants affidavit 03.11.2014. (Para 21)

CASES REFERRED
1.Manoj @ Panu v. State of Haryana JT 2013 (15) SC 384 (Para 19)

2.State of Punjab v. Madan Lal JT 2009 (3) SC 326 (Para 19)

3.Chatar Singh v. State of M.P. 2006 12 SCC 37 (Para 19)

4.State of Maharashtra & Anr. v. Najakat Alia Mubarak Ali JT 2001 (Suppl.1) SC 279 (Para 18)

5.Mohd. Akhtar Hussain @ Ibrahim Ahmed Bhatti v. Assistant Collector of Customs (Prevention), Ahmedabad & Anr. JT 1988 (3) SC 586 (Para 17)

ABHAY MANOHAR SAPRE, J.

1. Leave granted.

2. This appeal is filed by the accused against the judgment and final order dated 25.04.2014 passed by the High Court of Karnataka at Bangalore in Criminal Revision Petition No. 924 of 2009 whereby the learned single Judge of the High Court dismissed the revision petition and upheld the order dated 23.09.2008/01.10.2008 passed by the XVII Additional Chief Metropolitan Magistrate, Bangalore in CC No. 2408 of 1995 convicting and sentencing the appellant-accused for the offences punishable under Section 381 of the Indian Penal

3. Facts of the case lie in a narrow compass.

4. The appellant-accused, at the relevant time, (1.3.1992 to 11.3.1993) was working as Sorting Assistant in Bangalore Packet Sorting Office, Head Record Office (Main Unit) at Bangalore. On the intervening night between 05.03.1993 and 06.03.1993, the appellant-accused while on duty committed theft of a registered insured parcel bearing receipt No. 0127 dated 03.03.1993 containing Gold Chain (V shape) weighing 173.650 Grams worth Rs. 70,410/- which was sent by its owner from Ramavadi Post Office, Bombay for being delivered to the consignee - Gulab Jewellery Shop at K.H.B. Road Post Office, Bangalore. The parcel thus could not be delivered to the party concerned though reached to Bangalore post office.

5. Mr. M.N. Narasimha Murthy-Assistant Superintendent of Bags (PW-1) in the office of Chief Post Master General of Karnataka, on coming to know of the missing of parcel and commission of the theft of the parcel, immediately lodged a complaint (Ex-P-1) in the High Grounds Police Station. The complaint was accordingly investigated which revealed complicity of the appellant in commission of its theft which led to registration of Crime Case No. 115/1993 against the appellant for the offences punishable under Sections 381 and 419 of IPC read with Section 52 of the IPO Act. The case was then handed over to the CBI. The CBI registered the case being RC No. 14(S)/93-BLR, which eventually led to filing of the charge-sheet against the appellant in the Court of XVII Additional Chief Metropolitan Magistrate, Bangalore for appellants prosecution for commission of aforementioned offences.

6. The appellant abjured the guilt and claimed the trial. The Chief Metropolitan Magistrate, by his order dated 23.09.2008/01.10.2008 passed in CC No 2408 of 1995 convicted the appellant for the offences punishable under Section 381 IPC and Section 52 of the IPO Act and sentenced him to undergo simple imprisonment for 6 months and to pay a fine of Rs. 2000/- under Section 381 IPC and in default of payment of fine amount to undergo further simple imprisonment for 3 months. Similarly, the appellant was also sentenced to undergo simple imprisonment for 6 months and to pay a fine of Rs. 2000/- for the offence punishable under Section 52 of the IPO Act and in default of payment of fine amount, to undergo further simple imprisonment of 3 months. So far as the offence punishable under Section 419 IPC was concerned, the appellant was acquitted of the charge.

7. It may be pertinent to mention that the Chief Judicial Magistrate while awarding the punishment for commission of two offences as mentioned above did not mention as to whether both the punishments will run concurrently or consecutively. In other words, the order of the Chief Judicial Magistrate in so far as it relates to the award of punishment was concerned it was silent, on this issue.

8. Feeling aggrieved by the order of conviction and sentence, the appellant filed an appeal being Criminal Appeal No. 845 of 2008 before the XXI Additional City Civil and Sessions Judge and Special Judge for CBI Cases, Bangalore. The appellate Judge, by his order dated 08.10.2009, confirmed the conviction and sentences awarded to the appellant and dismissed his appeal. Against the said order, the appellant preferred a revision being Criminal Revision Petition No. 924 of 2009 in the High Court. The High Court, by impugned order, dismissed the revision and in consequence upheld the conviction and sentences awarded to the appellant. It is against this order, the appellant- accused has filed this appeal by way of special leave.

9. While assailing the legality and correctness of the impugned order, learned Counsel for the appellant urged only one point. Learned Counsel, however, did not question the legality and correctness of the conviction on its merit and confined his challenge only to the sentences awarded to the appellant. According to him, the Courts below erred in not directing both the sentences awarded to the appellant, i.e., the one awarded under Section 381 IPC and the other awarded under Section 52 of the IPO Act to run concurrently. It was his submission that since both the offences which resulted in appellants conviction under two different Acts (IPC and IPO Act) were tried in one trial and arose out of one act namely- theft, this was a fit case where the Courts below should have directed both the sentences to run concurrently. Learned Counsel pointed out that in every case of this nature, it is the duty of the Court to specifically mention in the order of conviction as to whether the sentences awarded for the offences under the different sections would run concurrently or consecutively by taking recourse to the provisions of Section 31 of the Code of Criminal Procedure, 1973 (hereinafter referred to as the Code). Learned Counsel contended that in any event, having regard to the nature of offence committed by the appellant, his advanced age (61 years), the serious heart ailment suffered by him while undergoing the sentence duly proved by documents and the fact that he has already been dismissed from service due to his conviction, this Court should invoke the power under Section 31 of the Code and direct both the sentences, i.e., the one awarded under IPC and other awarded under IPO Act to run concurrently instead of to run consecutively.

10. In contra, learned counsel for the respondent- State supported the impugned judgment and submitted that no interference is called for in the impugned judgment.

11. Having heard the learned counsel for the parties and on perusal of the record of the case, we find force in the submissions made by the learned counsel for the appellant.

12. The question, which arises for consideration in this appeal, is whether the sentences awarded to the appellant under IPC and the IPO Act should run concurrently or consecutively?

13. The expressions concurrently and consecutively mentioned in the Code are of immense significance while

awarding punishment to the accused once he is found guilty of any offence punishable under IPC or/and of an offence punishable under any other Special Act arising out of one trial or more. It is for the reason that award of former enure to the benefit of accused whereas award of latter is detrimental to the accuseds interest. It is, therefore, legally obligatory upon the Court of first instance while awarding sentence to specify in clear terms in the order of conviction as to whether sentence awarded to the accused would run concurrently or they would run consecutively

14. Section 31 of the Code deals with power of the Court to award sentence in cases where the accused is convicted of several offences at one trial. It reads as under :

31. Sentence in cases of conviction of several offences at one trial.-

(1) When a person is convicted at one trial of two or more offences, the Court may, subject to the provisions of section 71 of the Indian Penal Code (45 of 1860), sentence him for such offences, to the several punishments prescribed therefor which such Court is competent to inflict; such punishments when consisting of imprisonment to commence the one after the expiration of the other in such order as the Court may direct, unless the Court directs that such punishments shall run concurrently.

(2) In the case of consecutive sentences, it shall not be necessary for the Court by reason only of the aggregate punishment for the several offences being in excess of the punishment which it is competent to inflict on conviction of a single offence, to send the offender for trial before a higher Court:

Provided that-

(a) in no case shall such person be sentenced to imprisonment for a longer period than fourteen years;

(b) the aggregate punishment shall not exceed twice the amount of punishment which the Court is competent to inflict for a single offence.

(3) For the purpose of appeal by a convicted person, the aggregate of the consecutive sentences passed against him under this section shall be deemed to be a single sentence.

15. The issue as to in which circumstances the Court should direct the sentences to run concurrently or consecutively after the accused is convicted of more than one offence in one trial or more has been the subject matter of several cases in this Court and thus remains no more res integra. This issue was considered by this Court while considering the scope of Sections 31, 427 and 428 of the Code and Section 71 of IPC.

16. We consider it apposite to refer to some of the decisions.

17. In Mohd. Akhtar Hussain @ Ibrahim Ahmed Bhatti v. Assistant Collector of Customs (Prevention), Ahmedabad & Anr. JT 1988 (3) SC 586 : 1988 (4) SCC 183, the accused was sentenced to undergo 7 years imprisonment and a fine of Rs. 10 lakhs was imposed for having found to be in possession of primary gold worth Rs.1.4 crores which was in violation of the Gold (Control) Act. He was subsequently indicted for infringing the provisions of Customs Act by smuggling gold valued at Rs. 12.5 Crores and exporting silver worth Rs. 11.5 Crores. The accused pleading guilty in commission of the offences was awarded 4 years imprisonment and also a fine. Both the sentences were directed to run consecutively. However, the State contended that the offence under the Customs Act merited the maximum sentence, while the accused contended that sentences should run concurrently. The High Court, however, enhanced the sentence as contended by the State and rejected the plea of the accused in regard to the award of sentences. This Court in an appeal filed by the accused accepted the plea raised by him and while allowing his appeal directed both the sentences to run concurrently by referring to Section 427 of the Code. The following observations made by this Court in paras 9 and 10 are apposite:

9. The section relates to administration of criminal justice and provides procedure for sentencing. The sentencing court is, therefore, required to consider and make an appropriate order as to how the sentence passed in the subsequent case is to run. Whether it should be concurrent or consecutive?

10. The basic rule of thumb over the years has been the so-called single transaction rule for concurrent sentences. If a given transaction constitutes two offences under two enactments generally, it is wrong to have consecutive sentences. It is proper and legitimate to have concurrent sentences. But this rule has no application if the transaction relating to offences is not the same or the facts constituting the two offences are quite different.

18. Likewise, a question arose before the three-judge Bench in State of Maharashtra & Anr. v. Najakat Alia Mubarak Ali JT 2001 (Suppl-1) SC 279 : 2001 (6) SCC 311, as to whether the accused convicted in two cases one after another was entitled to claim set off the period of detention during investigation, inquiry or trial from the sentence imposed on conviction in both the cases. While interpreting Section 428 of the Code, the majority of the judges answered the question in affirmative. While answering the question, Justice Thomas, speaking for majority of the Judges, made the following observations, which are pertinent.

17. In the above context, it is apposite to point out that very often it happens, when an accused is convicted in one case under different counts of offences and sentenced to different terms of imprisonment under each such count, all such sentences are directed to run concurrently. The idea behind it is that the imprisonment to be suffered by him for one count of offence will, in fact and in effect be imprisonment for other counts as well.

19. The aforesaid principle of law was relied upon by this Court in Chatar Singh v. State of M.P., 2006 (12) SCC 37 and State of Punjab v. Madan Lal JT 2009 (3) SC 326 : 2009 (5) SCC 238, and lastly recently in Manoj @ Panu v. State of Haryana JT 2013 (15) SC 384 : 2014 (2) SCC 153, wherein this Court taking recourse to Section 31 of the Code directed in somewhat similar facts that the sentences awarded to the accused to run concurrently in place of consecutively.

20. Keeping the aforesaid principle of law in mind and applying the same to the facts of this case in the light of powers available under Section 31 of the Code, we are of the considered opinion that both the sentences awarded to the appellant in the case at hand should run concurrently and this we do by invoking Section 31 which enables the Court to so direct.

21. In our considered opinion, this is a fit case where we can direct the sentences awarded to the appellant to run concurrently for the reasons that firstly, the case out of which this appeal arises relates to the year 1993 and is pending for a long period of 21 years; secondly, the two sentences, which were imposed on the appellant, arose out of one offence of theft punishable under Section 381 IPC tried in one trial; thirdly, the provisions of Section 52 of the IPO Act were required to be invoked against the appellant because he was the postal employee; fourthly, the Gold Chain was long recovered and also handed over to the person concerned; fifthly, the appellant has already been dismissed from services due to impugned conviction; and lastly, the appellant has been suffering from heart ailment since long, as is proved by documents filed along with the appellants affidavit 03.11.2014.

22. It is for all these reasons, in our considered opinion, the interest of justice would be sub-served by directing both the sentences awarded to the appellant to run concurrently. Since we have upheld the conviction, which was not challenged by the appellant in this appeal, the directions to run both the sentences concurrently can always be passed by the appellate Court because such directions are in the nature of consequential on and incidental to the affirmance of the conviction as held by this Court in the case reported in Sawal Das v. State of Bihar, 1975 3 SCC 156.

23. In the light of foregoing discussion, the appeal succeeds and is allowed in part. The conviction and sentences awarded to the appellant by the courts below for the offences punishable under Section 381 of IPC and Section 52 of the IPO Act are upheld. However, it is directed that both the sentences awarded to the appellant under IPC and IPO Act would run concurrently.

24. As a consequence, if the appellant has already undergone the period of sentence imposed on him he shall be released forthwith if not required in connection with any other case.

**********, 0 , 
CROSS CITATION
1965 SCR (1) 293

CRIMINAL APPELLATE JURISDICTION : Criminal Appeal No. 29 of 1963.

Appealby special leave from the judgment andorder dated December 13, 1962, of the Patna High Court in Government Appeal No. 24 of 1960.

Nuruddin Ahmed, B. P. Singh and U. P. Singh, for the appellants.

B. P. Jha, for respondent No. 1.

The Judgment of the Court was delivered by

Raghubar Dayal J. This appeal, by special leave, raises the question whether a person who seizes cattle illegally, purporting to act under S. 10 of the Cattle TrespassAct, 1871, hereinafter the Act, commits the offence of theft or robbery or not. The question arises in this way.

On the morning of November 28, 1957, a number of cattle belonging to several persons, including Shamnarain Singh, were observed by a number of persons,including Ramnandan Singh and Ram Rattan alias Ratan Ahir, grazing in a kurthi fieldabout which there was a dispute between the authorities of the Basic School and Shamnarain Singh each of them claiming the field. Ramnandan Singh and others seized those cattle and proceeded to take them to the pound at village Tilauthu. These persons were armed with sharp-edged weapons and lathis.

The report of the seizure of the cattle reached Shamnarain Singh and other people in the village.A number of people, variously armed, started from the village to rescue the cattle. They were joined by others on the way. This party, including Sukhari Mahto, Deocharan, Sheodutt, Hari Mahto and Ramdeo, caught up with the other party a short distance from the cattle pound and asked that party to release the cattle. Altercation took place between the parties and thenthey fought together. According to the prosecution case, members of the appellants 295 party attacked Shamnarain Singh and his companions. According to the appellants it was the other party which attacked them. As a result of the fight five persons got injured on the side of Shamnarain Singh. Of them, Ramdeo got one gaping punctured wound in the right thigh with a spear. He died as a result of the injury received. Sukhari Mahto received 16 injuries including 4 incised wounds. The other three injured persons received ordinary injuries. Deocharan had an abrasion, Sheodutt Singh got a lacerated wound, a swelling and an abrasion and Hari Mahto hada lacerated wound. On the side of the appellants, fourpersons got injured. Ramnandan Singh received 12 injuries, including 4 incised wounds and 3 punctured wounds.Ratan Ahir got three injuries including 2 punctured wounds. Sheorattan got 5 injuries including 2 punctured wounds.Rajkumar Singh got 2 injuries including one punctured wound.

Reports were made at the police station on behalf of the two parties. Hari Mahto lodged a report on behalf of the complainantparty against 20 persons. Ratan Ahir lodged a reportagainst 26 persons. The police, as a result of investigation, sent up 28 persons for trial. The Additional Sessions Judge, Arrah, acquitted all of them. He found that (1) Shamnarain Singh was in, lawful possession of the kurthi field in question on the date of occurrence and that the supposed claim thereto raised on behalf of the defence was not in good faith; (2) the cattle were seized in the presence of the charwahas in spite of their protest; (3) even though the seizure of the cattle from the kurthi field by the accused party in these circumstances was an unlawful act, the conduct of the complainant-party, who were fully armed, in following them in order to release the cattle, was not justified as it showed a determination on their part to get their cattle released by use of force and that therefore there did not exist any right on the part of the owners of the cattle to the extent of securing the release of their cattlefrom the hands of those who had seized them earlier by use of force; (4) there was strong Probability in favour of the view that it was the prosecution-party which created the crisis and took the aggression to initiate the assault and that the prosecution narration as to the manner in which the assault commenced at the scene of occurrence where the assault took place, did not commend itself to him andthat part of the prosecution story appeared tosufferfrom material Suppression, and that, in these circumstances, the accused party had the reasonable apprehension of suffering grievous hurt or death at the hands of the prosecution party and they were justified in the exercise of their right of private defence of their bodies in 296 causing such injuries to the men on the prosecution side as might cause death, the death so caused being justifiable homicide.

The State of Bihar appealed against the acquittal of the 28 accused. The High Court allowed the appeal against 13 respondents and convicted Ratan Ahir under S. 302 I.P.C. and the others under s. 326 read with s. 149 I.P.C. and ofsome other offences. It may be mentioned thatone of the respondents had died and 14 others were acquitted. The High Court agreed with the Sessions Judge that the plot insuit was in the possession of Shamnarain Singh and that the seizure of the cattle by the accused-party was illegal. The learned Judges, however, were of opinion that the Sessions Judge had taken a wrong view of the law in thinking that the members of the prosecution party were not entitled to rescue the cattle by gleans of force only because the respondents had succeeded in taking away the cattle for some distance. They held that once the seizure of cattle was found to be illegal, members of the accused party were in the position of thieves-rather dacoits-when they had seized the cattle by show of force to the cowherd boys, and that therefore the members of the prosecution party had the right of private defence of property and could recover their cattle by use of force,subject to the limitation that force in excess of what was necessary be not used. It also found that the prosecution party, in their attempt to rescuethe cattle. had been violently attacked by the party of the accused. The learned Judges probably did not agree with the view of the Sessions Judge that the attackwas opened by the prosecution party as there was no material in support of the view on the record, but held that even the opening of the attack by the prosecution party would not give any justification to thedefence party for it was bound to defend itself in the act of rescuing the cattle.

To consider the question of law raised in this appeal, we accept the findings of the High Court to the effect that the plot in suit was in the possession of Shamnarain Singh, that the appellants and others seized the cattle grazing inthat plot alleging that they were damaging their crops andthat they would take them to the pound, that Shamnarain Singh and othersarmed, went to rescue the cattle and on meeting the accused partyasked them to release the cattle andthat after some altercation the accused party opened the attack.

It is not disputed-and it has been alleged from thevery beginning in the reports lodged by both the parties-that the appellants and others had seized the cattle allegingthat they 297 were damaging their crops. It follows that they purported to seize the cattle in pursuance of the provisions of s. 10 of the Act. In view of the finding that the plot was in possession of Shamnarain Singh and that he had raised the crop, such seizure was illegal. It is thus that the question arises whether by so seizing the cattle the appellants committed the offence of theft. It is necessary to determine this point as it is only when the appellants and others had committed the offence of theft in so seizing the cattle that any right of private defenceof property arises in favour of Shamnarain Singh and his party whowent to rescue the cattle. If the act ofthe appellants and othersdid not amount to theft, they committed no offence and therefore no right of private defence of property arose in favour of Shamnarain Singh and others as such a right arises against the commission of an offence as defined in s. 40I.P.C. i.e., an act which amounts to a thingmade punishable by the Code. It may be mentioned that no other offence is alleged to have been committed by the appellants and others which would have given the right of private defence of property to Shamnarain Singh and others.

To determine the question raised, it is desirable to refer to the provisions of the Act in order to findwhat actions of the appellants would be in accordance with its provisions, what would be against them and to whatthey would be liable if they acted against such provisions. Section 10 authorizes certain persons having interest in the crops grown on any land to seize or cause to be seized cattle trespassing on it and doing damage thereto or to any crop or produce thereon. It requires them to send the cattle so seized, within 24 hours, to the pound established for the village in which the land is situate. It further provides that all officers of police shall, when required, aid in preventing resistance to such seizuresand rescues from persons making such seizures.

Section 11authorises certain persons to seize cattle which damage public roads, canals, embankments and other thingsmentioned in that section. Section 12 provides for the levy of fine for every head of cattle impounded.

Chapter V deals with complaints of illegal seizure or detention, and has four sections, ss. 20 to 23. Section 20 reads:

Power to make complaints. Any person whose

cattle have been seized under this Act, or,

having been so

298

seized, have been detained in contravention of

this Act, may, at any time within tendays

from the date of the seizure, make a complaint

to the Magistrate of the District or any

Magistrate authorized to receive and try

charges without reference by the Magistrate of

the district.

Section 21 deals with the procedure onsuch

complaint and S. 22 reads:

Compensation for illegal seizure or

detention. If the seizure or detention be

adjudgedillegal, the Magistrate shall award

to the complainant, for the loss caused by the

seizure or detention, reasonable compensation,

not exceeding one hundred rupees, to be paid,

by the person who made the seizure or detained

the cattle, together with all fines paid and

expenses incurred by the complai

nant in

procuring the release of the cattle.

Release of cattle. And, if thecattlehave

not been released, the Magistrate shall,

besides awarding such compensation, order

their release, and direct that the fines and

expenses leviable under this Act shall be paid

by the person who made the seizure or detained

the cattle.

Section 23 provides that the compensation and expensesmentionedin s.22 maybe recovered as if they were fines imposed by the Magistrate.

Section 24 provides penaltyfor forcibly opposing the seizure of cattle liable to be seized under the Act or for rescuing such cattle after seizure, either from a pound or from any person taking or about to take them to a pound. The punishment on conviction is not to exceedsix months imprisonment or a fine of five hundred rupees.

TheAct does not make the illegal seizure of cattle punishable asan offence. The person seizing cattle illegally is made liable to pay compensation for theloss caused to the owner of the cattle on account of the illegal seizure of cattle or of detaining the cattle in contravention of the Act. He is also liableto pay the fine-, and expenses paid in procuring release of the cattle. The expression under this Act in S. 20 does not mean in accordance with the provisions of the Act but means purporting to be in accordance with the provisions of the Act as seizure under the Act i.e., seizure in accordance with the provisions of the 299 Act could never be illegal, and S. 20 deals with complaints of illegal seizure or detention. The expression used in S. 24 isdifferent and makes the forcible opposition of the seizure of cattle punishable when the cattleseizedwere liableto be seized under the Act. If the cattle were not liableto be seized, forcible opposition to their seizure would not be punishable under s. 24.

Section 25 of the Act provides a mode for the recovery of penalty for mischief committed bycausing cattle to trespass. Itthus takes notice of the offence under the Penal Code committed by the person who causes cattle to trespass on others land, and provides that any fine imposed for the commission of that offence can be recovered bysale of all or any of the cattle by which trespass was committed, whether those cattle were seized in the act of trespassing or not and whether they were the property of the person convicted of the offence or were only in his charge when the trespass was committed.

Section 26, inter alia, provides for penalty for damage causedby pigs through neglect or otherwise to crops etc., or public roads or damage by cattle generally if the State Government so notifies.

Section 29 expressly provides that nothingin the Act prohibits any person whose crops or other produce ofland have been damaged by trespass of cattle from suing for compensation in any competent Court, and S. 30 provides that any compensation paid to such person under the Act by order of the convicting Magistrate shall be set off and deducted from any sum claimed by or awarded to him as compensation in such suit. There is no provision in the Act for the award of compensation to the person whose crops or other produce of land had been damaged by trespass of cattle. Section 30, therefore, appears to refer to the award of compensation to such person under S. 545 Cr. P.C. by the Magistrate convicting the person, whose cattle had caused damage, of the offence of mischief under the Penal Code or of the offences under ss. 24 and 26 of the Act.

TheAct has not any provision,comparable to the provisions ofss. 29 and 30, stating that a person whose cattlehad been illegally seized or detained may sue for compensation in a competent Court and thatcompensation awarded by the Magistrate under s. 22 of the Act be deducted from any sum awarded to him in such proceedings. The Act does not make the illegal seizure or detention of cattle an offence.

It appearsthat the legislatureintended that the provisions of Chapter V of the Actwoulddeal comprehensively with the 300 case of illegal seizures or detentions of cattle andthat the remedy available to a person whose cattle had been so seized or detained would be the one provided by S. 22 of the Act and no other and that illegal seizure or detention of cattlewould amount to no offence under thePenal Code. There appears to be good reason for this as the object of the Act was the protection of crops and other produce of land from the damage by cattle trespassing on the land and of the cultivators and occupiers of land from consequent loss and injury.

The Cattle Trespass Act of 1871 was enacted to consolidate and amend the law relating to trespass by cattle. The first CattleTrespass Act was Act ITT of 1857 and its preamble reads:

Whereasloss and injury aresuffered by

cultivators and occupiers of land from damage

done to crops and other produce of land by the

trespass of cattle; and whereas damage is done

to the sides and slopes of public roads and

embankments by cattle trespassing thereon; and

whereas it is expedient to authorize the

seizure and detention of cattle doing damage

as aforesaid and also to make provision for

the disposal of cattle found straying in any

public place : It is enacted as follows:

Section II of the 1857 Act empowered the cultivator or occupier of any land to seize or cause to be seized any cattle trespassing on his land and doing damage to anycrop or produce thereon. Section 10 of the Act gave such right to other persons is well. It did not however give the right to seize cattle damaging the crops to everyone who might noticethe cattle damaging the crops.Though the power to seize cattle trespassing on a persons land was givenonly when the cattle were damaging the land or the crop the,-eon, it should have been considered a difficult matter for the person authorized to seize cattle to determine first whether the cattle had caused damage to his land or crop and thereafter to seize them. The person so authorized would instinctively first seize the cattle on his land presuming that they must have damaged the crop or the land andthat any further presence of the cattle in the field without their being seized would lead to further damage. Further, s. 10of the Act directs all officers of police,when required to do so, to aid in preventing resistance tosuch seizures and rescues from persons making such seizures. The personseizing the cattle is thus given police protection. Me police officers required to aidwould not, in the circumstances, be 301 determining, before rendering aid, whether the seizure of cattle Was legal Or not. They haveto prevent resistance to seizures

and rescue of cattle from persons making seizures if they are called upon by the persons seizing the cattle to prevent

resistance, to the seizure or the rescue. This emphasizes the view that seizures of cattle whether legal or illegal are protected from interference. The remedy of the person whose cattle are illegally seized is contained in the provisions of Chapter V.

In view of these realisticconsiderations, the person happening to seize the cattle which had not actually caused damagewas considered to be acting underthe Act as expressed in S. 20, so that no action not authorized by the Act be taken against him for conduct which be not strictly legal. At the same time the interest of the person whose cattleare seized even when they had not caused damage to the crop had to be protected.It was also bound to happen at times that persons not authorized to seize cattle in the exercise of their larger duty to the people whose crops were being damaged,, may be inclined to take action against the cattlethey might notice damaging the crops. Such persons would be actuated by good intentions., but actuallythey would not be acting in accordance with the provisions of the Act and might be liable for damages in civil courts or possibly alsocriminally if the seizure of cattle could amountto an offence under the Penal. Code or any other law. It was on a balancing of the interest of the persons purporting toseize the cattle to protect crops and the interest of the owners of the cattle that these provisions of Chapter V seem to have been made.

In view of these considerations, we are of opinion that the provisions of Chapter V comprehensively deal with the cases of such seizure of cattle which had been seized in the exercise of the power conferred by the Act or in furtherance of its objects though not in full accordance with the provisions ofthe Act. In view of these considerations based on the provisions of the Act it does not appearthat illegal seizure of cattle by persons. purporting to act in accordance with the provisions of the Act could be an offence of theft under the Penal Code. We arrive at the same conclusion by a scrutiny of the provisions of the Penal Code.

We may now consider what acts constitute the offence of theft under the Penal Code. Theft is defined in s. 378 thus:

Whoever, intending to take dishonestly any

movable property out of the possession of any

person 302

without that persons consent, movesthat

property in.. order to such taking, is said to

commit theft.

This Court had occasion to consider at lengthwhat commission of theft consists of, in K. N. Mehra v. The State of Rajasthan(1). It said at p. 630:

Commission of theft, therefore, consists in

(1) moving a movable property of a person out

of his possession without his consent, (2) the

moving being in order to the taking of the

propertywith a dishonest intention. Thus,

(I) the absence of the persons consent at the

time ofmoving, and (2) thepresence of

dishonest intention in so taking and at the

time, are the essential ingredients of the

offence of theft.

At p. 631 it said :

It is rightly pointed out that since the

definition of theft requires that the moving

of the property is to be in order tosuch

taking, such meaningintending totake

dishonestly the very moving out must bewith

the dishonest intention.

After stating the provisions of ss. 23 and 24 of the Indian Penal Code, this Court said:

Taking these two definitionstogether, a

person can be said to have dishonest intention

if in taking the property it is his intention

to cause gain,by unlawful means, of the

property to which the person so gaining is not

legally entitled or to cause loss, by wrongful

means, of property to which the person so

losing is legally entitled. It is further

clear from the definition that the gain or

loss contemplated need not be a total

acquisition or a total deprivation but it is

enough if it is a temporary retention of

property by the person wrongfully gaining or a

temporary keeping out of property from the

person legally entitled. This is clearly

brought out in illustration (1) to s. 378 of

the Indian Penal Code.... 

The Court did not express an opinion with respect to the submission that the Penal Code makes a distinction between intention to cause a particular result and knowledge or likelihood of causing a particular result and that the maxim that every person must be taken tointendthe natural consequence of his act is a

(1) 1957 S.C.R. 623.

303 legal fiction which is not recognized for penal consequences in the Indian Penal Code.

Till the property is moved, no offence of theft can becommittedeven if the alleged offender had intended totake dishonestly the property out of the possession of any other personwithout his consent. Mere seizure of cattle found trespassing on land does not amount to movingthe cattle. The act Of moving the cattle would be subsequent to seizing them.It follows therefore that theseizure of cattle, though illegal, cannot amount to the offence of theft. It is after the seizure of cattle that the person seizing them moves them in order to take them to the pound.This act of taking them to the pound is what he is directed to do by the Act, Section 10 specifically directs so. Of course, the direction is in regard to the cattle seized for damaging the land or crop, but the same direction will be deemed to be operative when the cattle are seized in the purported exercise of the right to seize them under s. 10 of theAct, specially when s. 20 speaks of such seizure as being under the Act. An act done in accordance with the provisions of the Act cannot be considered, prima facie, to be a dishonest act, and would not justify the conclusion that the taking of the cattle to the pound amounted to the offence of theft. A person is said to do a thing dishonestly when hedoes anything with the intention of causing wrongful gain to one personor wrongful loss to another person. In the case of illegal seizures andimpounding ofcattle, the person seizing the cattle does not gain anything. He simply takes the cattle to the pound. He does not use them for his purpose. He, in fact, exercises no greater dominionover those cattle than that of being in their custody on their journey to the pound.It is said that it causes wrongful loss to the owner of the cattle inasmuch as he keeps the owner out of possession of the cattle as he was wrongfully deprived; of the property for the time being, it being not necessary that the deprivation of property be of a permanent character. We do not think that in such circumstances, the owner of thecattle can be said to be deprived of his property. The person seizing the cattle can act in either of these three ways. He can keep, them himself. Thismay, in certain circumstances, make him guilty of theft. He can let them loose after taking them out of the field.This action will not remove the danger of the cattle trespassing again on the land. He can take them to the pound.. 304 In so doing he not only acts as directed by the Act but also in the interests of both himself and the owner of the cattle. He avoids the risk of further harm to himself and protects the interest of the owner by having the cattle in safe custody and keeping them from doing any further damage to anyones land or crop. The owner can get back the cattle from the pound on payment of the fine andexpenses in accordance with the provisions of S. 15 of ,theAct. Whatever he would have to pay forgetting the cattle released, he can reimburse himself by suitable action under S. 20of the Act, as the Magistrate dealing with his complaint is empowered under S. 22 to order the payment of finesand expenses paid by him in addition to the compensation for any loss that he suffers. The owner of the cattle illegally seized is thus not only reimbursed for the fine and expenses which he paid but also for any lossthat he has suffered on account of illegal seizure. This means that in the ultimate analysis the owner ofthe cattle, seized illegally, suffers no loss and that therefore the act of illegal seizure of cattle does not cause any wrongful loss to the owner of the cattle. It follows that the person seizing cattle purporting to act under the provisions of the Act does not cause any wrongful loss to the owner of the cattle.

Even if it be assumed that some sort of loss which is wrongful in nature is caused to the owner of the cattle by illegal seizure and impounding them, the question arises whether the person seizing the cattle illegally from a field with the avowed object of taking them to the pound on the groundthat it was damaging the field or the crop can be imputed the intention to take the cattle dishonestly. The effect of his seizing the cattle illegally may be assumed to cause wrongful loss to the owner of the cattle, but did he so intend? We are of opinion that he did not so intend. His intention at the time, though based on his wrong notions that he was entitled to seize the cattle, was to takethem to the poundas required by the Act so that no further damagebe done to the land or property. It is truethat intention is mostly gathered from the consequences of the act committed by the accused but that is so because it is not often that the intention with which an act is committed can be definitely known from any previous fact. When a person does a certain act by openly expressing his intention in committingthe act there seemsno reason why his intention should be gathered by the consequences of his act exceptin those cases where it is found that the avowed intention was a mere cloak for some other real 305 intention which is then to be determined in the same way as it is determined in cases of non-expressed intention. In view of the various considerations mentioned above, we are of opinion that when a person seizes cattle on the groundthat they were trespassing on his landand causing damageto his crop or produce and gives out that he was takingthem to the pound, he commits no offence of theft however mistaken he may be about his right to that land or crop. The remedy of the owner of the cattle so seized is to take action under S. 20 of the Act. He has no right to use force to rescue the cattle so seized.

We may now briefly consider the cases referred to in support of the contention that illegal seizure of cattle amounts to theft. These cases were not of the seizure and impounding of cattle in, the purported exercise of the powers under s. 10 ofthe Act. They are: Queen v. PreonathBanerjee(1); Wazuddi v. Rahimuddi(2) ; Abdul Khaliq v. Emperor ( 3) ; ParyagRai v. Arju Mian(4); Queen Empress v. Sri Churn Chungo(5). In these cases seizure of cattle was notmade even ostensibly on account of their causing, damage to any land or crop. They were seized and taken away by persons in order to get their claims against the owners satisfied, or in order to cause them loss otherwise. Suchseizures of cattle, was rightly held to amount to theft.

On the other hand there are cases which held that no offence is committed by a person seizing cattle illegally. In Empress v. Ramjiawan(6) it was held that illegal seizure of cattleunder the Act was not an offence of mischief under the Penal Code and, that the, remedy of the owner of the cattlewas to be found in the provisions of ss. 20, 21 and 22. In Dayal v. Emperor(7) persons who had seized cattle from, a pound and impounded them in retaliation of the action of the owners of the cattle in justifiably impounding their cattle a day earlier, were held not to have committed the offence of mischief under s. 425 T.P.C. inasmuch asdriving the cattleto the pounddid not in any way lead to the diminution in the utility or value of the cattle and not to have committed the offence of theft as no wrongful loss was causedto the owners of cattle even though they wouldhave had to incur expenses in order to get them released. (1) 5 W.R. 68 (criminal).

(3) A.I.R. 1941 Lah. 221.

(5) I.L.R. 22 Cal. 1017.

(2) (1917) 18 Crl. L.J. 849.

(4) I.L.R. 22 Cal. 139.

(6) 1881 1 All. W.N. 158.

(7) A.I.R. 1943 Oudh. 280. 306 We therefore hold that in the circumstances of this case, Rattan and others, appellants, who had seized the cattle from the .disputed field committed no offence of thefteven if they had no right to that fieldand that therefore Shamnarain Singh and others who went armed with sharp-edged weapons and lathis to rescue the cattle had no right of defence of their property, against Rattan and others. The learned Sessions Judge was inclined to the viewthat Shamnarain Singhs party was the aggressor. The view cannot be said to be unreasonable even though the prosecution witnesses did not actually state so. The circumstances of the case, however, indicate that normally Shamnarain Singhs party would have been the aggressors.It is they whowere aggrieved atthe conduct of Rattan andothers and deliberately followed those persons in order to rescue their cattleand therefore would have, in that state of temper. started the attack.

The fact that four persons in Rattans party receivedmore injuries thanfive persons in Shamnarains party and the numberof serious injuries was also larger on theirside support this view. These four persons received 8 punctured wounds and 4 incised wounds out of the total of 26 injuries on them all. The five persons on Shamnarains side received 22 injuries which included only one punctured wound, the only one on Ramdeo deceased, and 4 incised wounds on Sukhari Mahto.

Even if Shamnarain Singhs party were not the aggressors and the attack was started by the party of Rattan, as appears to be the view of the High Court, that would not give any right of private defence of person to Shamnarains party as Rattan and others could have apprehended, in the circumstances, that Shamnarains party was not peacefully inclined and would use force against them in order to rescue the cattle and that the force likely to be used could cause grievous hurt. We are of opinion that Rattan and others, appellants, committed no offencein causing injuries to persons in Shamnarains party and in causing the death of Ramdeo who was in that party. We accordingly allow theappeal, set aside the conviction of Rattan Ahir under s. 302 I.P.C. and of others under s. 326 I.P.C. and also their conviction of the other offences they were convicted of. They will be released forthwith from custody.

Appeal allowed. 307
**********, 0 , 
HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAWS
Penal Code, 1860
Sections 302, 380 read with Section 34 - Murder of land-lady - Recovery of her husbands (PW1s) wrist watch pursuant to appellants disclosure statement - Appellant was the only inmate with deceased present when the incident took place - Both accused convicted under Section 302, 380/34 by trial court - Whether appellants conviction was justified in view of first accuseds acquittal by High Court when said first accused had allegedly strangulated deceased - No appeal by State against his acquittal. Held, merely because both accused were seen with deceased by PWs 3 & 4 in the morning of the date of incident and were not seen for two days thereafter, does not show that appellant authored the crime. As per prosecution first accused had strangulated deceased. First accused had left for village after receiving information about his mothers illness and appellant too had gone to his home from where he was arrested later. Thus they were not absconders as alleged. Sunil Kundus case referred.
HELD
None of the circumstances by itself would lead to the irresistible conclusion that the appellant herein is the author of the crimes under Sections 302 and 380 IPC. It is in evidence of PWs 3 and 4 -the key witnesses that apart from the appellant, one Ranjit Roy was also seen in the house of the deceased and, according to prosecution also, as noted in their report, it was Ranjit Roy-accused no.1 who quietly put a strip of cloth round the neck of the deceased and strangulated her. It is in evidence that both the accused belonged to New Jalpaiguri. It is the case of the prosecution itself that the first accused had received a message on the evening of 5.7.2001 that his mother was seriously ill and she was at home. PW-13 Kakulay does not support the case of the prosecution that she had seen the accused in the afternoon of 4th July, 2001 as proceeding to Siliguri. She is specific and categoric of that date because it was the first death anniversary of her father-in-law. The accused were in fact not absconding. They had gone to their native place New Jalpaiguri and they were arrested from their respective homes only. (Para 9)

On the only ground that the accused was seen with the deceased in the morning of the date of incident and that they were not seen in that place for another two days, cannot, by themselves, lead to the conclusion that it is the appellant who authored the crime. (Para 13)

To abscond means, go away secretly or illegally and hurriedly to escape from custody or avoid arrest. Accused had told others that they were from their place of work at Gangtok to their home at New Jalpaiguri. They were admittedly taken into custody from their respective houses only, at New Jalpaiguri on the third day of the incident. Therefore, it is difficult to hold that the accused had been absconding. (Para 14)

Evidence Act, 1872
Sections 8, 27 - Murder - Motive - Recovery of deceaseds husbands (PW1s) wrist watch pursuant to appellants disclosure statement - Whether could be a basis of conviction - Whether theft was the motive behind murder - Delay of 10 days in effecting recovery - Neither disclosure nor seizure supported by witnesses - As per recovery memo wrist watch handed over to police by appellants mother whereas as per disclosure statement appellant had concealed the same in his house - How mother was in possession of the watch and why it was recovered through her when appellant was available, not explained - His mother also not examined - Neither PW1 nor deceaseds sons, PWs 2 & 3 ever stated about theft of watch and cash - Jewelry worn by deceased was also not stolen. Held, recovery, on the basis of which conviction was recorded by High Court, was doubtful and hence conviction cannot be sustained. Motive also could not be proved. Madhu v. State of Kerala referred.
HELD
The conviction of the appellant is by placing reliance solely on the recovery of the wrist watch. It is faulty in procedure and, apart from that, the same does not infuse any confidence in the mind of the Court in the given circumstances, when pitted against the rest of the evidence, that the appellant committed the murder with the motive of theft. There is no explanation for the delay of about ten days in effecting recovery. The owner of the wrist watch-PW1 does not have a case that his wrist watch had been stolen by the appellant. That version is not also supported by the children of the deceased. They have no case of theft of wrist watch or cash. (Para 20)

Exhibit P5-recovery memo says that the wrist watch had been handed over to the investigating officer by the mother of the appellant. However, Exhibit P6-disclosure statement recorded on 12.07.2001 which has already been extracted above, though, not admissible as such, states that the appellant had kept the wrist watch in his house at New Jalpaiguri and that he could handover the same to the police. The investigating officer examined as PW16 states that the wrist watch was recovered from the house of the appellant. It is not explained as to how the mother of the appellant came into custody of the wrist watch which had been allegedly kept in concealment by the appellant in his house. She was not examined. Yet another significant aspect is that the disclosure statement-Exhibit P6 is made only on 12.07.2001, after five days of the incident and yet the recovery is effected only on 17.07.2001. The witnesses to the disclosure statement as well as seizure memo PWs 11 and 12 have very clearly stated in their evidence that their signatures were obtained on some papers which had already been filled up by the police and that no statement had been given by the appellant in their presence. (Para 11)

If the motive for the accused in committing the murder of Manorama Devi was theft, it is again difficult to understand why the accused did not remove any ornaments worn by the deceased. (Para 15).

Section 302, 380 read with section 34 - Conviction under - Acquittal of one of the accused, who allegedly strangulated deceased - Whether is a ground to acquit the other as ground of common intention disappears. Held, if there is independent evidence against other accused, he cannot be acquitted. Krishna Govind Patils case referred. (Para 17)

CASES REFERRED
1.Raja v. State JT 2013 (11) SC 439 (Para 19)

2.Sunil Kundu v. State of Jharkhand JT 2013 (6) SC 599 (Para 14)

3.Madhu v. State of Kerala JT 2012 (1) SC 181 (Para 15)

4.Amrita alias Amritlal v. State of M.P. JT 2004 (2) SC 295 (Para 18)

5.Krishna Govind Patil v. State of Maharashtra AIR 1963 SC 1413 (Para 17)

KURIAN, J.

1. Appellant is the second accused in Criminal Case No. 31 of 2001 on the file of the Sessions Judge, Sikkim at Gangtok. He was charged along with one Ranjit Roy under Sections 302, 380 read with Section 34 of the Indian Penal Code (45 of 1860) (hereinafter referred to as IPC). According to the prosecution:

These two accused persons were already in need of money for their expenses as Durga Roy (Burman) had already borrowed much cash from his master Sujit Basak before completing his works and he had nothing to get from his master for few days. The money problem became more serious when on 5.7.2001 the accused person received telephonic call from the father of Ranjit Roy stating that his mother is seriously ill at home and he should return home immediately. That night both the accused persons slept late discussing about their monetary problems. Next day (i.e. 6.7.2001) in the morning, Ranjit Roy went to the rented room. Shibu Barman had already left for his job. After some time Durga Roy (Barman) also arrived in the room. Both of them were under the strong impression that Lalan Prasad had enough money in his house as he was engaged in lottery business and both his sons were also working. Therefore, the two accused persons made a plan to steal money from Lalan Prasads house as he was already left for job.

The accused persons had hot discussion with Raju Kumar, elder son of deceased in connection with use of bathing soap for toilet purposes. By 0900 hrs, both the sons also left for their daily works. Then only the deceased Manorama Devi remained in the house besides the two accused persons. The two accused persons decided to kill the deceased Manorama Devi in order to steal money from her house as she was the only person present in the house. Deceased Manorama Devi was inside the room of her sons when accused Durga Roy (Barman) pretended to talk to her, thereby diverting her mind. At that moment, the other accused Ranjit Roy came from his room bringing a strip (sic) of cloth and quietly went behind the deceased Manorama Devi and on getting the opportunity, the accd. Ranjit Roy quietly put the strip round the neck of the deceased and strangulated her. As the victim became unconscious, he encircled the ligature twice on her neck and tightly made a knot on the back of the neck (sic) as a result she died on the spot due to strangulation by ligature. Then leaving the dead body on the floor, the accused persons searched the house and took away one wrist watch SITCO and cash Rs.2300/- and fled away from P.O. At about 1200 hrs, the accused persons were seen by one Mrs. Kakulay Biswas w/o. Parusotham Biswas, at Tenzing and Tenzing, Gangtok going towards Deorali side. Accused Durga Roy, who was known to her, told her that they were going home. Then they never came back to Gangtok.

(Emphasis supplied)

2. It is thus further case of the prosecution that the appellant herein made Exhibit P6-disclosure statement while in custody on 12.07.2001:

My true statement is that on 6/7/01 Friday that the Watch which I had stolen after murdering the Lottery Sellers wife, I have kept the same in NJP. I can hand over the said Watch to Police. I have kept the said Watch in homes at NJP.

Sd/-
(illegible)
Accused Durga Roy
Witness
1) BRIJ KISHORE PRASAD,
S/o. Ram Janam Prasad,
Basantpur Near Police Station,
Dist. Sewan, Bihar,
A/P. R.N. Chamling Building Sd/-
Brij Kishore Prasad
M.G. Marg, gangtok, Ext.P-6(a)
Occupation : Lottery Agent.
2) TASHI TSHERING BHUTIA
S/o. Tensang Bhutia Sd/-
Dalep Busty, Kewzing SJ (E/N)
South Sikkim Gangtok
A/P Rajya Sainik Board,
Palger Stadium Road, Sd/-
Gangtok Tashi
Occupation : Lottery Seller Ext.P6(b)
Sd/-
SJ (E/N)
Recorded by
Sd/- Ex.P6(c)
(P.M. Rai) Sd/-
Police Inspector SJ (E/N)
Sadar P.S.
Gangtok

3. On the basis of above disclosure made on 12.7.2001, recovery of the watch was made on 17.07.2001, as per Annexure-P5 memo. The two witnesses in Exhibit P6 are witnesses to the seizure also. The Sessions Court, as per judgment dated 31.12.2002, convicted both the accused under Section 302/380/34 IPC.

4. In appeal, the High Court of Sikkim, by judgment dated 15.12.2003, acquitted the first accused Ranjit Roy for the following reasons:

12. At this stage, it is relevant to state that the appellants were charged under section 302/34 IPC and have been found guilty thereunder. To invoke the aid of section 34 IPC, it is necessary that the criminal act complained against was done in furtherance of the common intention of all the accused persons. The common intention implies prior meeting of mind. It can also be formed suddenly at the spot. The prosecution has not laid any evidence on this score.

So far as appellant no.1 Ranjit Roy is concerned, there is no evidence against him except that in the morning on the date of occurrence he was present in the house of the deceased and remain absconded till he was arrested on 8th July, 2001 at New Jalpaiguri. An act of absconding is no doubt a relevant piece of evidence but the said act does not by itself lead to a conclusion that he is guilty. There is no other incriminating material against him to connect with the offence. The suspicion however strong be cannot take the place of proof. For reasons aforesaid, we are inclined to hold that the prosecution has not been able to prove its case against appellant no.1 Ranjit Roy beyond reasonable doubt. He is, therefore, entitled to be acquitted on the benefit of doubt.

(Emphasis supplied)

5. However, in the case of second accused-appellant herein, it was held by the court as follows:

13. In the present case, the charge against both the appellants is specific in the sense that in furtherance of their common intention they committed the murder of the deceased. With the acquittal of appellant no.1 Ranjit Roy the charge of sharing common intention fails. It does not however mean that appellant no. 2 Durga Roy can also secure acquittal. There is no legal bar to convict him under the substantive provision if on the basis of evidence it could be held that he was the author of the crime.

Let us, therefore, examine his case separately. As already stated, he was found in the house of deceased in the morning on the date of occurrence. In the said house, no other inmate was present except the deceased. He was a co-tenant along with Shibu PW4 in respect of one room belonging to the deceased. Shibu PW4 deposed that he had gone to the house of the deceased at 2.30 p.m. to 2.45 p.m. to find out if he was present in his room but he did not find him and his room was locked. He had not returned to his room since then and remained absconded till he was arrested on 8th July, 2001. He gave recovery to the Sitco wrist which was found missing on the date of occurrence. Having regard to the above circumstances, we have no hesitation to hold, that he (appellant no.2 Durga Roy) after committing murder of the deceased also committed the theft of the wrist watch exhibit IX. He is, therefore, clearly guilty of offences punishable under sections 302 and 380 IPC. The conviction recorded by the Sessions Judge under sections 302/380/34 IPC is hereby converted to one under sections 302 and 380 IPC.

(Emphasis supplied)

6. Heard learned counsel appearing for the appellant and learned counsel appearing for the State of Sikkim.

7. The basis of maintaining the conviction against the appellant herein who is the second accused is:

i. He was in the house of the deceased in the morning on the date of occurrence.

ii. No other inmate was present except thedeceased.

iii. The co-tenant had deposed that when he went to the house of the deceased between 2.30 - 2.45 p.m. on the same day, he could not find the appellant and room was locked.

iv. He had not returned to his room and remained absconded till he was arrested on 8th July, 2001.

v. He gave recovery of the wrist watch belonging to husband of the deceased which was allegedly found missing on the date of occurrence.

8. On these grounds, it was concluded that the appellant/accused after committing the murder of the deceased, also committed theft of the wrist watch and, hence, he was guilty of offence punishable under Sections 302 and 380 IPC.

9. We are afraid, none of the circumstances by itself would lead to the irresistible conclusion that the appellant herein is the author of the crimes under Sections 302 and 380 IPC. It is in evidence of PWs 3 and 4 -the key witnesses that apart from the appellant, one Ranjit Roy was also seen in the house of the deceased and, according to prosecution also, as noted in their report, it was Ranjit Roy-accused no.1 who quietly put a strip of cloth round the neck of the deceased and strangulated her. It is in evidence that both the accused belonged to New Jalpaiguri. It is the case of the prosecution itself that the first accused had received a message on the evening of 5.7.2001 that his mother was seriously ill and she was at home. PW-13 Kakulay does not support the case of the prosecution that she had seen the accused in the afternoon of 4th July, 2001 as proceeding to Siliguri. She is specific and categoric of that date because it was the first death anniversary of her father-in-law. The accused were in fact not absconding. They had gone to their native place New Jalpaiguri and they were arrested from their respective homes only.

10. The only other ground is that of recovery under Section 27 of the Indian Evidence Act, 1872 (hereinafter referred to as Evidence Act), recovery of the wrist watch which was alleged to have been stolen by the appellant. From the evidence available on record, we find it extremely difficult to place reliance on that recovery for many reasons. The wrist watch belongs to PW1, the husband of the deceased. PWs 2 and 3 are the sons of the deceased and were staying with PW1 and the deceased. PWs 1, 2 and 3 do not have a case that the wrist watch belonging to PW1 had been stolen by the appellant. They do not also have a case about the money that has been allegedly taken by the accused after committing murder. There is not even a whisper in the evidence of PWs 1, 2 and 3 regarding the theft of either the wrist watch or the cash except for the identification of the wrist watch by PW1 as belonging to him. There is not even a reference to the alleged missing of the wrist watch since 06.07.2001 or the loss of cash. It is only in the evidence of PW16-the investigating officer that the accused had a motive of committing theft after murdering Smt. Manorama Devi and that an amount of Rs.2,300/- and wrist watch belonging to PW1 had been taken by the accused.

11. Exhibit P5-recovery memo says that the wrist watch had been handed over to the investigating officer by the mother of the appellant. However, Exhibit P6-disclosure statement recorded on 12.07.2001 which has already been extracted above, though, not admissible as such, states that the appellant had kept the wrist watch in his house at New Jalpaiguri and that he could handover the same to the police. The investigating officer examined as PW16 states that the wrist watch was recovered from the house of the appellant. It is not explained as to how the mother of the appellant came into custody of the wrist watch which had been allegedly kept in concealment by the appellant in his house. She was not examined. Yet another significant aspect is that the disclosure statement-Exhibit P6 is made only on 12.07.2001, after five days of the incident and yet the recovery is effected only on 17.07.2001. The witnesses to the disclosure statement as well as seizure memo PWs 11 and 12 have very clearly stated in their evidence that their signatures were obtained on some papers which had already been filled up by the police and that no statement had been given by the appellant in their presence.

12. Another significant aspect in the case is that all ornaments worn by the deceased were on the body and nothing had been removed. If the accused had a motive to commit theft, it is only normal that they would lay their hands on the jewelry as well.

13. On the basis of the evidence we have discussed above, we find it extremely difficult to hold that the prosecution has laid a foundation for an effective prosecution and has proved beyond doubt that it is the appellant who committed the murder of Manorama Devi. It has to be noted that this case is set up only on circumstantial evidence. All the circumstances should lead to, without breaking the chain, the involvement of the accused and the accused only. On the only ground that the accused was seen with the deceased in the morning of the date of incident and that they were not seen in that place for another two days, cannot, by themselves, lead to the conclusion that it is the appellant who authored the crime.

14. To abscond means, go away secretly or illegally and hurriedly to escape from custody or avoid arrest. It has come in evidence that the accused had told others that they were from their place of work at Gangtok to their home at New Jalpaiguri. They were admittedly taken into custody from their respective houses only, at New Jalpaiguri on the third day of the incident. Therefore, it is difficult to hold that the accused had been absconding. Even assuming for argument sake that they were not seen at their work place after the alleged incident, it cannot be held that by itself an adverse inference is to be drawn against them as held by this Court in Sunil Kundu v. State of Jharkhand JT 2013 (6) SC 599. To quote paragraph-28:

28. It was argued that the accused were absconding and, therefore, adverse inference needs to be drawn against them. It is well settled that absconding by itself does not prove the guilt of a person. A person may run away due to fear of false implication or arrest. (See: SK. Yusuf v. State of W.B. JT 2011 (6) SC 640) It is also true that the plea of alibi taken by the accused has failed. The defence witnesses examined by them have been disbelieved. It was urged that adverse inference should be drawn from this. We reject this submission. When the prosecution is not able to prove its case beyond reasonable doubt it pic cannot take advantage of the fact that the accused have not been able to probabilise their defence. It is well settled that the prosecution must stand or fall on its own feet. It cannot draw support from the weakness of the case of the accused, if it has not proved its case beyond reasonable doubt.

15. If the motive for the accused in committing the murder of Manorama Devi was theft, it is again difficult to understand why the accused did not remove any ornaments worn by the deceased. Hence, the prosecution version regarding the motive also, is shaken. (Please see the decision of this Court in Madhu v. State of Kerala JT 2012 (1) SC 181).

16. The evidence available on record would on the contrary give an indication that theft is a story of the investigation officer only. Neither PW1 whose wrist watch is said to be stolen nor the sons of the deceased-PWs 2 and 3 have any case of the alleged theft of wrist watch or cash. The recovery is also doubtful. There is no consistent version of the recovery. The person from whom the recovery has been effected, viz., the mother of the appellant, has not been examined. Despite the availability of the appellant, the recovery is through his mother. There is no explanation as to how she got to watch. This could also be the reason why the trial court in the judgment dated 31.12.2012 held that Technically speaking there is no compliance of Section 27 Evidence Act. Though the wrist watch Ext. IX was recovered from the house of accused Durga Roy but the record reveals that the said wrist watch was handed over to the Police by the mother of the accused Durga Roy. It has to be noted that recovery of the wrist watch from the house of the appellant is the only ground on which the High Court has maintained the conviction of the appellant.

17. It has been argued by the learned counsel for the appellant that the accused no.1 Ranjit Roy on whom the overt act of strangulation is alleged, having been acquitted by the High Court, the conviction of the appellant cannot be maintained. It is further contended that by the acquittal of the main accused, the whole theory of common intention has been shattered and that the appellant is entitled to succeed on that ground. We are afraid, the contention cannot be appreciated. No doubt, there are only two accused and they have been charged under Sections 302/380/34 IPC and one of them has been acquitted. That by itself is not a ground to acquit the co-accused, in case there is independent evidence. Of course in the absence of such independent evidence, the accused could succeed on that ground as held by this Court in Krishna Govind Patil v. State of Maharashtra AIR 1963 SC 1413, which is a case of Section 302 read with Section 34 IPC. To quote,

8. ... While it acquitted Accused 1, 3 and 4 under Section 302, read with Section 34 of the Indian Penal Code, it convicted Accused 2 under Section 302, read with Section 34, of the said Code, for having committed the offence jointly with the acquitted persons. That is a legally impossible position. When accused were acquitted either on the ground that the evidence was not acceptable or by giving benefit of doubt to them, the result in law would be the same: it would mean that they did not take part in the offence. The effect of the acquittal of Accused 1, 3 and 4 is that they did not conjointly act with Accused 2 in committing the murder. If they did not act conjointly with Accused 2, Accused 2 could not have acted conjointly with them. ...

18. In the case before us, the allegation is that after committing the murder, the accused committed theft also. As held by this Court in Amrita alias Amritlal v. State of M.P. JT 2004 (2) SC 295 at paragraph-8 that:

8. ... Mere acquittal of some of the accused on the same evidence by itself does not lead to a conclusion that all deserve to be acquitted in case appropriate reasons have been given on appreciation of evidence both in regard to acquittal and conviction of the accused. ...

19. The same view was followed by this Court in Raja v. State JT 2013 (11) SC 439. To quote paragraph-12:

12. ... It is also relevant to point out that the High Court took note of the general principle that if the prosecution case is the same against all the accused or with regard to some of the accused on the same set of evidence available on record with reference to any of the accused, then the Court would not be committing any mistake in acquitting all the accused and conversely, if it is possible to do so, namely, to remove the chaff from the grain, the Court would not be committing any mistake in sustaining the prosecution case against whom the evidence is shown to be intact.

20. Thus, there should be independent evidence. The conviction of the appellant is by placing reliance solely on the recovery of the wrist watch. We have already held above that, it is faulty in procedure and, apart from that, the same does not infuse any confidence in the mind of the Court in the given circumstances, when pitted against the rest of the evidence, that the appellant committed the murder with the motive of theft. It is not enough that the circumstances lead to possibility or probability of the involvement of the accused; the circumstances should point all the fingers to the accused and the accused only. That is not the situation in this case. The circumstances can lead to many other inferences. The chain is also not complete. The first accused, who according to the prosecution is the perpetrator of the offence under Section 302 IPC, has been acquitted. The State has not filed an appeal against the acquittal. It is a case of Sections 302, 380 read with Section 34 IPC. The whole theory of the prosecution is that it is the first accused who has been acquitted by the High Court, who tied the piece of cloth on the neck of the deceased and strangulated her. The only piece of shaky evidence against the appellant is of recovery of the wrist watch of PW1 from and through the mother of the appellant. She was not examined. There is no explanation as to how despite the availability of the appellant, the recovery is effected through his mother. There is no explanation for the delay of about ten days in effecting recovery. The witnesses have not supported the disclosure statement or the seizure. The owner of the wrist watch-PW1 does not have a case that his wrist watch had been stolen by the appellant. That version is not also supported by the children of the deceased. They have no case of theft of wrist watch or cash.

21. In such circumstances, we have no hesitation in holding that the prosecution has miserably failed in proving the case against the appellant and the appellant is entitled to succeed. The appeal is allowed. The conviction of the appellant under Section 302/380 IPC is set aside. He shall be released forthwith in case he is not required to be detained in connection with any other case.

**********, 0 , 
CROSS CITATION
1967 SC 349 (11)
1963 SCR Supl. (1) 689

CRIMINAL APPELLATE, JURISDICTION: Criminal Appeal No. 2 of 1962. Appealby special leave from the judgment andorder dated April 25, 1953 of the Rajasthan High Court Jaipur Bench, Jaipur in Criminal Revision No. 237 of 1956.

S. P. Varma, for the appellant.

S. K. Kapur and P. D. Menon, for the respondent. 1962. October 22. The judgment of the Court was delivered by

SUBBA RAO, J. This appeal by specialleave is directed against the decisionof the High Court of Rajasthan in Criminal Revision No. 237 of 1956 confirming that of the Sessions judge, Alwar, convicting the appellant under s. 379 of the Indian Penal Code and sentencing him to a fine of Rs. 200/-.

To appreciatethe questions raised in this appeal the following facts, either admitted or found by the High Court, may be stated. On November 24, 1945, one Ram Kumar Ram obtained permission, Ex. PB, from the Government oftile former Alwar State to supply electricity at Rajgarh, Khertal and Kherli. Thereafter, he entered into partnership with 4 otherswith an understanding that the licence would be transferred to a company that would be floated by thesaid partnership. After the company was formed, it put in an application to the Government through 691 its managing agents for the issue of a licence in its favour. Ex. P. W. 15/B is that application. On the advice given by the Government Advocate, theGovernment required Ram Kumar Ram to file a declaration attested by a Magistrate with regard to the transfer of his rights and the licence to the company.On April 8, 1948, RamKumar Ram filed a declaration to that effect. The case of the prosecution is that Ram Kumar Ram was a friend of the appellant. Pyarelal Bhargava, who was a Superintendent in the Chief Engineers Office, Alwar. At the instance of Ram Kumar Ram, Pyarelal Bhargava got the file Ex. PA/ 1 from the Secretariat through Bishan Swarup, a clerk, before December 16, 1948, took the file to his house sometime between December 15 and 16,1948, made it available to Ram Kumar Ram for removing the affidavitfiled by him on April 9, 1948, and the application, Ex. P. W. 15/B from the file andsubstituting in their place another letter Ex. PC and another application Ex. PB. After replacing the said documents, Ram Kumar Ram made an application to the Chief Engineer on December 24, 1948, that the licence should not be issued in the name of the company. After the discovery of the tampering of the said documents, Pyarelal and Ram Kumar were prosecuted before the Sub-Divisional Magistrate, Alwar--the former for an offence under s. 379 and s. 465, read with s. 109, of the. Indian Penal Code, and the latter for an offence underss. 465 and 379, read with s.109 of the Indian Penal Code. The Sub-Divisional Magistrate convicted both the accused under the said sections and sentencedthem on both the counts. On appeal the Sessions judge set aside the Conviction under s. 465, but maintained the conviction and sentence of Pyarelal Bhargava under s. 379, and Ram Kumar Ram under s. 379, read with s. 109, of the Indian Penal Code. Ram Kumar Ram was sentenced to pay a fine of Rs. 500/- and Pyarelal Bhargava to pay a fine of Rs. 200/-. Against these convictions both the accused 692 filed revisions to the High Court and the High Court set aside the convictionand sentence of Ram Kumar Ram but confirmed those of Pyarelal Bhargava. Pyarelal Bhargava has preferred the present appeal.

Learned counsel for the appellant raised before us three points, namely, (1) the High Court has wrongly reliedupon the confession made by the accusedbeforeShri P. N. Singhal, Officiating ChiefSecretary tothe Matsya Government atthat time, as that confession was notmade voluntarily and, therefore, irrelevant under s. 24 of the Evidence Act; (2) the said confession having been retracted by the appellant, the High Court should not have relied upon it as it was not corroborated in material particulars; and (3) on the facts found the offence of theft has not been made out within the meaning of s. 379 of the Indian Penal Code. Another argument, namely, that the statement made by Pyarelal Bhargava before the Chief Secretary was not a confession inlaw, was suggested but not pursuedand, therefore, nothing need be said about it.

The first question turns upon the interpretation of the provisions of s. 24 of the Evidence Act and its application to the facts found in this case. Section 24 of the Evidence Act lays down that a confession caused by inducement, threat or promise is irrelevant incriminal proceedings under certain circumstances. Under that section a confession would be irrelevant if thefollowing conditionswere satisfied: (1) it should appear to the court to havebeen causedby any inducement, threat or promise; (2) thesaid threat, inducement or promise must have reference to the charge against the accused person; (3) it shall proceed from a personal authority; and (4) the court shall be of the opinion that the said inducement, threat or promise is sufficient to give the accused per-son grounds which would appear to him reasonable in supposing that he would gain an advantage or avoid any 693 evil of a temporal nature in reference to the proceedings against him. The crucial word in the first ingredient is the expression  appears. The appropriate meaning of the word appears is seems. It imports a lesser degree of probability than proof. Section 3 of the Evidence Act says:

A factis said to be proved when after

considering the matters before it, the Court

either believes it to exist, or considers its

existence so probable that aprudent man

ought, under the circumstances of the

particular case, to act upon the supposition

that it exists.

Therefore, the test of proof is that there is such ahigh degreeof probability that a prudent man would act on the assumption that the thing is true. But under s. 24 of the Evidence Act such a stringent rule is waived but a lesser degreeof assurance is laid down as the criterion. The standard of a prudent man is not completely displaced, but the stringent rule of proof is relaxed. Even so, the laxity of proof permitted does not warrant a courts opinion based on pure surmise. A prima facie opinion basedon evidence and circumstances may be adopted as the standard laid down. To put it in otherwords,on the evidence and the circumstances in a particular case it may appear to the court that there was a threat, inducement or promise, though the said fact is not strictly proved.This deviationfrom the strict standards ,of proof has been designedly accepted by the Legislature with a. view to exclude forced or induced confessions which sometimes are extorted and put inwhen there is a lack of direct evidence. It is not possible or advisable to lay down an, inflexible standard for guidance of courts, for in the ultimate analysis it is the court which is called upon to exclude a confession by holding in the circumstances of a particular case that the confession was not made voluntarily.

The threat, inducement or promise must proceed from a person in authority and it is a question 694 of fact in each case whether the person concerned is a man of authority or not.What is more important is that the mere existence of the threat, inducement or promise is not enough, but in the opinion of the court the said threat, inducement orpromise shallbe sufficientto cause a reasonable belief in the mind of accused that by confessing he would get an advantage or avoid any evil of a temporal naturein reference to the proceedings against him: while the opinion is that of the court, the criterion is the reasonable belief of the accused. The section, therefore, makes it clear that it is the duty of the court to place itself in the position of the accused and to form an opinion as to the state of his mind in the circumstances of a case. In the present case it was found that certain documents in the Chief Enginecrs Office were tampered with and certain papers weresubstituted.The appellant was the Superintendent in the Chief Engineers Office.On April 11, 1949, Shri P. N. Singhal, Officiating Chief Secretary to the MatsyaGovernment, was making a departmental inquiry in respect of the missing documents. The appellant, among others, was questioned about the said documents. The appellant first madea statement, Ex. PL, in which he stated that he neither asked Bishan Swarup to bring file No. 127, nor did he recollect any cause for calling forthat file on or about that date. As Shri Singhal was not able to find out the culprit, he expresser his opinion that if the whole truth did not come out, he would hand over the inquiry to the police.Thereafter, the appellant made a statement, Ex. P.L. 1, wherein, in clear terms, he admitted that about the middle of December 1948 Ram Kumar Ram took file No. 127P. W./48 regardingissue of licence tothe Bharat Electrical and Industrial Corporation Ltd., Alwar, from his residence to show it to his lawyers, and that he took the file more than once for that purpose.He also addedthat this was 695 a voluntary statement. Learned counsel for the appellant argued that the Chief Secretary gave the threat that, if the appellant didnot disclose the truth he would place the matterin the hands of the police and that the threat induced the appellant to make the disclosure in thehope that he would be excused by the authority concerned. There is no doubt that the Chief Secretary is an authority within the meaning of s. 24 of the Evidence Act, but the simple question is whether the alleged statement by thesaid authority reappears to the court to be athreatwith reference to the charge against the accused.As wehave said, under particular circumstances whethera statement appears to the court to be a threat or not is a question of fact. In this case the three lower courts concurrently held that in the circumstances of the case the statement did not appearto be a threat within the meaning of s. 24 of The Evidence Act., but that was only a general statement which any person who lost his property and was not able tofind out the culprit would make. It may be that such a statement under different circumstances may amount to a threat or it may also be that another court may take a differentview even in the present circumstances of the case, but in exercising the powers under Art. 136 of the Constitution we are not prepared to differ from the concurrent finding given by the three courts that in the circumstances of the present case that the said statement did not appear to them to be a threat.

The second argument also has no merits.A retracted confession may form the legal basis of a conviction if the court is satisfied that it was true and was voluntarily made But it has been held that a court shallnot base a conviction on such a confession without corroboration. It is not a rule of law, but is only rule of prudence. It cannoteven be laid down as an inflexible rule of practice or prudence that under no circumstances such a conviction can be 696 made without corroboration, for a court may, in a particular case, be convinced of the absolute truth of a confession and prepared to act upon it without corroboration; but it may be laid down as a general rule of practice that it is unsafe to rely upon a confession, much less on a retracted confession, unless the court is satisfied that the retracted confession is true and voluntarily made and has been corroborated in material particulars., The High Court having regard to the said principles looked for corroboration and found it in the evidence of Bishan Swaroop, P.W-7, and the entry in the Dak Book, Ex. PA. 4, and accepted the confession in view of the said pieces of corroboration.The finding is one offact and there is no permissible ground for disturbing it in this appeal.

The last point is that on the facts found no case of theft has been made out. The facts found were that the appellant got the filebetween December 15 and 16, 1948, to his house,made it available to Ram Kumar Ram andon December 16, 1948, returned it to the office. On these facts it is contended that the prosecution has not made out that the appellant dishonestly took any movable property within the meaning of s. 378 of the Indian Penal Code. Thesaid section reads :

Whoever, intending to take dishonestly any

movable property out of the possession of any

person without that persons consent, moves

that property in order to such taking, is said

to commit theft.

The section may be dissected into its component parts thus : a person will be guilty of the offence of theft, (1) if he.intends to cause a wrongful gain or a wrongful loss by unlawful means of Property to which the person gaming is not legally entitled or to which the person losing is legally entitled, as the case may be: 697 see ss.23 and 24 of the Indian Penal Code; (2) thesaid intention to act dishonestly is inrespect of movable property; (3) the said property shall be taken out of the possession of another person without his consent; and (4) he shall move that property in order to such taking. In the present case the record was in the possession of the Engineering Department underthe control of the Chief Engineer. The appellant was the Superintendent inthat office; he took the file out of the session of thesaid engineer. removed the file from office and handed it over to Ram Kumar Ram. But it is contended that the said facts do not constitute the offence of theft for three reasons, namely, (i) the Superintendent was in possession of the file and therefore he could not have taken the file from himself; (ii) there was no intention to take it dishonestly as he had taken it only for the purpose of showing the documents to Ram Kumar Ram and returned it the next day to the office and therefore he had not taken the said fileout of the possession ofany person; and (iii) he did not intend to take it dishonestly, as he did not receive any wrongful gain or cause any wrongful loss to any other per-son. We cannot agree that the appellant was in session of the file. The file was in the Secretariat of the Department concerned, which was in charge of the Chief Engineer. The appellant was only one of the officers working in that, department and it cannot, therefore, be said that he was in legal possession of the file. Nor can we accept the argument that on the assumption that the Chief Engineer was in possession of the said file, the accused had not taken itout of his possession. To commit theft one need not take movable property permanently out of the possession of anotherwith the intention not to return it to him.It would satisfy the definition ifhe took any movable propertyout of the possession of another person though he intended to return it later on. We cannot also agree with learned counselthat there is no wrongful loss in the present case. 698 Wrongful loss is loss by unlawful means of property to which the person losing it is legally entitled. It cannot be disputed thatthe appellant unauthorisedly took thefile from the office and handed it over to Ram Kumar Ram. He had, therefore, unlawfully taken the file from the department, and for a short time he deprived the Engineering Department ofthe possession of the said file. Theloss need not be caused by a permanent deprivationof property but may be caused even by temporary dispossession, though the per-son taking it intended to restore it sooner or later. A temporary period of deprivation or dispossession of the property of another causes loss to the other. That a person- will act dishonestly if he temporarilydispossesses another of his property is made clear by illustrations (b) and (1) of s.378 of the Indian penal code. They are:

(b) A puts a bait for dogs inhis pocket,

and thus induces zs dog to follow it. Here,

if As intention be dishonestly to take the

dog out of Zs possession without Zs consent,

A has committed theft as soon as Zs dog has

begun to follow A.

(1). A takes an article belonging to Z out of

Zs possession without Zs consent, with the

intention of keeping it until he obtains money

from Z as a reward for its restoration.Here

A takes dishonestly; A has therefore committed

theft.

It will be seen from the said illustrations that a temporary removal of a dog which might ultimately be returned to the owner or the temporary taking of an article with a view to returnit after receiving some reward constitutes theft, indicating thereby that temporary deprivation of another personof his property causes wrongful loss to him. We, therefore, hold that the facts found in this case clearly bring them within the four comers of s. 378 of the Indian 699 Penal Code and, therefore, the courts have rightly held that the appellant had committed the offence of theft. No other Point was pressed before us. In the result the appeal fails and is dismissed.

Appeal dismissed.
**********, 0 , 
HEADNOTE
ELECTRICITY LAWS
Indian Electricity Act, 1910
Section 26(6) - Scope - Dispute regarding fraud in tampering with meter or breaking body seal. Held to be outside the ambit of the provision. (Para 10)

Bihar State Electricity Tariff
Clause 16.9 - Applicability - Assessment made on the basis of theft, for 180 days - Justification. Held that the Board has rightly applied Clause 16.9 and there is no infirmity in the bill raised.
HELD
In the cases of theft of electricity or dishonest abstraction of electrical energy the assessment for compensation has to be done on the basis of a formula wherein D stands for number of days for which the pilferage took place and where there is no possible evidence to establish the period, this factor can be taken to be equivalent to 180 days. Similarly, in case where connected load is more than the sanctioned load, the assessment charge has to be done on the basis of a formula where C stands for six months or the number of months or part thereof elapsed from the date of connection/installation, whichever is less. Therefore under the tariff in both the cases the period can be taken as 180 days or six months. It is on the basis of this formula that the assessment for consumption of units has been done for 180 days. The electricity board rightly applied Clause 16.9 of the Tariff and there is no infirmity in the assessment made and the bill prepared in pursuance thereof. (Para 12)

Clause 16.9 with Electricity Act - Section 39/44 - Assessment as per tariff - Case of dishonest abstraction or theft - Trial of accused in criminal court. Held that it has no bearing on assessment made according to tariff. (Para 13)

Clause 16.9 and 16.10.3 - Fuel surcharge - Method of calculation - Dishonest abstraction - Assessment thereof - Fuel surcharge at thrice the rate per unit - Legality. Held that Clause 16.10.3 is separate from Clause 16.9 and it does not lay the fuel surcharge at thrice the rate of per unit. (Para 17)

CASES REFERRED
1.Apparel Export Promotion Council v. A.K. Chopra JT 1999 (1) SC 61 (Para 15)

2.Hyderabad Vanaspathi Ltd. v. A.P. State Electricity Board & Ors., JT 1998 (3) SC 84 (Para 12)

3.State of U.P. & Ors. v. Maharaja Dharmander Prasad Singh JT 1989 (1) SC 118 (Para 14)

4.Madhya Pradesh Electricity Board & Ors. v. Basantibai JT 1987 (4) SC 294 (Para 10)

FOREIGN CASES REFERRED
:

1.North Wales Police v. Evans (1982) 1 W.L.R. 1155 (Para 14)

G.P. MATHUR, J.

1. These appeals are directed against the judgment and order dated 18.4.2000 of a Division Bench of Patna High Court, by which the writ petition preferred by M/s J.M.D. Alloys Ltd. was partly allowed and the Bihar State Electricity Board was directed to serve a fresh bill as per the observations made in the judgment and to restore the electricity connection within two days of the payment of the said bill.

2. M/s J.M.D. Alloys Ltd. (hereinafter referred to as the petitioner) has a high tension industrial connection of electricity for running induction furnaces for manufacturing steel ingots. The officials of the Bihar State Electricity Board (hereinafter referred to as the electricity board) inspected the petitioners factory premises on 26th and 27th August, 1999 and found that the seal fixed on CT/PT box was tampered. An FIR was lodged at the concerned police station on 27.8.1999 alleging that the petitioner had committed theft of 6.96 lakh units and had thereby caused a loss of Rs. 2.58 crores to the electricity Board. The electricity board thereafter issued a bill dated 31.8.1999 for Rs. 8,85,77,131/-. This bill was challenged by the petitioner by filing CWJC no. 8939 of 1999 before the High Court. The learned single judge, who heard the writ petition vide his judgment/order dated 27.9.1999 directed that a show cause notice in the light of the observations made in the judgment be given to the petitioner within a week and it will be open to the petitioner to raise all its defences against the charge of committing theft of electrical energy and/or drawing electrical energy at a load higher than its contracted demand. It was further directed that the show notice shall be given by the general manager-cum-chief engineer, Central, Bihar Area, Electricity Board, Patna, or by any other officer of the electricity board of equal or higher rank and he shall pass final order after giving an opportunity of hearing to the petitioner. The liability of the petitioner was to be determined afresh on the basis of the final order passed by the chief engineer.

3. The chief engineer (Transmission) Bihar State Electricity Board thereafter issued a notice dated 13.10.1999 to which a reply was given by the petitioner on 20.10.1999. After affording an opportunity of personal hearing and considering the reply, the chief engineer passed an order on 27.10.1999 holding that clause 16.9 (b) and (c) of Tariff is attracted and the consumer M/s J.M.D. Alloys Ltd. is liable to pay compensatory bill in terms of the aforesaid clauses of the Tariff. In accordance with the decision of the Chief Engineer, a fresh bill dated 29.10.1999 for Rs. 8,85,77,131/- was issued. This bill was again challenged by the petitioner by fling a writ petition which was dismissed by a learned single judge on 13.12.1999. Against the said decision the petitioner preferred a letters patent appeal which was partly allowed by the Division Bench by the impugned judgment and order dated 18.4.2000. The Division Bench held that the petitioner is liable to pay electricity charges in accordance with Clause 16.9 of the Tariff. However with regard to fuel surcharge it was held that the same cannot be levied at thrice the rate in accordance with Clause 16.9 of the Tariff, which permits consumption of electricity to be assessed at thrice the rate per unit. Feeling aggrieved by the aforesaid decision, M/s J.M.D. Alloys Ltd. have preferred civil appeal no. 8394 of 2002 and the Bihar State Electricity Board has preferred civil appeal no. 8395 of 2002.

4. As stated earlier, the chief engineer (transmission), Bihar State Electricity Board, issued a notice dated 13.10.1999 to the petitioner. The notice was issued on the grounds, inter alia, that the inspection of the business premises of the petitioner was conducted from 14.15 hours to 20.30 hours on 26.8.1999 and thereafter on the following day; that on examination of CT/PT unit and its terminal box, the seal bearing no. 04566OP which was put on CT/PT terminal box on 14.5.1999, was found to be tampered with and the signature of the authority was also not found on the same; that a seizure memo of the tampered seal was prepared on the same day; that on account of the fact that the seal on the terminal box had been removed, it had become easily accessible to the consumer and by fiddling with the terminals, namely by removing the wires or putting wires of higher resistance, the flow of energy to the metering unit was manipulated to show a very low recording of both KVA and unit consumption; that the total capacity of induction furnaces on operation was 12 M.T. for which energy requirement was 7200 KVA but the petitioner had entered into a contract demand of 4850 KVA and, therefore, the consumer was engaged in theft of electricity and was consuming energy at a much higher load than the contracted demand; that the supplier of the furnaces to the petitioner, namely Megatherm Electronic Pvt. Ltd. had reported to the director general of police (vigilance), Bihar State Electricity Board consumption equivalent to approximately 3000 KVA for running the furnaces exclusive of auxiliary load like water supply, cooling systems, cranes, etc; that the feasibility report given to the electricity board by the petitioner showed that the minimum required energy for each MT furnace was 500 KVA for the furnace alone besides 100 KVA for auxiliary load and thus 600 KVA was required for each MT furnace; that the electronic meter showed that the power had been consumed by the factory on an average basis of 21.25 hours per day which runs into two shifts of 12 hours each having 40 workers in each shift and the load and the capacity of two furnaces showed production of 3000 MT ingots every month and, therefore, the minimum consumption of power was 16.20 lakh units per month whereas bills had been paid on an average of 9.24 lakh units per month; that the theft of power was further substantiated from the meter reading of J.D. Feeder at 3311 KV Air Force Sub-station Bihta and also the claim filed by the petitioner under Clause 13 of the agreement and on the basis of the aforesaid facts and material it was obvious that the petitioner had been committing theft of electricity on a massive scale by tampering with the seal of the CT/PT terminal cover. The petitioner was accordingly directed to show cause as to why a bill in terms of Clause 16.9 of the tariff notification be not raised. The petitioner give a reply to the show cause notice raising various pleas and denying that it had committed any theft of electricity. It was pleaded that the meter had been regularly inspected by different teams of the electricity board but no tampering of the seal of the CT/PT terminal cover had been found; that the furnaces can operate only to the extent of 80% of its rated capacity; that the electricity board itself had assessed the capacity of the connected load at 5100 KVA, which was very near to the contracted demand; that the meter installed in the factory premises never recorded a maximum demand of more than the contracted demand; that the assumption that 100 KVA per ton is required for auxiliary load was not based on facts and that in the case of a high tension industrial consumer the connected load is of no relevance because to constantly monitor the load availed of by a high tension consumer a trivector meter, containing the maximum demand indicator is compulsorily installed. It was further submitted that the seal in CT/PT unit had not been tampered with an the allegation regarding tampering of the seal was being investigated by the investigating officer of the criminal case registered against the petitioner and his report shall be considered by the court of law at the appropriate time.

5. The chief engineer after consideration of the material and the submissions made held that the theft of electricity cannot be found physically and this has to be worked out from evidences parameters and various circumstances under which the consumer is availing power. He passed a detailed order on 27.10.1999 and the relevant part of the findings recorded by him are being reproduced below:

It appears from annexure 1 of show-cause notice that two nos. of induction furnaces of six M.T. capacity each totalling 12 MT were in operation. This is supported by the facts with the inspection report that the total capacity of transformer was 7230 KVA. The CTPT cover terminal seal which was found tampered was unsigned. There were large number officials of the board including executive magistrates and therefore there is no reason to disbelieve that seal of terminal cover of CTPT was tampered. The capacity of the furnaces being 12 MT it is evidently clear that the power was used unauthorised by the consumer because the consumption recorded in the meter was much less than what it ought to have been on actual load i.e. 7200 KVA (600 x 12 T). In this connection the annexure-3 & 4 the vouchers of the purchase of induction furnace from Megatherm, show the capacity of induction furnace 6 MT as 2500 KW i.e. equivalent to 3000 KVA therefore the load of 12 M.T. Furnace besides @ KVA/MT as auxiliary load totalling to 7200 KVA as the actual load. It is not out of place to mention here that the induction furnace association of Bihar has proposed and agreed that the load of induction furnace could be 600 KVA per M.T.

This is also brought to my notice that on average basis the power was consumed at the average period of 21.25 hrs. per day. The factory runs into two shifts with 40 workers in each shift. So far as the nos of days of pilferage is concerned, it has been rightly interpreted and assessed the maximum period of six months for the assessment of compensatory amount under clause 16.9 of Tariff.

The variant factors of the consumption as per formula i.e. LEFXIIED have been thoroughly taken care of in the formula provided in the Tariff.

From the facts and circumstances as set forth above, it is absolutely clear that clause 16.9 (b) and (c) of Tariff is attracted and the consumer M/s JMD Alloys is liable to pay the compensatory bill in terms of Clause 16.9 of Tariff.

6. In accordance with the order of the chief engineer, a fresh electricity bill was prepared on 29.10.1999 for Rs. 4,09,32,925/- towards the cost of units of electricity and Rs. 3,90,73,217/- towards fuel surcharge. After adding the electricity duty and charges for rental of transformer and fuse replacement, etc. a bill was issued for Rs. 8,85,77,131/-.

7. Shri Gopal Subramanium, learned senior counsel for the petitioner, has submitted that the factory premises of the petitioner had been inspected on 14.5.1999 and then again on 20.7.1999 and no irregularity of any kind had been found on the said dates and, therefore, the allegation that the petitioner had tampered with the seal of CT/PT unit is wholly incorrect. There was no material or evidence to show that any effort had been made by the petitioner to interfere with the metering unit which may have the effect of showing lesser consumption of energy. learned counsel has also submitted that in absence of any evidence relating to presence of artificial means which would have rendered abstraction of electrical energy possible the provisions of Clause 16.9 of the tariff could not be made applicable and the electricity bill issued to the petitioner is incorrect It has also been urged that the last inspection of the petitioners premises having been done on 20.7.1999, there is no justification for counting the period of dishonest abstraction of energy as 180 days (six months) and, therefore, the bill issued to the petitioner is for much longer period which was not permissible in law. The learned counsel has further submitted that the findings recorded by the chief engineer are wholly incorrect as instead of basing his order on the actual production of steel, he has gone by the capacity of the furnaces. Shri Subramanium has also urged that the faulty recording of the meter has to be judged from the standpoint of section 26(6) of the Indian Electricity Act, 1910 and the matter should have been referred to electrical inspector.

8. Shri V.R. Reddy, learned senior counsel for the Electricity Board, has submitted that section 26(6) of the Indian Electricity Act has no application to a case where the seal fixed on CT/PT terminal box had been tampered with and the recording of consumption by the meter had been effected by recourse to artificial means. Learned counsel has laid stress on the fact that the chief engineer, after considering all the relevant material and circumstances has recorded a categorical finding that the seal of the CT/PT terminal box had been tampered with and the petitioner had exceeded the contracted load and had also dishonestly abstracted electrical energy to a very large extent. According to the learned counsel, the findings recorded by the Chief Engineer being based upon relevant material are not open to challenge in proceedings under Article 226 of the Constitution of India. In support of the appeal preferred by the Electricity Board, Shri Reddy has submitted that the surcharge being part of the electricity bill, the Division Bench of the High Court had erred in holding that the same was chargeable on per unit basis and not at thrice the value thereof. According to the learned counsel, in view of Clause 16.9 of the Tariff, the fuel surcharge has also to be levied at three times the units assessed.

9. It may be stated at the very outset that a detailed show cause notice dated 13.10.1999 mentioning all the relevant facts was served upon the petitioner to which the petitioner gave a reply on 20.10.1999. The order of the chief engineer mentions that the petitioner was afforded an opportunity of personal hearing and its counsel appeared before him and argued the matter on 25.10.1999 and 26.10.99. The chief engineer has recorded a clear finding that the seal on CT/PT terminal box was found to be tampered with. A seal bearing No. 045660P had been put on the CT/PT terminal box on 14.5.1999 and the authority fixing the seal had put his signatures thereon. At the time of the inspection on 27.8.1999, the seal was found to be tampered with, which was seized by the inspecting team. The seal did not contain the signature of the authority who had put the seal. The record shows that the inspection had been done by a high level team consisting of as many as 8 responsible officers, some of whom had come from the headquarters of the electricity board at Patna. An executive magistrate was also a member of the team. The manager of the petitioner himself lodged a report on 28.8.1999 with the deputy superintendent of police, Danapur (Patna), alleging that 8 officers of the Bihar State Electricity Board with armed force visited and tested the installation and the members of the team with the help of screw and plier themselves tampered with the cover of the LT terminal box of CT/PT and the plastic seal was removed and brought down by one of the executive engineers. However, in reply to the show cause notice filed by the petitioner, tampering of the seal was denied and it was pleaded that the matter was being investigated by the investigating officer of the criminal case registered against the petitioner and his report shall be considered by the court at the appropriate time. The chief engineer after considering the entire material and taking into consideration the fact that there were large number of officers of the board at the time of the inspection, has recorded a finding that the seal had been tampered with. It is an admitted position that in the factory of the petitioner there were two furnaces, each of 6 MT and thus the total capacity was 12 MT. The manufacturer of the induction furnaces namely, Megatherm Electronic Pvt. Ltd. had given in writing that the load of 6 MT induction furnace was 2500 KV which is equivalent to 3000 KVA and, therefore, the actual load of the furnaces installed at the petitioners factory, after taking into consideration the auxiliary load, came to 7200 KVA. The Induction Furnaces Association of Bihar of which the petitioner is also a member, had agreed and proposed that the load of an induction furnace could be taken to be 600 KVA per MT. On consideration of these factors the chief engineer came to a conclusion that the actual load of the petitioners factory was 7200 KVA. The other material which has been considered by the chief engineer is that on an average the power was consumed for 21.25 hours per day as the factory was running in two shifts with 40 workers in each shift and, therefore, the number of units being actually consumed were much higher than that recorded in the meter. On the basis of these findings, the assessment has been made of the compensatory amount under clause 16.9 of the tariff.

10. The contention that the dispute regarding tampering of the seal of CT/PT terminal unit should have been referred to the electrical inspector, has hardly any merit. In Madhya Pradesh Electricity Board & Ors. v. Basantibai1, it has been held that a dispute regarding the commission of fraud in tampering with the meter and breaking the body seal is one outside the ambit of section 26(6) of the Indian Electricity Act and the electrical inspector has no jurisdiction to decide such cases of fraud. It was further held that under section 26(6), the only dispute which can be decided by the electrical inspector is as to whether the meter is correct and is accurately recording the reading or there is some fault in the same. Since in the present case it has been found that the seal on the CT/PT terminal box had been tampered with and the natural working of the meter had been affected by taking recourse to external devices, a dispute of this kind cannot be referred to an electrical inspector.

11. The next contention raised is that the period of 180 days for which theft of electricity has been assessed is absolutely wrong and has no rational basis. The electricity board has proceeded on the footing that Clause 16.9 of the Tariff framed by the Bihar State Electricity Board with the approval of the State government is applicable. Clause 16.9 of the Tariff reads as under :

16.9 (A) Detection of unauthorised load:- If at any time the consumer is found exceeding the contracted load without specific permission of the board, the board may without prejudice to its other rights under the agreement or under the provisions of the Electricity Act, estimate the value of the electrical energy, so extracted, consumed or used shall be calculated as below and may also disconnect the supply without notice :-

I. Necessary assessment for compensation in the following malpractice and theft of energy cases shall be made as below:-

(a) ................
(b) In case of using energy by creating obstruction in running of meters or interfering with the system of supply or wires etc.
(c) ....................

Unit assessed - L x F x H x D

Where L = .....................
H = .....................

D = is the no. of days for which the pilferage took place which can be established from production of satisfactory evidence by the consumer. In case there is no possible evidence to establish the period, this factor be taken equivalent to 180 or the no. of days elapsed from the date of connection/installation of meter till the date of detection of the pilferage whichever is less.

F=................................

II. ..................

III Method of charging the assessed units as indicated in para I & II above.
(a) The consumption so assessed shall be charged at thrice the rate per unit of the tariff applicable to the consumer excluding the consumption recorded by the meter and the latter shall be charged at the appropriate tariff rates. The amount billed at this (thrice the tariff rate) shall not be taken into consideration for the purpose of computing consumers liability to pay monthly/minimum guarantee.

(b) ................

IV When connected load is more than the sanctioned load in case of all categories LT connection except domestic service.

Assessment charge:- Rs. C x M (LD-LS)x3
Where, M=Minimum consumption guarantee charge pet BHP per month as applicable in the tariff schedule.

LD - is the load detected in BHP at the time of inspection.

LS = is the load sanctioned to the consumer in BHP

C= This factor be taken equivalent to six months or no. of months or part thereof elapsed from the date of connection/installation whichever is less.

12. The relevant part of the tariff quoted above shows that in the cases of theft of electricity or dishonest abstraction of electrical energy the assessment for compensation has to be done on the basis of a formula wherein D stands for number of days for which the pilferage took place and where there is no possible evidence to establish the period, this factor can be taken to be equivalent to 180 days. Similarly, in case where connected load is more than the sanctioned load, the assessment charge has to be done on the basis of a formula where C stands for six months or the number of months or part thereof elapsed from the date of connection/installation, whichever is less. Therefore under the tariff in both the cases the period can be taken as 180 days or six months. It is on the basis of this formula that the assessment for consumption of units has been done for 180 days. In Hyderabad Vanaspathi Ltd. v. A.P. State Electricity Board & Ors.1, it has been held that the terms of conditions for supply of electricity to consumers notified by the board in exercise of power under section 49 of Electricity (Supply) Act, 1948 and made applicable to all consumers availing supply of electricity, are statutory in character. This being the legal position, the electricity board in our opinion rightly applied Clause 16.9 of the Tariff and there is no infirmity in the assessment made and the bill prepared in pursuance thereof.

13. Shri Gopal Subramanium has also submitted that after the inspection had been done on 27.8.1999, an FIR had been lodged against the petitioner on the same day by Shri Om Prakash, Assistant Executive Engineer at the police station and a criminal case was registered under section 39/44 of Indian Electricity Act. This case was investigated and thereafter a final repot was submitted, which was accepted by the concerned magistrate and as a result of this order, the petitioner stands exonerated from the charge of theft of electricity and no compensatory bill could be issued by taking recourse to Clause 16.9 of the tariff. Shri V.R. Reddy, learned senior counsel for the electricity board has submitted that before accepting the final report, the learned magistrate had issued notice to Shri Om Prakash, assistant executive engineer, but the said notice was not served upon him as he was transferred from Patna on account of his allocation to Jharkhand State and as such no representation could be made on behalf of the electricity board against the final report. Subsequently, an application has been moved on behalf of the electricity board before the concerned magistrate for recall of the order by which final report was accepted. In our opinion, the mere acceptance of final report by the magistrate cannot amount to a finding by the criminal court that theft of electricity was not committed. The accused was not even summoned, no charge was framed nor any evidence was recorded. In such a situation, it cannot be held that the criminal court has recorded any finding to the effect that the petitioner has not committed theft of electricity. That apart, the purpose of a trial under section 39/44 of the Indian Electricity Act is entirely different and the object is to punish and sentence the person who is alleged to have committed the offence. The trial of an accused in a criminal case can have no bearing in the matter of assessment made in accordance with the tariff of the value of electricity dishonestly abstracted or consumed. Therefore, the contention raised on the basis of alleged acceptance of the final report in the criminal case has absolutely no merit.

14. It is to be noted that in pursuance of the order passed on 27.9.1999 by the High Court in CWJC no 8939 of 1999, the chief engineer decided the matter holding that the petitioner had exceeded the contracted load and had also committed theft of electricity and consequently assessment of compensatory amount had to be done in accordance with clause 16.9 of the tariff. In terms of the order of the chief engineer the bill dated 29.10.1999 was prepared which was challenged by the petitioner by filing the writ petition before the High Court under Article 226 of the Constitution. The High Court was not hearing an appeal against the decision of the chief engineer. The scope of inquiry in such a matter is a limited one. We would like to quote here what was said by Venkatachaliah, J. in State of U.P. & Ors. v. Maharaja Dharmander Prasad Singh1, which reads as under :

However, Judicial review under Article 226 cannot be converted into appeal. Judicial review is directed, not against the decision, but is confined to the examination of the decision making process. In Chief Constable of the North Wales Police v. Evans, (1982) 1 W.L.R. 1155 refers to the merits-legality distinction in judicial review. Lord Hailsham said:

The purpose of judicial review is to ensure that the individual receives fair treatment, and not to ensure that the authority, after according fair treatment, reaches on a matter which it is authorised by law to decide for itself a conclusion which is correct in the eyes of the Court.

Lord Brightman observed:

 ..........Judicial review, as the words imply, is not an appeal from a decision, but a review of the manner in which the decision was made.....

And held that it would be an error to think:

..........that the Court sits in judgment not only on the correctness of the decision making process but also on the correctness of the decision itself.

When the issue raised in judicial review is whether a decision is vitiated by taking into account irrelevant, or neglecting to take into account of relevant factors or is so manifestly unreasonable that no reasonable authority entrusted with the power in question could reasonably have made such a decision, the judicial review of the decision-making process includes examination, as a matter of law, of the relevance of the factors............

15. In Apparel Export Promotion Council v. A.K. Chopra1, Chief Justice Anand held as under :

Judicial Review, not being an appeal from a decision, but a review of the manner in which the decision was arrived at, the court while exercising the power of judicial review must remain conscious of the fact that if the decision has been arrived at by the administrative authority after following the principles established by law and the rules of natural justice and the individual has received a fair treatment to meet the case against him, the court cannot substitute its judgment for that of the administrative authority on a matter which fell squarely within the sphere of jurisdiction of that authority.

16. There is not dispute that the chief engineer issued notice to the petitioner mentioning all the relevant facts to which the petitioner gave a reply. The petitioner was also afforded an opportunity of hearing and it appeared through a counsel, who made submissions on two days and thereafter the chief engineer passed the order. As discussed earlier, the chief engineer has taken into consideration relevant factors and the findings recorded by him are clearly borne out from the material available before him. It cannot be said that the order passed by him is unreasonable or perverse in any manner. The High Court therefore rightly took the view that the order passed by the chief engineer that the compensatory bill is to be prepared in accordance with Clause 16.9 of the tariff could not be interfered with in a writ petition under Article 226 of the Constitution.

17. The Bihar State Electricity Board feels aggrieved by that part of the judgment and order of the Division Bench of the High Court by which it has been held that the surcharge cannot be levied at thrice the rate per unit and has accordingly filed civil appeal no. 8395 of 2002. Shri V.R. Reddy, learned senior counsel for the electricity board has submitted that the cost of a unit of electricity is not fixed and on the contrary it is dependent upon the fuel surcharge. The formula for calculating the fuel surcharge is a long and complicated one and is given in Clause 16.10.3 of the tariff. A host of factors have to be taken into consideration in calculating the fuel surcharge and they depend upon many variables. Shri Reddy has submitted that since the surcharge has necessarily to be taken into consideration and has to be added in the cost of electricity and, therefore, in accordance with part (III) of clause 16.9 of the tariff, it should also be assessed at three times the rate per unit. We are unable to accept the contention raised. Clauses 16.9 and 16.10.3 are separate and distinct clauses in the tariff. Clause 16.9 lays down the formula for calculating the value of the electrical energy abstracted or consumed by a consumer by exceeding the contracted load or by creating obstruction in running of meter. Part (III) of this Clause deals with method of charging the assessed units and sub-para (a) thereof lays down that the consumption so assessed shall be charged at thrice the rate per unit of the tariff applicable to the consumer excluding the consumption recorded by the meter and the latter shall be charged at the appropriate tariff rates. Clause 16.10.3 is a separate clause which deals with fuel surcharge and it nowhere lays down that this additional surcharge will also be levied at thrice the rate per unit of the tariff. The two clauses namely 16.9 and 16.10.3 have to be read separately and there being no specific provision for assessing the fuel surcharge at thrice the rate per unit, it is not possible to hold that in such a case the fuel surcharge should also be charged at thrice the rate per unit.

18. We are, therefore, of the opinion that the view taken by the High Court is perfectly correct and called for no interference. In the result, both the appeals lack merit and are hereby dismissed. No costs.

**********, 0 , 
HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAW
Criminal Procedure Code, 1898:
Sections  236, 237 and 403(1) - The Customs Act,  1968;  Sections 111 and 135 - Gold (Control) Act, 1968; Section 85 - Whether  the acquittal  for the offences under the Customs Act operates  as  a bar to the prosecution of the same person in connection with  the charge  of  having  committed  the  offence  under  the  Gold (C2ontrol)Act?  -Tests  to  be applied - Ingredients  of  the  two offences are different in scope and content-What is necessary  is to  analyze  the  ingredients of the two  offences  and  not  the allegations  made in the two complaints - Framing of  alternative charge  - Held that if the ingredients of both the  offences  are satisfied the same act of possession of the gold would constitute an  offence  both under the Customs Act as also  under  the  Gold (Control)  Act  0 there is therefore no question  of  framing  an alternative  charge  - Judgment of the High  Court  holding  that subsequent trial was barred set aside.
Appeal allowed.

Held - 
(i)  In order to successfully establish their plea of  bar  under Section 403 (1) the concerned respondents will therefore have  to establish  that......(1)  there  must have been  adoubt  as  to whether  the  offence under the Customs Actcould be  proved  or whether the offence under the Gold(Control)Act would be  proved and  (2) that in the context of this doubt an alternative  charge could  have  been  framed  under Section  236.  Now,  on  a  true interpretation  of Section 236 it would appear that  the  Section WOULD BE ATTRACTED where the offence would fall either under  one or  the other of the two alternative charges. It  WOULD  NOT  BE ATTRACTED  if an offence could all under both of the  alternative charges.  What  is contemplated by Section 236 if framing  of  an alternative  charge  where on the facts of the  case  an  offence would fall under one of the two alternative charges, but the  act would  not  constitute an offence under both  the  charges.  This point is made clear by the illustrations to Section 236. Para5

(ii) IIIustration (a) refers to framing of an alternative  charge in  respect of theft or receiving of stolen property or  criminal breach of trust or cheating. It will be seen that a person cannot be  said to have committed the offence both of theft as  also  of receiving of stolen property. A person who himself commits  the theft,  cannot  be  guilty of the  charge  of  receiving  stolen property  whereas a person who may have nothing to do  with  the commission  of theft, but who may be found in possession  of  the stolen  property,  would be guilty of the offence  of  receiving stolen property. Now the prosecution cannot foresee whether  the person  from  whose possession the stolen article was  found  was himself the thief or was merely a person who had received  stolen property from the thief. A person cannot be found guilty of  both theft  as  also for receiving stolen property. And it  is  in such a case that an alternative charge under Section 236 could be framed.  In the present case the concerned respondents  could  be found  guilty  of  both  the  offences  in  the  context  of  the possession  of  gold.  If it was established  that  there  was  a prohibition  against the import of gold and that he was found  in possession  of  gold which he knew or had reason to  believe  was liable  to  confiscation he would be guilty of that  offence.  He would  also be guilty of an offence under the Gold (Control)  Act provided  the gold is of a purity of atleast 9 carats.  He  would have  violated the provisions of both the Customs Act  and  the Gold (Control) Act if the aforesaid ingredients were established. It  is not as if in case he was found guilty of an offence  under the  Customs Act, he could not have been found guilty  under  the Gold (Control) Act or vice versa. Upon being found guilty of both the  offences the Court may perhaps impose a concurrent  sentence in respect of both the offences but the Court has also the  power to  direct  that the sentence shall run consecutively.  There  is therefore  no question of framing of an alternative  charge  one, under  the Customs Act, and the other, under the  Gold  (Control) Act.  If the ingredients of both the offences are  satisfied  the same  act of possession of the gold would constitute  an  offence both under the Customs Act as also under the Gold (Control)  Act. Such  being the position it cannot be said that they  could  have been  tried  on the same facts for an alternative charge  in  the context  of  Section  236  Cr. P.C. at the  time  of  the  former proceedings. The submission urged in the context of Section  403 (1)  cannot  therefore succeed for it cannot be said that  the persons who are sought to be tried in the subsequent proceedings could have been tried on the same facts at the former trial under section 236. Para 6

CASES REFERRED
1. Maqbool Hussain v The State of Bombay and Ors. etc. etc., 1953 S.C.R. Vol. IV p. 730

2. State of Bombay v S.L.Apte and Another, 1961 (3) SCR p.107

THAKKAR, J.

1.  Does  the  acquittal  of  an  accused  charged  with  having committed  an  offence  punishable under Section  111  read  with Section  135  of the Customs Act 1969 create a legal bar  to  the said  accused subsequently being prosecuted under Section  85  of the Gold (Control) Act, 1968. The High Court having answered this question (in the affirmative) against the prosecution and  having directed  the  dropping  of the  subsequent  proceedings  on  the premise that the acquittal in the former proceedings operated  as a  legal  bar  to the prosecution of the accused  in  the  latter proceedings  operated  as a legal bar to the prosecution  of  the accused in the latter proceedings, the State has approached  this Court by way of the present appeal.

2.  Respondents  1 to 3 came to be prosecuted as a result  of  a raid at their house in which primary gold valued at Rs.  84,770/- at  the material time was found along with some  other  articles. They were prosecuted for an offence punishable under section  111 read  with  Section 135 of the Customs Act, 1969.  In  that  case present respondent No.3 was convicted whereas present  respondent Nos.  1  and 2 were acquitted. The same  alleged  offenders  were later  on  sought to be prosecuted under Section 85 of  the  Gold (Control) Act, 1968 relying on the find of primary gold from  the very  same premises at the time and on the occasion of  the  very same  raid which gave rise to the prosecution under  the  Customs Act  which had culminated in the conviction of respondent  No.  3 and  the  acquittal  of respondents 1 and  2.  A  contention  was thereupon  raised  on behalf of respondents 1 to 3 that  the  new trial  was  barred. The Chief Judicial Magistrate  accepted  this plea  and  ordered that the prosecution be dropped.  The  learned Sessions Judge confirmed the said order. The appellant challenged the order passed by the learned trial Magistrate as confirmed  by the  learned Sessions Judge by way of a Revision  Application  to the  High  Court , the High Court affirmed the  decision  of  the Courts below holding that the present trial was barred by  virtue of  Section 403 (1) of the Code of Criminal  Procedure,1898  (Cr. P.C.). Hence this appeal. In order to determine this question  it is  necessary to identify the ingredients which will have  to  be established by the prosecution in order to bring home the  guilty under  the  different  provisions.  These  ingredients  may  be catalogued as under:

Ingredients of the charge for the  Ingredients of the charge for 
offence under Section 111 read with  the offence under Sec. 85  of  Sec.  135 of the Customs Act, 1969  the Gold (Control)Act,  1968 
in respect of which the respondents  for which the  respondents are
were acquitted.  sought to be prosecuted.


i) Interalia being in possession  The offender owns or  has  of or being concerned in keeping  in his possession,custody,  
or  concealing of goods which the  or control  any  primary 
offender knows or has reason to  gold of not less than 9 
believe  are  liable  to confiscation  carats  in  purity  in  under  Section  111.  unfinished  or  semi-  finished  form  or  in   blocks, bars etc.

ii) The goods in question, gold, was  
imported within the Indian Customs
waters contrary to a prohibition
contained under the Customs Act.

iii) There was a prohibition in 
respect of the import of gold at 
the material time as contemplated
by Sec. 111 - D of the Customs Act.

3.  It is therefore evident that the ingredients required to  be established  in respect of the offence under the Customs Act  are altogether different from the ones required to be established for an  offence  under  the Gold (Control) Act.  In  respect  of  the former,  the  prosecution  has  to establish  that  there  was  a prohibition  against the import into Indian sea waters  of  goods which were found to be in the possession of the offender. On  the other  hand  in respect of the offence under the  Gold  (Control) Act,  it is required to be established that the offender  was  in possession  of primary gold meaning thereby gold of a  purity  of not  less than 9 carats in any unfinished or semi-finished  form. In regard to the latter offence it is not necessary to  establish that  there  is any prohibition against the import of  gold  into Indian  sea  waters. Mere possession of gold of purity  not  less than 9 carats in any unfinished or semi-finished form would be an offence  under the Gold Control Act. It is therefore stating  the obvious  to  say  that the ingredients of the  two  offences  are altogether  different.  Such being the case the  question  arises whether  the  acquittal for the offences under  the  Customs  Act which requires the prosecution to establish altogether  different ingredients operates as bar to the prosecution of the same person in  connection with  the charge of having committed  the  offence under the Gold (Control) Act.

4.  Reliance has been placed on Section 403 (1) of the  Code  of Criminal  Procedure, 1898 (Cr. P.C.) in support of the plea  that the  prosecution under the Gold (Control) Act would be barred  on the basis of the undermentioned facts :-

i) that the respondents had been tried by a competent Court for  the  offence of being in possession of gold under  the  Customs  Act and had been acquitted.

ii)  they are sought to be prosecuted on the same facts for  an  offence under the Gold (Control) Act.

It  is  not  in  dispute that  the  respondents  were  tried  and acquitted  for  the offence under the Customs Act  in  connection with  the possession of a quantity of gold. Their trial would  be barred  by  Section  403  (1) provided  they  are  sought  to  be prosecuted on same facts for any offence for which a  different charge from the one made against them might have been made  under Section  236 and for which they might have been convicted  under Section 237.

5.  In order to successfully establish their plea of  bar  under Section  403(1) the concerned respondents will therefore have  to establish that:-

i)  It  was doubtful as to which of the several  offences  the  facts which could be proved by the prosecution would consitute.

ii)  And they could have been charged in the  alternative  with  having committed one or other of the said offences.

In other words what they would be required to establish would  be that (1) there must have been a doubtas to whether the  offence under  the Customs Act could be proved or whether  the  offence under  the Gold (Control) Act would be proved and (2)  that  in the  context of this doubt an alternative charge could have  been framed  under  Section  236. Now, on  a  true  interpretation  of Section  236 it would appear that the Section WOULD BE  ATTRACTED where the offence would fall either under one or the other of the two alternative charges. It WOULD NOT BE ATTRACTED  if an offence could  fall  under  both  of the  alternative  charges.  What  is contemplated  by Section 236 if framing of an alternative  charge where on the facts of the case an offence would fall under one of the two alternative charges, but the act would not constitute  an offence  under both the charges. This point is made clear by  the illustrations to Section 236 viz:

(a)  A  is accused of an act which may amount  to  theft,  or  receiving  stolen  property,  or criminal breach  of  trust  of  cheating.  He  may  be charged  with  theft,  receiving  stolen  property,  criminal breach of trust and cheating or he  may  be  charged  with  having  committed  theft,  or  receiving  stolen  property, or criminal breach of trust or cheating.

(b)  A states on oath before the Magistrate that he saw B hit C  with a club. Before the Sessions Court A states on oath that  B  never hit C. A may be charged in the alternative and  convicted  of  intentionally giving false evidence, although it cannot  be  proved which of these contradictory statements was false.

6.  Illustration (a) refers to framing of an alternative  charge in  respect of theft or receiving of stolen property or  criminal breach of trust or cheating. It will be seen that a person cannot be  said to have committed the offence both of theft as  also  of receiving of stolen property. A person who himself commits  the theft,  cannot  be  guilty of the  charge  of  receiving  stolen property  whereas a person who may have nothing to do  with  the commission  of theft, but who may be found in possession  of  the stolen  property,  would be guilty of the offence  of  receiving stolen property. Now the prosecution cannot foresee whether  the person  from  whose possession the stolen article was  found  was himself the thief or was merely a person who had received  stolen property from the thief. A person cannot be found guilty of  both theft  as  also for receiving stolen property. And it  is  in such a case that an alternative charge under Section 236 could be framed.  In the present case the concerned respondents  could  be found  guilty  of  both  the  offences  in  the  context  of  the possession  of  gold.  If it was established  that  there  was  a prohibition  against the import of gold and that he was found  in possession  of  gold which he knew of had reason to  believe  was liable  to  confiscation he would be guilty of that  offence.  He would  also be guilty of an offence under the  Gold  (Control)Act provided  the gold is of a purity of atleast 9 carats.  He  would have  violated the provisions of both the Customs Act  and  the Gold (Control) Act if the aforesaid ingredients were established. It  is not as if in case he was found guilty of an offence  under the  Customs Act, he could not have been found guilty  under  the Gold (Control)Act or vice versa. Upon being found guilty of  both the  offences the Court may perhaps impose a concurrent  sentence in respect of both the offences but the Court has also the  power to  direct  that the sentence shall run consecutively.  There  is therefore  no question of framing of an alternative  charge  one, under  the Customs Act, and the other, under the  Gold  (Control) Act.  If the ingredients or both the offences are  satisfied  the same  act of possession of the gold would constitute  an  offence both  under  the Gold (Control) Act. Such being the  position  it cannot be said that they could have been tried on the same  facts for an alternative charge in the context of Section 236 Cr.  P.C. at the time of the former proceedings.The submission urged in the context of Section 403 (1) cannot therefore succeed for it cannot be  said  that  the persons who are sought to  be  tried  in  the subsequent proceedings could have been tried on the same facts at the former trial under section 236.

7.  Strong reliance has been placed on behalf of the  respondents on  MAQBOOL  HUSSAIN VS. THE STATE OF BOMBAY & ORS.  ETC.  ETC.in support of the submission that the second prosecution is  barred. In  Maqbools case the central issue in the context of  the  fact that a person who had arrived at an Indian Airport from abroad on being  searched was found in possession of gold in  contravention of  the  relevant notification, prohibiting the import  of  gold. Action  was taken against him by the Customs authorities and  the gold  seized  from  his possession was confiscated.  Later  on  a prosecution  was  launched against him in the  criminal  court  a Bombay  charging  him  with having committed  the  offence  under Section 8 of the Foreign Exchange Regulation Act (Act 7 of  1947) read  with the relevant notification. In the background of  these facts  the  plea  of  autrefois  acquit  was  raised  seeking protection under Article 20(2) of the Constitution of India. This Court  came  to the conclusion that the  proceedings  before  the Customs  authority  did not constitute the prosecution  of  the appellant. The Court also took the view that the penalty  imposed on  him  did  not  constitute  a  punishment  by  the  judicial tribunal.  The ratio of the decision is altogether different  and has  no  application  in  so  far  as  the  plea  raised  by  the respondents is concerned. However, reliance is placed on  certain observations made in the course of the discussion, at p. 737.

To quote:

The test is whether the former offence and the offence now  charged have the same ingredients in the sense that the facts  constituting the one are sufficient to justify a conviction of  the other, not that the facts relied on by the Crown are the  same in the two trials. A plea of autrefois acquit is not  proved unless it is shown that the verdict of acquittal of the  previous charge necessarily involves an acquittal the latter.  (Vide Halsburys Laws of England, Hailsham Edition, Vol.9 pages  152 and 153, paragraph 212).
(Emphasis added)


We have already applied the very test indicated in this passage. But we have reached the conclusion that in the present case this test does not support the respondentssubmission in as much as the ingredients of the two offences are different in scope and content. The facts constituting the offence under Customs Act are different and are not sufficient to justify the conviction under the Gold Control Act. It must also be realized that what is necessary is to analyze the ingredients of the two offences and not the allegations made in the two complaints as declared by this Court in STATE OF BOMBAY VS. S.L. APTE & ANOTHER.

8.  We have also concluded that a separate charge could have been framed in respect of the distinct offence under Gold Control  Act Under  the  circumstances the plea raised by the  difence  cannot succeed.  The two conclusions reached by us squarely  brings  the matter squarely within the parameters of the law settled by  this Court  decades ago in S.L. Aptes case (Supra). In that case  the element  of  dishonestywas  required to  be  established  under section  409 of Indian Penal Code whereas it was not required  to be established under Section 105 of the Indian Insurance Act.  In this backdrop this Court has enunciated the law in the context of the  plea based on Article 20(2) of the Constitution, Section  26 of  the  General Clauses Act and section 403(2) of  the  Criminal Procedure Code in no uncertain terms:-

If, therefore, the offences were distinct there is no question  of the rule as to double-jeopardy as embodied in Art. 20(2) of  the Constitution, being applicable.

The next point to be considered is as regards the scope of s.26  of  the General Clauses Act. Though ss.26 in its opening  words  refers  to the act or omission constituting an  offence  under  two  or  more  enactments, the emphasis is not  on  the  facts  alleged  in the ingredients which constitute the  two  offences  with  which  a  person is charged. This is made  clear  by  the  concluding portion of the section which refers to shall not be  liable  to  be  punished twice for the  same  offece.  If  the  offences are not the same but are distinct, the ban imposed  by  this  provision  also cannot be invoked. It  therefore  follows  that  in  the  present case as the respondents  are  not  being  sought to be punished for the same offence twice but for  two  distinct  offences  constituted  or  made  up  of  different  ingredients the bar of the provision is inapplicable.

In passing, it may be pointed out that the construction we have  placed  on  Art.  20(2) of the Constitution  and  s.26  of  the  General  Clauses  Act is precisely in line with  the  terms  of  s.403 (2) of the Criminal Procedure Code which runs:

403(2)  A person acquitted or convicted of any offence  may  be  afterwards tried for any distinct offence for which a  separate  charge  might  have been made against him on the  former  trial  under section 235, sub-section (1).

There is no manner of doubt that section 403(1) does not come  to rescue  of the respondents 1 to 3 whereas section 403(2)  of  the Code clearly concludes the matter against them.

9.  The  High  Court  was therefore in  error  in  holding  that subsequent  trial was barred. We accept the appeal on this  point and reverse the decision of the Courts below and the High  Court. The  appellant  was  understandably seriously  aggrieved  by  the crroneous enunciation of law by the High Court as it would  cause prejudice  in  other matters involving the same point  which  may have been pending or might arise in future. With the position  of law being now setted in the appellants favour the main objective of  the appellant is achieved. Learned counsel for the  appellant indicated  at the very commencement that the main purpose of  the appeal was to have the true position in law setted. That 20 years have elapsed since the date of the seizure (November 15,1968) is, in  our  opinion, no ground for not proceeding further  with  the matter inasmuch as the offence in question is a serious  economic offence,  which undermines the entire economy of the Nation.  The delay  occasioned  in the working of the judicial system  by  the ever-increasing  workload cannot provide an alibi  for  upholding such  a plea. However in the present case the sessions Court  has quashed  the proceedings not only on this ground but also on  the basis of certain factual findings as well and the learned Counsel for  the  appellant himself found it difficult  to  assail  these findings at this juncture. The operative order passed by the High Court  cannot  therefore be disturbed in view of  the  facts  and circumstances  peculiar to this particular case.  We  accordingly allow  the appeal to this extent and reverse the findings of  the Lower Court and High Court on the question of maintainability  of the subsequent prosecution but find ourselves unable to pass  any further orders under the circumstances.

**********, 0 , 
CROSS CITATION
1972 SCC (3) 885
1973 SCR (1) 880

CRIMINAL APPELLATE JURISDICTION : Cr.A. No. 212 of 1968. Appeals by special leave from the judgment and order dated January 19, 1968 ofthe Rajasthan High Court inCrl. Revision No. 383 of 1967.

S. P. Singh and Shiv Pujan Singh for the appellant. Debabroto Mookerjee, P. C. Kapur and K. B. Mehta for the respondent.

The Judgment of the Court was delivered by

Khanna, J. Ayodhya Singh appellant and Hira Singhwere convicted by Additional Munsiff MagistrateJaipur for offences under section 457 and 380 read with section 75 IndianPenal Code. Ayodhya Singh was sentenced to undergo rigorous imprisonment for a period of two years and to pay a fine of rupees two thousand for the offence under section 457 read with section 75 Indian Penal Code. In default of payment of fine, Ayodhya Singh was sentenced to undergo rigorous imprisonment for a further period ofsix months. Similar sentence wasawarded to Ayodhya Singh for the offence under section 380 read with section 75 Indian Penal Code. The two sentences were ordered to run consecutively. Hira Singh was sentenced to undergo rigorousimprisonment for a period of two years and to pay a fine of rupees one thousand, or in default, to undergo rigorousimprisonment for afurther period of six months for the offence under section 457 read with section 75 Indian Penal Code. Similar sentence was awarded to Hira Singh for the offence under section 380 read with section 75 Indian Penal Code. The two sentences of Hira Singh were also ordered to run consecutively. Appeals filed by Ayodhya Singh andHira Singh were dismissed by Additional Sessions Judge Jaipur. Revision petitions filed by Ayodhya Singh and 7--L173Sup.C.I./73 882 Hira Singh in Rajasthan High Court met with no better fate. Ayodhya Singh thereafter filed this appeal by special leave through jail.

The prosecution case is that Kistoor Chand (PW 73) deals in gold and silver. He was running a shop inJohri bazar Jaipur, but sometime before the occurrence he had to vacate the shop and remove the gold and silver ornaments worth over a lakh of rupees to his house situated in Manni Ramji-kaRasta in Jaipur City.The house has four storeyes and the ornaments were put in a room on the third storey of the house. Cash amount was also kept by Kistoor Chand inthat room. When Kistoor Chand got up on the morning of February 9, 1964 he found that the big window of the room in which ornaments had been kept was lying open. On opening the room it was found that the boxes containing ornaments were lying empty. A number of articles were seen scattered in the room.Reportabout the occurrence was lodged at police station Manak Chowk Jaipur City by Mahindra Kumar (PW74), son of Kistoor Chand at 7-30 a.m. on February 9, 1964. A case was then registered by the police under sections 457 and 380 Indian Penal Code.

Sub Inspector Basarat Vallabh went soon after the registration of the case to Kistoor Chands house and found that culpritshad effected their entry into the room by breaking open the window. The Sub Inspector saw a number of articles scattered in the room. The containers for keeping gold and silver ornaments were lying empty. A police photographer was sent for. The photographer developed the fingerprints left by the culprits on a silver plate lying in an almirah of the room. The photographs of the finger impressions were compared with the specimen finger impressions of Hira Singh accused and it was found that they tallied with each other.

Hira Singh accused was arrested on February 21, 1964. In pursuance of disclosure statement of Hira Singh Rs. 1,790 were recovered from Saraswati Bai, wife of the brother of Hira Singh. A box was also recovered in pursuance of the disclosure statement of Hira Singh and a number of stolen articles werefound in that box. Hira Singh also got recovered an instrument of house breaking. As a result of the interrogation of Hira Singh, the police raided the house of Ayodhya Singh appellant at Jairi on February 21, 1964 and recovered from that place 18 stolen articles. Ayodhya Singh was arrested by the police on February 25, 1964 at Etawah and from his personal search 26 items of stolen property were recovered. The recovered property included cash amount of Rs. 6,485/- including 28 currency notes ofthe denominationof Rs. 100/-. In pursuance of information supplied by 883 Ayodhya Singh, the police recovered on March 3, 1964 a numberof stolen gold articles wrapped in anold baniyan which had been buried in a graveyard near milestone No. 5 on the Agra-Etawah-Kanpur road. Identifications of recovered ornaments were held by Shri A. C. Bafna Magistrate (PW 72) on July 17, 1964 and July 20, 1964. The recovered ornaments were then identified by Kistoor Chand and Mahendra Kumar PWs as those which belonged to them and which had been stolen. At the trialthe two accused denied the prosecution allocations against them and stated that they hadbeen falsely involved in this case. According to them, the various articles which had been recovered bythe police, belonged to them. Regarding the recovery of some goldbars from him, the appellant stated that he got the bars prepared for the purpose of purchasing bonds. Thetrial court accepted the prosecution case and convicted and sentenced the accused as, above.The recovered articles were ordered to be restored to Mahendra Kumar complainant.Appeals and revision petitions filed by the accused, as stated earlier, were dismissed.

We have heard Mr. Singh who has argued thecase amicus curiaeon behalf of the appellant and are ofthe opinion that there is no merit in the appeal.The fact thatsome persons had broken into the house of Kistoor Chand on the night betweenFebruary 8 :and February 9, 1964 and had removed valuable articles consisting of cash, jewellery and silverware is proved by the testimony of Kistoor Chand and Mahindra Kumar. The prosecution has also ledevidence to show that a number of stolen articles were recovered in pursuance of the disclosure statement of Hira Singh accused after he was, arrested on February 21, 1964. The interrogation of Hira Singh led to the police raid on the house of Ayodhya Singh appellant wherefrom a number of stolen articles wererecovered. Ayodhya Singh wasarrested on February 25, 1964 and some of the stolen articleswere recovered from his person. Ayodhya Singh thereaftermade disclosure statement ,,which led to the recovery ofmore stolenarticles from a graveyard ,on March 3, 1964. The appellate court and the High Court accepted the evidence adduced by the prosecution in this respect. The version of the accused that the recovered articles belonged tothem was rejected. The courts below in this content reliedupon the identification of the recovered articles by Kistoor Chand and Mahindra Kumar. Nothing has been brought to our noticeby Mr. Singh as may justify interference with the appraisement of the evidence of the trial magistrate, the Additional Sessions Judge and theHigh Court. One significant circumstance which shows the falsity of the claim made by the appellant that the recovered articles belonged to him is the fact that some of those articles were recovered from a graveyard near milestone No. 5 at AgraEtawahKanpur road. The articles were found to havebeen buried there 884 and were recovered in pursuance of the disclosure statement of the appellant. If the aforesaid recovered articles consisting ofgold bars belonged to the appellant, it is difficult to believe that he would have buried them in a lonelyspot in a graveyard. The fact that, the appellant buriedthem in a graveyard shows hisanxiety to conceal those articles so that no one may know that he was in possession of those articles.

Mr. Singh has assailed the propriety of the identification of the recovered articles. In this respect we find that the evidence of Shri A. C. Bafna Magistrate (PW 72) showsthat the recoveredarticles weremixed with other similar articles and all necessary precautions were taken. Kistoor Chand and Mahindra Kumar correctly identified the recovered articles. Nothing cogent has been shown to us as to why the statement of Shri Bafna in this respect be not accepted. Mr. Singh has referred to the observations of the High Court that the judgments of thetrial magistrate and the Additional Sessions Judge were not very satisfactory.This circumstance, in our opinion, is not very material because the High Court considered the evidence which hadbeen adduced in the caseat some length and came to the conclusion that the case against the accused hadbeen proved. In view of the fact that the evidence on record has been discussed in detail by the High Court, it cannot be said that the appellant has been prejudiced because of the fact that the judgments of the trialmagistrate and the appellate court were not as elaborate as theyshouldhave been.

A faint attempt was made by Mr. Singh to show that there had been misjoinder of charges. This submission is plainly without any force because the circumstances of the case show that the accused jointly committed the offences with which they were charged and that those offences were committed in the course of the same transaction. The two accused could consequently be. charged and tried together as such a course is permitted by section 239 of the Codeof Criminal Procedure.

Lastly, it has been argued that the conviction of the appellant should have been under section 411 Indian Penal Code and not under sections 457 and 380 Indian Penal Code. This contention is equally untenable.The house breaking and theft in the house of Kistoor Chand took place on the night between February 8 and February 9, 1964.The various stolen articles were recovered from the appellants house on February 21, 1964 and thereafter from his person on February 25, 1964. The appellant was in police custody after February 25, 1964 and more stolen articles were recovered on March 3, 1964 from the graveyard in pursuance of his disclosure statement. The articles which were recovered on March 3, 1964 can consequently be held to be in the possession of the appellant on February 25, 1694. It would

885 thus follow that within 17 days of the theft the appellant was found in possession of the stolen articles. According to illustration (a) of section 114 of the Indian Evidence Act, a man who is in possession of stolen goods soon after the theft is either the thief or hasreceived the goods knowing them to be stolen, unless he can account for his possession. It would, in our opinion, depend upon the facts and circumstances of each case whether the court should draw the presumption that a person found in possession of stolen goods soon after the theft and who has not been able to account for his possession is the thief or whether he is the receiver of the goods knowing them to be stolen. We may state at this stage that the appellant has not been able to account for his possession of the stolen articles and the explanation furnished by him is not all worthy of credence. Looking to the facts and circumstances of the case, we are of the view that the courts below were justified in drawing the presumption that the appellant was guilty of the offence under section 457 and 380 Indian Penal Code. The factthat the _culprits entered the room on the third floor by opening the window and thereafter broke open a large number of boxes and almirahsand removed huge quantity of gold and silverware shows that it was not the work of a single individual. The fact that the appellant was foundsoon after the theft in possession of a very large number of stolen articles shows that he was himself the thief and not the receiver of stolen goods.The present isnot acase wherein one or two or a very few of the stolen articles were found in the possession of the appellant soon after the theft. On the contrary, the bulk of stolen articleswere recovered from him. The number and the nature of the stolen articles recovered from the appellant soon after the theft coupled with the other circumstances of the case, in our opinion, warrant the presumption that the appellant himself committed thetheft after entering the room on the third storey of Kistoor Chands house through the window. In the result, the appeal, fails and is dismissed. S.C. Appeal

dismissed. 886
**********, 0 , 
CROSS CITATION
1965 SC 585 (5)
1962 SCR Supl. (1) 8

CRIMINAL APPELLATE JURISDICTION: Criminal Appeal No. 31 of 1961.

Appeal by special leave from the judgment and order dated October 7, 1958 of the Andhra Pradesh High Court in Criminal Appeal No. 456 of 1957.

P . Ram Reddy for the appellants.

Ratna Raoand K R. Choudhri, for respondent No 1.

A. Ganganatham Chetty and T.M. Sen. for respondent No.2.

1961. October 5. The Judgment of the Court was delivered by

HIDAYATULLAH, J.-The two appellants who were granted special leave by this Court, appeal against the judgment of the High Court of Andhra Pradesh convicting them, on appeal against acquittal, of an offence under. 380 of the Indian Penal Code and sentencing them to six months rigorous imprisonment and a fine Rs. 500/- each, with further rigorous imprisonment for one month in default of payment of fine.

The prosecution case which had a chequered career in the High Court and the two Courts below, is as follows: In Dusi, which is a partof Bhaskararaopuram, there was a Press knownas Srinivasa Printing Press at Srinivasa Ashram. This Press existed for over 17 years. Pappala Chinna Ramadasu (P.W.4) was admittedly a printer and for some years, the declared keeper of that Press under s. 4 of the Press and Registration of Books Act, 1867. The declarations were made in 1944 (Ex.P.4) and 1947 (Ex.P-5). On November 21, 1955, 10 Pappala ChinnaRamadasu soldthis press by a registered document (Ex.P. 1 ) to one Boddepalli Lakshminarayana forRs 4,000/-,of which Rs.3,500/- were shown to have been paid in advance and the balance was received by Pappala Chinna Ramadasu on January10, 1956, (Ex.P.2). Two applications were then made on December 1, 1955, respectively by Chinna Ramadasu andBoddepalli Lakshminarayana beforethe Collector and District Magistrate for substituting the name of Boddepalli Lakshminarayana in place of that of Pappala Chinna Ramadasu in the declaration. On December 6, 1955, by Ex.P.11 they were informed that they should apply under the Pressand Registration of Books Act (25 of 1867). Subsequently, on January 11, 1956, a declaration under s. 4 of that Act was made by Boddepalli Lakshminarayana and was accepted (Ex.P.3).

The case of the prosecution further is that Boddepalli Lakshminarayana went to Kurnoolon March 20, 1956, and in hisabsence, the two appellants with two others (who wereprosecuted but acquitted)removed the Printing Press on the night of March 25, 1956 to Korlakota where the first appellant, Apparao, resides. A report of the offence (Ex.P-13), purporting to be writtenon March 27, 1956, was handed in at the police station house on the following day at 8 P.m. The policetook no action, anda complaint was, therefore, filed on April 4, 1956, by Boddepalli Laksminarayana. The Judicial Second class Magistrate, Srikakulam, convicted the two appellants of an offence under 8. 380 of the Indian Penal Code, and acquitted the two others, with whom we are not concerned, and sentenced each of theappellants to imprisonment till the rising of theCourt and a fine of Rs. 250/-, with simple imprisonment for one month in default. On appeal, the Additional District and Sessions Judge, Srikakulam, set aside the conviction and acquitted them. The complainant then obtained special leave of the High Court to file 11 appeal againstthis acquittal, and the High Court reversed theacquittal, asalready indicated above.

In support of the prosecutioncase, the complainant examined four witnesses, including himself. Pappala Chinna Ramadasu was examined as P.W.4 to prove that he had sold the Pressto Boddepalli Lakshminarayana, and two other witnesses wereexamined to prove theremoval of the Printing Press by the appellants.

The defence of the appellants was as follows: According to them, the Press originally belonged to oneGovindachari, and on October 25, 1947 he transferred it to Kuna Appala Naidu by Ex. D-2. In the registered sale deed then executed, Govindachari was joined formally by Pappala Chinna Ramadasu. The sale was for Rs. 6,400/- and on the same day, a promissory note was executed by Kuna Appala Naidu in favour of Govindachari, which was attested by Pappala Chinna Ramadasu. Subsequently, Appala Naidu made payments of certain amounts, and endorsements on tho promissory note showing these payments were signed by Pappala Chinna Ramadasu as a witness. Kuna Appala Naidu was examinedas D.W.1, and he stated that, the name of Pappala ChinnaRamadasu was formally included in the transfer deed,since the declaration stood in his name. He also stated that the deed, Ex. D.2, was signed as witness by one Akkala Naidu, who died years before the present controversy started. Kuna Appala Naidu later sold the Press to the second appellant and one Sri K. Sriramda, and the second appellant continued in possessionas owner. Pappala ChinnaRamadas continued as the printer, and his declaration as the keeper of the Press also continued. In 1953, Pappala Chinna Ramadasu left the Press for good. The Press was leased out by thesecond appellant to one Appanna, and this leave continued till 1956. On March 19, 1956, an agreement for leave was executed in favour of the first appellant, and on March 26, 1956, a registered deed was duly 12 executed. According to the appellants, the Press WAS removed during the day on March 27 and the lease amount was paidon the28th. According to them, the second appellant was the owner, in law and infact, of the Press and the first appellant was the lessee and had removed the Press in the bona fide exercise ofhis right as lessee. The appellants examined eight witnesses in support of their case.

The case of the prosecution hinged upon the evidence of Pappala Chinna Ramadasu, when confronted with Ex. D-2, he denied his signature, and stated evasively that he could not identify the signaturesof Govindachari and Appala Naidu. He admitted, however, that Appanna used to look after the Press after 1953, though he said that he used to visit the Press oncein two or three months before he soldit to P.W.1, and that the correspondence used to be made in his name.He also stated that he had purchased the Press from the Madras Type Foundry Co., for RH. 9,107/- but that the bills were lost, and he added that they were taken away along with the Press, when it was removed. The case of the appellants rested upon the proof of the signature of Pappala Chinna Ramadasu on Es. D-2 and additionally the proof of the signature of Akkala Naidu, beoause if Akkala Naidu signed the document in 1947 and died some four years before the present controversy started, there would be goodreasonto think that a document of this character couldnot be a fabricated one. The appellants examined a handwriting expert, Sri B. R. Singh (D.W.8). He statedcategoricallythat Ex.D-2bore tho signature ofPappala Chimla Ramadasu. The signature of Akkala Naidu was proved by his son, Sri Rangam. He identified the signature of his father not only on that document but also on Ex. D-3, the promissory Dote. He also stated that h father had died in 1951.

From thismaterial, the Additional District and Sessions Judge, Srikakulam, found that Ex- D-2 13 was not a forged document, as was suggested, but was amply proved as genuine by Pappala Chandrudu (D.W 4) and the combined evidence of Sri Rangam (D. W.3) andSri B.R. Singh (D. W. 8).He therefore, held that Pappala Chinna Ramadasu had no right to sell the Pres in 1955 to Boddepalli Lakshminarayana and that his connection with the Press had effectively ceased from. 1953 even as a mere printer. It is unnecessary to examine whether this finding or the finding given by the Judicial SecondClass Magistrate, Srikakulam, who held otherwise, wasthe correct inferencefrom the. facts. The learned Judge of the High Court, who heard the appeal against the acquittal, said nothing about Ex. D-2. According to him, the removal of the Pressamounted to theft, even though the appellants removed it under a bona fide claim of right.

In this statement of the law, the learned Judge was, with respect, clearly in error. This is what the learned Judge observed:

Further, to a charge of theft, the plea

that the property was removed under a bona

fide claim of right would not avail. For

example aperson who bona fide believes that

the fountain pen on his neighbours desk is

his has no right in law to trespass into the

neighbours houseand snatch away the pen

without the latters content.

The first of the statements is certainly not the law. It is settled law that where abona fide claim of right exists, it can be a good defence to a prosecution for theft. An act does not amount to theft, unless there be not only no legal right but no appearance or colour of alegal right. in 2 East .659, the law was stated a long time ago thus:

If there be in the prisoner any fair

pretence of property of right, or if it be

brought into doubt at all, the court will

direct an acquittal. 14 And accordingto I Hale P.C. 509, the best evidence is that the goodswere taken quite openly. The law thus stated by East and Hale has not been altered inmoderntimes.There are numerous casesin which Courts in India have recognised a bone fide claim of right as a defence to the charge of theft. See Ratanlal law of Crimes 19th Ed. p. 933.

We are not concerned in this case with the declaration under the Press and Registrationof Books Act. A declaredkeeper of the Press is not necessarily the owner thereof so as to be able to confertitle to thePress upon another. The ownership of the Press is a matter of the general law and must follow that law. Whether Pappala Chinna Ramadasu was not only the declared keeper of thePress but also its owner can onlybe effectively decided by theCivil Court. For purposes of Criminal law, the evidence prima facie pointed to a transferof thePress by Pappala Chinna Ramadasu and Govindachari to Kuna Appala Naidu. The evidence prima facie also established that the appellants had taken possession of the Press under a bona fide claim of right, and that, in ouropinion. was sufficient to dispose of the present case. The Additional District and Sessions Judge,Srikakulam, had rightly held that the matter was for the decision of the Civil Court, and that this was not a case of theft under the Indian Penal Code, and had rightly directed the acquittal of the appellants. The learned Judge of the High Court considered the declarationby Pappala Chinna Ramadasu,which continued Unchanged, as sufficient to prove anoffence of theft. In our opinion, in tho circumstances and in the light of the finding given by the District and Sessions Judgewith regard to Ex. D-2, it was necessary to go further to see what right Pappala Chinna Ramadasu had to the Press at all. If this had been considered, the learned Judge would have seen that there was some doubt the rightof Pappala Chinna Ramadasu 15 to transfer the Press in 1955 toBoddepalli Lakshminarayana, and further that the defence that the appellantstook possession of the Press under a bona. fide claim of right was a good defence entitling them to an acquittal.

In the result, this appeal must succeed. The convictions ofthe appellantsand the sentences passed on them are set aside, they are acquitted and their bail bonds shall stand discharged. The fines, if realised, are ordered to be remitted.

Appeal allowed.
**********, 0 , 
HEADNOTE
SERVICE AND LABOUR LAWS
Industrial Dispute Act, 1947
Section 11A - Natural Justice - Termination - Effect of acquittal in criminal case - Theft of Face Milling Cutter - Respondents caught in factory premises - Enquiry officer held charges proved but respondents acquitted in criminal case - Labour Court while holding that departmental enquiry was legal and proper, also held that initiation of enquiry before disposal of criminal case was against principles of natural justice and hence termination was not justified, specially when accused is acquitted by Criminal Court. Held when Labour Court upheld the departmental enquiry as being legal and proper, then it should have confined itself to deciding the legality of dismissal order as per the provisions of Section 11A. Labour Court did not consider the law laid down by Apex Court in The Workmen of M/s Firestone Tyre & Rubber Co. of India (Pvt.) Ltd.s case. It even erred in holding that since appellant failed to lead any evidence to prove the charge in Labour Court, dismissal orders were liable to be set aside.
HELD
When we examine the legality and the correctness of the Awards of the Labour Court, we are of the considered opinion that the Labour Court, having held and indeed rightly that the departmental enquiry conducted by the appellant was legal and proper committed an error in holding that the departmental enquiry got vitiated due to criminal court’s order which had acquitted the respondents from the charge of theft. In our opinion, there was no occasion for the Labour Court to examine this issue once the departmental enquiry was held legal and proper. The Labour Court, in our opinion, committed yet another error in holding that since the appellant failed to lead any evidence to prove the charge in Labour Court, therefore, the dismissal orders of respondents are liable to be set aside. This finding, in our opinion, was again not legally sustainable. (Para 16)
In other words, the Labour Court should have then confined its enquiry to examine only one limited question as to whether the punishment given to the respondents was, in any way, disproportionate to the gravity of the charge leveled against them and this, the Labour Court should have examined by taking recourse to the provisions of Section 11-A of the Industrial Dispute Act, 1947 (in short “the Act”) and the law laid down by this Court in the case of The Workmen of M/s Firestone Tyre & Rubber Co. of India (Pvt.) Ltd. v. The Management & Ors. 1973 (1) SCC 813. It was, however, not done thereby rendering the order of Labour Court legally unsustainable. (Para 18)
Natural justice - Whether initiation of departmental enquiry should be only after decision of Criminal Court, otherwise it would be against the principle of natural justice. Held criminal proceeding and departmental proceedings are two separate proceedings in law. Standard of proof required in domestic enquiry is different from that required in criminal case. In domestic enquiry it is pre-ponderance of probabilities. In this case, dismissal order was not based on Criminal Courts judgement. It was based on domestic enquiry which every employer has a right to conduct independently of criminal case. Divisional Controller, Karnataka State Road Transport Corporations JT 2011 (13) SC 247 case relied.
HELD
The Labour Court should have seen that the dismissal order of the respondents was not based on the criminal Court’s judgment and it could not be so for the reason that it was a case of acquittal. It was, however, based on domestic enquiry, which the employer had every right to conduct independently of the criminal case. (Para 20)
This Court has consistently held that in a case where the enquiry has been held independently of the criminal proceedings, acquittal in criminal Court is of no avail. It is held that even if a person stood acquitted by the criminal Court, domestic enquiry can still be held - the reason being that the standard of proof required in a domestic enquiry and that in criminal case are altogether different. In a criminal case, standard of proof required is beyond reasonable doubt while in a domestic enquiry, it is the preponderance of probabilities. (See Divisional Controller, Karnataka State Road Transport Corporation v. M.G. Vittal Rao jt 2011(13) SC 247). (Para 21)
In the light of this settled legal position, the Labour Court was not right in holding that the departmental enquiry should have been stayed by the appellant awaiting the decision of the criminal Court and that it is rendered illegal consequent upon passing of the acquittal order by the criminal Court. This finding of the Labour Court is, therefore, also not legally sustainable. (Para 22)
Dismissal - Labour court held departmental proceedings to have got vitiated due to acquittal in criminal proceeding - In writ High Court held enquiry to be legal but remanded the matter without directing as to what Labour Court has to decide after remand and why Writ Court could not decide such issues. Held, High Court erred in doing so. Writ Court should have examined the question itself which it had left for consideration i.e. whether order of dismissal was commensurate with the charges or interference was required under Section 11 of the Act. Shankar Chakravartis case referred.
HELD
Now coming to the order of writ Court (Single Judge) though, in our opinion, the Single Judge rightly held the departmental enquiry as being legal and proper but committed an error in remanding the case to the Labour Court without precisely saying as to what the Labour Court has to decide after remand and why writ Court cannot decide such issues in the writ petition. We find that the Single Judge, in concluded para of the order, remanded the whole case afresh for its decision on merits. (Para 23)
In our considered view, the Single Judge (Writ Court) having held the enquiry to be legal and proper instead of remanding the case to the Labour Court should have himself examined the short question which had survived for consideration in the writ petition, namely, whether the punishment of dismissal was commensurate with the charges or it required any interference by the Court under Section 11-A of the Act. (Para 24)
Dismissal order - Whether justified when acquittal was recorded in criminal proceedings - Departmental enquiry held to be legal and proper - Respondent was found committing theft while on duty. Held, act of theft by employee while on duty is a serious charge, which stood proved in enquiry. Hence employer was justified in dismissing the employee from service. Plea that employee was acquitted in criminal case, hence reinstatement should be ordered, has no merit. Dismissal order was not passed on the basis of conviction of employee by the Criminal Court, which was later set aside by Superior Court. Findings were based on preponderance of probabilities and could be recorded by the enquiry officer notwithstanding the order of acquittal by Criminal Court. Dismissal order held to be legal and proper. Division Bench, High Court erred in ordering reinstatement and restoration of the order of Labour Court.
HELD
An act of theft committed by an employee while on duty is a serious charge. This charge once proved in enquiry, the employer is justified in dismissing the employee from service. (Para 29)
Dismissal orders had not been passed on the basis of employees’ conviction by the criminal Court which later stood set aside by the superior Court. Had it been so, then the situation would have been different because once the conviction order is set aside by the superior Court, the dismissal order which was solely based on passing of the conviction order also stands set aside. Such was not the case here. (Para 31)
In the case on hand, the appellant (employer) had conducted the departmental enquiry in accordance with law independently of the criminal case wherein the Enquiry Officer, on the basis of the appreciation of evidence brought on record in the enquiry proceedings, came to a conclusion that a charge of theft against the delinquent employees was proved. This finding was based on preponderance of probabilities and could be recorded by the Enquiry Officer notwithstanding the order of criminal Court acquitting the respondents. (Para 32)

CASES REFERRED
1.  Divisional Controller, Karnataka State Road Transport Corporation v. M.G. Vittal Rao JT 2011 (13) SC 247 (Para 21)
2.  Shankar Chakravarti v. Britannia Biscuits Co. Ltd. & Anr. AIR 1979 SC 1652 (Para 25)
3.  The Workmen of M/s Firestone Tyre & Rubber Co. of India (Pvt.) Ltd. v. The Management & Ors. 1973 (1) SCC 813 (Para 18)


ABHAY MANOHAR SAPRE, J.
1. These appeals are filed against the common final judgment and order dated 16.04.2007 passed by the High Court of Judicature at Madras in Writ Appeal Nos.3789 of 2003 and 3790 of 2003 whereby the High Court allowed the appeals filed by the respondents and directed the appellant to reinstate the respondents with continuity of service and other attendant benefits but without payment of back wages.
2. In order to appreciate the issues involved in these two appeals, it is necessary to set out the facts in detail.
3. The appellant in both the appeals is a Public Sector undertaking known as-Bharat Heavy Electricals Ltd. (BHEL). It has a plant at Ranipet in District Vellore, Tamil Nadu. M. Mani-Respondent in Civil Appeal No.10766/2013 and T.A. Mathivanan (since dead) and represented by his legal representatives-respondent in connected Civil Appeal No.10767/2013 were the employees of BHEL at all relevant time and were working as Driver Grade II in the plant.
4. On 17.02.1991, both the respondents were on duty in the night shift in the Plant. They were supposed to remain present all the time in the Transport Department of the Plant so that on receiving the call they would attend the place of call with their respective vehicles.
5. It was, however, noticed by the officials concerned on duty that both the respondents were not found present on their respective seats and instead were found driving one forklift FLV in another shop floor. It was also noticed that they both had unauthorizedly removed one heavy machine called-”Face Milling Cutter of 500 diameter” from one shop floor and kept it on forklift and loaded in company’s ambulance, which was being driven by T.A. Mathivanan. Both of them then managed to take the said machine in ambulance outside factory premises through South gate.
6. The officials, who witnessed the incident, reported the incident to the appellant (Management). The appellant took up the matter with seriousness and issued charge-sheet to both the respondents. They were asked to submit their explanation. Both denied the charges. The appellant, therefore, appointed Enquiry Officer for holding regular departmental enquiry. Both the respondents participated in the enquiry proceedings. The Enquiry Officer recorded the evidence of the witnesses and submitted his report. The Enquiry Officer, on evaluation of the evidence, held the charges as proved against both the respondents. He held that both the respondents were involved in committing theft of “Face Milling cutter” and were caught in the factory premises while on duty. The appellant accepted the report and dismissed the respondents from service on 31.08.1991. Against their dismissal order, the respondents filed departmental appeals. The appeals were dismissed.
7. This event gave rise to filing of two cases. One was by the State in the Court of Magistrate seeking prosecution of the respondents under Section 379 of the Indian Penal Code, 1860 (in short “IPC”) and the other was by the respondents against the appellant (employer) in Labour Court challenging legality of their dismissal orders (ID Nos. 801 and 839 of 1993). So far as the criminal case was concerned, the Magistrate, by his order dated 24.11.1992, acquitted the respondents from the charge.
8. As regards the cases before the Labour Court out of which these two appeals arise, the Labour Court framed three issues, first, whether the enquiry conducted by the Enquiry Officer was legal and proper; second, whether the findings of the Enquiry Officer holding the charge as proved against the respondents are correct; and third, whether these two employees are entitled to claim the relief of reinstatement with back wages?
9. By Award dated 06.08.2001 (Annexure-P-9), the Labour Court answered the reference in favour of the employees by recording the following findings:
     “Hence it can not be said that there has been denial of reasonable opportunity during the enquiry.”
9.1. and then in Para 7, it was held that,
     “it can not be considered that the departmental enquiry has not been held properly.”
9.2. and then in Para 8 it was held that,
     “till the disposal of the criminal case, the Management ought to have stayed the departmental enquiry and they should have passed the order only after the conclusion  of the criminal proceedings.”
9.3. and, in the same Para 8, it was held that,
     “Therefore, the object of this provision is that till proceedings of criminal court, the departmental enquiry should not be initiated. Therefore, the respondent ought not to have appointed enquiry officer to conduct the enquiry in respect of same charge which has been pending before the Criminal Court. Such an enquiry held is contrary to principles of natural justice. On this ground, I hold that departmental enquiry is held not in accordance with principle of natural justice”
9.4. and in last line of Para 8, it was held that,
     “it is for this reason the removal of the employee from service is not justified.”
9.5. The Labour Court then lastly in para 9 held that,
     “Having held that the departmental enquiry has not been conducted according to principle of natural justice, it has to be decided whether the finding of the Enquiry Officer that the charge against the petitioner is correct. When the criminal case has been pending the finding of the Enquiry Officer that the petitioner is guilty of the charge is not correct. Further the petitioner has been acquired by the criminal court. Hence when in the criminal proceedings, the petitioner has been found not guilty, I hold that the findings of the Enquiry Officer that the charge against the petitioner had been proved, is not correct.”
10. To sum up, the Labour Court held that, firstly, the departmental enquiry was properly held; secondly, the employer instead of holding an enquiry should have stayed it awaiting the outcome of the criminal case; thirdly, since the criminal case resulted in the acquittal of the respondents, the departmental enquiry stood vitiated as violating the principle of natural justice; fourthly, since the employer did not lead any evidence in support of the charge, the charge remained unproved; and lastly, the dismissal orders are bad in law in the light of the four grounds and, therefore, the respondents be reinstated in service with payment of full back wages by the appellant.
11. The appellant, felt aggrieved, filed writ petitions in the High Court. The Single Judge, by order dated 31.07.2003 (Annexure-P-11), allowed the writ petitions, set aside the award of the Labour Court and remanded the case to the Labour Court for deciding both the matters afresh. The Single Judge held that when the Labour Court held the departmental enquiry to be legal and proper then the only question that remained for the Labour Court to decide was as to whether the punishment imposed on two employees, i.e., “dismissal” was just, legal and proper or it required any interference in its quantum and, if so, to what extent. Having observed this, the writ Court remanded the cases to Labour Court to decide the cases afresh on merits. This is what the learned Single Judge in concluding para held,
     “10. Keeping in view of all these aspects, I think interest of justice would be served by quashing the awards in both the cases and directing both the matters are to be considered afresh by the Labour Court. It goes without saying that both the matters should be taken up for hearing together and shall be disposed of. Since the matter is pretty old, the Industrial Disputes are to be decided as expeditiously as possible, preferably within a period of six months from the date of receipt of a copy of this order.”
12. Felt aggrieved, the respondents filed intra court appeals in the High Court before the Division Bench. By impugned judgment, the Division Bench allowed the appeals, set aside the order of writ Court and directed reinstatement of the respondents by restoring the order of the Labour Court to this extent but declined to award to them any back wages except continuity of service and other attendant benefits to the respondents.
13. Felt aggrieved by the judgment of the Division Bench, the appellant (employer) has filed these appeals by way of special leave before this Court.
14. Heard Mr. P.S. Patwalia, learned senior counsel for the appellant and Mr. M.A. Chinnasamy and Mr. M.K. Perwez, learned counsel for the respondents.
15. Having heard learned counsel for the parties and on perusal of the record of the case, we are constrained to allow the appeals, set aside the impugned judgment and uphold the dismissal order of the respondents as legal and proper.
16. To begin with, when we examine the legality and the correctness of the Awards of the Labour Court, we are of the considered opinion that the Labour Court, having held and indeed rightly that the departmental enquiry conducted by the appellant was legal and proper committed an error in holding that the departmental enquiry got vitiated due to criminal court’s order which had acquitted the respondents from the charge of theft. In our opinion, there was no occasion for the Labour Court to examine this issue once the departmental enquiry was held legal and proper. The Labour Court, in our opinion, committed yet another error in holding that since the appellant failed to lead any evidence to prove the charge in Labour Court, therefore, the dismissal orders of respondents are liable to be set aside. This finding, in our opinion, was again not legally sustainable.
17. In our opinion, once the Labour Court upheld the departmental enquiry as being legal and proper then the only question that survived for consideration before the Labour Court was whether the punishment of “dismissal” imposed by the appellant to the respondents was legal and proper or it requires any interference in its quantum.
18. In other words, the Labour Court should have then confined its enquiry to examine only one limited question as to whether the punishment given to the respondents was, in any way, disproportionate to the gravity of the charge leveled against them and this, the Labour Court should have examined by taking recourse to the provisions of Section 11-A of the Industrial Dispute Act, 1947 (in short “the Act”) and the law laid down by this Court in the case of The Workmen of M/s Firestone Tyre & Rubber Co. of India (Pvt.) Ltd. v. The Management & Ors. 1973 (1) SCC 813. It was, however, not done thereby rendering the order of Labour Court legally unsustainable.
19. Similarly, in our considered view, the Labour Court failed to see that the criminal proceedings and departmental proceedings are two separate proceedings in law. One is initiated by the State against the delinquent employees in criminal Court and other, i.e., departmental enquiry which is initiated by the employer under the Labour/Service Laws/Rules, against the delinquent employees.
20. The Labour Court should have seen that the dismissal order of the respondents was not based on the criminal Court’s judgment and it could not be so for the reason that it was a case of acquittal. It was, however, based on domestic enquiry, which the employer had every right to conduct independently of the criminal case.
21. This Court has consistently held that in a case where the enquiry has been held independently of the criminal proceedings, acquittal in criminal Court is of no avail. It is held that even if a person stood acquitted by the criminal Court, domestic enquiry can still be held - the reason being that the standard of proof required in a domestic enquiry and that in criminal case are altogether different. In a criminal case, standard of proof required is beyond reasonable doubt while in a domestic enquiry, it is the preponderance of probabilities. (See Divisional Controller, Karnataka State Road Transport Corporation v. M.G. Vittal Rao JT 2011 (13) SC 247).
22. In the light of this settled legal position, the Labour Court was not right in holding that the departmental enquiry should have been stayed by the appellant awaiting the decision of the criminal Court and that it is rendered illegal consequent upon passing of the acquittal order by the criminal Court. This finding of the Labour Court is, therefore, also not legally sustainable.
23. Now coming to the order of writ Court (Single Judge) though, in our opinion, the Single Judge rightly held the departmental enquiry as being legal and proper but committed an error in remanding the case to the Labour Court without precisely saying as to what the Labour Court has to decide after remand and why writ Court cannot decide such issues in the writ petition. We find that the Single Judge, in concluded para of the order, remanded the whole case afresh for its decision on merits.
24. In our considered view, the Single Judge (Writ Court) having held the enquiry to be legal and proper instead of remanding the case to the Labour Court should have himself examined the short question which had survived for consideration in the writ petition, namely, whether the punishment of dismissal was commensurate with the charges or it required any interference by the Court under Section 11-A of the Act.
25. In other words, the remand to the Labour Court in this case by the Single Judge was not called for. It would have become necessary, if the Single Judge had come to a conclusion that the departmental enquiry is illegal. In such situation, the question would have arisen as to whether the employer should now be given an opportunity to prove the charge before the Labour Court on merits by adducing evidence provided such opportunity had been asked for in any form by the employer (See- Shankar Chakravarti v. Britannia Biscuits Co. Ltd. & Anr. AIR 1979 SC 1652).
26. However, this occasion did not arise because, as observed supra, the enquiry was held legal and proper by the Labour Court and Single Judge.
27. Now coming to the legality of the impugned judgment, in our considered opinion, there was absolutely no justification on the part of the Division Bench to have allowed the appeals of the respondents and restored the order of the Labour Court by setting aside the dismissal order. The Division Bench, in our view, did not take note of correct legal position, which we have discussed above.
28. In our opinion, this is a clear case where the departmental enquiry was held legal and proper. We also, on going through the record of the case, hold that the departmental enquiry was properly held and was, therefore, legal and proper. So far as the quantum of punishment imposed on the respondents is concerned, having regard to the nature of charge which stood proved in the enquiry, in our view, the order of dismissal from service was the appropriate punishment. It was commensurate with the charge.
29. An act of theft committed by an employee while on duty is a serious charge. This charge once proved in enquiry, the employer is justified in dismissing the employee from service.
30. We are not impressed by the submission urged by the learned counsel for the respondents (employees) when he urged that once the respondents (employees) were acquitted from the charge of theft by the criminal Court, the dismissal orders deserve to be set aside entitling the employees to seek reinstatement in service. Learned counsel read the entire criminal Court’s order to show that it was an honorable acquittal of the employees from the charge of theft.
31. The answer to the aforementioned submission lies in the law laid down by this Court in the case of Karnataka SRTC (supra). At the cost of repetition, we may say that in the case on hand, the dismissal orders had not been passed on the basis of employees’ conviction by the criminal Court which later stood set aside by the superior Court. Had it been so, then the situation would have been different because once the conviction order is set aside by the superior Court, the dismissal order which was solely based on passing of the conviction order also stands set aside. Such was not the case here.
32. In the case on hand, the appellant (employer) had conducted the departmental enquiry in accordance with law independently of the criminal case wherein the Enquiry Officer, on the basis of the appreciation of evidence brought on record in the enquiry proceedings, came to a conclusion that a charge of theft against the delinquent employees was proved. This finding was based on preponderance of probabilities and could be recorded by the Enquiry Officer notwithstanding the order of criminal Court acquitting the respondents.
33. In view of the foregoing discussion, the appeals succeed and are allowed. Impugned judgment is set aside. As a consequence thereof, the dismissal orders of the respondents herein are held legal and proper and accordingly upheld.
**********, 0 , 
CROSS CITATION
2006 AIR (SC) 1214
2006 (2) SCC 373
APPEARANCES
Mrs. D. Bharathi Reddy, Advocate for the Appellants.
Mrs. K. Amareswari, Senior Advocate, Mr. B. Ramana Murthy and Mrs. Anjani Aiyagari, Advocates with for the Respondent.
HEADNOTE
SERVICE AND LABOUR LAWS
Government service - Termination of service for misconduct - Judicial review of administrative decisions - Scope - Respondent, a Police Head Constable charged with the theft of lens of closed circuit TV while on security duty during the visit of US President - After Departmental Enquiry services of delinquent dispensed with by the Disciplinary Authority since the charges stood proved by evidence of witnesses - Delinquent given adequate opportunity of being heard in the said proceedings - Appellate Authority as well as Administrative Tribunal upholding the dismissal - On a writ High Court on reappreciation of the evidence, upsetting the findings and directing the reinstatement of the respondent - Validity. Allowing the appeal held that the Enquiry Officer having held on the basis of evidence that the charge of theft stood proved against the respondent and the said finding having been upheld by the Appellate Authority and the Tribunal, the High Court erred in reappreciating the evidence and upsetting the factual findings. High Court while exercising the power of judicial review does not act as Appellate Court and judicial review is not akin to adjudication on merits by reappreciating the evidence as an Appellate Authority. Considering the gravity of the misconduct the punishment of dismissal was not disproportionate. Writ filed by the respondent therefore dismissed.
HELD
From the finding recorded by the High Court it clearly appears that the High Court re-appreciated the evidence as an Appellate Authority. Apart from reappreciating the evidence, which is not permissible in law, the High Court also fell in grave error by directing the government pleader and the learned counsel for the respondent herein to again view the cassettes. It is on record that the Inquiry Officer relied on the video cassettes displayed during the Inquiry as part of additional evidence. The finding has been clearly recorded by the Inquiry Officer on the basis of the evidence adduced by PWs. 1,2,3 and 4 during the Inquiry. (Para 6)

By now it is a well-established principle of law that the High Court exercising power of judicial review under Article 226 of the Constitution does not act as an Appellate Authority. Its jurisdiction is circumscribed and confined to correct errors of law or procedural error, if any, resulting in manifest miscarriage of justice or violation of principles of natural justice. Judicial review is not akin to adjudication on merit by reappreciating the evidence as an Appellate Authority. (Para 7)

The gravity of the offence must necessarily be measured with the nature of the offence. The respondent was a member of the Discipline Force holding the rank of head constable. The duty assigned to him was a bandobast duty during the visit of the then President Bill Clinton, who ran a security risk of the highest grade. His misconduct could have led to serious security lapse resulting into fatal consequences. But, because of timely detection of the electrician PW4, the lens was recovered and immediately restored. We entirely agree with the inquiry officer that the charges are serious in nature, being committed by a member of Disciplinary Force, who deserved stringent punishment. To instill the confidence of the public in the establishment, the only appropriate punishment in such cases is dismissal from service, which has been correctly awarded. (Para 11)

In the premises aforestated, we are clearly of the view that the High Court has committed patent error of law which has resulted in miscarriage of justice. The order of the High Court is, accordingly, quashed. The appeal is allowed. Consequently, the writ petition, filed by the respondent stands dismissed. (Para 13)

CASES REFERRED
1.B.C. Chaturvedi v. Union of India & Ors. JT 1995 (8) SC 65 (Para 9)

2.Union of India v. Parma Nanda JT 1989 (2) SC 132 (Para 8)

H.K. SEMA, J.

1. This appeal, preferred by the State of Andhra Pradesh, is directed against the judgment and order of the Division Bench of the High Court of Andhra Pradesh dated 9.12.2003 in writ petition no. 14146 of 2003 quashing the order of dismissal dated 21.9.2000 of the respondent herein and the order of the appellate authority dated 20.10.2001 confirming the order of dismissal. The Division Bench of the High Court directed that the respondent herein be reinstated into service forthwith with all back wages and all attendant benefits, which he could have received, had he not been dismissed from service. The High Court further directed that the respondent be reinstated into service within a period of four weeks from the date of receipt of the order. This Court on 16.7.2004, while issuing notice granted interim stay of the impugned order. Further, on 18.7.2005, on the submission of the learned counsel for the respondent that the respondent has been reinstated pursuant to the High Court order but the back wages have not been paid, this Court stayed the payment of back wages directed by the High Court.

2. Briefly stated, the facts are as follows:

2.1 The respondent, Mohd. Nasrullah Khan was working as head constable at Shamshabad Police Station of Ranga Reddy District. Mr. Bill Clinton, the then President of the United States of America was to visit the Hi-Tech City in Hyderabad and the respondent was assigned the bandobast duty at the office of the Oracle Software India Limited on the 4th Floor of Hi-Tech City, Madhapur, Hyderabad. It is alleged that during the bandobast duty, the respondent removed the CCTV Lens No. VAT-660-DSC-56894 of Watal company from ceiling of the said office and concealed the same. It is further alleged that the said removal of the lens was observed in the close circuit TV by one G. Sridhar, the electrician (PW4) and he immediately went to the respondent and asked him about the removal but the respondent denied the same. The electrician, thereafter, informed the same to the Security Supervisor and on enquiry by him, though the respondent denied of having removed the lens at the first instance, later handed over the same stating that the same was lying at the toilet.

2.2 A disciplinary inquiry was initiated against the respondent by the Superintendent of Police, A.R. Ranga Reddy District by appointing Deputy Superintendent of Police (DSP) by its order dated 19.4.2000. The substance of imputations of misconduct and misbehaviour against the respondent are as follows:

Shri Mohd. Nasrullah Khan, High Court 380 of P.S. Shamshabad (u/s) exhibited grave misconduct in committing theft of the C.C.T.V. lens costing about Rs.15,000/- from the office of Oracle India Limited, Hi-Tech City, Madhapur on 24.3.2000, while on bandobast duty, for personal gain.

2.3 In course of the inquiry, the Inquiry Officer examined as many as four witnesses and after conducting detailed inquiry by affording adequate opportunity to the respondent submitted its report dated 18.8.200 holding that the charge against the respondent of theft of C.C.T.V. lens has been proved beyond all reasonable doubt. The Inquiry Officer, in its report, also observed as under:

The charges are serious in nature. The delinquent being the member of the disciplined force and being a protector of public property, ought not to have attempted to commit such a delinquency. I, therefore, propose that the delinquent may be awarded with a stringent punishment to meet the ends of justice.

2.4 After receipt of the Inquiry Report, a show cause notice was issued to the respondent herein by the Disciplinary Authority and after considering the reply to the show cause notice, the Disciplinary Authority dismissed the respondent from service with immediate effect by an order dated 21.9.2000. It was further directed that the period of suspension from 30.3.2000 till the date of dismissal be treated as not on duty. Aggrieved thereby, the respondent preferred an appeal before the Deputy Inspector General of Police, which was dismissed on 11.5.2001. Thereafter, the respondent filed O.A.No. 3700 of 2001 before the Andhra Pradesh Administrative Tribunal. The Administrative Tribunal, by its order dated 1.8.2001, remanded the matter to the Appellate Authority for reconsideration of the matter. The Appellate Authority, after reconsidering the representation, rejected the appeal again and confirmed the order of dismissal by its order dated 20.10.2001. Being aggrieved, the respondent again filed O.A. No. 8066 of 2001 before the Tribunal contending, inter-alia, that the theft, as alleged, was not proved and the Appellate Authority did not properly consider the submissions of the respondent and that the Appellate Authority dismissed the appeal without application of mind. The appellant herein filed a detailed counter repudiating the allegations made in the O.A. It is stated that the order of dismissal was passed in accordance with the rules and regulations and there was no denial of principles of natural justice to the respondent, nor was there any allegations of violations of rules and regulations or procedures. It was also contended that the guilt of the respondent has been proved beyond all reasonable doubt. After considering the petition and the counter, the Andhra Pradesh Appellate Tribunal by its order dated 4.4.03 dismissed the O.A. confirming the order of dismissal. Aggrieved thereby, the respondent preferred writ petition no. 14146 of 2003 before the High Court, which was allowed by the impugned order, as stated earlier. Hence, the present appeal by special leave.

3. It is contended by the learned counsel for the appellant that the finding recorded by the Inquiry Officer is a finding of fact and the High Court cannot act as an appellate authority. Its jurisdiction is circumscribed and confined to correct errors of law or procedural law, if any, or violation of principles of natural justice. It is further contended that the High Court fell in grave error of law by reappreciating the evidence recorded by the Inquiry Officer like an appellate authority in the instant case.

4. Per contra, learned counsel for the respondent contended that the alleged theft of lens or removal of lens by the respondent is not proved and, therefore, the finding of the Inquiry Officer is perverse and the order of dismissal on the basis of the finding recorded by the Inquiry Officer is vitiated. At this stage, we may point out that there is no allegation of violation of principles of natural justice, or that the inquiry was conducted without following the procedures or rules and regulations. The only case put up before us by the respondent is that the theft or removal of lens by the respondent is not proved in the course of Inquiry. This contention need not detain us any longer because going through the report of the Inquiry, the Inquiry Officer, after examining PWs. 1,2,3 and 4 and after affording adequate opportunity to the respondent, has come to the conclusion that the charge levelled against the respondent stands proved.

5. The High Court, while upsetting the order of the Tribunal dated 4.4.03 passed in O.A. No. 8066/01 and order of dismissal dated 21.1.2000 confirmed by the Appellate Authority dated 20.10.2001, recorded its finding in paragraph 5 of its judgment as under:

There is no dispute that the petitioner was posted on bandobast duty on the relevant date and the entire premises was under close circuit T.V. System. The question is whether the petitioner has committed the theft of camera lens. There is no direct evidence on this aspect. It is only on presumption that when once the camera was not relaying the pictures, the officials of Oracle company came to that place where the camera was positioned and found that the lens was not available with the camera. Even the witnesses examined on this aspect namely the employees of Oracle company did not state that the petitioner had committed theft of the lens and further it is on record that the electrician himself traced out the camera lens which was lying outside toilet room and the entire premises was carpeted. No other independent officer has been examined to establish that the petitioner had committed theft. However, we see from the report of the Enquiry Officer that he got the cassette displayed and noticed the movements of the petitioner, sitting on chair, getting up and coming towards the camera and touching the lens of camera (hand is clearly visible) between 13-58 and 13-59 hours on 24.3.2000. But this is not the function of the Enquiry Officer. It must be established by the independent evidence. When we directed the learned government pleader and the learned counsel for the petitioner to again view the cassette, they stated that the visibility is beyond recognition. In such circumstances, it has to be held that the findings of the Enquiry Officer appears to be based on mere surmises and conjectures and it is finding based on no evidence. In such situation, the Tribunal ought to have held that the enquiry is vitiated for lack of acceptable and permissible evidence on this aspect. It is also on record that the lens was not recovered from the person of the petitioner and admittedly the petitioner was on guard duty in the premises where the cameras were positioned. In such a situation, it cannot be said that simply because, the lens of one camera is missing, the petitioner committed theft of it. If really the police had conducted investigation, they could have sent the lens to the Forensic expert with reference to the fingerprints and that could have made the matters clear. But for the reasons best known to the police, they did not take such action and tried to find fault with the police constable fastening the charge of theft. Under these circumstances, we are of the considered view that the Tribunal failed to take into consideration this aspect and held that the Enquiry was conducted properly and finding was validly recorded.

6. From the finding recorded by the High Court it clearly appears that the High Court re-appreciated the evidence as an Appellate Authority. Apart from reappreciating the evidence, which is not permissible in law, the High Court also fell in grave error by directing the government pleader and the learned counsel for the respondent herein to again view the cassettes. It is on record that the Inquiry Officer relied on the video cassettes displayed during the Inquiry as part of additional evidence. The finding has been clearly recorded by the Inquiry Officer on the basis of the evidence adduced by PWs. 1,2,3 and 4 during the Inquiry.

7. By now it is a well-established principle of law that the High Court exercising power of judicial review under Article 226 of the Constitution does not act as an Appellate Authority. Its jurisdiction is circumscribed and confined to correct errors of law or procedural error, if any, resulting in manifest miscarriage of justice or violation of principles of natural justice. Judicial review is not akin to adjudication on merit by reappreciating the evidence as an Appellate Authority.

8. We may now notice a few decisions of this Court on this aspect avoiding multiplicity. In Union of India v. Parma Nanda1, K. Jagannatha Shetty, J., speaking for the Bench, observed as under:

We must unequivocally state that the jurisdiction of the Tribunal to interfere with the disciplinary matters or punishment cannot be equated with an appellate jurisdiction. The Tribunal cannot interfere with the findings of the Inquiry Officer or competent authority where they are not arbitrary or utterly perverse. It is appropriate to remember that the power to impose penalty on a delinquent officer is conferred on the competent authority either by an Act of legislature or rules made under the proviso to Article 309 of the Constitution. If there has been an enquiry consistent with the rules and in accordance with principles of natural justice what punishment would meet the ends of justice is a matter exclusively within the jurisdiction of the competent authority. If the penalty can lawfully be imposed and is imposed on the proved misconduct, the Tribunal has no power to substitute its own discretion for that of the authority. The adequacy of penalty unless it is mala fide is certainly not a matter for the Tribunal to concern itself with. The Tribunal also cannot interfere with the penalty if the conclusion of the Inquiry Officer or the competent authority is based on evidence even if some of it is found to be irrelevant or extraneous to the matter.

9. Again, the same principle has been reiterated by this Court in B.C. Chaturvedi v. Union of India & Ors.2. K. Ramaswamy, J., speaking for the Court, under:

Judicial review is not an appeal from a decision but a review of the manner in which the decision is made. Power of judicial review is meant to ensure that the individual receives fair treatment and not to ensure that the conclusion, which the authority reaches, is necessarily correct in the eye of the court. When an inquiry is conducted on charges of misconduct by a public servant, the court/tribunal is concerned to determine whether the inquiry was held by a competent officer or whether rules of natural justice are complied with. Whether the findings or conclusions are based on some evidence, the authority entrusted with the power to hold inquiry has jurisdiction, power and authority to reach a finding of fact or conclusion. But that finding must be based on some evidence. Neither the technical rules of Evidence Act nor of proof of fact or evidence as defined therein, apply to disciplinary proceeding. When the authority accepts that evidence and conclusion receives
support therefrom, the disciplinary authority is entitled to hold that the delinquent officer is guilty of the charge. The court/tribunal in its power of judicial review does not act as appellate authority to appreciate the evidence and to arrive at its own independent findings on the evidence. The court/tribunal may interfere where the authority held the proceedings against the delinquent officer in a manner inconsistent with the rules of natural justice or in violation of statutory rules prescribing the mode of inquiry or where the conclusion or finding reached by the disciplinary authority is based on no evidence. If the conclusion or finding be such as no reasonable person would have ever reached, the court/tribunal may interfere with the conclusion or the finding and mould the relief so as to make it appropriate to the facts of each case.

10. As already said, in the present case there is no allegation of violation of principles of natural justice or the inquiry being held inconsistent with the mode of procedure prescribed by the rules or regulations.

11. This takes us to the last submission of the counsel for the respondent. Learned counsel for the respondent contended that the offence, said to have been committed, being minor in nature and no loss being caused to the owner of the property, inasmuch as the same had been recovered on the spot, lenient punishment may be awarded in place of dismissal from service. We are unable to countenance this submission. The gravity of the offence must necessarily be measured with the nature of the offence. The respondent was a member of the Discipline Force holding the rank of head constable. The duty assigned to him was a bandobast duty during the visit of the then President Bill Clinton, who ran a security risk of the highest grade. His misconduct could have led to serious security lapse resulting into fatal consequences. But, because of timely detection of the electrician PW4, the lens was recovered and immediately restored. We entirely agree with the Inquiry Officer that the charges are serious in nature, being committed by a member of Disciplinary Force, who deserved stringent punishment. To instill the confidence of the public in the establishment, the only appropriate punishment in such cases is dismissal from service, which has been correctly awarded.

12. It is stated that the respondent was reinstated on 19.6.04, pursuant to the order passed by the High Court and has been working since then and pay and allowances have been paid from 19.6.04. Since, he has been paid for the period he has worked, the salary and allowances already paid to him shall not be disturbed. The respondent, however, shall not get his back wags.

13. In the premises aforestated, we are clearly of the view that the High Court has committed patent error of law which has resulted in miscarriage of justice. The order of the High Court is, accordingly, quashed. The appeal is allowed. Consequently, the writ petition, filed by the respondent stands dismissed. Parties are asked to bear their own costs.

**********, 0 , 
HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAWS
Indian Penal Code, 1860
Sections 390, 392 - Evidence Act, 1872, Section 3 - Robbery - When can be said to have been committed - Principles stated.
HELD
The provision defines robbery which is theft or extortion when caused with violence of death, hurt or wrongful restraint. When there is no theft committed, then as a natural corollary there cannot be robbery. Robbery is only an aggravated form of offence of theft or extortion. Aggravation is in the use of violence of death, hurt or restraint. Violence must be in course of theft and not subsequently. It is not necessary that violence actually should be committed but even attempt to commit it is enough. (Para 8)

The words for that end in Section 390 clearly mean that the hurt caused must be with the object of facilitating the committing of the theft or must be caused while the offender is committing theft or is carrying away or is attempting to carry away property obtained by the theft. (Para 10)

Sections 390, 392, 395 - Evidence Act, 1872, Section 3 - Robbery - PWs going on scooter at 9 p.m. - Gold chain, thali, ear-drops scooter and cash snatched by threatening with knife - Next day, arrested - Stolen goods recovered and identified by victims - No dispute that place was highway. Held that offence was established. Conviction and sentence of 10 years RI and fine of Rs. 5000/- upheld. (Paras 3 -12)

CASES REFERRED
1.State of Karnataka v. Puttaraja JT 2003 (9) SC 603 (Para 13)

DR. ARIJIT PASAYAT, J.

1. Leave granted.

2. Challenge in this appeal is to the order of a learned Single Judge of the Karnataka High Court holding the appellants guilty of offence punishable under Section 392 of the Indian Penal Code, 1860 (in short the IPC) and sentencing each of 10 years imprisonment.

3. Prosecution version in a nutshell is as follows:

3.1. On 24.6.2001 at 9.00 p.m. on Mulbagal-Punganoor road PWs 2 and 3 were going on a Bajaj Scooter. When they were near Kirumani Mitta of Buddadoru village, accused persons 2 to 5 intercepted PWs 2 and 3, and robbed the gold chain, golden ear drops, thali and cash of Rs.400/- by threatening with knife. The accused tied the legs and hands of PW-2 and PW-3 and threatened them not to escape and get out from the place for about ten minutes after their departure. The victims went to Punganoor Police Station and later on lodged First Information Report with Nangali Police (Kolar Dist.) on 25.6.2001. The Traffic Police while checking found A-2, A-3 and A-4 were going on the scooter (M.O.6) they had robbed from PW-2, the deadly weapons like knives, pistol, iron rod, etc. were hidden in the scooter. On interrogation, the accused persons admitted the commission of offence in question. A-5 and A-8 were arrested on the information given by A-2 to A-4. At the instance of A-2, the gold jewellery (M.Os.2 and 3) are recovered from PW-6-Pawn broker. The Bajaj Scooter (M.O.6) was seized from A-2, A-3 and A-4. PW-13 with whom the ear-studs and the chain were pledged by A-2, testified to the said fact. PWs 2 and 3 identified A-2 to A-5 as the persons who robbed them. Prosecution claimed that the identification of accused persons by PWs 2 and 3 coupled with the recovery of jewellery at the instance of A-2 and seizure of scooter from A-2, A-3 and A-4 clinchingly established the guilt of A-2 to A-5.

3.2. The investigating agency submitted charge sheet for alleged commission of offence punishable under Section 395 of IPC. The case was split up against A-1, A-6 and A-7 as they were absconding.

3.3. Learned Additional Sessions Judge, Kolar referred to the evidence of PWs 1 and 2, the recovery of the scooter, the recovery of stolen articles and identification thereon to conclude that accused persons are guilty and accordingly A-2 to A-5 were convicted for offence punishable under Section 395 IPC. Accused 7 and 8 were acquitted as the evidence was not sufficient to find them guilty. Considering the gravity of the offence, custodial sentence of 10 years imprisonment and a fine of Rs.5,000/- each was imposed. In appeal, the High Court found that the offence committed was covered under Section 392 IPC, but considering the gravity of the offence upheld the sentence.

4. In support of the appeal, learned counsel for the appellants submitted that the evidence of PWs 2 and 3 does not show that any knife was used for robbery. On the contrary, evidence of victim clearly shows that she raised hue and cry when accused persons tried to snatch the stolen articles from her. It was also submitted that the appellants have suffered custody of more than nearly 8 years and the sentence deserves to be reduced to the period already undergone.

5. Learned counsel for the respondent-State on the other hand submitted that there is no minimum sentence prescribed and the maximum sentence is 10 years. It is submitted that the robbery was committed on the highway at about 9.00 p.m. That being so, the sentence can be upto 14 years. Considering the gravity of the offence and the large scale highway robberies, no leniency should be shown.

6. Section 392 IPC provides for punishment for robbery. The essential ingredients are as follows:

1.Accused committed theft;

2.Accused voluntarily caused or attempted to cause.

(i)death, hurt or wrongful restraint.

(ii)Fear of instant death, hurt or wrongful restraint.

3.He did either act for the end.

(i)to commit theft.

(ii)While committing theft.

(iii)In carrying away or in the attempt to carry away property obtained by theft.

7. It is to be noted that the Section 392 provides punishment for robbery. It is punishment for the offence defined in Section 390. Punishment is higher if it is committed on a highway and between sunset and sunrise. Section 390 which defines robbery reads as follows:

390. Robbery.- In all robbery there is either theft or extortion.

When theft is robbery.-Theft is robbery if, in order to the committing of the theft, or in committing the theft, or in carrying away or attempting to carry away property obtained by theft, the offender, for the end, voluntarily causes or attempts to cause to any person death or hurt wrongful restraint, or fear of instant death or of instant hurt, or of instant wrongful restraint.

When extortion is robbery.-Extortion is robbery if the offender at the time of committing the extortion, is in the presence of the person put in fear, and commits the extortion by putting that person in fear of instant death, of instant hurt, or of instant wrongful restraint to that person or to some other person, and, by so putting in fear, induces the person so put in fear then, and there to deliver up the thing extorted.

Explanation.-The offender is said to be present if he is sufficiently near put the other person in fear of instant death, of instant hurt, or of instant wrongful restraint.

8. The provision defines robbery which is theft or extortion when caused with violence of death, hurt or wrongful restraint. When there is no theft committed, then as a natural corollary there cannot be robbery. Robbery is only an aggravated form of offence of theft or extortion. Aggravation is in the use of violence of death, hurt or restraint. Violence must be in course of theft and not subsequently. It is not necessary that violence actually should be committed but even attempt to commit it is enough.

9. The authors of the Code observed as follows:

In one single class of cases, theft and extortion are in practice confounded together so inextricably, that no judge, however, sagacious, could discriminate between them. This class of cases, therefore, has, in all systems of jurisprudence ... been treated as a perfectly distinct class ... we have, therefore, made robbery a separate crime.

There can be no case of robbery which does not fall within the definition either of theft or of extortion; but in a practice it will perpetually be a matter of doubt whether a particular act of robbery was a theft or an extortion. A large proportion of robberies will be half theft, half extortion. A seizes Z, threatens to murder him, unless he delivers all his property, and begins to pull off Zs ornaments. Z in terror begs that A will take all he has, and spare his life, assists in taking off his ornaments, and delivers them to A. Here, such ornaments as A took without Zs consent are taken by theft. Those which Z delivered up from fear of death are acquired by extortion. It is by no means improbable that Zs right arm bracelet may have been obtained by theft, and left-arm bracelet by extortion; that the rupees in Zs girdle may have been obtained by theft, and those in his turban by extortion. Probably in nine-tenths of the robberies which are committed, something like this actually takes place, and it is probable that a few minutes later neither the robber nor the person robbed would be able to recollect in what proportions theft and extortion were mixed in the crime; nor is it at all necessary for the ends of justice that this should be ascertained. For though, in general, the consent of a sufferer is a circumstance which very materially modifies the character of the offence, and which ought, therefore, to be made known to the Courts, yet the consent which a person gives to the taking of this property by a ruffian who holds a pistol to his breast is a circumstance altogether immaterial.

10. The words for that end in Section 390 clearly mean that the hurt caused must be with the object of facilitating the committing of the theft or must be caused while the offender is committing theft or is carrying away or is attempting to carry away property obtained by the theft.

11. As the provision itself provides when the highway robbery is committed, deterrent punishment is called for.

12. In the instant case, the evidence of the victim, her husband, the factum of recovery of the vehicle used has clearly established the commission of offence by the appellants. The offence was committed on a public road. There is no dispute that it was not a highway. It is also not in dispute that the offence was committed during sunset and sunrise that is, at about 9.00 p.m.

13. In State of Karnataka v. Puttaraja JT 2003 (9) SC 603 ; 2004 (1) SCC 475, it was inter-alia observed as follows:

Imposition of sentence without considering its effect on the social order in many cases may be in reality a futile exercise. The social impact of the crime e.g. where it relates to offences against women like the case at hand, dacoity, kidnapping, misappropriation of public money, treason and other offences involving moral turpitude or moral delinquency which have great impact and serious repercussions on social order and public interest, cannot be lost sight of and per se require exemplary treatment. Any liberal attitude by imposing meager sentences or taking too sympathetic a view merely on account of lapse of time or considerations personal to the accused only in respect of such offences will be resultwise counterproductive in the long run and against societal interest which needs to be cared for and strengthened by the required string of deterrence inbuilt in the sentencing system.

14. Above being the position, there is no merit in this appeal which is accordingly dismissed.

**********, 0 , 
CROSS CITATION
1990 AIR (SC) 882
1990 (2) SCC 659
1990 (2) SCR 733
APPEARANCES
Mr. K.S. Bindra, Senior Advocate, Mr. R.K. Maheshwari and Mr. G.S. Gujananip, Advocates with him for the appellant.
Mr. Prem Sunder Jha, Advocate for the Respondent.
HEADNOTE
ELECTRICITY SUPPLY
Disconnection of - Service of notice on the consumer is a pre- requisite for disconnection.
HELD
... the service of notice is a prerequisite for disconnection, and the appellant can not be allowed to go back upon its words and refuse the consumer the benefit of notice as contemplated by the agreement. The learned counsel for the appellant urged that the Delhi Electric Supply Undertaking will seriously suffer if this view is upheld. We do not understand as to what is the difficulty in the way of the appellant to serve a notice on the consumer before discontinuing the supply. It has to be appreciated that the licensee Undertaking is performing a public duty and is governed by a special statute and the law also contemplates service of a notice before disconnection of supply of electricity. The courts below have made it clear that they have not examined the case on merits. The question whether, the allegations of theft are true or not has to be examined and decided in an appropriate proceeding, and the appellant will not, therefore, be prejudiced by the present judgment in its claim. Para 4

CASES REFERRED
1. Jagarnath Singh v. B.S. Ramaswamy 1966 (1) SCR 885 Distinguished.


SHARMA,J.

1. This appeal by special leave arises out of a suit filed by the respondent-company against the appellant, Municipal Corporation of Delhi, for a mandatory injunction to restore the supply of electricity discontinued during the pendency of the suit. Initially the suit was filed for a prohibitory injunction from disconnecting the electric connection. The plaint was amended following stoppage of the supply of energy.

2. According to the plaintiffs case, the suit had to be filed as the Delhi Electricity Supply Undertaking was threatening disconnection without disclosing any reason. Subsequently, some officers of the Undertaking made an inspection of the meters and alleged theft of electricity after tampering with the seals affixed on the meters. A First Information Report was lodged with the police.

3. Admittedly no notice was served by the Delhi Electricity Supply Undertaking on the plaintiff before severing the electric connection. The learned trial court, however, dismissed the suit and the plaintiff appealed. The First Additional District Judge, Delhi, who heard the appeal decreed the suit on the sole ground of non-service of notice as required under condition no. 36 in regard to supply of electricity by the appellant. The Delhi High Court dismissed the appellants second appeal at the admission stage by a reasoned judgment.

4. The learned counsel for the appellant has contended that in view of the conduct of the plaintiff in stealing electricity, the Court should in its discretion refuse to issue a direction for restoration of the electric supply. We are afraid, it is not possible to agree with the appellant for more reasons than one. The plaintiff is seriously denying the allegation of theft and it is not possible to assume the accusation as correct without a full-fledged trial on this issue. The case of Jagarnath Singh v. B.S. Ramaswamy, 1966 (1) SCR 885; relied upon on behalf of the appellant is clearly distinguishable inasmuch as the consumer in that case was convicted under the Indian Penal Code, and the conviction was being maintained in appeal. Besides, the service of notice is a prerequisite for disconnection, and the appellant can not be allowed to go back upon its words and refuse the consumer the benefit of notice as contemplated by the agreement. The learned counsel for the appellant urged that the Delhi Electric Supply Undertaking will seriously suffer if this view is upheld. We do not understand as to what is the difficulty in the way of the appellant to serve a notice on the consumer before discontinuing the supply. It has to be appreciated that the licensee Undertaking is performing a public duty and is governed by a special statute and the law also contemplates service of a notice before disconnection of supply of electricity. The courts below have made it clear that they have not examined the case on merits. The question whether, the allegations of theft are true or not has to be examined and decided in an appropriate proceeding, and the appellant will not, therefore, be prejudiced by the present judgment in its claim. In the result, the appeal is dismissed but, without costs.

**********, 0 , 
CONTRACTS/INSURANCE/CONSUMER DISPUTES
General insurance - Insurance of property - Burglary and /or housebreaking policy - Theft - If included in the risks - Respondent taking out a policy against burglary and /house breaking in respect of property which included the godowns used for storing food grains - Theft of food grain bags from the godown - Notice by the insured - Respondent lodging FIR and subsequently raising a claim from the insurance company - Company repudiating the claim on the ground that theft was not covered by the policy and there was no burglary - Respondent raising a consumer dispute - District Forum holding that burglary included theft and hence appellant insurer directed to settle the claim - State Commission and National Commission too upholding the decision of the District Forum - Validity. Whether burglary included theft - Whether insurer liable for the loss arising from theft. Allowing the appeal of the insurer held that the terms of the contract have to be strictly read and natural meaning should be given and no outside help should be sought unless the meaning is ambiguous. When the term burglary has been defined in the policy then the cause should fall within the definition. The element of force and violence is a condition precedent for burglary or housebreaking and therefore in terms of the definition the theft should have preceded with force or violence and it is for the claimant to establish that theft or burglary took place precedent with force or violence and if it is not then the insurance company will be well within their right to repudiate the claim. Decision of the District Forum as upheld by the State and National Commissions held not sustainable. However the claim amount having been paid by the insurer, on the point of equity said decision not disturbed.
HELD
The policy is a contract between the parties and both parties are bound by the terms of contract. As per the definition of the word burglary, followed with violence makes it clear that if any theft is committed it should necessarily precede with violence i.e. entry into the premises for committing theft should involve force or violence or threat to insurer or to his employees or to the members of his family. Therefore, the element of force and violence is a condition precedent for burglary and housebreaking. The term burglary as defined in the English Dictionary means an illegal entry into the building with an intent to commit crime such as theft. But in absence of violence or force the insurer cannot claim indemnification against the insurance company. The terms of the policy have to be construed as it is and we cannot add or subtract something. Howsoever liberally we may construe the policy but we cannot take liberalism to the extent of substituting the words which are not intended. It is true that in common parlance the term burglary would mean theft but it has to be preceded with force or violence. If the element of force and violence is not present then the insurer cannot claim compensation against theft from the insurance company. (Para 6)

It is settled law that the terms of the contract has to be strictly read and natural meaning be given to it. No outside aid should be sought unless the meaning is ambiguous. (Para 14)

From the above discussion, we are of the opinion that theft should have preceded with force or violence as per the terms of insurance policy. In order to substantiate a claim an insurer has to establish that theft or burglary took place preceding with force or violence and if it is not, then the insurance company will be well within their right to repudiate the claim of the insurer. (Para 15)

However, all the three forums have already awarded compensation and the amount has been paid to the respondent, therefore, on the point of equity we would not like to disturb the payment which has already been made. However, in view of legal position stated by us, the orders of the District Forum, State Commission and the National Commission cannot be upheld. (Para 16)

CASES REFERRED
1.National Insurance Company Ltd. v. Public Type College II (2001) CPJ 26(NC). (Para 5)

2.Oriental Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Samayanallur Primary Agricultural Co-op. Bank JT 1999 (9) SC 9 (Para 10)

3.Oriental Insurance Co.Ltd. v. Sony Cheriyan reported in JT 1999 (6) SC 149 (Para 12)

4.General Assurance Society Ltd. v. Chandumull Jain and Anr. (1966) 3 SCR 500 (Para 13)

Foreign Cases Referred
:

1.Halsburys Laws of England Fourth Edition (203 Reissue) Para 646. (Para 6)

2.George and the Goldsmiths and General Burglary Insurance Association, Limited 1899 1 Q.B.595 (Para 7)

3.Dino Services Ltd. v. Prudential Assurance Co. Ltd. 1989 1 All ER 422 (Para 7)

A.K. MATHUR, J.

1. Leave granted.

2. This appeal is directed against the order passed by the National Consumer Disputes Redressal Commission, New Delhi in Revision Petition No.2159 of 2002 confirming the order passed by the State Consumer Disputes Redressal Commission, New Delhi as well as the order passed by the Consumer Disputes Redressal Forum-II (District Forum II), New Delhi.

3. The brief facts which are necessary for the disposal of the appeal are as follows. The respondent took out a policy by the appellant company for a sum of Rs.7 lacs against burglary and/or house breaking policy with effect from September 22, 1991 to September 21,1992. Necessary provisions of the policy read as under:

 THE COMPANY HEREBY AGREES subject to the terms and conditions contained herein endorsed/ or otherwise expressed hereon that if,

(a)The property hereinafter described or any part thereof be LOST or DAMAGED by BURGLARY and/or HOUSE BREAKING or

(b)ANY DAMAGE be caused to the premises to be made good by the insured from BURGLARY and/or HOUSE BREAKING or any attempt thereat.

4. The term Burglary and/or Housebreaking has been defined in terms of the policy also which reads as under.

 Burglary and/or Housebreaking shall mean theft involving entry to or exit from the premises stated therein by forcible and violent means or following assault or violence or threat thereof to the insured or to his employees or to the members of his family

5. There are exceptions to it with which we are not concerned. During the currency of the policy, the respondent had his stock of food grains kept in godown no.48, Srinagar Colony, Bharat Nagar, New Delhi. Shri Ashok Kumar Bansal, one of the partners of the respondent visited his godown on July 2, 1992 and there he found out that 197 bags of gwar were stolen. An F.I.R. was lodged at Police Station Sarai Rohilla under Section 380 of the Indian Penal Code on July 24,1992. Therefore, the respondent raised a claim against the appellant company under the aforesaid policy for incurring the aforesaid loss by theft. The appellant company repudiated the claim of the respondent on the ground that theft is not covered by the insurance policy as no burglary took place in the godown by use of force or violence. Therefore, the respondent approached the Consumer Disputes Redressal Forum-II (District Forum) and made a claim for the loss of 197 bags of gwar. The appellant company contested the claim and took the stand that the claim is not covered as per the insurance policy. However, the District Forum overruled the objection and held that burglary includes theft and by its order dated June 1, 1998 directed the appellant company to release the claim of the respondent within two months with interest at the rate of 15% per annum and also awarded cost quantified at Rs.1,000/-. Aggrieved against the said order of the District Forum the appellant company preferred an appeal before the State Consumer Disputes Redressal Commission, New Delhi which was registered as Appeal No.881 of 1998. The State Commission also by its order dated June 19,2002 upheld the claim of the respondent taking the view that notwithstanding the definition of the term burglary and/or housebreaking as defined in the policy, burglary includes theft also. It also relied upon a decision of the National Consumer Disputes Redressal Commission in the case of National Insurance Company Ltd. v. Public Type College1 . The State Commission thus dismissed the appeal filed by the appellant company. Aggrieved by the said order of the State Commission a revision was filed before the National Consumer Disputes Redressal Commission. The National Commission by its impugned order affirmed the claim of the respondent and dismissed revision on May 20,2003. Hence, the present appeal by way of special leave.

6. The question before us is whether in terms of the policy, the repudiation of the claim of the respondent by the appellant company is justified or not. We have already reproduced the terms of the policy as also the definition of burglary and/or housebreaking as defined in the policy. The definition given in the policy is binding on both the parties. The policy is a contract between the parties and both parties are bound by the terms of contract. As per the definition of the word burglary, followed with violence makes it clear that if any theft is committed it should necessarily precede with violence i.e. entry into the premises for committing theft should involve force or violence or threat to insurer or to his employees or to the members of his family. Therefore, the element of force and violence is a condition precedent for burglary and housebreaking. The term burglary as defined in the English Dictionary means an illegal entry into the building with an intent to commit crime such as theft. But in absence of violence or force the insurer cannot claim indemnification against the insurance company. The terms of the policy have to be construed as it is and we cannot add or subtract something. Howsoever liberally we may construe the policy but we cannot take liberalism to the extent of substituting the words which are not intended. It is true that in common parlance the term burglary would mean theft but it has to be preceded with force or violence. If the element of force and violence is not present then the insurer cannot claim compensation against theft from the insurance company. This expression appearing in the insurance policy came up for interpretation before the English Court and the English Courts in no uncertain terms laid down that burglary or theft has to be preceded with force or violence in order to be indemnified by the insurance company. In this connection reference may be made to the statement of law as summarized in Halsburys Laws of England Fourth Edition (203 Reissue) Para 646. It reads as under:

646. Forcible and violent entry. The terms of a burglary insurance may exclude liability in certain circumstances unless there is forcible and violent entry into the premises. If so, the entry must be obtained by the use of both force and violence or the definition is not satisfied and the policy does not apply. An entry obtained by turning the handle of an outside door or by using a skeleton key, though sufficient to constitute a criminal offence, is not within the policy since the element of violence is absent. However, an entry obtained by picking the lock or forcing back the catch by means of an instrument involves the use of violence and is therefore covered. The policy may be so framed as to apply only to violent entry from the outside; or the violent entry into a room within the insured premises may be sufficient. In any case, the violence must be connected with the act of entry; if the entry is obtained without violence, the subsequent use of violence to effect the theft, as for instance where a show-case is broken open, does not bring the loss within the policy. 

7. In this connection, a reference may be made to an earlier decision (Queens Bench Division) in re George and the Goldsmiths and General Burglary Insurance Association, Limited1. In this case, a policy was taken out for loss or damage by burglary and housebreaking. A theft took place at premises No.78, Strand, in a shop where the front door was shut but not locked or bolted and access to the shop could be obtained by turning the handle of the door. In the early morning before business hours, during the temporary absence of a servant of the assured, some person opened the front door, entered the shop, and breaking open a locked-up compartment or show-case and certain properties were stolen. Reversing the judgment of the Divisional Court, the Court of Appeal held that the loss which has occurred as above mentioned was not covered by the policy. Two propositions were advanced before the Court The first that an entry effected by the exercise of any force, however slight, was sufficient to constitute an entry within the meaning of policy. The contention was advanced that pushing a door open, if it were ajar, or turning the handle of a door, if the door were shut and could be opened in that way, was sufficient force to satisfy the language of the policy. The second proposition was that if that was so, and therefore it could not be said that the original entry in the case was effected by force within the meaning of the policy, yet nevertheless, the language of the policy was satisfied by the fact that the thief, after having entered the shop without force, proceeded to prise off an iron plate to which a locked padlock was attached securing a show-case in which valuables were placed. Their Lordships considered both the propositions and after reproducing the definition, observed that as per the plain reading of the expression used in terms of the policy violence is a condition precedent. The Court of Appeal reversed the decision of Queens Bench. This view was reiterated subsequently in the case of Dino Services Ltd. v. Prudential Assurance Co. Ltd.1. In this case also the proposition of law as enunciated in the case of George and Goldsmith and General Burglary Insurance Association Ltd. was reaffirmed. It was held as follows:

 In the context of a policy of insurance against theft from premises by  forcible and violent means of entry, the word violent was to be construed according to its ordinary meaning and meant entry by the use of any force which was accentuated or accompanied by a physical act which could properly be described as violent in nature and character. In the context of such a policy the word violent accordingly referred to the physical character of the means of entry and not merely to its unlawful character. It followed that the thieves, by gaining entry to the premises simply by using the proper keys to unlock the doors of the premises, had not entered the premises by violent means. Accordingly, the plaintiffs loss was not covered by the policy. The appeal would therefore be allowed.

8. Similarly, view has been expressed by American Courts also in American Jurisprudence 2nd (Vol. 44) 1401 which is as follows:

1401 Provisions as to visible marks or evidence, or use of force or violence

It is not uncommon for insurance companies to include in their theft or burglary policies provisions restricting their liability to cases where there were some visible marks or visible evidence of the use of force or violence. It is generally competent for an insurer to insert such a clause in the contract of insurance, and since such a provision is unambiguous it does not justify the applicability of the general principle that the insurance policy will be construed most favourable to the insured. However, the courts will not read such a requirement into a policy and do not require compliance with such clauses unless the unmistakable language of the policy so requires.

Such a policy requirement has been considered either as a limitation on the liability of the insurer or as a rule characterizing the evidence upon which liability must be predicated, but in either event, the validity of the requirement has been recognized and rarely questioned, although in at least one instance such a requirement has been held in contravention of public policy under the particular terms of the policy involved and the particular circumstances.

Just as policies insuring against burglary of an insureds premises commonly require visible marks upon the insureds premises or upon the exterior of the insureds premises, so also do safe-burglary policies commonly require visible marks either upon the insureds safe, or upon the exterior of the insureds safe, or upon the exterior of the doors of the insureds safe, and in some instances the requirement of visible marks or visible evidence has been imposed in policies pertaining to theft of property from an insureds automobile.

The determination of what constitutes visible marks or visible evidence within the meaning of such a provision, and of where such marks or evidence must be located in order to satisfy the policy requirement, is to a great extent depend upon the particular facts involved in relation to the specific requirements imposed by the policy. Where, for example, a burglary or theft policy requires that there must be visible marks of force or violence  at the place of entry into the premises, this requirement has been held complied with if the visible marks are only on one of the outer doors to the insureds premises, which the burglars or thieves must have used to accomplish their deed. However, under such a requirement, if the only visible marks are those on inside doors which are not at the entrance to the premises, recovery will be denied. Similarly, a policy providing against loss by burglary by felonious entry into a safe by actual force evidenced by visible marks made upon the exterior of all the doors does not cover loss sustained by felonious entry into the safe by a manipulation of the lock on the outer door with no visible marks made thereon, although the inner door of the safe did contain such marks, although there is contrary authority. The opening of a safe by manipulation of the combination within the period covered by a policy of burglary insurance which was made possible by force applied to the safe before such period, leaving visible marks upon the safe, was not within the terms of the policy insuring against loss through felonious entry into the safe by actual force and violence, leaving visible marks upon the safe and occurring within the policy period, with an exemption from liability from loss effected by opening the safe by manipulation of the lock.

9. It is possible that an insurer may sustain loss in technical terms of the criminal law, but no relief can be given to him unless his case is covered by the terms of the policy. It is not open to interpret the expression appearing in policy in terms of common law; but it has to give meaning to the expression as defined in the policy. The act that causes the loss must fall within the definition in the policy and it cannot take the cover and contents of the definition as laid down in the criminal law. Therefore, when the definition of the word burglary has been defined in the policy then the cause should fall within that definition. Once a party has agreed to a particular definition, he is bound by it and the definition of criminal law will be of no avail. In this connection, the decision of the National Consumer Disputes Redressal Commission in the case of National Insurance Company Ltd. v. Public Type College which has taken the colour and content of the definition given in the criminal law does not lay down the correct proposition of law. It is settled law that terms of the policy shall govern the contract between the parties, they have to abide by the definition given therein and all those expressions appearing in the policy should be interpreted with reference to the terms of policy and not with reference to the definition given in other laws. It is a matter of contract and in terms of the contract the relation of the parties shall abide and it is presumed that when the parties have entered into a contract of insurance with their eyes wide open, they cannot rely on definition given in other enactment. Thus, the decision of the National Consumer Disputes Redressal Commission in the case of National Insurance Company Ltd. v. Public Type College is not a good law and all the Tribunals i.e. National Consumer Disputes Redressal Commission, State Commission & District Forum having applied the ratio of that case; the impugned order cannot be sustained.
10. Reference in this connection may be made to the decision of this Court in the case of Oriental Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Samayanallur Primary Agricultural Co-op. Bank1 . In this case question came for interpretation of the similar policy, i.e., policy against burglary. The bank had two insurance policies with the Oriental Insurance Company Ltd. out of which one was cash insurance policy for Rs. 1 lac and the second was a burglary insurance policy for Rs. 25 lacs. The relevant terms of the policy were

3(a)- Are all valuables secured in Burglary resistance safes when Premises are locked Yes (b) If so, state name or maker of safe and cost
Tansi

11. The answer to the question 3(a) was in positive. The question arose that according to the complaint burglary took place from the cashiers cash box. The surveyors report was that the stolen jewels had not been kept in safe locker and the theft was not covered under burglary insurance policy. Though the District Forum directed the insurance company to pay a sum of Rs. 43,729.25 however, the State Commission observed that what is insured is not the contents of the cash box but the jewels kept in the safe which means a safety locker made by Tansi as agreed to in the proposal form. And it was observed that jewels kept in the cashiers cash box which were not covered by the policy. The State forum overruled the order passed by the District Forum. The order passed by the State Commission in revision was reversed by the National Commission. The matter came before this Court in special leave petition by insurance company. Their Lordships observed that there was no necessity of referring to the dictionaries for understanding the meaning of the word safe which the parties in the instant case are proved to have understood while submitting the proposal and accepting the insurance policy. The cashiers box could not be equated with the safe within the meaning of the insurance policy. The alleged burglary and the removal of the jewellery from cash box, the cash box was not covered by the insurance policy between the parties. The insurance policy has to be construed having reference only to the stipulations contained in it and no artificial far-fetched meaning could be given to the words appearing in it. And, therefore, they set aside the order of the National Commission.

12. Similarly, in the case of Oriental Insurance Co.Ltd. v. Sony Cheriyan2 an insurance was taken out under the Motor Vehicles Act, 1988 in which their Lordships observed :

The insurance policy between the insurer and the insured represents a contract between the parties. Since the insurer undertakes to compensate the loss suffered by the insured on account of risks covered by the insurance policy, the terms of the agreement have to be strictly construed to determine the extent of liability of the insurer. The insured cannot claim anything more than what is covered by the insurance policy.

13. Similarly in the case of General Assurance Society Ltd. v. Chandumull Jain and Anr.1 the Constitution Bench has observed that the policy document being a contract and it has to be read strictly. It was observed,

 In interpreting documents relating to a contract of insurance, the duty of the court is to interpret the words in which the contract is expressed by the parties, because it is not for the court to make a new contract, however reasonable, if the parties have not made it themselves. Looking at the proposal, the letter of acceptance and the cover notes, it is clear that a contract of insurance under the standard policy for fire and extended to cover flood, cyclone etc. had come into being.

14. Therefore, it is settled law that the terms of the contract has to be strictly read and natural meaning be given to it. No outside aid should be sought unless the meaning is ambiguous.

15. From the above discussion, we are of the opinion that theft should have preceded with force or violence as per the terms of insurance policy. In order to substantiate a claim an insurer has to establish that theft or burglary took place preceding with force or violence and if it is not, then the insurance company will be well within their right to repudiate the claim of the insurer.
16. However, all the three forums have already awarded compensation and the amount has been paid to the respondent, therefore, on the point of equity we would not like to disturb the payment which has already been made. However, in view of legal position stated by us, the orders of the District Forum, State Commission and the National Commission cannot be upheld.

17. But before parting with the case we would like to observe that the terms of the policy as laid down by the insurance company should be suitably amended by the insurance company so as to make it more viable and facilitate the claimants to make their claim. The definition is so stringent in the present case that it gives rise to difficult situation for the common man to understand that in order to maintain their claim they will have to necessarily show evidence of violence or force. The definition of the word burglary should be given meaning which is closer to the realities of life. The common man understands that he has taken out the policy against theft. He hardly understands whether it should precede violence or force. Therefore, a policy should be a meaningful policy so that a common man can understand what is the meaning of burglary in common parlance. Though we have interpreted the present policy strictly in terms of the policy but we hope that the insurance companies will amend their policies so as to make them more meaningful to the public at large. It should have the meaning which a common man can easily understand rather than become more technical so as to defeat the cause of the public at large.

18. In the result, we allow this appeal, set aside the order passed by the National Consumer Disputes Redressal Commission, New Delhi confirming the order of the State Commission & District Forum. But the amount of compensation which has already been paid to the respondent shall not be recovered in the facts and circumstances of the present case. No order as to costs.

**********, 0 , 
HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAWS
Penal Code, 1860
Sections 457, 380/34 - Theft - Recovery - Gold chain worn by PW2 lost on the night of 12-11-1995, while she was sleeping - No complaint filed as PWs 1 and 2 were not aware - FIR filed after sixteen days when police caught appellant roaming in a suspicious manner and he disclosed about the theft - Discovery statement made to PW7, circle inspector, regarding sale of chain to PW8 - PW 8 who allegedly purchased the gold chain did not support prosecutions case - Police official, PW3 corroborated PW7s version - Conviction on the basis of alleged recovery at his instance - Out of three, two accused acquitted. Held it is difficult to believe that PW2 was not aware about the theft of chain she was wearing. Only evidence against appellant is the alleged recovery of gold chain and Trial Court erred in convicting him on that basis alone. PW8 turned hostile. It is not safe to convict appellant on the evidence of police officials. Benefit of doubt given.
HELD
FIR was registered after about sixteen days from the date of alleged theft. PWs-1 and 2 did not even realize that the chain was stolen. It is only when the accused were brought to their house after about sixteen days that they realized that the chain was stolen and FIR was lodged. The chain in question was being worn by PW2. It is stated to have been stolen while she was sleeping. It is inconceivable that she would not realize that she had lost her chain. The incident in our view is not unfolded truthfully. A1 and A3 have been rightly acquitted because nothing links them to the offence. But, similar is the case with the appellant. The only evidence against him is the alleged recovery of gold chain at his instance. That cannot connect the appellant to the theft. The Trial Court has stated that since chain was recovered at the instance of the appellant, the only inference which can be drawn is that he committed the theft. Drawing such inference in the facts of this case would be totally unjust. Pertinently, PW8 from whose shop the chain is said to have been recovered has turned hostile. Thus, the prosecution is relying only on police witnesses. In this case, it is unsafe to do so. Grave doubt is, therefore, created as to whether the appellant could be involved in the offence of theft. We are, therefore, of the view that benefit of doubt must be given to the appellant and he must be acquitted. (Para 9)


(Smt.) RANJANA PRAKASH DESAI, J.

1. Leave granted.

2. The appellant (A2-Azeez) along with two others i.e. A1-Khalid and A3-Babu was tried by the Judicial Magistrate, First Class-I, Aluva for offences punishable under Sections 457 and 380 read with Section 34 of the Indian Penal Code (for short, the IPC). By order dated 15/12/2000, learned Magistrate convicted the appellant under Section 457 of the IPC and sentenced him to undergo rigorous imprisonment for one year. The appellant was further convicted for offence under Section 380 of the IPC and sentenced to undergo rigorous imprisonment for two years. The substantive sentences were ordered to run concurrently. A1-Khalid and A3-Babu were acquitted.

3. The appellant challenged the said order before the Additional Sessions Judge, Ernakulam. Learned Sessions Judge by his order dated 28/11/2002 confirmed the conviction and sentence and dismissed the appeal. Being aggrieved by the said conviction and sentence, the appellant filed a criminal revision petition in the Kerala High Court. By the impugned judgment, the High Court dismissed the revision petition. Hence, this appeal by special leave is filed against the said judgment.

4. According to the prosecution, the appellant along with A1-Khalid and A3-Babu with an intention of committing theft entered the house of PW1-Radha at Karumalloor Village on 12/11/1995 at 4.00 a.m. through the door which was kept open. They entered the bedroom where PW2- Renuka Devi was sleeping and committed theft of a gold chain weighing 14 grams worth Rs.7,500/- which PW2 was wearing while she was sleeping. A1 and A3 assisted the appellant in committing the offence. They gave the gold chain to the appellant for selling. The appellant sold the gold chain and the accused divided the sale proceeds and thereby committed the offence.

5. This case presents rather unusual facts. PW7, the Circle Inspector, stated that he arrested the accused on 28/11/1995 at 1 a.m. near the parking area, Municipal Buildings, Aluva, while they were moving in suspicious circumstances. On questioning them, it was revealed that they had committed the offence involved in this case, hence they proceeded to the house of PW1 at Aduvathuruthu and recorded her F.I.R.(Ext.P1).

6. PW1 in her evidence stated that her daughter PW2 was sleeping in her room on the night of 12/11/1995. PW2 was wearing Thara fashion gold chain. The gold chain was stolen but no complaint was lodged at the police station because PW2 did not realize that her gold chain was stolen. It is only on 28/11/1995 when the police came to their house along with the accused and the gold chain was shown to her that she realized that the gold chain was stolen. She identified the gold chain MO1. FIR (Ext.P1) was then lodged. PW2, the daughter, stated that on 12/11/1995 at about 11 p.m. she went to sleep. On the next day morning the gold chain was not seen. On 28/11/1995 when the police came to her house with the accused and showed her the chain, she realized that her chain was stolen. She identified the chain.

7. Evidence of PWs-1 and 2 raise several question marks. If gold chain worn by PW2 was removed by the accused at night, it is unbelievable that she would not realize it in the morning. Even PW1, the mother, did not realize that the chain worn by PW2 was not around her neck. Assuming this to be true, PWs-1 and 2 would at least realize the loss on the next day or a day thereafter. They did not realize that the chain was stolen till 28/11/1995, when the police came to their house with the accused and showed them the chain. At that time they realized that chain was stolen. It is on 28/11/1995 that PW1 lodged her complaint. Thus, the complaint came to be lodged about sixteen days after the incident that too after the police came to PW1s house with the chain. The sequence of events is not convincing and does not stand to reason.

8. According to the prosecution the appellant made a discovery statement to PW7-the Circle Inspector and pursuant to that statement PW7 went to the shop of PW8-Pradeep along with the appellant. The appellant is stated to have pointed out to PW8 as the man to whom he had sold the chain. However, PW8 has not supported the prosecution case. The courts below have while convicting the appellant placed reliance on the evidence of PW7-the Circle Inspector and PW3-the Head Constable who sought to corroborate the version of PW7 regarding recovery of chain at the instance of the appellant from the shop of PW8. We find it difficult to do so. Trial Court has observed that offence under Section 457 of the IPC is not made out because according to PW1 the thieves entered the door which was kept open. The Trial Court, therefore, acquitted the appellant of the offence punishable under Section 457 of the IPC. The Trial Court also acquitted A1 and A3 of the offence punishable under Section 457 read with Section 34 of the IPC. The Trial Court, however, observed that from the evidence of PWs-1 and 2 it is seen that theft had taken in the room in which PW2 was sleeping; the thief entered the house and committed theft of gold chain which PW2 was wearing and, therefore, this act will be covered by Section 451 of the IPC i.e. house-trespass in order to commit offence punishable with imprisonment. The Trial Court further held that since the recovery of gold chain was effected on the basis of statement given by the appellant the only inference that can be drawn is that he committed the theft of gold chain and therefore the case is covered by Section 380 of the IPC i.e. theft in a dwelling house. After observing that there is nothing in the evidence of PWs-1 to 8 to connect A1 and A3 with the crime the Trial Court acquitted them of all the offences. This view is affirmed by the Sessions Court and the High Court.

9. We find it difficult to uphold the above view so far as it relates to the appellant. As we have already noted that FIR was registered after about sixteen days from the date of alleged theft. PWs-1 and 2 did not even realize that the chain was stolen. It is only when the accused were brought to their house after about sixteen days that they realized that the chain was stolen and FIR was lodged. The chain in question was being worn by PW2. It is stated to have been stolen while she was sleeping. It is inconceivable that she would not realize that she had lost her chain. The incident in our view is not unfolded truthfully. A1 and A3 have been rightly acquitted because nothing links them to the offence. But, similar is the case with the appellant. The only evidence against him is the alleged recovery of gold chain at his instance. That cannot connect the appellant to the theft. The Trial Court has stated that since chain was recovered at the instance of the appellant, the only inference which can be drawn is that he committed the theft. Drawing such inference in the facts of this case would be totally unjust. Pertinently, PW8 from whose shop the chain is said to have been recovered has turned hostile. Thus, the prosecution is relying only on police witnesses. In this case, it is unsafe to do so. Grave doubt is, therefore, created as to whether the appellant could be involved in the offence of theft. We are, therefore, of the view that benefit of doubt must be given to the appellant and he must be acquitted.

10. We, therefore, allow the appeal. The impugned judgment and order is quashed and set aside. The appellant is acquitted of the offences under Sections 380 and 451 of the IPC. The appellant is in jail. He is directed to be released forthwith, unless he is required in any other case.

**********, 0 , 
HEADNOTE
CRIMINAL LAW
Indian Penal Code, 1860
Section 395 - Dacoity - Ingredients - No evidence of any theft or attempt to commit theft - Accused exploding a bomb and also firing gun - Only evidence of theft in realm of hearsay. Held that offence under section 395 IPC is not made out. (Paras 5, 6)

Criminal Procedure Code, 1973
Section 211(ii) with Indian Penal Code, 1860 - Section 457 - Scope - Accused charged with offence under section 395/311 IPC - Offence not proved - If can be conï¿½victed under section 457 - Armed accused shown to have forcibly entered the house. Held that they can be convicted under section 457 IPC even if they were not charged with said offence. (Paras 7, 8)


ORDER


1. Out of five persons challaned before the sessions court for the offence under section 395 IPC, four were convicted by the trial court and sentenced each of them to rigorous imprisonment for ten years. The four convicted persons filed appeals before the High Court. The conviction was confirmed in respect of two of them (who are appellants before us) while acquitting A4 - Tara Kant Jha and A5 - Badri Jha. However, the High Court reduced the sentence to rigorous imprisonment for seven years.

2. The occurrence happened during the night of 10th January, 1981 (the next morning was 11th). The prosecution case is that all the five accused entered into the courtyard of the house of PW5 Ram Prasad. The male persons of the house were then sleeping in the courtyard. After the assailants entered the courtyard, they trussed up three persons belonging to that house (PW1 Bimal, PW2 Ramchander and PW3 Mahender). They were threatened not to make any noise lest they would be killed. Thereafter, the assailants pushed the door of the house open and committed mischief there including theft of some silver ornaments. When PW4 (Shatrughan Prasad Yadav) tried to escape, one of the assailants fired a gun shot which hit him on the hand. While decamping, they exploded a bomb. Hearing the commotion, the neighbouring people rushed to the scene and haystacks were set fire to by them. In the light of the flames, the faces of the assailants were identified by the villagï¿½ers also.

3. It is unnecessary for us in this appeal to deal with the evidence in detail. We conclude that the case alleged against the convicted persons stand proved to the following extent:-

They entered into the house and tied up the three inmates of the house. They exploded something like a bomb - though none was injured thereby. They entered into the house forcibly opening the door. The story that one of them fired a gun at PW5 is not subï¿½stantiated. When the villagers rushed in, all the assailants left the place.

4. The prosecution attempted to make out that an offence of dacoity was committed. But they can succeed only if there was either theft or at least attempt to commit theft. There is no evidence that there was any act of theft or even attempt to commit theft. Of course, PW5 said that two lady inmates of the house reported to him later that their silver necklaces were snatched away by the dacoits. Unfortunately, those ladies were not examined and hence, the version of PW5 remained only in the realm of hearsay evidence. PW1 made an attempt to say that there was looting or that silver ornaments were stolen by the assailï¿½ants. This was not what he saw and perhaps this too would have been only reported to him. In cross-examination, he definitely said that he did not see any act of theft. No such ornament was recovered by the police during investigation.

5. Thus, there is total lack of evidence to show that the intrudï¿½ers committed theft or made any attempt to commit theft. Theft or extortion or attempt to commit any one of the two is an ineviï¿½table ingredient for robbery. In such a situation, it is extremely difficult for the prosecution to sustain the conviction for the offence under section 395 of the IPC. We, therefore, set aside the conviction and sentence passed on the appellants for the aforesaid offence.

6. The above is not enough to dispose of this appeal nor to exonerate the appellants completely from the charge. The acts proved by the prosecution would fall within the ambit of section 457 of the IPC. Learned counsel for the appellants made a bid to contend that the said count was not included in the charge and hence, the appellants are not liable to be convicted thereunder. Section 221(ii) enables the court to convict the appellants of the offence which they have shown to have committed, although they were not charged with it. If any such alteration is to be made, the question is whether any prejudice would be caused to the appellants. We asked learned counsel for the appellants whether they want another opportunity to cross-examine the proseï¿½cution witnesses focusing on the offence under section 457 IPC. Learned counsel fairly submitted that it is not necessary.

7. We, therefore, convict the appellants for the offence under section 457 read with section 34 of the IPC. We are told that the first appellant has undergone RI for more than three years and the second appellant has undergone RI for more than four years. We feel that the sentence for the aforesaid offence can be limitï¿½ed to imprisonment for the period already undergone by the apï¿½pellants, We do so.

8. The appeal is disposed of accordingly.

9. We direct the jail authorities to release the appellants from jail forthwith unless they are required in any other case.

**********, 0 , 
HEADNOTE
GENERAL INSURANCE
General insurance - Insurance against theft - Distinction between theft and criminal breach of trust - Respondent, a jewellery shop owner taking out a Jeweller Block Policy from the appellant - Customer visiting the shop taking away some ornament - Res-pondent lodging a claim with the insurer besides registering criminal complaint - Insurer rejecting the claim holding that entrustment of jewellery to customer did not constitute theft covered by the policy - State Consumer Protection Council also finding the claim of respondent to be unsustainable - High Court on appeal holding that it was not a case of entrustment but the act of removal of the goods by the customer constituted theft and therefore the insurer was liable - Whether High Court correct in holding so. Upholding the decision of the High Court held the customer in the instant case being an unknown person as seen from the FIR, there was no occasion for the respondent to entrust the jewellery to him and it being a case of theft, the insurer was clearly liable to make good the loss in terms of the policy taken by the respondent.
HELD
It is not in dispute that an insurance cover against theft was granted by the appellant. The insurance policy, thus, covered the risk of theft also. An insurer determines the extent of its risk. It floats the policy knowing fully well the risk it seeks to cover. Having regard to the determination of the risk only he fixes the quantum of premium. The insured while entering into a contract of insurance must precisely know the extent of his cover so that he may take out additional insurance if it is so required. (Para 7)

Clause 8 of the contract of insurance would be attracted only where the offences specified therein are committed by any of the persons mentioned therein. For defeating the claim of the respondent, it was, thus, obligatory on the part of the appellant to establish that the conditions prescribed therein were satisfied. (Para 9)

The word entrust would imply giving responsibility to a person upon whom the owner has confidence. It envisages establishment of a relationship. When a customer enters into a jewellery shop, as of necessity, the owner or his agent must allow him to inspect the merchandise, the customer intends to purchase. For the said purpose possession in the legal sense is not handed over. The owner or his agent does not loose complete control thereover. (Para 13)

For the purpose of arriving at a conclusion as to whether the exclusion clause is attracted or not, loss or damage must be occasioned, inter alia, by a customer in respect of the property entrusted to him. The word customer contained in clause 8 (c) of the Insurance Policy must be read ejusdem generis. A customer con-templated thereunder must have to be one who would be a man of trust. If a customer is not a man of trust or the property had not been entrusted to him, the exclusion clause would not apply. The customer who committed theft of jewellery was an unknown person. It was so categorically stated in the First Information Report. There was, thus, no occasion for the respondent to entrust the jewellery to him. (Para 14)

We, therefore, are clearly of the opinion that the view taken by the High Court was correct. The High Courts judgment is upheld. The appeal is dismissed. We, in the facts and circumstances of this case, also direct the appellant to pay and bear the cost of the respondent throughout. Counsels fee in this appeal is assessed at Rs.50,000/-. (Para 24)

CASES REFERRED
1.M/s Peacock Plywood Pvt. Ltd. v. The Oriental Insurance Co. Ltd. JT 2007 (1) SC 191 (Para 8)

2.United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Kiran Combers & Spinners (2007) 1 SCC 368 (Para 8)

3.United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Pushpalaya Printers JT 2004 (4) SC 352 (Para 8)

4.Ram Narayan Popli etc. v. Central Bureau of Investigation etc. JT 2003 (1) SC 184 (Para 23)

5.Superintendent and Re-membrancer of Legal Affairs, W.B. v. S.K. Roy AIR 1974 SC 794 (Para 22)

6.The State of Gujarat v. Jaswant Lal Natha Lal (1968) 2 SCR 408 (Para 21)

S.B. SINHA , J.

1. Appellant insurer is before us questioning the correctness or otherwise of a judgment and order dated 10.09.1999 passed by a Division Bench of the High Court of Jammu & Kashmir in CIMA 21 of 1998 allowing the appeal preferred by the respondent herein from a judgment and order dated 16.12.1997 passed by the Jammu & Kashmir Consumers Protection Com-mission.

2. Respondent herein carries on business in jewellery It obtained a policy known as Jeweller Block Policy. A theft of 140 gms of jewellery worth of Rs.63,000/- occurred in his business premises. A First Information Report was lodged therefor. Respondent also lodged a claim with the appellant herein. The same having not been settled for a long time, an application was filed before the State Consumers Protection Commission constituted under the J & K Consumers Protection Act, 1987.

3. The question raised before the Commission was as to whether the loss in question was covered by the insurance policy. Appellant contended that the claim of the respondent is covered by an exclusion clause contained in the policy, which reads as under :

8. Loss or damage occasioned by theft or dishonesty or any attempt there at committed by or where such loss or damage has been expedited or in any way sustained or brought about by :

(a) any of the insureds family members;

(b) any servant or traveller or messenger in the exclusive employment of the insured;

(c) any customer or broker or their customer or angadias or cutters or goldsmiths in respect of the property hereby insured entrusted to them by the insured his or their servants or agents.

4. The Commission by reason of its order dated 16.12.1997, inter alia, found the said claim to be not sustainable on the ground that the loss was not covered by the said policy, stating :

...It appears to us that while preparing the insurance agreement the insurer was aware of the fact that this could be the easiest way for any Jeweller to raise claims against the insurance companies and that is why this clause has been deliberately introduced and theft by customer if any has been put in exclusive clause of the policy...

5. The High Court, as indicated hereinbefore, by reason of its judgment
and order dated 10.09.1999, did not agree therewith. It was held :

What is meant by the term entrustment (and) does handing over of jewellery to a customer amounts to entrustment ? The dictionary meaning of the word entrust would be to give to another for care, protection or to commit something trustfully or plays trust upon a person. If a customer enters the premises of a shopkeeper and examines some movable property and takes away the same, then there hardly arises any occasion for entrustment to such a customer. In the present case a customer entered the business premises and removed 140 gms. of Jewellery. There was no entrustment on the part of the owner to the customer. The act of removal of the goods by the customer is nothing but a plain theft. This is a dishonest taking and removing of the property by the customer with the intent of permanently depriving the owner.

6. A short question which, thus, arises for our consideration is as to whether clause 8 of the policy is applicable to the facts and circumstances of the present case.

7. It is not in dispute that an insurance cover against theft was granted by the appellant. The insurance policy, thus, covered the risk of theft also. An insurer determines the extent of its risk. It floats the policy knowing fully well the risk it seeks to cover. Having regard to the determination of the risk only he fixes the quantum of premium. The insured while entering into a contract of insurance must precisely know the extent of his cover so that he may take out additional insurance if it is so required.

8. However, there may be an express clause excluding the applicability of insurance cover. Wherever such exclusionary clause is contained in a policy, it would be for the insurer to show that the case falls within the purview thereof. In a case of ambiguity, it is trite, the contract of insurance shall be construed in favour of the insured. See United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Pushpalaya Printers1, M/s Peacock Plywood Pvt. Ltd. v. The Oriental Insurance Co. Ltd.2 and United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Kiran Combers & Spinners3.

9. Clause 8 of the contract of insurance would be attracted only where the offences specified therein are committed by any of the persons mentioned therein. For defeating the claim of the respondent, it was, thus, obligatory on the part of the appellant to establish that the conditions prescribed therein were satisfied.

10. Keeping in view the aforementioned legal aspect of the matter, we may advert to the meaning of the word entrust. Its ordinary meaning, would mean to charge or invest with a trust; to commit to another with a certain confidence regarding his care See Advanced Law Lexicon by P. Ramanatha Aiyar 3rd Edn.-Book 2 page1613.

11. It requires no elaboration that offences of breach of trust and theft contain different ingredients. Whereas theft has been defined in Section 378 of the Indian Penal Code; breach of trust has been defined in Section 405 thereof, which reads as under :

378. Theft.- Whoever, intending to take dishonestly any moveable property out of the possession of any person without that persons consent, moves that property in order to such taking, is said to commit theft.

12. Illustration (d) appended thereto reads as under :

(d) A, being Zs servant, and entrusted by Z with the care of Zs plate, dishonestly runs away with the plate, without Zs consent. A has committed theft.

405. Criminal breach of trust.-Whoever, being in any manner entrusted with property, or with any dominion over property, dishonestly misappropriates or converts to his own use that property, or dishonestly uses or disposes
of that property in violation of any direction of law prescribing the mode in which such trust is to be discharged, or of any legal contract, express or implied, which he has made touching the discharge of such trust, or willfully suffers any other person so to do, commits criminal breach of trust

13. The word entrust would imply giving responsibility to a person upon whom the owner has confidence. It envisages establishment of a relationship. When a customer enters into a jewellery shop, as of necessity, the owner or his agent must allow him to inspect the merchandise, the
customer intends to purchase. For the said purpose possession in the legal sense is not handed over. The owner or his agent does not loose complete control thereover.

14. For the purpose of arriving at a conclusion as to whether the exclusion clause is attracted or not, loss or damage must be occasioned, inter alia, by a customer in respect of the property entrusted to him. The word customer contained in clause 8 (c) of the Insurance Policy must be read ejusdem generis. A customer contemplated thereunder must have to be one who would be a man of trust. If a customer is not a man of trust or the property had not been entrusted to him, the exclusion clause would not apply. The customer who committed theft of jewellery was an unknown person. It was so categorically stated in the First Information Report. There was, thus, no occasion for the respondent to entrust the jewellery to him.

15. Mr. Vishnu Mehra, the learned counsel appearing for the appellant has relied upon the meaning of the word entrust as contained in Blacks Law Dictionary, 8th Edn. and Websters Universal Dictionary.

16. In Blacks Law Dictionary, the word entrust has been defined as under :

To give (a person) the responsibility for something after establishing a confidential relationship.

17. In Websters Universal Dictionary meaning of the word entrust reads as under :

To confer as a responsibility, duty etc. to place, something in anothers care.

18. Apart from the fact that the said meaning of the term entrustment goes against the submission of Mr. Mehra, we may notice that in Blacks Law Dictionary the word entrusting in commercial law has been described as The transfer of possession of goods to a merchant who deals in goods of that type and who may in turn transfer the goods and all rights to them to a purchaser in the ordinary course of business. Transfer of possession of goods, therefore, is a sine qua non for entrustment. The person must be handed over the possession of the property. Illustration (d) appended to Section 378 IPC envisages a situation of this nature. It by no stretch of imagination would have contemplated a situation where an unknown customer would have committed theft.

19. The word entrustment, moreover, must be read in the context in which it has been used.

20. In Colinvauxs Law of Insurance, 7th Edn., by Robert Merkin at page 50, it is stated :

Words in context

The above generality is not applicable when it is clear from the context that the words are not used in a colloquial popular sense. Thus the word flood in the phrase strom, tempest or floor does not cover a case where a house-holders bathroom is affected by upward seepage of water to a depth of three inches, as the context of the word requires an event violent, sudden or abnormal. Similarly, heavy rain is not in itself likely to constitute a storm. It has also been held that the phrase sum actually paid in a reinsurance agreement referred to a sum which the reinsured is merely liable to pay, as the agreement read as a whole was against liability rather than actual payment.

21. In The State of Gujarat v. Jaswant Lal Natha Lal1, this Court held :

...The expression entrustment carries with it the implication that the person handing over any property or on whose behalf that property is handed over to another, continues to be its owner. Further the person handing over the property must have confidence in the person
taking the property so as to create a fiduciary relationship between them. A mere transaction of sale cannot amount to an entrustment...

22. In Superintendent and Re-membrancer of Legal Affairs, W.B. v. S.K. Roy1, this Court held :

12. To constitute an offence under Section 409 IPC, it is not required that misappropriation must necessarily take place after the creation of a legally correct entrustment or dominion over property. The entrustment may arise in
any manner whatsoever. That manner may or may not involve fraudulent conduct of the accused. Section 409 IPC, covers dishonest misappropriation in both types of cases; that is to say, those where the receipt of property is itself fraudulent or improper and those where the public servant misappropriates what may have been quite properly and innocently received. All that is required is what may be described as entrustment or acquisition of dominion over property in the capacity of a public, servant who, as a result of it, becomes charged with a duty to act in a particular way, or, atleast honestly.

23. Yet again in Ram Narayan Popli etc. v. Central Bureau of Investigation etc.2, it was held :

361. To constitute an offence of criminal breach of trust, there must be an entrustment, there must be misappropriation or conversion to ones own use, or use in violation of a legal direction or of any legal contract; and the misappropriation or conversion or disposal must be with a dishonest intention. When a person allows others to misappropriate the money entrusted to him, that amounts to a criminal breach of trust as defined by Section 405. The section is relatable to property in a
positive part and a negative part. The positive part deals with criminal misappropriation or conversion of the property and the negative part consists of dishonestly using or disposing of the property in violation of any direction and of law or any contract touching the discharge of trust.

362. In Jaswantrai Manilal Akhaney v. State of Bombay it was held that if the Managing Director of the Bank entrusted with securities owned by the pledgor disposes of their securities against the stipulated terms of the contract entered into by the parties with an intent to cause wrongful loss to the pledgor and wrongful gain to the Bank, there can be no question but that the Managing Director has necessary mens rea required by Section
405.

363. The term entrustment is not necessarily a term of law. It may have different implications in different contexts. In its most general signification all it imports is the handing over possession for some purpose which may not imply the conferring of any proprietary right at all.

364. When a person misappropriates to his own use the property that does not belong to him, the misappropriation is dishonest even though there was an intention to restore it at some future point of time.

24. We, therefore, are clearly of the opinion that the view taken by the High Court was correct. The High Courts judgment is upheld. The appeal is dismissed. We, in the facts and circumstances of this case, also direct the appellant to pay and bear the cost of the respondent throughout. Counsels fee in this appeal is assessed at Rs.50,000/-.

**********, 0 , 
HEADNOTE
INSURANCE LAW
Rule of contra proferentem - Insurance Policy covered theft following an actual forcible and violent entry/or exit from the premises - Appellant made a case for theft without forcible entry - Respondent No.1 rejected the claim as for a valid claim violent and forcible entry was necessary - Appellant invoked Rule of contra proferentem, alleging ambiguity in terms of policy. Held it is well-settled law that there is no difference between a contract of insurance and any other contract, and that it should be construed strictly without adding or deleting anything from the terms thereof. A plain reading of the policy shows that a forcible entry should precede the theft, and unless that is proved, claim cannot be accepted. There being no ambiguity in the relevant clause of the policy, rule of contra proferentem cannot be invoked. United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Orient Treasures (P) Ltd. JT 2016 (1) SC 147, General Assurance Society Ltd. cases referred.
HELD
We are of the opinion that there is no error committed by the MRTP Commission in rejecting the Claim of the Appellant. It is clear from the facts of the present case that the Appellant has made out a case of theft without a forcible entry. The case of the Appellant is that forcible entry is not required for a claim to be made under the policy. Following the well-accepted principle that a contract of insurance which is like any other commercial contract should be interpreted strictly, we are of the opinion that the policy covers loss or damage by burglary or house breaking which have been explained as theft following an actual, forcible and violent entry from the premises. A plain reading of the policy would show that a forcible entry should precede the theft, and unless they are proved, the claim cannot be accepted. (Para 7)

It is well-settled law that there is no difference between a contract of insurance and any other contract, and that it should be construed strictly without adding or deleting anything from the terms thereof. On applying the said principle, we have no doubt that a forcible entry is required for a claim to be allowed under the policy for burglary/house breaking. (Para 9)

The Policy in this case is in a standard form. The policy for Burglary and House Breaking in United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Orient Treasures (P) Ltd. (supra) and the policy in this case are identical. If there is any ambiguity or doubt the clause in the Policy should be interpreted in favour of the insured. But we see no ambiguity in the relevant clause of the policy and the rule of contra proferentem is not applicable. (Para 12)

For the aforementioned reasons, we uphold the order of the MRTP Commission and dismiss the Appeal with no order as to costs. (Para 13)

RULE OF CONSTRUCTION
Rule of contra proferentem - Verba chartarum fortius accipiuntur contra proferentem - What is. Held, the rule states that ambiguity in the wording of the policy is to be resolved against the party who prepared it. MacGillivrays case, Colinvauxs Law of Insurance referred. (Para 10)

CASES REFERRED
1.United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Orient Treasures (P) Ltd. JT 2016 (1) SC 147 (Para 4.1)

2.United India Assurance Co. Ltd. v. Harchand Rai Chandan Lal JT 2004 (8) SC 8 (Para 5)

3.General Assurance Society Ltd. v. Chandmull Jain and Anr.  1966 (3) SCR 500 (Para 11)

L. NAGESWARA RAO, J.

1. The Appellant is a wholly owned Public Sector Undertaking of the Government of Orissa. The Appellant finances medium and large scale industries within the State of Orissa and is also involved in setting up joint sector industries with private entrepreneurs. The Appellant extended a term loan of Rs. 40,74,000/- to M/s. Josna Casting Centre Orissa Pvt. Ltd. As the loan amount was not repaid, the Appellant exercising its power under Section 29 of the State Finance Corporation Act, 1951, took over the assets of M/s. Josna Casting Centre Orissa Private Limited on 14-02-1992. On 23-01-1996, the Appellant insured the said assets with Respondent No. 1 for a sum of Rs. 46,00,000/- under the Miscellaneous Accident Policy, Rs. 60,40,000/- under the Fire Policy and Rs. 46,00,000/- under the Burglary and House Breaking Policy.

2. The seized assets were put to auction by the Appellant on 22-01-1997 at which point of time it was detected that some parts of the plant and machinery were missing from the factory premises. The Appellant registered an FIR on 25-01-1997 in the Remona Police Station, Balasore regarding the theft/burglary of the plant and machinery. On 07-02-1997, the Appellant informed Respondent No. 1 about the theft and requested for issuance of a claim form. A claim was lodged with Respondent No. 1 on 16-12-1997 for an amount of Rs. 34,40,650/- under the Burglary and House Breaking Policy. The valuation reports given by GEC, Calcutta, the machines supplier and Alpha Transformer Ltd., Bhubaneswar were relied upon by the Appellant/Claimant. The claim of the Appellant was repudiated by Respondent No. 1 on 31-03-1998 on the ground that the alleged loss did not come within the purview of the insurance policy.

3. The Appellant filed compensation application No. 45 of 2001 under Section 12-B read with Section 36-A of the Monopolies and Restrictive Trade Practices (MRTP) Act, 1969, which was rejected by the MRTP Commission, New Delhi by its Order dated 17-08-2005. Aggrieved by the said Order, the Appellant has preferred the present Appeal.

4. Mr. Raj Kumar Mehta, counsel for the Appellant took us through the proposal form for Burglary and House Breaking Insurance (Business) Premises. The scope of cover in the said proposal form is as follows:

SCOPE OF COVER

This Insurance Policy provides cover against loss or damage by Burglary or House breaking i.e. (theft following an actual, forcible and violent entry of and/or exit from the premises) in respect of contents of offices, warehouses, shops, etc. and cash in safe or strong room and also damage caused to the premises, except as detailed below:

4.1 It was further submitted by Mr. Mehta that the rule of contra proferentem would be applicable to the present case and he relied upon the judgment of this Court in United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Orient Treasures (P) Ltd. reported at JT 2016 (1) SC 147 : 2016 (3) SCC 49.

5. Mr. Mehta submitted that the words theft following an actual forcible and violent entry/or exit from the premises are with reference only to house breaking and not burglary. According to him, forcible and violent entry is not necessary for making a valid claim under the policy. It would be sufficient that there is theft of certain goods from the factory premises, which fact has been proved by the Appellant. Mr. Mehta referred to a judgment of this Court in United India Assurance Co. Ltd. v. Harchand Rai Chandan Lal reported in JT 2004 (8) SC 8 : 2004 (8) SCC 644 which related to a claim pertaining to a theft and attempted to distinguish it. He submitted that the clause in the policy in that case is different from that involved in the present case. He urged that the Commission committed an error in relying upon the said judgment to reject the Claim Application for the Appellant.

6. Mr. Salil Paul, Advocate for Respondent No.1 submitted that there is no difference in the policies involved in the case cited supra and the instant case. He also urged that an insurance policy is akin to a commercial contract and has to be construed strictly. Mr. Paul submitted that a forcible entry and/or exit is compulsory for maintainability of a claim under the policy.

7. Having considered the submissions made on both sides, we are of the opinion that there is no error committed by the MRTP Commission in rejecting the Claim of the Appellant. It is clear from the facts of the present case that the Appellant has made out a case of theft without a forcible entry. The case of the Appellant is that forcible entry is not required for a claim to be made under the policy. Following the well- accepted principle that a contract of insurance which is like any other commercial contract should be interpreted strictly, we are of the opinion that the policy covers loss or damage by burglary or house breaking which have been explained as theft following an actual, forcible and violent entry from the premises. A plain reading of the policy would show that a forcible entry should precede the theft, and unless they are proved, the claim cannot be accepted. The provisions of the policy in United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Harchand Rai Chandan Lal (supra) read as under:

THE COMPANY HEREBY AGREES subject to the terms and conditions contained herein endorsed/or otherwise expressed hereon that if, the property hereinafter described or any part thereof be LOST or DAMAGED by BURGLARY and/or HOUSE BREAKING, or ANY DAMAGE be caused to the premises to be made good by the insured from BURGLARY and/or HOUSE BREAKING or any attempt thereat.

7.1 The term burglary and/or house breaking has been defined in terms of the policy which are as follows:

Burglary and/or house breaking shall mean theft involving entry to or exit from the premises stated therein by forcible and violent means or following assault or violence or threat thereof to the insured or to his employees or to the members of his family.

8. A comparison of the above terms as defined in the policy in the case of United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Harchand Rai Chandan Lal (supra) and the scope of cover in the proposal form in the instant case are similar. This Court in the said judgment of United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Harchand Rai Chandan Lal (supra) considered the scope of a policy involving burglary and house breaking and held as follows:

The policy is a contract between the parties and both parties are bound by the terms of contract. As per the definition of the word burglary, followed with violence, makes it clear that if any theft is committed it should necessarily be preceded with violence i.e. entry into the premises for committing theft should involve force or violence or threat to insurer or to his employees or to the members of his family. Therefore, the element of force and violence is a condition precedent for burglary and housebreaking. The term burglary as defined in the English Dictionary means an illegal entry into the building with an intent to commit crime such as theft. But in absence of violence or force the insurer cannot claim indemnification against the insurance company. The terms of the policy have to be construed as it is and we cannot add or subtract something. Howsoever liberally we may construe the policy but we cannot take liberalism to the extent of substituting the words which are not intended. It is true that in common parlance the term burglary would mean theft but it has to be preceded with force or violence. If the element of force and violence is not present then the insurer cannot claim compensation against theft from the insurance company. This expression appearing in the insurance policy came up for interpretation before the English Courts and the English Courts in no uncertain terms laid down that burglary or theft has to be preceded with force or violence in order to be indemnified by the insurance company. In this connection reference may be made to the statement of law as summarized in Halsburys Laws of England Fourth Edition (2003 Reissue) Para 646. It reads as under:

646. Forcible and violent entry. The terms of a burglary insurance may exclude liability in certain circumstances unless there is forcible and violent entry into the premises. If so, the entry must be obtained by the use of both force and violence or the definition is not satisfied and the policy does not apply. An entry obtained by turning the handle of an outside door or by using a skeleton key, though sufficient to constitute a criminal offence, is not within the policy since the element of violence is absent. However, an entry obtained by picking the lock or forcing back the catch by means of an instrument involves the use of violence and is therefore covered. The policy may be so framed as to apply only to violent entry from the outside; or the violent entry into a room within the insured premises may be sufficient. In any case, the violence must be connected with the act of entry; if the entry is obtained without violence, the subsequent use of violence to effect the theft, as for instance where a show-case is broken open, does not bring the loss within the policy.

9. It is well-settled law that there is no difference between a contract of insurance and any other contract, and that it should be construed strictly without adding or deleting anything from the terms thereof. On applying the said principle, we have no doubt that a forcible entry is required for a claim to be allowed under the policy for burglary/house breaking.

10. We proceed to deal with the submission made by counsel for the Appellant regarding the rule of contra proferentem. The Common Law rule of construction verba chartarum fortius accipiuntur contra proferentem means that ambiguity in the wording of the policy is to be resolved against the party who prepared it. MacGillivray on Insurance Law1 deals with the rule of contra proferentem as follows:

The contra proferentem rule of construction arises only where there is a wording employed by those drafting the clause which leaves the court unable to decide by ordinary principles of interpretation which of two meanings is the right one. One must not use the rule to create the ambiguity - one must find the ambiguity first. The words should receive their ordinary and natural meaning unless that is displaced by a real ambiguity either appearing on the face of the policy or, possibly, by extrinsic evidence of surrounding circumstances. (footnotes omitted)

Colinvauxs Law of Insurance2 propounds the contra proferentem rule as under:

Quite apart from contradictory clauses in policies, ambiguities are common in them and it is often very uncertain what the parties to them mean. In such cases the rule is that the policy, being drafted in language chosen by the insurers, must be taken most strongly against them. It is construed contra proferentes, against those who offer it. In a doubtful case the turn of the scale ought to be given against the speaker, because he has not clearly and fully expressed himself. Nothing is easier than for the insurers to express themselves in plain terms. The assured cannot put his own meaning upon a policy, but, where it is ambiguous, it is to be construed in the sense in which he might reasonably have understood it. If the insurers wish to escape liability under given circumstances, they must use words admitting of no possible doubt.

But a clause is only to be contra proferentes in cases of real ambiguity. One must not use the rule to create an ambiguity. On must find the ambiguity first. Even where a clause by itself is ambiguous if, by looking at the whole policy, its meaning becomes clear, there is no room for the application of the doctrine. So also where if one meaning is given to a clause, the rest of the policy becomes clear, the policy should be construed accordingly. (footnotes omitted)

11. This court in General Assurance Society Ltd. v. Chandmull Jain and Anr., reported in 1966 (3) SCR 500 held that there is no difference between a contract of insurance and any other contract except that in a contract of insurance there is a requirement of uberima fides, i.e., good faith on the part of the insured and the contract is likely to be construed contra proferentes, i.e., against the company in case of ambiguity or doubt. It was further held in the said judgment that the duty of the Court is to interpret the words in which the contract is expressed by the parties and it is not for the Court to make a new contract, however reasonable.

12. In United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Orient Treasures (P) Ltd. (supra) cited by the Counsel for the Appellant, it was held that there is no ambiguity in the insurance policy and so the rule of contra proferentem was not applicable. A standard policy of insurance is different from other Contracts and in a claim under a standard policy the rule of contra proferentem is to be applied. The Policy in this case is in a standard form. The policy for Burglary and House Breaking in United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Orient Treasures (P) Ltd. (supra) and the policy in this case are identical. If there is any ambiguity or doubt the clause in the Policy should be interpreted in favour of the insured. But we see no ambiguity in the relevant clause of the policy and the rule of contra proferentem is not applicable.

13. For the aforementioned reasons, we uphold the order of the MRTP Commission and dismiss the Appeal with no order as to costs.

**********, 0 , 
HEADNOTE
CONSTITUTION OF INDIA, 1950:
Article 32 - Army service - Petitioner dismissed from service for having abetted the commission of offence of theft - Principal accused acquitted of the offence - Abetment fails when substantive offence is not established against the principal offender - Respondents directed to pay the entire pension and other entitlements to the petitioner.

CRIMINAL LAW
Abetment
Abetment of offence of theft - Principal accused acquitted - Abetment fails when substantive offence is not established against the principal offender.

SERVICE AND LABOUR LAW
Army Service
Reinstatement - Petitioner dismissed from service for having abetted the commission of offence of theft - Principal accused acquitted of the offence - Abetment fails when substantive offence is not established against the principal offender - Respondents directed to pay the entire pension and other entitlements to the petitioner - Constitution of India, 1950, Article 32.
HELD
Having examined the facts in the instant case, we are of the view that the ratio laid down in Faguna Kanta Naths case and later followed in Madan Raj Bhandaris case is attracted. The petitioner was charged with the offence of abetment by conspiracy of the commission of the offence of theft by Major Trilok Chand. The High Court of Allahabad has clearly held that there was no evidence that Major Trilok Chand has committed the theft; therefore, unless the substantive offence against the principal offender is established, the question of abettor being held guilty under these circumstances does not arise. The petitioner is alleged to have entered into a conspiracy alongwith eight others and abetted the commission of the offence. All the other alleged abettors are acquitted and the principal offender Major Trilok Chand is also acquitted and the petitioner alone remains in the picture as one having abetted the offence by entering into conspiracy. It is axiomatic that there cannot be a conspiracy of one. In Topan Das v. The State of Bombay 1955(2) SCR 881 it was held that two or more persons must be parties to such an agreement and one person along can never be held guilty of criminal conspiracy for the reason that one cannot conspire with oneself. Para 9

CASES REFERRED
1. Lt. Col. (TS) Harbans Singh Sandhu v. Union of India and Others Judgment dated 22.1.1978.

2. Madan Raj Bhandari v. State of Rajasthan 1970 (1) SCR 688

3. Jamuna Singh v. State of Bihar AIR 1967 SC 553

4. Faguna Kanta Nath v. The State of Assam 1959 Supp.(2) SCR 1

5. Topan Das v. The State of Bombay 1955 (2) SCR 881


REDDY,J.:

1. This petition is filed under Article 32 of the Constitution of India seeking an appropriate writ directing the respondents i.e. Union of India and the Chief of the Army Staff to restore the petitioner to service with all consequential benefits and grant of pension.

2. The petitioner entered the Indian Army in 1939 and served in Burma during the Second World War and later joined Indian National Army and fought under the leadership of the Netaji Subhash Chander Bose and on India attaining independence, he rejoined Indian Army in 1948 and was promoted to the rank of Hawaldar. He was released from Army service on 15.10.1964 consequent to the reduction of manpower and consequently he joined Defence Security Corps on 14.9.1967 and served till 29.7.78. While serving in Defence Security Corps in 1976 at Pathankot, he alongwith Major Trilok Chand who at the relevant time was serving as their Officer and nine others was charge-sheeted by the Court-martial. The charge against them was that Trilok Chand committed the theft of 250 wheel drums while getting them loaded in a civil truck and that the others abetted the commission of the said offence. Major Trilok Chand was found guilty and out of the nine abetters, eight abetters were acquitted. Major Trilok Chand was awarded one year imprisonment. The petitioner was dismissed from the service with an imprisonment of 90 days in civil prison. Major Trilok Chand questioned the proceedings of the Court-martial before the High Court of Allahabad in Writ Petition No. 13161 of 1981. The High Court allowed the writ petition and held that there was no evidence that it was Trilok Chand who removed the wheel drums and consequently the High Court found that there was no material to support the charge of theft. The review petition filed by the Union of India was dismissed by the High Court and the S.L.P. No. 9294 of 1987 filed by the Union of India in the Supreme Court was dismissed on 5.10.87. Consequently Major Trilok Chand has been reinstated in the service.

3. In view of the fact that the main accused has been acquitted and reinstated in service, the petitioner requested the authorities to review his case and give the necessary relief but his request was rejected. Hence the present petition.

4. Learned counsel for the petitioner submitted that since the principal accused Major Trilok Chand has been acquitted of the charge of theft and has also been reinstated, the petitioner who was only charged of abetment of the said offence of theft can not be found guilty.

5. In support of his submissions, learned counsel has relied on some of the decisions of this Court in Faguna Kanta Nath v. The State of Assam (1959) Supp. 2 SCR 1,Jamuna Singh v. State of Bihar, AIR 1967 SC 553 and Madan Raj Bhandari v. State of Rajasthan, (1970) 1 SCR 688.

6. In Faguna Kanta Naths case the appellant was tried for an offence under Section 165A of the Indian Penal Code for having abetted the commission of an offence by an officer. The said officer was acquitted on the ground that no offence under Section 161 was committed. Consequently, the Court held that appellants conviction for the offence of abetment was not maintainable.

7. This case is referred to in Jamuna Singhs case and it is held that it cannot be held in law that a person cannot ever be convicted of abetting a certain offence when the person alleged to have committed that offence in consequence of the abetment has been acquitted. The question of the abettors guilt depends on the nature of the act abetted and the manner in which the abetment was made. The offence of abetment is complete when the alleged abettor has instigated another or engaged with another in a conspiracy to commit the offence. It is not necessary for the offence of abetment that the action abetted must be committed. It is only in the case of a person abetting an offence by intentionally aiding another to commit that offence that the charge of abetment against him would be expected to fail when the person alleged to have committed the offence is acquitted of that offence.

8. Madan Raj Bhandaris is a case where the appellant was charged with having abetted one Mst. Radha in causing miscarriage to a woman and that Mst. Radha was acquitted but the appellant was convicted. This Court referred to the principle laid down in Faguna Kantha Naths case and held that the facts of the present case fell within the rule that a charge of abetment fails ordinarily when the substantive offence is not established against the principal offender. It may not be necessary to multiply the discussions on this aspect.

9. Having examined the facts in the instant case, we are of the view that the ratio laid down in Faguna Kanta Naths case and later followed in Madan Raj Bhandaris case is attracted. The petitioner was charged with the offence of abetment by conspiracy of the commission of the offence of theft by Major Trilok Chand. The High Court of Allahabad has clearly held that there was no evidence that Major Trilok Chand has committed the theft; therefore, unless the substantive offence against the principal offender is established, the question of abettor being held guilty under these circumstances does not arise. The petitioner is alleged to have entered into a conspiracy alongwith eight others and abetted the commission of the offence. All the other alleged abettors are acquitted and the principal offender Major Trilok Chand is also acquitted and the petitioner alone remains in the picture as one having abetted the offence by entering into conspiracy. It is axiomatic that there cannot be a conspiracy of one. In Topan Das v. The State of Bombay 1955(2) SCR 881 it was held that two or more persons must be parties to such an agreement and one person along can never be held guilty of criminal conspiracy for the reason that one cannot conspire with oneself.

10. We may also mention here that under similar circumstances this Court in Writ Petition No. 553 of 1972 - Lt. Col. (TS) Harbans Singh Sandhu v. Union of India and Others Judgment dated 22.11.78, directed the payment of pension and the gratuity as per the rules.

11. For all these reasons, we direct the respondents to pay the entire pension, gratuity and other entitlements to the petitioner as per the rules within four months. The Writ Petition is accordingly allowed with costs.

**********, 0 , 
HEADNOTE
ELECTRICITY LAWS
Indian Electricity Act, 1910
Sections 39 and 44 - Electricity supply - Tampering of electricity meter and theft of electricity by two industrial users (a company and a partnership firm) located side by side - Theft detected by surprise raid during the night - Managing director of the company and the partners of the firm convicted by the trial court and sentenced to three months imprisonment besides monetary fine -Lower appellate court dismissing the appeals - High Court also dismissing the revision - Validity. Held large scale theft of electricity being an alarming problem causing enormous loss to the Electricity Suppliers, should be dealt with firmly and besides disconnection of supply and conviction of the erring persons, heavy monetary fine should be levied. In the instant cases theft of enormous electricity having been established, no interference was called for in so far as the conviction of the appellants is concerned. However in view of peculiar facts since the appellants had already served out a part of the sentence, instead of making them serve out the remainder term after a lapse of 17 years, in the interest of justice monetary fine imposed by the lower court enhanced.
HELD
On consideration of the totality of the entire case, we do not find any merit in the submissions made on behalf of the appellants. In our view, no interference is called for in the impugned judgment so far as conviction of the appellants under Sections 39 and 44 of the Act is concerned and consequently, we uphold the impugned judgment as far as conviction of the appellants is concerned. (Para 28)

We have also heard the learned counsel for the appellants on the point of sentence. It was submitted before the Trial Court and before this Court also that it is the first offence of the appellants. They have family members and minor dependents. Appellant number 2 is a lady. More than 17 years have elapsed and now, sending the appellants to jail for serving out the remaining part of their sentence would be extremely harsh. The appellants have already served out a part of their sentence and sending them back to jail to serve out the remaining sentence would cause tremendous hardship to the appellants and their family members. (Para 29)

Large scale theft of electricity is a very alarming problem faced by all the State Electricity Boards in our country, which is causing loss to the State revenue running into hundreds of crores every year. In our considered view, after proper adjudication of the cases of all those who are found to be guilty of the offence of committing theft of electricity, apart from the sentence of conviction, the Court should invariably impose heavy fine making theft of electricity a wholly non-profitable venture. The most effective step to curb this tendency perhaps could be to discontinue supply of electricity to those consumers for temporarily or permanently who have been caught abstracting electricity in a clandestine manner on more than one occasion. The legislature may consider incorporating this suggestion as a form of punishment by amending Section 39 of the Indian Electricity Act of 1910. (Para 30)

On consideration of the peculiar facts and circumstances of the case, where the appellants have already served out a part of the sentence and instead of compelling them to serve out the remaining sentence after lapse of 17 years, in the interest of justice, we deem it appropriate to increase the fine from Rs.40,000/- each to Rs.3,00,000/- each in case of appellants number 1 and 3 (Jagmodhan Mehatabsing Gujaral and Harcharanpalsing Nanda respectively) and from Rs.20,000/- to Rs.2,00,000/- under Section 39 of the Act in case of appellant number 2 (Mrs. Rupender Kaur Harcharanpalsing). The appellants are further sentenced to pay a fine of Rs.5,000/- each under Section 44 of the Act. (Para 31)


Dalveer Bhandari, J.


1. Leave granted.

2. This appeal is directed against the judgment of the High Court of Judicature at Bombay dated 23.1.2006 in Criminal Revision Application No.458/2005 and Criminal Revision Application No.11 of 2006.

3. The appellants in this appeal had been convicted by the Additional Chief Judicial Magistrate, First Class, Pune, by the judgment dated 21.12.1996 under Sections 39 and 44 of the Indian Electricity Act, 1910 (hereinafter referred to as the Act) and were also directed to pay a fine. These appellants were directed to suffer three months rigorous imprisonment. Appellants number 1 & 3 were also directed to pay a fine of Rs.40,000/- each and appellant number 2 to pay a fine of Rs.20,000/- under Section 39 of the Act.

4. The appellants, aggrieved by the said judgment of the Additional Chief Judicial Magistrate, Pune, filed an appeal before the Ad-hoc Additional Sessions Judge, Pune being Appeal No. 12 of 1997. The learned Additional Sessions Judge again evaluated the entire evidence and examined the documents on record and reached the same finding and consequently dismissed the appeal filed by the appellants.

5. The Criminal Revision filed against the said judgment of the Additional Sessions Judge was dismissed by the High Court of Judicature at Bombay vide judgment dated 23.1.2006. Both the learned Additional Sessions Judge and the High Court upheld the decision of the Additional Chief Judicial Magistrate.

6. The brief facts which are relevant to dispose of this appeal are recapitulated as under.

7. Appellant number 1 was the Managing Director of M/s. Nanda Glass Industries Pvt. Ltd., located at Gat No. 679/680 Valu, Taluka Bhor and appellants number 2 and 3 are the partners of the partnership firm M/s. Technoframes. Both the industries were adjacent to each other.

8. The Consumer number of M/s. Nanda Glass Industries Pvt. Ltd. is 17941-900102-3 with sanctioned load CD 225 KVA for toughening of glass. The Consumer number of M/s. Technoframes is 1-416 with Meter No. 9030013/TPHR 605 dated 10.7.1986. The sanctioned load of Consumer number 1-416 is 60 H.P. for toughening of glass.

9. Upon receiving information that there was theft of electric energy being committed by the appellants at these two electric connections for their industry at night, the complainant V. G. Kokane, the then Dy. Executive Engineer and in-charge of flying squad of MSEB and Executive Engineer, Kadam with their other testing staff etc. and two Panchas went to M/s. Nanda Glass Industries Pvt. Ltd. and Technoframes in the intervening night of 3/4.10.1989 for the purpose of inspection and checking.

10. It was found that the power of 225 KVA was sanctioned to accused no. 1 on contract demand with H.T. metering for the purposes of recording consumption. One iron box was provided for Trivector Meter. The box was closed and duly sealed under the seal of M.S.E.B. There was CTPC unit provided at D.P. Pole from which the wires were brought into the Meter Box through a conduit pipe so that they could not be tampered. The appellants dislocated the conduit pipe at the bend and socket. They had cut and removed voltage wire of one phase and current wire of another phase so that actual consumption could not be recorded by the meter. Similarly, the appellants by tampering meters ensured that actual consumption of power used for main furnaces and blower was not recorded from December, 1987 so that there could not be any difficulty in putting explanation, if any, called upon by the M.S.E.B. The daily consumption of power was to be recorded by the consumer in prescribed G-7 form, but it was found that it was written only once in every month. On 3.5.1988 while it was inspected by the Testing Division abruptly, abnormal difference was found between the entries noted by the consumer in G-7 form and the reading recorded by the officers of the M.S.E.B. The copies of these forms were attached to the complaint.

11. In the intervening night of 3/4-10-1989, when the complainant and his companions went to the premises they found one watchman on the gate who was called Bapu Bhagwan Alder. He was said to be a Shift Operator-cum-Supervisor and he showed the actual condition of the connections to them. Bapu Bhagwan Alder had put his signatures on the Inspection Reports drawn on the spot, being exhibit Nos.90 and 91. He also voluntarily gave one statement in writing (marked as exhibit No. 80) stating that the industry was actually working at the time of the visit. The factory was normally working in three shifts. It was found at the place of L.T. Connection supplied for Technoframes that though the said company was bearing a different name, the electric power was being used for toughening of glass in M/s. Nanda Glass Industries. The members of the raid team along with complainant found drastic changes and tampering done by the accused in the said connection wherein three incoming wires and other three outgoing wires of the meter were joined together at their respective ends by taking them out from outgoing phase of the terminal box of the meter. Therefore, the meter was totally by-passed and it was not recording the electricity which was consumed. The meter terminal cover and the seals of the M.S.E.B. were not available and there was 100% theft of energy of 60 H.P. The complainant V.G. Kokane had taken photographs to show the tampering of the electric connection and taking of such photographs was indicated in the seizure panchanama.

12. The appellants did not pay any amount more than the minimum charges to the Board, whereas the actual consumption of the electricity was much more. It was assessed by the complainant as an Expert in the field that there was consumption of 10,00,000 units and 16075 VA power worth of Rs.12,00,000/- from H.T. connection whereas 5,00,000 units worth of Rs.4,50,000/- from L.T. connection and the theft of energy of Rs.16,50,000/- committed by them. The photographs of the actual position seen by the raiding party were taken on the spot and that they were produced in the police station during investigation. Similarly, the original seals of H.T. Meter Box were cut and seized in a closed packet duly sealed under the signatures of the Panchas which were also produced by them in the police station. As it was likely that there will be rejoining or change in the position of the L.T. Connection (I-416) the room in which it was installed was duly locked and the lock was sealed with paper bearing signatures of the Panchas was pasted on it. Both the keys of the lock were also given by the complainant in the police station along with the complaint. The complaint was registered at the Bhor Police Station at about 7.30 p.m. on 4.10.1989. The original panchnama drawn by the M.S.E.B. officials and the Panchas at the time of actual raid were also produced by the complainant with true statement of consumption of M/s. Nanda Glass Industries for the purposes of evidence in support of the allegations.

13. After proper investigation of the entire case, the charges against the appellants were framed under Sections 39 and 44 of the Electricity Act, to which the appellants pleaded not guilty. It may be pertinent to mention that the presence of accused Ravindra Birbal Khadake could not be secured in spite of issuing warrants and the Chief Judicial Magistrate was pleased to order for separation of trial against him. We are not concerned with the said accused in this appeal.

14. In the trial of the instant case the prosecution had examined seven witnesses Ramchandra Paigude, PW1 attested the panchanama of exhibit 74. It was drawn during the surprise visit by the raiding party in the night. He also proved exhibit 78 a sealed packet (that was opened in the court), containing three seats which were removed from the meter in the premises of the glass industry. Shankar Anpat, PW2, Executive Engineer, Lokhote, PW3, Junior Engineer, Security Officer, complainant Vijay Kokane PW4, Dy. Executive Engineer and in charge of flying squad and Pathan PW5, Junior Vigilance Officer were employees of the MSEB. These officials of the board described how they had visited the factory and detected existence of fraudulent means of abstraction of electricity without recording consumption in the meter. PW6 is one of the panch witnesses who had attested exhibit 101. In his presence, another panch had climbed atop the meter room located in the premises of Technoframes. It was found that planks in the roof were newly fitted with fresh nailing. Vishnu Mane PW7 had investigated the offence and sent charge sheet to the court.

15. Ramchandra Paigude PW1, an independent witness, fully supported the prosecution version. He was under no obligation to favour the Board officials. He had also stated that the watchman Wadkar had called Bapu Aldar and he was introduced as shift supervisor and had taken the raiding party to the electric installations.

16. The defence of the appellants is that of denial of abstraction and dishonest consumption or use of electric energy by them directly or by any artificial means or the means not authorized by the licensee.

17. The appellants were found guilty of the offences punishable under Sections 39 and 44 of the Electricity Act. According to the Trial Court, the prosecution had succeeded in establishing the commission of theft of the electric energy worth about Rs.16,50,000/-.

18. The appellants, aggrieved by the judgment of the Trial Court, preferred an appeal before the learned Sessions Court, Pune. The first Appellate Court again examined in detail the entire evidence and the arguments advanced by the parties. The first Appellate Court also examined the relevant decided cases of this Court and other courts. The appeal filed by the appellants was dismissed by a detailed and comprehensive judgment dated 27.12.2005.

19. The appellants preferred a revision petition before the High Court of Judicature at Bombay, which was dismissed vide order dated 23.1.2006. The appellants, aggrieved by the said judgment of the High Court, have preferred this appeal.

20. It was submitted by the appellants that the complainant was not authorized to file FIR. The Trial Court had considered this argument of the appellants. The Trial Court has correctly mentioned in its judgment that by the amendment in the provisions of Section 50, the word Government or a State Electricity Board or an Electric Inspector or a person aggrieved by same has been amended and the officers of the State Electricity Board or a person aggrieved by the theft are authorized by the notification to lodge a complaint. The complainant was fully justified in filing the complaint. We do not find any merit in this argument of the appellants.

21. The appellants submitted that there is manifest error in the judgment of the Trial Court, which was affirmed by the first appellate court and the High Court, by which the appellants were convicted and sentenced to three months rigorous imprisonment on the ground that the theft of electricity to the extent of an amount of Rs.17,35,453.52 was extracted by the appellants, whereas, the Civil Court had come to the conclusion and passed the decree in favour of the respondent Maharashtra State Electricity Board in Civil Suit No.156/92 for only Rs.3,07,999.74.

22. On evaluation of the entire evidence and documents on record when the case of theft has been fully proved, then whether the theft of energy was to the extent of Rs.17,35,453.52 or Rs.3,07,999.74, really makes no difference, as there was theft of energy on a large scale for a long time. The appellants cannot take advantage of the fact that the respondents had not appealed against the judgment of the Joint Civil Judge, Senior Division, Pune, who had passed the decree for Rs.3,07,999.74.

23. The appellants had also alleged that 48 hours notice was not given to the appellants before conducting the raid.

24. The Trial Court had dealt with the aspect of giving 48 hours notice before conducting the raid. In a case of a surprise raid 48 hours notice to the appellants is not envisaged by the Legislature and otherwise also it would have been counter productive, because there was a strong possibility of obliterating and/or destroying the entire evidence to connect the appellants with the crime. Moreover, even if it is so accepted, it is on record that the Watchman and Bapu Bhagwan Alder were found present in the premises on behalf of the appellants and that they did assist the raiding team to carry on their work. It is reported by the police in reply to summons that Bapu Bhagwan Alder was serving in some Glass Factory in Pune, but he could not be traced out for the purpose of tendering the evidence before the Court. In fact, it was possible for the appellants to bring him in the box, at least as defence witness, to state that he had no concern with the industry of the accused. Moreover, the employment record or muster roll of the Industry of the accused was not brought for inspection by this Court. Suppression of this clearly gives rise to considerable substance in the allegations of the prosecution. By and large this negatives the arguments on behalf of the appellants that the raid is illegal or otherwise defective. Therefore, we do not find any substance in this submission made by the appellants.

25. The appellants further submitted that the courts in the impugned judgment ought to have appreciated the circumstance that more than 17 years have elapsed; that one of the accused/appellants is a lady partner in the firm and that in fact the public prosecutor had consented and argued for reducing the sentence.

26. The appellants further submitted that the courts below have not properly considered the entire case in the proper perspective because there was no evidence about the tampering with the meter.

27. In the Panchnama, it is categorically mentioned that exhibit no. 91 is the Inspection Sheet pertaining to M/s. Technoframes, Consumer No. I-416 and the observations made are as under:

Meter Terminal Box Seal and cover missing. All the coming and outgoing wires are connected together in the incoming hole resulting total buy passing of meter and no consumption is recorded in the meter.

Therefore, we find no substance in this submission that there was no evidence of tampering of electricity meters by the appellants.

28. On consideration of the totality of the entire case, we do not find any merit in the submissions made on behalf of the appellants. In our view, no interference is called for in the impugned judgment so far as conviction of the appellants under Sections 39 and 44 of the Act is concerned and consequently, we uphold the impugned judgment as far as conviction of the appellants is concerned.

29. We have also heard the learned counsel for the appellants on the point of sentence. It was submitted before the Trial Court and before this Court also that it is the first offence of the appellants. They have family members and minor dependents. Appellant number 2 is a lady. More than 17 years have elapsed and now, sending the appellants to jail for serving out the remaining part of their sentence would be extremely harsh. The appellants have already served out a part of their sentence and sending them back to jail to serve out the remaining sentence would cause tremendous hardship to the appellants and their family members.

30. Large scale theft of electricity is a very alarming problem faced by all the State Electricity Boards in our country, which is causing loss to the State revenue running into hundreds of crores every year. In our considered view, after proper adjudication of the cases of all those who are found to be guilty of the offence of committing theft of electricity, apart from the sentence of conviction, the Court should invariably impose heavy fine making theft of electricity a wholly non-profitable venture. The most effective step to curb this tendency perhaps could be to discontinue supply of electricity to those consumers for temporarily or permanently who have been caught abstracting electricity in a clandestine manner on more than one occasion. The legislature may consider incorporating this suggestion as a form of punishment by amending Section 39 of the Indian Electricity Act of 1910.

31. On consideration of the peculiar facts and circumstances of the case, where the appellants have already served out a part of the sentence and instead of compelling them to serve out the remaining sentence after lapse of 17 years, in the interest of justice, we deem it appropriate to increase the fine from Rs.40,000/- each to Rs.3,00,000/- each in case of appellants number 1 and 3 (Jagmodhan Mehatabsing Gujaral and Harcharanpalsing Nanda respectively) and from Rs.20,000/- to Rs.2,00,000/- under Section 39 of the Act in case of appellant number 2 (Mrs. Rupender Kaur Harcharanpalsing). The appellants are further sentenced to pay a fine of Rs.5,000/- each under Section 44 of the Act.

32. The appellants, in case, have already paid fine imposed by the Trial Court under Section 39 of the Act, then the appellants are directed to deposit only the remaining amount of fine within a period of eight weeks from the date of this judgment. In case the amount of fine, as directed by this Court under Sections 39 and 44 of the Act, is not deposited within the stipulated time, then the appellants shall be taken into custody to serve out the remaining part of their sentence, as imposed by the Trial Court and upheld in the impugned judgment by the High Court.

33. This appeal is accordingly disposed of in terms of the aforesaid observations.

**********, 0 , 
HEADNOTE
SERVICE AND LABOUR LAWS
Industrial Disputes Act, 1947
Section 11A - Workman - Dismissal for misconduct - Proportionality of punishment - Employee of State Road Transport Corporation committing thefts of automobile parts from Depot - Management instituting an enquiry proceedings and also initiating criminal proceedings - Court absolving the employee in the criminal proceedings - Enquiry proceedings establishing the theft -Corporation dismissing the employee from service - Before the Labour Court delinquent employee admitting the theft and pleading to be excused as being the first offence - Labour Court upholding the dismissal -Single Judge of High Court on a writ filed by the delinquent holding that the dismissal was disproportionate and therefore directing his reinstatement with continuity in service but without back wages - Division Bench dismissing the appeal - Validity - Whether dismissal was disproportionate to the act of misconduct. Allowing the appeal of the Corporation held that the employee having committed a serious misconduct of theft and admitted the same before the Labour Court and thus having lost the confidence of the employer, the High Court erred in considering the punishment of dismissal to be disproportionate to the act of misconduct. Order of Labour Court upholding the dismissal accordingly restored.
HELD
In our view, the theft committed by the respondent amounts to misconduct and, therefore, we have no hesitation to set aside the orders passed by the learned Single Judge and also of the Division Bench and restore the order of removal of the respondent from service. When the Labour Court has proved the charges, no interference by the learned Single Judge or by the Division Bench of the High Court was called for. In the instant case, the jurisdiction vested with the Labour Court has been exercised judiciously and fairly. In our opinion, the conclusion arrived at by the High Court in ordering reinstatement; continuity of service was shockingly disproportionate to the nature of charges already proved which is in the nature of theft. (Para 22)

It is also not open to the Tribunal and Courts to substitute their subjective opinion in place of the one arrived at the domestic Tribunal. In the instant case, the opinion arrived at by the Corporation was rightly accepted by the Tribunal but not by the Court. We, therefore, hold that the order of reinstatement passed by the Single Judge and the Division Bench of the High Court is contrary to the law on the basis of a catena of decisions of this Court. In such cases, there is no place for generosity or sympathy on the part of the judicial forums for interfering with the quantum of punishment of removal which cannot be justified. Similarly, the High Court can modify the punishment in exercise of its jurisdiction under Article 226 of the Constitution only when it finds that the punishment imposed is shockingly disproportionate to the charges proved. (Para 23)

Interfering therefore with the quantum of punishment of the respondent herein, is not called for. In our opinion, the respondent has no legal right to continue in the Corporation. As held by this Court, in a catena of judgments that the loss of confidence occupies the primary factor and not the amount of money and that sympathy and generosity cannot be a factor which is permissible in law in such matters. When the employee is found guilty of theft, there is nothing wrong in the Corporation losing confidence or faith in such an employee and awarding punishment of removal. In such cases, there is no place of generosity or place of sympathy on the part of the judicial forums and interfering with the quantum of the punishment. (Para 24)

For the aforementioned reasons, we hold that the orders passed by learned Single Judge and as modified and affirmed by the learned Judges of the Division Bench in Writ Appeal No. 108 of 2005 dated 29.06.2005 deserves to be set aside. Accordingly, we do so. (Para 25)


Dr. AR. Lakshmanan, J.

1. Leave granted.

2. The Department Manager A.P.S.R.T.C. is the appellant in this appeal. The respondent joined as cleaner in the A.P.S.R.T.C. (in short the Corporation) on 02.10.1976. While working as mechanic, he was involved in a serious case of theft. On 23/24.08.1986, while working in the night shift, he committed a theft of Fuel Injection Pump. This apart, he was also involved in stealing an alternator bearing while working in the night shift on 11.09.1986.

3. He also unauthorisedly entered into the tyre section of the depot and stole a new tube of 900 x 20 size on 23/24.09.1986. A sponge sheet was also stolen from the garage of Gajuwaka Depot, where he was working. A charge-sheet was issued to the respondent framing four charges.

4. The charges are as under:

1.For having stolen the Corporation property of fuel injection pump bearing No. AVD 2305 which was fitted to the engine No. 170207 during the night shift on 23/24.08.86 in the garage which constitutes misconduct under Reg. No. 28(x) of APSRTC Employees conduct, Reg.1963.

2. For having stolen the Corporation property of an alternator bearing No. 3440 during the night shift of 11.09.86 when it was fitted to the parked vehicle in the garage which constitutes misconduct under Reg. No. 28(x) of APSRTC Employees Conduct, Regulations, 1963.

3. For having unauthorisedly entered into the tyres section and stolen the new tube of 900 x 20 size on 23/24.09.86 which constitutes misconduct under Reg. No. 28(x) of APSRTC Employees Conduct, Regulations, 1963.

4. For having stolen the sponge sheets SR from the garage of Gajuwaka depot which constitutes misconduct under Reg. No. 28(x) of APSRTC Employees Conduct, Regulations, 1963.

5. An Enquiry Officer was appointed to enquire into the charges and submit a report. In the domestic enquiry conducted on the charges levelled against the respondent, full and fair opportunity was given to him to defend himself. The Enquiry Officer, on completion of the domestic enquiry, had submitted a report holding the respondent guilty of all the charges that were levelled against him.

6. A criminal case was also initiated against the respondent in C.C. No. 751/1987. The Criminal Court by its judgment and order dated 16.05.1987 acquitted the respondent of the charges that were levelled against him.

7. Basing on the Enquiry Officers report, the Depot Manager, on independently examining the matter, came to a conclusion that orders of removal would be an appropriate punishment for the proved charges of theft. Accordingly, the Depot Manager issued proceedings for removing the respondent from the services of the Corporation.

8. Aggrieved by the order of his removal, the respondent raised an Industrial Dispute. In I.D. No. 139/1992, the Labour Court came to the conclusion that the charges holding that the respondent was involved in a case of theft of the property belonging to the Corporation were correctly proved and the punishment of removal was justified under the factual circumstances of the case.

9. Aggrieved by the award of the Labour Court, the respondent preferred a writ petition before the High Court of Andhra Pradesh at Hyderabad.

10. The learned Single Judge of the High Court came to a conclusion that the charges of theft were correctly proved against the respondent. But, however, came to a conclusion that punishment of removal was not in consonance with the gravity of the charges proved against the respondent. Accordingly, the High Court held that the Labour Court ought to have exercised its power under Section 11A of the Industrial Disputes Act. Accordingly, the Single Judge held that the respondent had put in 12 years of unblemished service and deserved a lenient view in the matter. Hence, by his judgment and order dated 31.12.2004, the learned Single Judge passed a judgment by setting aside the order of removal and directed reinstatement of the respondent with continuity of service but without back wages.

11. The appellant - Corporation preferred a writ appeal before the Division Bench of the High Court under Clause 15 of Letters Patent.

12. By its impugned order dated 29.06.2005, the Division Bench of the High Court dismissed the writ appeal filed by the appellant herein. Aggrieved against the order passed by the Division Bench, the above civil appeal has been filed in this Court.

13. We heard Mr. Mahesh Babu, learned counsel for the appellant and Mr. Vijaya Bhaskar, learned counsel for the respondent. Learned counsel for the appellant submitted that the High Court has failed to appreciate that the misconduct of theft involved in by the respondent was a serious misconduct warranting no less a punishment than removal from services of the Corporation and that the High Court has also failed to appreciate that the delinquent employee gave a statement in which he admitted that he had stolen the property of the Corporation but handed over the same to his friend for sale, and that the Labour Court, on the basis of the said evidence, rightly removed the respondent from the services of the Corporation. Arguing further, learned counsel for the appellant submitted that the Division Bench of the High Court has also failed to appreciate that once the Labour Court in its award, passed orders of removal, by taking into consideration the entire factual circumstances of the case, it does not deserve interference. The High Court, in its extraordinary jurisdiction under Article 226 of the Constitution could not interfere with the said order of removal.

14. Mr. Vijaya Bhaskar, learned counsel for the respondent strenuously contended that the order passed by learned Single Judge and by the Division Bench of the High Court does not call for any interference and that the Division Bench of the High Court has ordered only reinstatement of the respondent without back wages and therefore the Corporation is not prejudiced in any manner. He further submitted that the respondent had put in 12 years of service and deserves a lenient view in the matter.

15. Learned counsel for the respondent further submitted that the respondent had an unblemished career in the past and therefore a lenient view should have been taken as rightly taken by the learned Single Judge and as modified by the Division Bench of the High Court in ordering only reinstatement.

16. We have carefully considered the rival submissions and perused the orders passed by the Labour Court and of the High Court and other annexures. In our opinion, the High Court has failed to appreciate that the delinquent employee categorically admitted that he had stolen the property of the Corporation. The Labour Court, on a careful perusal of the evidence, rightly ordered removal of the respondent from service. When the delinquent employee admitted his guilt before the Enquiry Officer that he had handed over the alternator from pan shop to the police authorities and further deposed that he had handed over the stolen property and requested the Labour Court to excuse him since it was his first offence. The Tribunal rightly set aside the request by taking into consideration the entire factual circumstances on record and after careful examination of the same and held that the delinquent employee does not deserve any sympathy and therefore he ordered removal from service.

17. Learned Single Judge of the High Court likewise also failed to appreciate the statement given by the delinquent employee admitting the guilt and however ordered reinstatement, continuity of service but without back wages.

18. Likewise, the learned Judges of the Division Bench also failed to appreciate that once the Labour Court in its award held removal from service by taking into consideration the entire facts and circumstances of the case, it does not deserve interference and that the High Court in its extraordinary jurisdiction under Article 226 of the Constitution could not have interfered with the said orders of the removal.

19. The enquiry reports also clearly reveal that the departmental enquiry was conducted after giving fair and reasonable opportunity to the delinquent official, after following the procedure and as per the regulations.

20. The learned Single Judge considered the past conduct of the delinquent employee as one of the ground in taking a lenient view. In our view, past conduct of workman is not relevant in departmental proceedings. Likewise, the learned Single Judge has erred in holding that the workman did not involve in any misconduct of theft during his past services and on that ground, granted reinstatement with continuity of service.

21. Learned Judges of the High Court have also failed to appreciate that once an employee lost the confidence of employer, it would not be safe and in the interest of the Corporation to continue the employee in the service. The punishment, imposed by the management in the facts and circumstances of the case, is not disproportionate and that the punishment of removal from service is the just and reasonable and proportionate to the proved misconduct.

22. In our view, the theft committed by the respondent amounts to misconduct and, therefore, we have no hesitation to set aside the orders passed by the learned Single Judge and also of the Division Bench and restore the order of removal of the respondent from service. When the Labour Court has proved the charges, no interference by the learned Single Judge or by the Division Bench of the High Court was called for. In the instant case, the jurisdiction vested with the Labour Court has been exercised judiciously and fairly. In our opinion, the conclusion arrived at by the High Court in ordering reinstatement; continuity of service was shockingly disproportionate to the nature of charges already proved which is in the nature of theft.

23. It is also not open to the Tribunal and Courts to substitute their subjective opinion in place of the one arrived at the domestic Tribunal. In the instant case, the opinion arrived at by the Corporation was rightly accepted by the Tribunal but not by the Court. We, therefore, hold that the order of reinstatement passed by the Single Judge and the Division Bench of the High Court is contrary to the law on the basis of a catena of decisions of this Court. In such cases, there is no place for generosity or sympathy on the part of the judicial forums for interfering with the quantum of punishment of removal which cannot be justified. Similarly, the High Court can modify the punishment in exercise of its jurisdiction under Article 226 of the Constitution only when it finds that the punishment imposed is shockingly disproportionate to the charges proved.

24. Interfering therefore with the quantum of punishment of the respondent herein, is not called for. In our opinion, the respondent has no legal right to continue in the Corporation. As held by this Court, in a catena of judgments that the loss of confidence occupies the primary factor and not the amount of money and that sympathy and generosity cannot be a factor which is permissible in law in such matters. When the employee is found guilty of theft, there is nothing wrong in the Corporation losing confidence or faith in such an employee and awarding punishment of removal. In such cases, there is no place of generosity or place of sympathy on the part of the judicial forums and interfering with the quantum of the punishment.

25. For the aforementioned reasons, we hold that the orders passed by learned Single Judge and as modified and affirmed by the learned Judges of the Division Bench in Writ Appeal No. 108 of 2005 dated 29.06.2005 deserves to be set aside. Accordingly, we do so.

26. In the result, the appeal filed by the appellant Corporation stands allowed and order of removal passed by the Labour Court is confirmed. However, there shall be no order as to costs.

**********, 0 , , 0 , ', 3] ] 
